379400
Thomas_Jordan_(general)
laterwork Thomas Jordan (September 30, 1819 &ndash;  November 27, 1895) was a Confederate a general and major operative in the network of Confederate spies during the Civil War.  A career soldier in the armies of three nations, he fought in numerous wars and rebellions in the States, Mexico, and Cuba.  Jordan was also a newspaper editor and author.Early life and careerThomas Jordan was born the oldest child of Gabriel and Elizabeth Betsey Seibert Jordan in the Luray Valley, Virginia, and is believed to have been educated in the local schools of County, Virginia (later County, Virginia).  In 1840, he graduated from the States Military Academy at West Point.  Jordan entered the army  as a second lieutenant in the 3rd U.S. Infantry, and was assigned to the garrison at Snelling, Minnesota.  He fought in the Second Florida War against the Seminole Indians.  He was among those soldiers who surprised and captured Chief Tiger Tail near Cedar Keys in November 1842. He was then assigned to frontier duty until 1846, when he was promoted to first lieutenant.  In the War, he served creditably at the battles of Palo Alto and Resaca de la Palma.  In 1847, he rose to the rank of captain and served as a quartermaster.  He remained at Vera Cruz for a year after the war in an administrative role.  He then was posted to various Southern garrisons and on the Coast.As early as 1860, he secretly began a pro-Southern spy network in D.C., that was particularly active in the period immediately after secession.  In early 1861, Jordan passed control of the espionage network to ONeal Greenhow, however, he continued to receive and evaluate her reports even when she was imprisoned (see Fishel, pp. 5976).Civil WarOn May 22, 1861, Jordan resigned from the U.S. Army and was commissioned as a captain in the fledgling Confederate army.  Promotion came rapidly, and by June 1861, he had become a lieutenant colonel and a staff officer, seeing duty at the Battle of Manassas as a full colonel and chief of staff under Beauregard.  He also was the armys general and accompanied President Davis on a post-battle tour of the field.Jordan subsequently accompanied Beauregard to the Western Theater to Kentucky.  During the advance from Mississippi, into Tennessee, he rendered valuable service in preparing the men for the of Shiloh, where he was conspicuous in efficiently managing the flow of orders to and from the various corps commanders and their respective staffs.For his actions at Shiloh, he was promoted to brigadier general on April 14, 1862, and served as chief of staff for General Bragg during his Kentucky Campaign.  When Beauregard was reassigned to the defense of South Carolina, Jordan accompanied his long-time friend and mentor as chief of staff for that department.  In May 1864, he was assigned to the command of the Third Military District of South Carolina.PostbellumImmediately after the Civil War, Jordan lived in Tennessee, where he published a critical review of the Confederate operations and administration in Harpers Magazine.  He was the editor of the Memphis Appeal newspaper in 1866.  In 1868, he co-published, with J. B. Pryor, a book entitled The Campaigns of Lieutenant-General Forrest.General Jordan, with his lengthy administrative and combat experience, became chief of staff of the Cuban insurgent army that same year.  In May 1869, as General-in-Chief of the Cuban Liberation Army, he landed at Mayar with 300 men, and with enough arms, ammunition and supplies for 6,000 additional men that he hoped would rise to join the rebellion.  In December 1869, Jordan became military head of the Cuban Mambi army who were fighting for Cuban independence from Spain in the Years War.  He scored a significant victory over superior enemy forces at Guaimaro in January 1870.  By then, extremely short of supplies, Jordan resigned from his Cuban post a month later and returned to the United States, his long military career over.He eventually settled in York City.  Continuing his interest in writing, Jordan published numerous articles on the Civil War and became the editor of the Mining Record.Jordan is buried in Mount Hope Cemetery in Hastings-on-Hudson in County, New York.See also*List of American Civil War generalsReferences(*Further reading* Antonio Pirala, Anales de la Guerra en Cuba (1895, 1896 and some from 1874) (Felipe Gonzlez Rojas, Madrid).  This is a detailed source for Jordan in the Cuban Ten Year War.* Some details of Jordans tactics in Cuba and its consequences can be found only slightly fictionalized in Calixto Enamorados 1917 Tiempos. Heroicos Persecucion. (Havana: Rambla, Bauza and Company). Calixto Enamorado was a Cuban General in the 1895-1898 war and was a son of Calixto Garcia. (See Spanamwar.com)* Fishel, Edwin C. 1996 The Secret War for the Union: The Untold Story of Military Intelligence in the Civil War.  Houghton Mifflin, Boston and New York ISBN 0-395-74281-1, ISBN 978-0-395-74281-5  This excellent and interesting book provides novel material on intelligence activities during the U.S. Civil War, and places it in clear and applicable context.External links*Virtual American Biographies: Thomas Jordan*Virginia Civil War: Brigadier General Thomas Jordan*JordanJordan
381289
Our_Airline
Our Airline (formerly known as Air Nauru) is the national airline of the Republic of Nauru. It operates scheduled international services to other Pacific islands and Australia. Its main base is International Airport.() Its head office is on the property of International Airport, District, and its operations office is in Brisbane, Queensland, Australia.(Contact Us. Our Airline. Retrieved on January 16, 2011. Head Office Nauru International Airport PO Box 40 Republic of Nauru Operations Office Level 3, 99 Creek Street Brisbane QLD 4000 ) History thumb|left|Former Air Nauru logoOur Airline was established as Air Nauru and started operations on 14 February 1970 with an experimental service between Nauru and Brisbane, using a chartered Falcon 20 registered VH-BIZ.(A brief flying history of Brisbane Airport retrieved 2007-09-22.)(Image of VH-BIZ retrieved 2007-09-22.) Regular scheduled services commenced after the delivery in January 1972 of the airlines first F28 Fellowship, registered C2-RN1( (a second Fellowship, C2-RN2, was subsequently placed into service as well). A 737-200 (C2-RN3) was added to the fleet in 1975(List of Boeing 737s operated by Air Nauru retrieved 2007-09-22.) and a 727-100 (C2-RN4) entered service on June 16, 1976.(History of Boeing 727-77QC c/n 20370 retrieved 2007-09-22.) Later in the 1970s the two Fellowships were sold to Niugini and more Boeings were added to the fleet. Image:Fokker 28 C2-RN1 Melbourne 301073-1-.jpg|thumb|right|Air Nauru Fellowship Nauru Chief at Melbournes Tullamarine Airport in October 1973By 1983 the fleet included seven aircraft, two Boeing 727-100s (the second was registered C2-RN7) and five Boeing 737-200s (C2-RN5, RN6, RN8 and RN9 having been added to the fleet);(Australian Aviation magazine 1984 Major Airline Directory. Aerospace Publications Pty. Ltd. ISSN 0813-0876.) since the entire population of Nauru at this time was about 8,000,(Population number derived from figures mentioned on Page 14 of this report retrieved 2007-09-22.) the airline was in the extraordinary position of having seating capacity equal to 10% of the Nauruan population. The airline also had a bad reputation for cancelling flights at the whim of its government owners, including using the Boeing 727s for low-level searches for Nauruan fisherman lost at sea while relatives on board were served alcohol by the flight attendants.(Micronesian Carriers to Stage a Comeback? Australian Aviation magazine, No. 127, April 1997, p60-61. Aerospace Publications Pty. Ltd. ISSN 0813-0876.) From this high point (at least in terms of fleet numbers) the airline gradually contracted in size, leasing some aircraft and selling others. Five years later in 1988 the fleet consisted of three Boeing 737-200s with the one remaining 727-100 leased out to Australia Airlines. At this time the airline was badly affected by an industrial dispute with its pilots and was operating without a set timetable, a situation that lasted for several months.(Australian Aviation magazine 1989 Major Airline Directory. Aerospace Publications Pty. Ltd. ISSN 0813-0876.) In 1993 two of the 737-200s were replaced by Boeing 737-400s (C2-RN10 and RN11), leaving the venerable C2-RN3 (kept because it was convertible between passenger and freight configurations) to soldier on for a little while longer.(Australian Aviation magazine 1994 Major Airline Directory. Aerospace Publications Pty. Ltd. ISSN 0813-0876.) The airline, by now only operating a single 737-400, was corporatised in July 1996 as the Nauru Air Corporation (NAC) headed by a new CEO without ties to the government, enabling it to operate independently in a commercial marketplace, free from most of its government constraints(.In 1998 Air Nauru came under the regulatory control of the Civil Aviation Authority of Australia and since then has been a select foreign carrier holding an Australian Air Operators Certificate (AOC). The islands regular economic troubles have caused the airline to lose large amounts of money, and on some occasions become insolvent. Its operations were also suspended for brief periods in the 1990s because of concerns raised by Australia over the airworthiness and safety record of its aircraft. Airline offices and equipment were also frequently repossessed by the Australian government for Naurus repeated defaults on foreign loans. The airline has been in dispute with the Bank of the United States since 2002, and in December 2005 the Court of Australia upheld an earlier decision to allow the bank to seize Air Naurus only aircraft, registered VH-RON, leaving Nauru and the island nation Kiribati without air services.() The aircraft was seized by creditors at Airport on December 18, 2005.(Suit costs Nauru its air link retrieved 2007-09-22.) Following the acquisition of a replacement aircraft (a Boeing 737-300) in mid-2006, the airline was rebranded as Our Airline and relaunched on 14 October 2006.(Our Airline is wholly owned by the state and has 144 employees (at March 2007).( On November 26, 2007, the airline launched its new website and online booking facility.http://www.ourairline.com.au/ Destinations ;Australia* Brisbane - International Airport;Fiji* Nadi - International Airport(on behalf of Kiribati from International Airport);Kiribati* Tarawa - International Airport;Nauru* Nauru - International Airport;Solomon Islands* Honiara - International AirportAir Nauru once had a remarkably comprehensive network in the Asia-Pacific, with service to Kong, Kagoshima, Taipei, Okinawa, Singapore, Guam, Saipan, Koror, Chuuk, Pohnpei, Kosrae, Majuro, Tarawa, Honolulu, Honiara, Vila, Noumea, Apia, Pago, Nadi, Tonga, Island, Niue, Raratonga, Auckland, Melbourne, Sydney, Brisbane, and Island.(http://www.airwaysmuseum.com/JL-Air%20Nauru%20story.htm)  The average load factor throughout the network was around 20%, with many flights carrying no or few passengers.(  The Nauru government subsidized the airline with profits from phosphate mining.  As the phosphate began to run out in the early 1990s, the airline began to stop service to unprofitable destinations.  Today services are provided from Nauru to Brisbane, Honiara, and Tarawa.  Our Airline currently operates a once weekly service from Brisbane through Honiara to Nauru, with an extension to Tarawa and Fiji.  The Tarawa extension was suspended from July 2008 to November 2009 because, along with the high fuel prices, operating the Tarawa flight was not profitable without a connecting destination.(http://www.ourairline.com.au/MediaRelease001.htm)(http://www.rnzi.com/pages/news.php?opread&id40540)Although it was reported in early 2007 that Our Airline would begin services between Nauru and Fiji in the very near future,() the airline will instead provide once weekly Tarawa to Nadi service on behalf of Kiribati beginning in November 2009.(http://www.ourairline.com.au/MediaRelease002.htm)Air Nauru also provides services on behalf of Air from Island to Brisbane, Newcastle, Melbourne, and Sydney.  A similar service was provided for Norfolk Airs predecessor, Jet Express, until Norfolk Jet Express went out of business on 4 June 2005.  After urgent discussions, Norfolk Island Administration secretary Peter Maywald announced on 7 June that Qantas and Air Nauru would jointly provide replacement services for at least 12 months. For the first week after liquidation, Airlines aircraft were used for services, following which it was planned that Qantas would operate the flights from 11 June using Air Naurus Boeing 737 VH-RON chartered by the Norfolk Island Government.(Air International, July 2005) This arrangement naturally ceased later that year when VH-RON was seized.  After Ozjet stopped flying on behalf of Norfolk Air, Norfolk Jet Expresss successor, in April 2009, Our Airline began operating the service.(http://www.aviationrecord.com/Home/ArticlesPages/tabid/58/articleType/ArticleView/articleId/2252/Norfolk-Air-launches-Our-Airline.aspx)FleetAs of January 2011 the Our Airline fleet consists of two 737:In March 2006, the government of the of China, reportedly as a reward for Naurus recognition of the ROC instead of the Republic of China,(Taiwan Switch Keeps Air Nauru Flying retrieved 2007-09-22.) assisted Air Nauru with the purchase of a second-hand 737, which was expected to be in operation by mid-2006, after several logistical delays. This purchase was put on hold in May 2006 due to OzJet and Pacific having started on the routes formerly operated by Air Nauru.() In October 2006 the new Boeing plane came into service.ReferencesExternal links**Our Airline Fleet Detail*Photo of the new Our Airline plane designAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineja:AirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlineAirlinezh:
382289
Wirksworth
Wirksworth is a small market town in Derbyshire, England, with a population of over 9,000.The population of the Wirksworth area including Cromford, Bolehill and Middleton-by-Wirksworth is about 12,000. Wirksworth is listed in the Book in 1086.((Outlying farms or berwicks were Cromford, Middleton, Hopton, Wellesdene(sic), Carsington, Ireton and Callow) Within it is the source of the Ecclesbourne. The town was granted its market charter by Edward I in 1306. The market is held every Tuesday in the market square in the busy town centre. Perhaps the finest building in Wirksworth is St. Marys Church, which was one of the first centres of Christian teaching in England and is believed to date back to around 653 AD. The ancient Wirksworth Hundred or Wapentake was named after the town.Wirksworth is on the border of Amber Valley and Derbyshire Dales districtsHistorically, it developed as a centre for lead mining, but then later on, it branched into quarrying.Many of the institutions in the area have connections with the Gell family, of Hall, whose most famous member was John Gell, 1st Baronet, who fought on Parliaments side in the Civil War. One of his predecessors, Anthony Gell, founded the local grammar school, and one of his successors, Phillip Gell, opened the curiously named Gellia (possibly named in allusion to the Roman Via Appia), a road from the familys lead mines around Wirksworth to the smelter in Cromford. (In the middle of the last century the Anthony Gell School became one of the first comprehensive schools and remains a model for local, community-based education in a rural area)Wirksworth is rumoured to be the ancient Roman town of Lutudarum, although there is much speculation as to the exact whereabouts/origins of this settlement. This used to be the capital of the area and up until the later Revolution, the town was the 5th biggest in Derbyshire, after Derby, Chesterfield, Matlock and Buxton. In 2009, a small team of volunteers undertook a project to discover a Roman fort near the vicarage but the attempt was unsuccessful.(http://www.stosythscollege.com/WRP.htm)Early historyDuring the Carboniferous period (between about 359 and 299 million years ago), Wirksworth was under tropical oceans, thus giving it vast quantities of limestone for quarrying. There is an extensive history of quarrying, which scars the surrounding of the town, whilst Dene Quarry is still operational in the neighbouring village of Cromford.Close to Wirksworth in the Carsington Pastures is the Dream Cave, where the remains of a Rhino were found in the late 19th century.The area may well have been visited by erectus as long as 150,000 years ago, during warm inter-glacial periods. An Acheulean handaxe from the  Paleolithic has been found at Hopton nearby. From other remains found in the county there would seem to have been human presence at least periodically until the Romans arrived and found a thriving lead industry.Perhaps the finest building in Wirksworth is St. Marys Church, which was one of the first centres of Christian teaching in England and is believed to date back to around 653 AD. The ancient Wirksworth Hundred or Wapentake was named after the town. There is a tiny carving in the church of a miner with his pick and kibble or basket. This carving is also claimed by nearby Bonsall, where it was found. The ore was washed out by means of a sieve, the iron wire for which had been drawn in Hathersage since the Ages. Smelting was carried out in boles, hence the name Bolehill. The lead industry, the miner, the ore and the waste, were known collectively as towd man.One of the rectors of Wirksworth was Draycot who served from 1535 to his imprisonment in 1560. Draycott was the judge at the heresy trial of Waste.(Gordon Goodwin, Draycot, Anthony (d. 1571), rev. Andrew A. Chibi, Oxford Dictionary of National Biography, Oxford University Press, 2004 accessed 28 Feb 2009)Lead miningIt is not known when lead mining began, but certainly it was flourishing in Roman times.(There has been some discussion about the whereabouts of a Roman city known as Lutudarum. Anton Shone has recently published a well-referenced paper on the possible location of Lutudarm: Origins and History of Wirksworth: Lutudarum and the Peak District before the Norman Conquest http://www.conferencesdirect.co.uk/clacton/Lutudarum.pdf) A possible Roman road led to a ford between Duffield and Milford and thence to the garrison at Derventio (Derby) and to Rykneld Street and possibly but not certainly, to the ports on the Humber. In Anglo-Saxon times there were many mines owned by the Abbey of Repton. Three lead mines are identified in the entry for Wirksworth in the Domesday Book.(Domesday Book: A Complete Translation. London: Penguin, 2003. ISBN 0-14-143994-7 p.741)Every man had the right (and still does) to dig for ore wherever he chose, except in churchyards, gardens or roadways. All that was necessary to stake a claim was to place ones stowce or winch on the site and extract enough ore to pay tribute to the barmaster.Henry VIII granted a charter to hold a miners court in the town called the Bar Moot, which still exists, though the present building dates from 1814. Within it is a brass dish for measuring the levy which was due to the Crown. Even into the 20th century, the punishment for stealing from a mine was to have ones hand nailed to the stowce. One then had the choice of tearing oneself loose or starving to death. The Court is still held today and controls all matters of lead mining.There is a tiny carving in Wirksworth Church, taken from Bonsall Church during a restoration project and never returned, of a miner with his pick and kibble or basket. The carving is known as tOwd Man of Bonsall. The ore was washed out by means of a sieve, the iron wire for which had been drawn in Hathersage since the Ages. Smelting was carried out in boles, hence the name Bolehill. The lead industry, the miner, the ore and the waste, were known collectively as towd man.By the 18th century there were many thousands of mines, all worked individually. Defoe(Daniel Defoe, (c. 1724) A tour thro the whole island of Great Britain, divided into circuits or journies: Letter 8, Part 2: The Peak District, Reprnted: London: JM Dent and Co, 1927 http://www.visionofbritain.org.uk/text/chap_page.jsp;jsessionidC9A3F9615D29E8D480CBECF9ADEB6DEE?t_idDefoe&c_id29) gives an eye-witness account of a lead miners family and of the miner himself at work. At this time, the Lead Company was formed which brought in the finance to dig deeper mines, with drainage channels, called soughs, and bring in Newcomen steam engine pumps.There was a workhouse in Wirksworth from 1724 to 1829. Called Babington House, it was located on Green Hill () and housed 60 inmates.(Higginbotham, P. (2007), Workhouses of the Midlands, Tempus, Stroud. Page 27. ISBN 978-0-7524-4488-8)TextilesIn 1777, Arkwright leased the land and premises of a corn mill from Philip Gell of Hopton and converted it to spin cotton, using his frame. The Mill (as the mill came to be called) was the first cotton mill in the world to use a engine, which it used to replenish the millpond that drove the mills waterwheel.()() This mill was adjacent to another, the Speedwell, owned by John Dalley, a local merchant. These mills still stand close together at Millers Green next to the Derby road.The Haarlem Mill was sublet in 1792, when Arkwrights son, Richard, began to sell off the familys property assets in his move toward banking. It was given that name in 1815, when it was converted to weaving tape, by Madely, Hackett and Riley, who had established the Haarlem Tape Works in Derby in 1806. In 1879 the Wheatcroft family, who were producing tape at the Speedwell Mill, expanded into Haarlem.The two mills together employed 230 people, and it was said that their weekly output equalled the circumference of the earth, and that Wirksworth was the primary producer of tape for Whitehall.Both mills still exist. The Haarlem produces narrow fabrics, while the Speedwell produces cavity wall and roof insulation.Literary connectionThe Haarlem Mill is said to be the model for the mill in Eliots Mill on the Floss (although it is arguably also based on somewhere down south).The Snowfield in George Eliots Bede is also said to be based in Wirksworth; Dinah Morris, an important character in that novel, is based on Eliots aunt, who lived in Wirksworth and whose husband ran the silk mill, now Wirksworth Heritage Centre.One of H. Lawrences houses (Mountain Cottage), in which he lived with Frieda in 191819, stands below the road on the outskirts of Middleton-by-Wirksworth, approximately 1 miles northwest of Wirksworth. Lawrence also reputedly spent a lot of time at Woodland Cottage on the opposite side of New Road. While staying in Middleton in the bitter winter of 191819, Lawrence wrote the short story A Wintry Peacock (published in 1921).Television connectionWirksworth was the prime location of ITVs Medicine (2003), as well as playing occasional roles in its forerunner Practice. More recently, part of Mobile was filmed on a train on the Valley Railway, and a large amount of an episode of the BBCs Casualty was also filmed here.Scientific connectionBennet was curate of Wirksworth in the 18th century and did important early work in electricity, in association with Darwin. There is a memorial plaque in Wirksworth Church and a portrait by an unknown artist.(*)The surgeon and author Frederick Treves was in medical practice in the town, 187779 and a house on Coldwell Street is named after him.(http://www.wirksworth.org.uk/X186.htm)Wirksworth todayDistricts of Wirksworth include Yokecliffe, Gorsey Bank, Bolehill, Mountford and Millers Green. Bolehill, although technically a hamlet in its own right in Wirksworths suburbs, is the oldest and most northern part of the town, while Yokecliffe is a fairly new estate in the western area of the town. Modern houses have recently been built in the Three Trees area and at the bottom of Steeple Grange, this housing estate is called Spring Close.There are five schools in Wirksworth:(Wirksworth Federation Infant Schools) (of England and county infants, and regular combined but on two sites), Wirksworth Junior School, Anthony Gell School and Callow Park College. Anthony Gell was an outstanding local man who was requested to build a grammar school for Agnes Fearne on her death. The original site for the school is now a private house on the edge of the churchyard. The current school is now a thriving 11-18 comprehensive on a larger site beside the Hannage Brook. It currently has approximately 800 pupils, including its Sixth Form. There are four school houses, each named after a significant local: Fearne (Agnes Fearne), Arkwright (Richard Arkwright), Wright (Wright of Derby), and Gell (after Anthony Gell himself). The current headteacher is Mr David L. Baker, who took up the position in September 2006. Most pupils come from Wirksworth itself, and the surrounding villages of Middleton, Carsington, Brassington, Ireton, Turnditch, Bath, Cromford and Crich. The Anthony Gell School is a College.In the Derbyshire Dales district, the town is the second largest in terms of both population and area after Matlock.Fanny Shaws Playing Field, just out of the centre of town, is the principal recreation area for the north of the town. It houses a new skate park and play area. In the south of the town, there is the Rec, where there is another childrens play area, along with cricket and football pitches.The town is also a popular location from which to explore the Derbyshire Peak District and consequently features a range of accommodation for visitors. Many of these buildings are historic, such as the 18th century Old Manor House on Coldwell Street or the Old Lock-Up guest house which dates from 1842. Moreover, the town features a large and very grand coach house, which was originally built for Sir Richard Arkwright, but has now been converted into a holiday cottage.(Marmaduke Coachhouse holiday cottage, accessed 10 October 2008)The Wirksworth Heritage Centre is a wonderful centre just off Market Place in Crown Yard (adjacent to Crown Yard Kitchen). Within, is an extensive history of Wirksworth, from its prehistoric Dream Cave and Rhinos, through its Roman and lead mining histories, all the way to the modern era.right|thumb|Well or tap dressing in Wirksworth in the 1860s(Wirksworths dressing was adapted after the arrival of piped water so that not only wells but also taps were decorated. Although the resulting creations are still advertised as well dressings.(1860s picture, PictureThePast, accessed August 2009) and carnival(carnival site)thumb|left|250px|The Wirksworth Stone in St Marys Church, an early stone carving depicting scenes from the life of ChristA one-place-study of Wirksworth and five miles around is available on the web (see external link below). This includes: census, church monuments, crimes, church wardens accounts, maps, a transcription of Inces pedigrees , monumental inscriptions, old photos, parish registers and wills.;Events*Early June: The Wirksworth Well Dressing and Carnival*First Sunday after the 8th of September:  The Clypping of the Church,  an ancient custom, still observed, where the congregation joins hands to completely encircle the church.*September: The Wirksworth Festival For three weeks in September Wirksworth throws open its doors and invites you in to see some great art in some fascinating places.Inspirational work from international and national artists is shown alongside the very best local and regional artists.Some visitor attractions include:* Valley Railway* Grange Light Railway*  Wirksworth Heritage Centre*District National ParkNotable residentsThe oldest living man in Britain, the Rev Thomas Reginald Reg Dean, lives at a care home in the town. Born at Tunstall on 4 November 1902, he has lived in Derbyshire since 1947 and served as a minister at the United Reformed Churches in Wirksworth and nearby Matlock for some 20 years until his retirement in 1980. He also helped form the Dalesmen Male Voice Choir in the late 1980s and is now life president of this organisation.(http://www.thisisderbyshire.co.uk/news/Britain-s-oldest-man-108-reasons-celebrate/article-2842339-detail/article.html)ReferencesExternal links*Wirksworth Dot Net - Community web site*The Wirksworth Heritage Centre* Discover Derbyshire and the Peak District: Wirksworth*Wirksworth Parish Records 1600-1900*Ecclesbourne Valley Railway*Anthony Gell School*Wirksworth Federation of Infant Schools*St. Osyths Wirksworth Roman Project*Wirksworth Festivalit:Wirksworthnl:Wirksworthpl:Wirksworth
383652
Telluric_current
A telluric current (from Latin tells, earth), or Earth current,(In Chisholm, H. (1910). Earth current. The Encyclopdia britannica: A dictionary of arts, sciences, literature and general information. New York: The Encyclopdia Britannica Company. Page 813-816.) is an current which moves underground or through the sea. Telluric currents result from both natural causes and human activity, and the discrete currents interact in a complex pattern. The currents are low frequency and travel over large areas at or near the surface of Earth.DescriptionTelluric currents are phenomena observed in the Earths crust and mantle. In September 1862, an experiment to specifically address Earth currents was carried out in the Munich Alps (Lamont, 1862). The currents are primarily induced by changes in the outer part of the magnetic field, which are usually caused by interactions between the wind and the magnetosphere or solar radiation effects on the ionosphere.  Telluric currents flow in the surface layers of the earth. The electric potential on the Earths surface can be measured at different points, enabling us to calculate the magnitudes and directions of the telluric currents and thence the Earths conductance. These currents are known to have diurnal characteristics wherein the general direction of flow is towards the sun.(, D. L. Hings, Telluric current responsive device having spaced conductors for positioning adjacent the Earths surface)(Jahr, Emil,   Method of utilizing electrical earth currents.) Telluric currents will move between each half of the terrestrial globe at all times. Telluric currents move equator-ward (daytime) and pole-ward (nighttime). Both the telluric and magnetotelluric methods are used for exploring the structure beneath the Earths surface (such as in industrial prospecting).  For mineral exploration the targets are any subsurface structure with a distinguishable resistivity from its surroundings.  Uses include geothermal exploration, mining exploration, petroleum exploration, mapping fault zones, ground water exploration and monitoring, investigating magma chambers, and investigating tectonic boundaries. Telluric currents can be harnessed to produce a useful low voltage current by means of earth batteries. Such devices were used for telegraph systems in the United States as far back as 1859. There is a major hotspot near Boston Common that actually diverted the construction of the Western Hemispheres first subway system from Boylston to Park St in 1897.In industrial prospecting activity that uses the telluric current method, electrodes are properly located on the ground to sense the difference between locations caused by the oscillatory telluric currents.(Dobrin, Introduction to Geophysical Prospecting, McGraw Hill (3rd Ed. 1976) pg. 592.)(, C. L. Kober, Passive geophysical prospection system based upon the detection of the vertical electric field component of telluric currents and method therefore) It is recognized that a frequency window (LFW) exists when telluric currents pass through the substrata. In the frequencies of the LFW, the earth acts as a conductor.(Burrell et al., Pulse Propagation in Lossy Media Using the Low Frequency Window for Video Pulsed Radar Application, Proceedings of the IEEE, Vol. 67, No. 7, July 1979, pgs. 981-990.)In fictionIn Hope Hodgsons novel Night Land, the Earth-Current, a powerful telluric current, is the source of power for the Last Redoubt, the arcology home of man after the Sun has died. Hodgsons Earth-Current is a spiritual force as well as an electrical one, warding off the monsters of the Night Lands. The main plot of the novel Pendulum by Eco revolves around search for the Ombilicus Mundi (Latin: The Navel of the World), the mystic Center of The Earth which is supposed to be a certain point from where a person could control the energies and shapes of the earth thus reforming it at will. The novel takes this even further by suggesting that monuments like the Tower are nothing more than giant antennae to catalyze these energies.Telluric currents are also used as a means of travel by the woman Hsien-Ko and her minions in the Who Missing Adventures novel, Shadow of Weng-Chiang, by David A McIntee.Telluric currents  along what are effectively  lines  are discovered to be a means of mysterious communication in Thomas Pynchons and Dixon and are associated with the books Chinese-Jesuit sub plot. As with Eco, cited above, Pynchon also reflects upon hollow earth theories in this work.See also* induced current* resistivity tomography* Magnetotellurics* Seismo-electromagnetics References  Further reading ;General* Telluric current   A Dictionary of Earth Sciences. Ed. Ailsa Allaby and Michael Allaby. Oxford University Press, 1999.* The Earths Electrical Environment. US National Academies Press, Commission on Physical Sciences, Mathematics and Applications, 1986.** Louis J. Lanzerotti and Giovanni P. Gregori, Telluric Currents: The Natural Environment and Interactions with Man-made Systems, Chapter 16.* Lamont, J. V., Der Erdstrom und der Zusammen desselben mit dem Erdmagnetismus. Leopold-Voss-Verlag, Leipzig und Muenchen, 1862.;Other* J.R., On the relation between telluric currents and the earths magnetic field, Geophysics, 19, 281-289, 1954.* Gideon, D. N., A. T. Hopper, and R. E. Thompson, Earth current effects on buried pipelines : analysis of observations of telluric gradients and their effects. Battelle Memorial Institute and the American Gas Association. New York, 1970.*  Seeley, Robert L., Tippens, C. L., and  Hoover, Donald B., Circuitry of the U.S.G.S. telluric profiler. U.S. Geological Survey open-file report ; 87-332, Denver, Colo. : U.S. Dept. of the Interior, Geological Survey.* Berdichevski, Mark Naumovich, Elektricheskaya razvedka metodom telluricheskikh tokov. Boston Spa, Yorkshire : National Lending Library for Science and Technology, 1963. LCCN 92140338 (Tr., Electrical surveying by means of telluric currents; Translation by J.E.S. Bradley)* Hoover, Donald B., Pierce, H. A.,  and Merkel, D. C., Telluric traverse and self potential data release in the vicinity of the Pinson Mine, Humboldt County, Nevada. U.S. Geological Survey open-file report; 86-341.  U.S. Dept. of the Interior, Geological Survey, 1986.External links;General* Gaetan Chavalier, The Earths Electrical Surface Potential: A summary of present understanding. January 2007.* Electrical Conductivity : Models of the Crust and Mantle.  PDF* MTNet, Scientists engaged in the study of the Earth using electromagnetic methods, principally the magnetotelluric technique (magnetotellurics).* Telluric current in Hydrocarbon Reservoirs, Discussion on the occurrence of Telluric currents in Oil and Gas reservoirs and their nature and application.* Gummow, R. A., Telluric and Ocean Current Effects on Buried Pipeline and their Cathodic Protection Systems. CORRENG Consulting Service, Inc. December 3, 2002.* Sinha, M. C., et al., Applications of 3-Dimensional Electromagnetic Induction by Sources in the Ocean, ISO-3D. RTD Project, MAST III (Area C: Marine Technology). MAS3-CT97-0120telluriquehi:stroomja:tellurycznetelricasv:Jordstrmmarzh:
386616
1891_in_Canada
Events from the year 1891 in Canada.Events* February 21 - The first Mining Disaster occurs killing 125.* March 5 - Federal election:  Sir A. Macdonalds Conservatives win a fourth consecutive majority* April 27 - Peters becomes premier of Edward Island, replacing Neil McLeod* June 6 - Prime Minister Sir John A. Macdonald dies in office* June 16 - Sir Abbott becomes prime minister following the death of Sir A. Macdonald* September 29 - McGreevy is expelled from the House of Commons due to corruption.* November 7 - The election of the North-West Legislative Assembly* December 10 - The Pacific Railway is extended to Edmonton* December 21 - Sir de Boucherville becomes premier of Quebec for the second time, replacing Mercier* The Council of New Brunswick is abolishedSport* The Canadian Rugby Football Union is renamed the Canadian Rugby UnionBirthsJanuary to June* January 6 - Buck, politician and long-time leader of the Party of Canada (d.1973)* January 26 - Penfield, neurosurgeon (d.1976)* April 1 - Nixon, politician and 13th of Ontario (d.1961)* May 3 - John Bentley, politician (d.1983)* June 13 - Brunelle, politician and lawyer (d.1950)July to December* July 12 - Raynault, politician and of Montreal (d.1984)* August 30 - Jamieson, educator* September 16 - Winnefred Bertrand, supercentenarian, oldest living Canadian and oldest verified living recognized woman at the time of her death (d.2007)* October 30 - Mackenzie, golfer* November 14 - Banting, medical scientist, doctor and Nobel laureate (d.1941)* December 10 - Alexander, 1st Earl Alexander of Tunis, military commander and General of Canada (d.1969)* December 25 - Ross Macdonald, politician, of the Canadian House of Commons and 21st Lieutenant Governor of Ontario (d.1976)Deaths* January 4 - Labelle, priest and settler (b.1833)* January 21 - Lavalle, musician and composer (b.1842)* May 31 - Dorion, politician and jurist (b.1818)* June 6 - A. Macdonald, politician and 1st Minister of Canada (b.1815)au Canada
387054
Polkowice
website                 http://www.polkowice.plPolkowice  (, 1937&ndash;1945 Heerwegen) is a town in south-western Poland with 22,279 inhabitants (2006). It is situated in Silesian Voivodeship (from 1975&ndash;1998 it was in the former Voivodeship). It is the seat of County and of the smaller administrative district called Polkowice.The town is located in an industrial copper-mining area, with a copper-processing plant operating nearby.The region passed to Poland from Germany in 1945 following decisions approved at the Conference. For more information on the general history of the region, see Silesia.  Education * Lower Silesian College of Enterprise and Technology (Dolnolska Wysza Szkoa Przedsibiorczoci i Techniki) Nearest Airport The nearst airport is Strachowice Airport (WRO) Wroclaw, Poland and it is located 45 Miles from Polkowice (approx. 76 KM). Sport * Polkowice - football team (1st league in season 2003/2004 begin_of_the_skype_highlighting2003/2004end_of_the_skype_highlighting)* Aquapark Polkowice - womens basketball team, 3rd place in Torell Basket Liga in 2004/2005 season* - Polsat - Polkowice - Cyclism Team Professional Continental Team in 2011bg:de:Polkowiceeo:Polkowiceit:Polkowicejv:Polkowicecsb:Polkowicelv:Polkovicelt:Polkovicsnl:Polkowicepl:Polkowicept:Polkowicero:Polkowiceru:sk:Polkowiceszl:Polkowicyuk:war:Polkowice
387623
Polish_American
A Polish American (), is a citizen of the United States of Polish descent. There are an estimated 10 million Polish Americans, representing about 3.2% of the population of the United States. No distinction is made in the American census between ethnically Polish Americans and descendants of non-ethnic Poles, such as Jews or Ukrainians, who were born in the territory of Poland and considered themselves Polish nationals. Therefore, some say, of the 10 million Polish Americans, only a certain portion are of Polish ethnic descent.  On the other hand, many ethnic Poles when entering the US from 17951917, when Poland did not exist, did not identify themselves as ethnic Poles and instead identified themselves as either German, Austrian or Russian (this pertained to the nations occupying Poland from 17951917).   Therefore, the actual amount of Americans of at least partial Polish ancestry, could be well over 10 million. Polish Americans are the largest European ethnic group in the United States of Slavic and European origin.  The first Poles in North America arrived in the Virginia Colony in 1608.  Early Polish immigrants of note included Sodowski, Puaski and Kociuszko, who were active in America around the time of the Revolutionary War.  Overall, more than one million Poles immigrated to the United States, primarily during the late 19th and early 20th centuries. Exact immigration numbers are unknown. Owing to the partitions of PolishLithuanian Commonwealth, the Polish state did not exist at the time when the precursor to the and Naturalization Service classified immigrants according to country of origin rather than by ethnicity. The three partitions gave rise to the terms Russian, German and Austrian for Polish immigrants to the United States.According to the United States Census, 667,414 Americans over 5 years old reported Polish as the language spoken at home, which is about 1.4% of the census groups who speak a language other than English or 0.25% of the U.S. population.HistoryEarly settlersThe first Poles in North America came to the Jamestown in the Virginia Colony in 1608, twelve years before the Pilgrims arrived in Massachusetts.(Richmond, From Da to Yes, p.  72)  These early settlers were brought as skilled artisans by the English soldieradventurer Captain John Smith, and included a glass blower, a pitch and tar maker, a soap maker and a timberman.(  There are known few names of them: Micha owicki, Zbigniew Stefaski, Jan Bogdan, Jan Mata, Stanisaw Sadowski.(Praca zbiorowa, Polska informator, Interpress, Warszawa 1977) These skills were vital to the new settlement, which was evidenced when the House of Burgesses met in 1619.  During their deliberations, the House excluded the Polish community and threatened their rights.  In reaction, the Poles launched the first recorded strike in the New World.() In need of their industries, the House of Burgesses extended the rights of Englishmen to the Poles (which included some Prussians.)  As a result, Poles established the first bilingual schools in the New World, teaching both Polish and English, which later would be expanded to include Latin and German as well.(  The political and economic power of the Polish community declined, however, with the increased colonial warfare with Native Americans.(Age of RevolutionDetroit.jpg|thumb|150px|right|Kociuszko statue, Detroit Later Polish immigrants included Jakub Sadowski, who in 1770, settled in New York with his sonsthe first Europeans to penetrate as far as Kentucky. It is said that Ohio, was named after him.()  As the State of Poland entirely lost its independence at the end of the 18th century due to military partitions by foreign powers, Polish patriots, among them Puaski and Kociuszko, left for America to fight for American Independence.Kazimierz Puaski served as Brigadier-general in the Army and commanded its cavalry.(  He saved General Washingtons army at the Battle of Brandywine and died leading a cavalry charge at the Battle of Savannah, aged 31.(  Puaski later become known as the father of American cavalry.(  He is also commemorated in Pulaski Day and the Day Parade.Kociuszko was a professional military officer who served in the Continental Army in 1776 and was instrumental in the victories at the of Saratoga and West Point.(  He led the failed Polish insurrection against Russia which ended with the Partition of Poland in 1795.(  Puaski and Kociuszko both have statues in Washington, D.C.(Post-American RevolutionFile:Pomnik Czynu Zbrojnego 04.jpg|thumb|Monument of Andrzej Pityski Contribution of Polish Americans to war 1920 founded in Warsaw by Polish AmericansDuring the of Poland (17951918), the Polish nation was forced to define itself as a disjointed and oppressed minority within three neighboring empires: Russian, Prussian and Austrian.  The Polonia community in the United States, however, was founded on a unified national culture and society. Consequently, it assumed the place and moral role of the fourth province.()The largest wave of Polish immigration to America occurred in the early 20th century. Officially, more than 1.5 million Polish immigrants were processed at Island, between 1899 and 1931. In addition, many Polish immigrants arrived at the port of Baltimore. The actual numbers of ethnically Polish arrivals at that time would be difficult to estimate due to prolonged occupation of Poland by neighboring states, with total loss of its international status. Similar circumstances developed in the following decades: during the Nazi German occupation of Poland in World War II; and further, in the communist period, under the Soviet military and political dominance with re-drawn national borders.(Between 1870 and 1914, more than 3.6 million people departed from Polish territories (of whom 2.6 arrived in the U.S.)(Aleksader Gieysztor, History of Poland (Warsaw: Polish Scientific Publishers, 1968) Pg. 585) Serfdom was abolished in Prussia in 1808, in the Austro-Hungarian Empire in 1848 and in Czarist Russia, in 1861. In the late 19th century, the beginnings of industrialization, commercial agriculture and a population boom, that exhausted available land, transformed Polish peasant-farmers into migrant-laborers. Racial discrimination and unemployment drove them to emigrate.(Initially, the Polish emigrants to America came mainly from the German part of the partitioned Poland, where they were targeted by Bismarcks official policy of anti-Catholic Kulturkampf. Only after 1900, the Prussian Poles were outnumbered by immigrants from Austrian and Russian Poland. 240px|thumb|left|Polish immigrants working on the farm, 1909.Also, the Russian section of the partition, Poland, was undergoing considerable industrialization, particularly the textile capital of d, the Manchester of Imperial Russia and the iron-foundries of Trybunalski. The decline of these areas, after the War and the 1905 Russian Revolution, led to a mass exodus of laborers, first to Germany, Denmark and France, then eventually to the U.S., Canada, Brazil and Argentina. At its peak, in 19121913, annual emigration to the U.S., from the Polish provinces of the Empire, exceeded 112,345 (including large numbers of Jews, Lithuanians and Belarusians).(In the Polish provinces of Austrian Galicia, chiefly rural, but with laborers in the mines and factories of Bohemia, Silesia, Moravia and Austria, land shortages, crop failures and the loosening of travel restrictions led to another exodus, mainly to Germany, Austria proper, France and the United States.() The United States Census recorded more than 900,000 new immigrants, who spoke Polish.(ImmigrationPolish/Russian: The Nation of Polonia)According to the United States Census, 667,414 Americans of age 5 years and older, reported Polish as the language spoken at home, which is about 1.4% of people who speak languages other than English or 0.25% of the U.S. population.OccupationsFile:1922 Detroit store.jpg|thumb|220px|Polish-American grocery, 1922, Michigan.Lopata (1976) argues that Poles differed from most ethnics in America, in several ways. First, they did not plan to remain permanently and become Americanized. Instead, they came temporarily, to earn money, invest, and wait for the right opportunity to return. Their intention was to ensure for themselves a desirable social status in the old world. However, many of the temporary migrants had decided to become permanent Americans. Following World War I, the reborn Polish state began the process of economic recovery and many Poles tried to return. Since all the ills of life in Poland could be blamed on foreign occupation, the migrants did not resent the Polish upper classes. Their relation with the mother country was generally more positive than among migrants of other European countries. It is estimated that 30% of the Polish emigrants from lands occupied by the Russian Empire returned home. The return rate for non-Jews was closer to 5060%. More than two-thirds of emigrants from Polish Galicia (freed from under the Austrian occupation) also returned.((American employers considered Polish immigrants better suited than Italians, for arduous manual labor in coal-mines, slaughterhouses and steel mills, particularly in the primary stages of steel manufacture. Consequently, Polish migrants were recruited for work in the coal mines of Pennsylvania and the heavy industries (steel mills, iron foundries, slaughterhouses, oil and sugar refineries), of the Great Lakes cities of Chicago, Pittsburgh, Detroit, Buffalo, Milwaukee and Cleveland.Polish communities as part of urban AmericaImage:Gateway Theatre (Chicago).jpg||thumb|220px|The Gateway Theatre, seat of the Foundation, in Park, Chicago. The Baroque spire is modeled on the Castle, Warsaw.Image:Polish Market in Chicago.jpeg|thumb|220px|Bobaks Polish supermarket in Chicago. Image:Greenpoint Brooklyn.JPG|thumb|220px|Brooklyn, considered the center of New York Citys Little Poland.The vast majority of Polish immigrants settled in urban areas, attracted by jobs in industry. The minority, by some estimates, only ten percent, settled in rural areas.One of the most notable in size of the urban Polish American communities is in Chicago and its surrounding suburbs. Almanac of American Politics 2004 states that Even today, in Archer Heights (a neighborhood of Chicago), you can scarcely go a block without hearing someone speaking Polish. The York City metropolitan area is home to the second largest community of Polish Americans.()There are about 9-10 million Americans of Polish descent. Chicago bills itself as the largest Polish city outside of Poland, with approximately 185,000 language speakers.(The Polish Community in Metro Chicago:A Community Profile of Strengths and Needs, A Census 2000 Report, published by the Polish American Association June 2004, p.  18) The influence of Chicagos Polish community is demonstrated by the numerous Polish-American organizations: the Museum of America, American Association, American Congress, National Alliance, Falcons and the Highlanders Alliance of North America. In addition, Illinois has more than one million people that are of Polish descent, the third largest ethnic group after the German and Americans.  Chicagos Polish community is concentrated along the citys Northwest and Southwest Sides, along Milwaukee and Archer Avenues, respectively. Chicagos of Polonia festival is celebrated at the Foundation, in Jefferson Park, every Day weekend. Nearly 3 million people of Polish descent live in the area between Chicago and Detroit, including Indiana, a part of the metropolitan area.  Further north, along Michigans coast, Milwaukees Polish population has always been overshadowed by the citys more prominent German inhabitants. Nevertheless, the citys once numerous Polish community built a number of magnificent Polish Cathedrals, among them the magnificent of St. Josaphat and St. Stanislaus Catholic Church. Many Polish residents and businesses are still located in the Lincoln Village neighborhood.  The city is also home to Fest, the largest Polish festival in the United States, where Polish Americans from all over Wisconsin and nearby Chicago, come to celebrate Polish Culture, through music, food and entertainment.() Michigans Polish population of more than 850,000, is third, behind that of York and Illinois. Polish Americans make up 8.6% of Michigans total population. The city of Detroit had a very large Polish community, which historically settled in Poletown and Hamtramck. Poletown was cleared of residents, to make way for the Motors Assembly plant. Much of Hamtramcks Polish population moved on to the suburbs and have been replaced by Arab American and African American citizens, in the 1980s and 1990s. The Polish influence is still felt throughout the entire Detroit area, especially the suburb of Wyandotte, which is slowly emerging as the major center of Polish American activities in the state. An increase in new immigration from Poland is helping to bolster the parish community of Our Lady of Mount Carmel and a host of Polish American civic organizations, located within the city of Wyandotte. Also, the Detroit suburb of Troy is home to the American Polish Cultural Center, where the Polish-American Sports Hall of Fame has over 200 artifacts on display from over 100 inductees, including Musial and Krzyzewski.( ) Marys Preparatory, a high school in Orchard Lake with historically Polish roots, sponsors a popular annual Polish County Fair that bills itself as Americas Largest High School Fair.The city of Ohio has a large Polish community, especially in historic Village, as part of its Warszawa Section. Poles from this part of Cleveland migrated to the suburbs, such as Garfield Heights, Parma and Seven Hills. The more affluent of Clevelands Polish community live in Brecksville, Independence and Broadview Heights. Many of these Poles return to their Polish roots, by attending masses at St. Stanislaus Church, on East 65th Street and Baxter Avenue. Poles in Cleveland celebrate the annual Harvest Festival, which is usually held at the end of August. It features polka music, Polish food and all things Polish. Clevelands other Polish section is in Tremont, located on Clevelands west side. The home parishs are St. John Cantius and St. John Kanty. They also host Polish celebratory events in Cleveland.  Poles, in Cleveland, were instrumental in forming the Federal Savings and Loan, in 1938. After seeing fellow Poles discriminated against by Clevelands banks, Ben Stefanski formed Third Federal. Today the Stefanski family still controls the bank. Unlike Clevelands KeyBank and City Corp., which have their headquarters in Cleveland, Third Federal is on Broadway Avenue in the Village neighborhood. Third Federal Savings and Loan is in the top 25 saving and loan institutions in the United States. In 2003, they acquired a Florida banking company and have branches in Florida and Ohio.Other industrial cities, with major Polish communities, include: Buffalo (New York), a city whose Polish neighborhood dispersed into the suburbs and became integrated; Philadelphia, Columbus (Ohio), Boston, Baltimore, New Britain (Connecticut), Portland (Oregon), Minneapolis, Rochester (New York), Angeles, Francisco, Pittsburgh and Duluth (Minnesota). Despite the lack of new large-scale Polish immigration, some cities are emerging with strong Polish American communities. Bend, Indiana, has a large Polish population for a mid-sized city. Milwaukee and Denver experienced major increases in their Polish populations, during the last 10 years. There is also a tendency among Poles from Chicago and Brooklyn, to move to Florida.Luzerne County, in Pennsylvania, is the only county in the United States, where a plurality of residents state their ancestry as Polish. (See: of American ancestries) This includes the cities of Wilkes-Barre, Pittston, Hazelton and Nanticoke. Many of the immigrants were drawn to this area, because of the mining of Anthracite coal in the region. Polish influences are still common today, in the form of church bazaars, polka music and cuisine. It is widely believed that Pennsylvania, is one of the largest growing Polish communities in the United States. In addition, New Jersey also boasts a large Polish population, primarily in the North. Wallington and Garfield are two towns, that combined have a population of 41,000 residents. Of those, roughly 12,000 are Polish. Out of all of Bergen County, roughly 7% consists of Polish-Americans. In addition, towns like Elmwood Park, Clifton and East Rutherford, all have decent Polish populations.Riverhead, New York, located on Long Island, has a section in town called Polish Town. Many immigrants from the World War II era have settled here. The town has polish architecture, stores and a church, St. Isidores R.C. Church. Every summer they host a Polish Fair, which takes place on the streets of Polish Town. Wisconsin, Minnesota and Nebraska represent a different type of settlement with significant Polish communities, having been established in rural areas. Historian John Radzilowski estimates that up to a third of Poles in Minnesota settled in rural areas, where they established 40 communities, that were often centered around a Catholic church.(John Radzilowski. Poles in Minnesota. St. Paul: Minnesota Historical Society, 2005. p.  6) Most of these settlers came from the Polish lands that had been taken by Prussia during the Partitions, with a sub-group coming from Silesia. The Kaszub minority, from Polands Baltic coast, was also strongly represented among Polish immigrants to Minnesota, most notably in Winona.ReligionMary of the Angels interior 090307.jpg|thumb|right|Interior of St Mary of the Angels Catholic Church in Chicago.Most immigrants to North America from the Polish lands, who considered themselves Polish in ethnic or orientation, were Roman Catholic. These people were responsible for building the Polish Cathedrals, found in the Lakes and England regions and the States. Poles, in the metropolitan area, founded the following churches: St. Stanislaus Kostka, Holy Trinity, St. John Cantius, Holy Innocents, St. Helen, St. Fidelis, St. Mary of the Angels, St. Hedwig, St. Josaphat, St. Francis of Assisi (Humboldt Park), St. Hyacinth Basilica, St. Wenceslaus, Immaculate Heart of Mary, St. Stanislaus B&M, St. James (Cragin), St. Ladislaus, St. Constance, St. Mary of Perpetual Help, St. Barbara, SS. Peter & Paul, St. Joseph (Back of the Yards), Five Holy Martyrs, St. Pancratius, St. Bruno, St. Camillus, St. Michael (South Chicago), Immaculate Conception (South Chicago), St. Mary Magdalene, St. Bronislava, St. Thecla, St. Florian, St. Mary of Czstochowa (Cicero), St. Simeon (Bellwood), St. Blase (Summit), St. Glowienke (Downers Grove), St. John the Fisherman (Lisle), St. Isidore the Farmer (Blue Island), St. Andrew the Apostle (Calumet City) and St. John the Baptist (Harvey), as well as St. Mary of Nazareth Hospital, on the Near West Side.Poles established approximately 50 Roman Catholic parishes in Minnesota. Among them: St. Wojciech (Adalbert) and St. Kazimierz (Casimir) in St. Paul; Holy Cross, St. Philip, St. Hedwig (Jadwiga Slaska) and All Saints, in Minneapolis; Our Lady Star of the Sea and St. Casimirs in Duluth; and St. Kazimierz (Casimir) and St. Stanislaw Kostka in Winona. A few of the parishes of particular note, founded by Poles elsewhere in Minnesota, include: St. John Cantius in Wilno; St. Jozef (Joseph) in Browerville; St. John in Baptist in Virginia; St. Mary in Czstochowa; St. Wojciech (Adalbert) in Silver Lake; Our Lady of Mount Carmel in Opole; Our Lady of Lourdes in Little Falls; St. Stanislaus B&M in Sobieski; St. Stanislaus Kostka in Bowlus; St. Hedwig in Holdingford; Sacred Heart in Flensburg; Holy Cross in North Prairie; Holy Cross in Harding; and St. Isadore in Moran Township. Poles in Cleveland established St. Hyacinths (now closed), Stanislaus Church (1873), Sacred Heart (18882010) Immaculate Heart of Mary (1894), St. John Cantius (Westside Poles), St. Barbara (closed), Sts Peter and Paul Church (1927) in Garfield Heights, Saint Therese (1927) Garfield Heights, Marymount Hospital (1948) Garfield Heights, and Saint Monica Church (1952) Garfield Heights. Also, the Polish Community created the Our Lady of Czestochowa Shrine on the campus of Marymount Hospital.()Poles in Bend, Indiana founded four parishes: St. Hedwig Parish (1877), St. Casimir Parish (1898), St. Stanislaus Parish (1907), and Adalbert Parish, South Bend (1910).Circa 1897, in Pittsburghs Hill, Immaculate Heart of Mary, modeled on Peters Basilica in Rome was founded.()To assert their independence from the American-dominated Catholic Church, a group of Roman Catholics of Polish descent broke away, to form the National Catholic Church, which is headquartered in Pennsylvania.       Poland is also home to followers of Protestantism and the Orthodox Church. Small groups of both of these groups also immigrated to the United States. One of the most celebrated painters of religious icons in North America today is a Polish American Eastern Orthodox priest, Fr. Jurewicz, who singlehandedly painted Graanica Monastery in Lake, Illinois, over the span of three years.(Serbian Monastery of New Gracanica  History)A small group of Tatars, originating from the Biaystok region, helped co-found the first Muslim organization in Brooklyn, York, in 1907 and later, a mosque, which is still in use.()Polish American cultureImage:Nowy dziennik cover.gif|thumb|right|220px|The front page of New York Citys Dziennik.Cultural contributions of Polish Americans cover a broad spectrum including media, publishing industry, religious presence, artistic life, cuisine and museums as well as festivals.MediaAmong the most notable Polish American media groups are: the Books (founded by Polish American George Blagowidow); Polonia; 2 International; International; Polvision; TV4U New York; WPNA Radio Chicago; Radio External Service (formerly Radio Polonia); Polonia Today and the Voice. There are also Polish American newspapers and magazines, such as the Dziennik Zwizkowy, PL magazine,(http://www.PLmagazine.net/)Polish Weekly Chicago, the Express USA and Dziennik in New York and Polski and Polish Times in Detroit, not to mention the Ohio University Press Series in Polish American Studies,(http://www.ohioswallow.com/) Przeglad Polski Online, Polish American Journal,(Polish American Journal http://www.polamjournal.com/) and the Polish News Online,(http://www.polishnews.com/) among others.Cultural identityEven in long-integrated communities, remnants of Polish culture and vocabulary remain. Roman Catholic churches built by Polish American communities often serve as a vehicle for cultural retention.During the 1950s1970s, the Polish wedding was often an all-day event. Traditional Polish weddings in metropolitan area, in areas such as the southeast side of Chicago, inner suburbs like Calumet City and Hegewisch, and Indiana suburbs, such as Whiting, Hammond and East Chicago, always occurred on Saturdays. The receptions were typically held in a large hall, such as a VFW Hall. A polka band of drums, a singer, accordion, and trumpet, entertained the people, as they danced traditional dances, such as the oberek, Polish Hop and the waltz. Always an important part of Slavic culture, food played a very important role. The musicians, as well as the guests, were expected to enjoy ample amounts of both food and drink. Foods, such as Polish sausage, sauerkraut, pierogi and kluski were common. Common drinks were beer, screwdrivers and highballs. Many popular Polish foods became a fixture in the American cuisine of today, including kiebasa (Polish sausage), babka cake, kaszanka (kasanzka) and pierogi.Polish American cultural groups include White Eagle Lodge, American Arts Association and the Falcons. The Polish community was long the subject of sentiment in America. The word, Polack, has become a racial slur. Much of this prejudice was associated with anti-Catholicism and early 20th century worries, about being overrun by European immigrants.Among the many Polish American writers are a number of poets, such as Boiarski, Gorski, Guzlowski, Minczeski, Nemec Foster, Kress (poet and translator), Woloch, Kikel and Pawlak (poet and editor), along with novelists Pietrzyk, Rutkowski, Strempek Shea(Polish American Historical Association http://www.polishamericanstudies.org/resources.html) and others.MuseumsImage:20070822 Polish Museum.JPG|thumb|220px|right|The Museum of America in Chicago. Among the best known Polish American museums are the Museum of America in Chicagos old Downtown; founded in 1935, the largest ethnic museum in the U.S. sponsored by the Roman Catholic Union of America. The Museum Library ranks as one of the best, outside of Poland. Equally ambitious is the American Museum located in Washington, New York, founded in 1977. It features displays of folk art, costumes, historical artifacts and paintings, as well as bilingual research library with particular focus on achievements of the people of Polish heritage in America.(Smithsonian Magazine,  Polish American Museum at Smithsonian.com)(James Barron, New York Times,  If youre thinking of living in:; Port Washington Published: August 8, 1982) There is also the Museum of Winona, known as the Polish Cultural Institute of Winona, Minnesota.FestivalsThere are a number of unique festivals, street parties and parades held by the Polish American community. The Fest in Milwaukee, Wisconsin, which is a popular annual festival, takes place at the Henry Maier Festival Park. It is also the largest Polish festival in the United States. It attracts Polish Americans from all over Wisconsin and nearby Chicago, who come to celebrate Polish culture through music, food and entertainment.The Polish Festival in Syracuses Clinton Square has become the largest cultural event in the history of the Polish community in Central New York. Theres also the of Polonia festival held in Chicago every Labor Day weekend since 1979 at the Cultural and Civic Center in the Jefferson Park area. The Polish Festival in Portland, Oregon is reported to be the largest in the Western United States.() One of the newest and most ambitious festivals is the Polish Film Festival organized in conjunction with the Film Festival in Gdynia, Poland. And last, but not least, theres the Fest in Indiana with many more attractions other than Polish pierogi, and the Dells Polish Fest.( The Polish and Polish-American contribution to American culture Polish-Americans have influenced culture in many ways. Most prominent among these is through the inclusion of traditional cuisine such as pierogi,  kielbasa, golabki. Some of these Polish foods were tweaked and reinvented in the new American environment such as Chicagos Street Polish Sausage. Polish Americans have also contributed to altering the physical landscape of the cities they have inhabited, erecting monuments to Polish-American heroes such as Kociuszko and Pulaski. Distinctive cultural phenomena such as flats or the Cathedral style of architecture became part and parcel of the areas where Polish settlement occurred.Poles cultural ties to Roman Catholicism has also influenced the adoption of such distinctive rites like the blessing of the baskets before Easter in many areas of the United States by fellow Roman Catholics. Polish American communities Polish-Americans comprise a multigenerational ethnic community. Names listed in this category include: Polish-American enclaves with cultural organizations; media outlets; and broadly defined community resources.()(Open directory project,  Polish-American (61) Selected regional centres.) * Arizona** metropolitan area* California** Los Angeles Area** Francisco Bay Area-(115,601) 1.6%* Connecticut** New Britain* Florida** Miami** Tampa* Illinois** Algonquin** Bridgeview (22.4%)** Brookfield** Burbank (25.8%)** Calumet City** Chicago*** Archer Heights*** Avondale****Jackowo****Wacawowo*** Belmont Cragin*** Forest Glen*** Hegewisch*** Jefferson Park*** Logan Square*** Norwood Park (28.8%)*** Portage Park*** West Town** Chicago Heights** Cicero** Des Plaines** Du Bois** Elmwood Park (21.7%)** Goodings Grove (20.6%)** Harwood Heights (32.5%)** Hickory Hills (21.4%)** Joliet** Justice (21.6%)** Lemont (25.2%)** Lemont Township (24.7%)** Lyons** Naperville** Niles (22%)** Norridge (29.2%)** Oak Lawn** Park Ridge** Posen (21.4%)** River Grove (27.2%)** Stickney Township (25.1%)** Willow Springs (21.7%)* Indiana** East Chicago** Fort Wayne** Hammond** Hudson Township (25.6%)** Merrillville** Michigan City** Munster** Portage** South Bend** Warren Township (25%)** Whiting* Maryland** Baltimore*** Canton*** Fells Point*** Highlandtown*** Joseph Lee*** Locust Point** Bel Air** Fallston** Middle River** Parkville* Massachusetts** Adams (23%)** Beverly** Boston*** Dorchester*** Hyde Park*** South Boston** Chelsea** Chicopee** Deerfield (20.5%)** Dudley** Easthampton** Fall River** Hadley (25.2%)** Hatfield (28.9%)** Holyoke** Ludlow** Lynn** Montgomery** Palmer*** Bondsville (29%)** South Deerfield (23%)** Springfield*** Indian Orchard** Taunton** Webster** Whately (21.7%)***Whittenton** Worcester* Michigan** Alpena (23.3%)** Alpena Township (21.8%)** Bingham Township (34.1%)** Boyne Valley Township (22.7%)** Bronson** Chester Township (20.4%)** Detroit*** Poletown** Dwight Township (32.1%)** Filer Charter Township (30.8%)** Fraser Township (20.5%)** Hamtramck (25.7%)** Hume Township (28.1%)** Lincoln Township (36.2%)** Long Rapids Township (21.2%)** Ludington (10%)** Manistee (23.7%)** Maple Ridge Township (25.6%)** Mount Forest Township (21.8%)** Parisville** Pinconning Township (20.4%)** Port Austin Township (25%)** Portsmouth Township (29.4%)** Posen Township (61.3%)** Presque Isle Township (20.5%)** Rogers City (24.2%)** Rogers Township (27.2%)** Sand Beach Township (20%)** Sherman Township (23.3%)** Sterling Heights** Ubly** Verona Township (26.9%)** Warren** Wyandotte (23%)* Minnesota** Alberta** Alberta Township (39.8%)*** Brennyville** Browerville** Columbia Heights** Culdrum Township*** Flensburg** Elmdale Township (22.3%)*** Elmdale** Gilmanton Township*** Gilman** Hale Township (22.4%)** Holding Township (30.9%)*** Holdingford*** Opole*** St. Anna** Langola Township (23.1%)** Minneapolis** Pike Creek Township (30.6%)*** Little Falls** Pulaski Township*** Harding** Royalton (23.8%)** Swan River Township (41.5%)*** Sobieski** Swanville Township*** Swanville** Two Rivers Township*** Bowlus*** North Prairie** Winona* Missouri** Eureka** Kansas City** St. Louis* Nebraska** Loup City (31.8%)** Omaha*** Sheelytown*** South Omaha** Sherman County* Jersey** Bayonne (17.9%)** Clifton** East Brunswick Township** Garfield (22.9%)** Manville (23.1%)** South Amboy (20.6%)** Trenton** Union Township** Linden** Wallington (45.5%)* York** Alden (21.5%)** Amsterdam (20.5%)** Auburn** Buffalo** Cheektowaga (31.6%)** Copiague** Depew (31.2%)** Dunkirk (24.1%)** Elma (22.8%)** Hagaman (20.5%)** Lackawanna (25.2%)** Lancaster (town) (27.7%)** Lancaster (village) (23.5%)** New York City*** Brooklyn*** Brooklyn*** Queens*** Dorp, Staten Island** New York Mills (30.3%)** Pine Island** Pulaski** Riverhead** Schenectady** Sheridan (20.5%)** Sloan (46.8%)** Syracuse** Utica** Watervliet** West Seneca (23.5%)** Yorkville (27.1%)* Carolina** Warsaw* Dakota** Warsaw* Ohio** Cleveland*** Brecksville*** Cuyahoga Heights*** Garfield Heights (22%)*** Independence (25.4%)*** Newburgh Heights (23.1%)*** Parma*** Village** Short Creek Township (20.2%)** Toledo* Oklahoma** Coalgate** Harrah* Oregon** Portland* Pennsylvania** Ashley (27.1%)** Avoca (28.8%)** Bear Creek Township (20.5%)** Blakely (20.6%)** Blossburg (20.3%)** Carbondale Township (25.1%)** Cleveland Township (23.6%)** Coal Township (23.7%)** Conyngham Township (23.5%)** Dickson City (32.6%)** Dorrance Township (21.2%)** Dupont (46.6%)** Duryea (32.8%)** Edwardsville (22.6%)** Erie** Glen Lyon (35.1%)** Hanover Township (24.5%)** Hazleton (14.1%)** Kline Township (22.7%)** Kulpmont (32.1%)** Laflin (20.3%)** Larksville (28.6%)** Luzerne (23.8%)** Mayfield (28%)** Moosic (21.3%)** Mount Carmel (23.8%)** Mount Carmel Township (20.2%)** Nanticoke (41.2%)** Newport Township (37.1%)** Old Forge (20.7%)** Olyphant (22.2%)** Philadelphia*** Port Richmond** Pittsburgh*** Hill** Plains Township (28.1%)** Plymouth (24.9%)** Plymouth Township (28.6%)** Portage Township (22.1%)** Pringle (27.6%)** Ringtown (23%)** Scott Township (20.8%)** Scranton** Shenandoah (32.6%)** Slocum Township (26.7%)** Sugar Notch (28.8%)** Swoyersville (24.9%)** Taylor (20.4%)** Throop (23.7%)** Union Township (20.1%)** Washington Township (20.9%)** West Mahanoy Township (21.9%)** West Wyoming (28.3%)** Wilkes-Barre (28.2%)** Wright Township (21.1%)* Texas** Brenham** Chappell Hill** Dallas** Houston** Panna Maria** St. Hedwig (25.7%)*Washington**Seattle* Virginia (during the late 19th century, the state attracted a large influx of Polish coal miners)** Charleston** Fairmont** Huntington** Parkersburg** Weirton** Wheeling* Wisconsin** Alban (44.7%)** Amherst (town) (27.9%)** Amherst (village) (23.4%)** Angelica (30.7%)** Arcadia (city) (30%)** Arcadia (town) (36.7%)** Bevent (52.7%)** Buena Vista (30.3%)** Carson (33.7%)** Chase (26.2%)** Cudahy (20.8%)** Dewey (46.1%)** Eaton (21.7%)** Eau Pleine (22.6%)** Edgar (23.4%)** Emmet (20.8%)** Goodman (24.5%)** Green Bay** Greenfield (20.7%)** Hale (20.8%)** Hull (34.4%)** Independence (43.7%)** Kenosha** Knowlton (27.9%)** Kronenwetter (24.1%)** Linwood (43.1%)** Lublin** Maple Grove (33.8%)** Milwaukee** Morgan (20.5%)** Mosinee (22.8%)** Norrie (29.6%)** Plover (town) (25.5%)** Plover (village) (22.4%)** Pulaski (31.7%)** Reid (37%)** Rietbrock (30.2%)** Ringle (24.6%)** Rosholt** Sharon (53.7%)** South Milwaukee (20.7%)** St. Francis (22.6%)** Stockton (42.9%)** Stevens Point (22.5%)** Thorp (29.2%)** Weyerhaeuser** West Allis** Whiting (30.7%)Polish Americans by state totalsImage:Polish1346.gif|thumb|right|300px|Distribution of Polish Americans, according to the United States Census.According to the United States Census, the U.S. states with the largest numbers of self-reported Poles and Americans of Polish ancestry are:Polish Americans by percentage of the total population*01. Wisconsin 9.65%*02. Michigan 9.59%*03. Connecticut 8.85%*04. Illinois 8.13%*05. Jersey 7.35%*06. Pennsylvania 7.28%*07. Massachusetts 5.76%*08. Delaware 5.55%*09. Hampshire 5.29%*10. York 5.24%*11. Minnesota 5.21%*12. Island 4.58%*13. Ohio 4.28%*14. Vermont 4.20%*15. Nebraska 3.80%*16. Maryland 3.61%*17. Dakota 3.07%*18. Florida 2.91%*19. Indiana 2.83%*20. Arizona 2.79%*21. Colorado 2.77%*22. Nevada 2.53%*23. Maine 2.34%*24. Alaska 2.29%*25. Montana 2.29%*26. Virginia 2.07%*27. Washington 2.06%*28. Virginia 2.00%*29. Missouri 1.93%*30. Wyoming 1.86%*31. Oregon 1.77%*32. Dakota 1.75%*33. Kansas 1.70%*34. District of Columbia 1.70%*35. Idaho 1.65%*36. California 1.50%*37. Carolina 1.46%*38. Mexico 1.35%*39. Carolina 1.35%*40. Iowa 1.28%*41. Georgia 1.15%*42. Texas 1.15%*43. Tennessee 1.11%*44. Hawaii 1.03%*45. Oklahoma 0.97%*46. Utah 0.96%*47. Kentucky 0.95%*48. Arkansas 0.88%*49. Alabama 0.69%	*50. Mississippi 0.64%*51. Louisiana 0.58%Notable Polish AmericansSee also* American* Sisters* American* Village, City of Milwaukee, Wisconsin* University (Polish Studies)* American Catholic Heritage Committee* Brazilians* British* Canadians* Righteous among the Nations* of PolandReferencesBibliography* * * * * * * * Jaroszynska-Kirchmann, Anna D., The Polish American Historical Association: Looking Back, Looking Forward, Polish American Studies, 65 (Spring 2008), 5776.* McCook, Brian.  The Borders of Integration: Polish Migrants in Germany and the United States, 1870-1924 (Ohio University Press; 2011) 296 pages; $Contrasts the Polish migrants to  the Ruhr Valley in Germany with those in northeastern Pennsylvania.* * * * * * * Pula, James S. Polish-American Catholicism: A Case Study in Cultural Determinism, U.S. Catholic Historian Volume 27, #3 Summer 2009, pp. 119; in MUSE* Radzilowski, John. A Social History of Polish-American Catholicism, U.S. Catholic Historian  Volume 27, #3 Summer 2009, pp. 2143 in MUSE* * * * * * * * External links* American Polish Advisory Council* The Nation of Polonia, Immigration, Library of Congress* The Polish Academic Information Center, State University of New York at Buffalo; information about Poland, Polish universities, Polish Studies and Polish American heritage* Association of the Sons of Poland Fraternal Benefit Society since 1903, Carlstadt, NJ* The Polish Scholarship Fund, Syracuse* Polish American Association, Chicago* Polish American Journal, New York* Polish American Students Association, University of Chicago* Polish-Americans in Western New York, Classic Buffalo.com* The Polish Churches of Milwaukee* Polish Heritage Highway, Portage County (WI) Historical Society* Polish National Alliance, Chicago* Union of Poles in America, division of PNA, Garfield Heights, Ohio* Polonia.net, New York* Pulaski Day Parade Pulaski Day Parade in New York* Polish-American Cultural Center, Cleveland, Ohiopolaca en Estados Unidosfr:Polono-Amricainsja:w Stanach ZjednoczonychAmerican
390883
Electric_locomotive
File:AEM-7AC 923 at Trenton.JPG|thumb|250px|An Amtrak AEM-7 electric locomotive pushing a train in New JerseyFile:Bhopalshatabdi.jpg|thumb|250px|Indian Locomotive Class Wap 5 hauling the Shatabdi Express to New Delhi File:Db-152073-00.jpg|thumb|250px|Bahn DBAG Class 152 pulling a freight trainFile:NECtrain3967.jpg|thumb|250px|New Jersey Transit ALP-46 AC locomotive based on the Class 101:Electric Trains redirects here. For the 1995 Squeeze single, see Trains (song).An electric locomotive is a locomotive powered by electricity from lines, a rail or an on-board energy storage device (such as a chemical battery or cell). Electrically propelled locomotives with on-board fuelled prime movers, such as engines or turbines, are classed as diesel-electric or turbine electric locomotives because the electric generator/motor combination only serves as a power transmission system. Electricity is used to eliminate smoke and take advantage of the high efficiency of electric motors; however, the cost of railway electrification means that usually only heavily used lines can be electrified.CharacteristicsOne advantage of electrification is the lack of pollution from the locomotives themselves. Electrification also results in higher performance, lower maintenance costs and lower energy costs for electric locomotives.Power plants, even if they burn fossil fuels, are far cleaner than mobile sources such as locomotive engines. Also the power for electric locomotives can come from clean and/or renewable sources, including power, hydroelectric power, power, power and turbines.() Electric locomotives are also quiet compared to diesel locomotives since there is no engine and exhaust noise and less mechanical noise. The lack of reciprocating parts means that electric locomotives are easier on the track, reducing track maintenance.Power plant capacity is far greater than what any individual locomotive uses, so electric locomotives can have a higher power output than diesel locomotives and they can produce even higher short-term surge power for fast acceleration. Electric locomotives are ideal for rail service with frequent stops. They are used on high-speed lines, such as ICE in Germany, Acela in the US, Shinkansen in Japan, Railway High-speed in China and TGV in France. Electric locomotives are also used on freight routes that have a consistently high traffic volume, or in areas with advanced rail networks.Electric locomotives benefit from the high efficiency of electric motors, often above 90%. Additional efficiency can be gained from braking, which allows energy to be recovered during braking to put some power back on the line. Newer electric locomotives use AC motor-inverter drive systems that provide for regenerative braking.The chief disadvantage of electrification is the cost for infrastructure (overhead power lines or electrified third rail, substations, control systems). Public policy in the US currently interferes with electrificationhigher property taxes are imposed on privately owned rail facilities if they have electrification facilities. Also, US regulations on diesel locomotives are very weak compared to regulations on automobile emissions or power plant emissions.In Europe and elsewhere, railway networks are considered part of the national transport infrastructure, just like roads, highways and waterways, and therefore are often financed by the state. Operators of the rolling stock pay fees according to rail use. This makes possible the large investments required for the technically and in the long-term also, economically advantageous electrification. Because railroad infrastructure is privately owned in the US, railroads are unwilling to make the necessary investments for electrification.HistoryFile:B&O 1895 loco.png|thumb|Electric locomotive of the Belt Line, 1895. The steam locomotive was not detached for passage through the tunnel. The overhead conductor was a  section bar at the highest point in the roof, so a flexible, flat pantograph was usedFile:AlcoGEClassS1.JPG|thumb|right|Alco-GE Prototype Class S-1, NYC & HR no. 6000 (DC)File:Kando Kalman mozdony.jpg|thumb|right|AC locomotive in Valtellina (1898-1902). Power supply: 3-phase 15 Hz AC, 3000 V. Designed by Kand in Ganz Company, Hungary and supplied by Westinghouse.(File:GE Steeplecab.jpg|thumb|A GE steeplecab electric locomotive.  This example is fitted with trolley poles for service on an interurban railroad.File:MILW ES-2.jpg|thumb|A Road class ES-2, an example of a larger steeplecab switcher for service on an electrified heavy-duty railroadThe first known electric locomotive was built in 1837 by chemist Robert Davidson of Aberdeen. It was powered by cells (batteries). Davidson later built a larger locomotive named Galvani which was exhibited at the Scottish Society of Arts Exhibition in 1841. The 7-ton vehicle had two direct-drive motors, with fixed electro-magnets acting on iron bars attached to a wooden cylinder mounted on each axle, and simple  commutators. It hauled a load of 6 tons at 4 miles per hour for a distance of 1 miles. The machine was tested on the and Glasgow Railway in September of the following year but the limited electric power available from batteries prevented its general use.  It was destroyed by railway workers, who saw it as a threat to their security of employment.()()(Renzo Pocaterra, Treni, De Agostini, 2003)The first electric passenger train was presented by von Siemens at Berlin in 1879. The locomotive was driven by a 2.2 kW series wound motor and the train, consisting of the locomotive and three cars, reached a maximum speed of 13 km/h. During four months, the train carried 90,000 passengers on a 300 metre long circular track. The electricity (150 V DC) was supplied through a third, insulated rail situated between the tracks. A contact roller was used to collect the electricity from the third rail.The worlds first electric tram line opened in Lichterfelde near Berlin, Germany, in 1881. It was built by Werner von Siemens (see Straenbahn).In Britain, Volks electric railway was opened in 1883 in Brighton (see Electric Railway).In the US, electric trolleys were pioneered in 1888 on the Union Passenger Railway, using equipment designed by Frank J. Sprague.()Much of the early development of electric locomotion was driven by the increasing use of tunnels, particularly in urban areas. Smoke from steam locomotives was noxious and municipalities were increasingly inclined to prohibit their use within their limits. Thus the first successful working, the and South London Railway underground line in the UK, was prompted by a clause in its enabling act prohibiting use of steam power.() This line opened in 1890, using electric locomotives built by and Platt. Electricity quickly became the power supply of choice for subways, abetted by the Spragues invention of train control in 1897. Surface and elevated transit systems generally used steam until forced to convert by ordinance.The first use of electrification on a mainline was on a four-mile stretch of the Belt Line of the and Ohio Railroad (B&O) in 1895.  This track connected the main portion of the B&O to the newly built line to New York and it required a series of tunnels around the edges of Baltimores downtown. Parallel tracks on the Railroad had shown that coal smoke from locomotives would be a major operating issue, as well as a public nuisance. Three Bo+Bo units were initially used, at the south end of the electrified section; they coupled onto the entire train, locomotive and all and pulled it through the tunnels.(B&O Power, Sagle, Lawrence, Alvin Stauffer) Railroad entrances to York City required similar tunnels and the smoke problems were more acute there. A collision in the Park Avenue tunnel in 1902 led the New York State legislature to outlaw the use of smoke-generating locomotives south of the River after 1 July 1908. In response, electric locomotives began operation in 1904 on the York Central Railroad. In the 1930s, the Railroad, which also had introduced electric locomotives because of the NYC regulation, electrified its entire territory east of Pennsylvania.The Milwaukee, St. Paul and Pacific Railroad (the Milwaukee Road), the last transcontinental line to be built, electrified its lines across the Mountains and to the Pacific Ocean starting in 1915. A few East Coast lines, notably the Railway and the and Western Railway, found it expedient to electrify short sections of their mountain crossings. However, by this point, electrification in the United States was more associated with dense urban traffic and the use of electric locomotives declined in the face of dieselization.(Duffy (2003: 241)) Diesels shared some of the electric locomotives advantages of over steam and the cost of building and maintaining the power supply infrastructure, which had always worked to discourage new installations, brought on the elimination of most mainline electrification outside the Northeast. Except for a few captive systems (e.g. the Mesa and Lake Powell), by 2000 electrification was confined to the Corridor and some commuter service; even there, freight service was handled by diesels. The centre of development shifted to Europe, where electrification was widespread.Introduction of alternating current The first practical AC electric locomotive was designed by Charles Brown, then working for Oerlikon, Zrich. In 1891, Brown had demonstrated long-distance power transmission, using three-phase AC, between a hydro-electric plant at am Neckar and am Main West railway station, a distance of 280 km. Brown, using the experience he had gained while working for Jean Heilmann on steam-electric locomotive  designs, had observed that three-phase motors had a higher power-to-weight ratio than DC motors and, because of the absence of a commutator, were simpler to manufacture and maintain.(Heilmann evaluated both AC and DC electric transmission for his locomotives, but eventually settled on a design based on Edisons DC systemDuffy (2003: 3941))  However, they were much larger than the DC motors of the time and could not be mounted in underfloor bogies: they could only be carried within locomotive bodies.(Duffy (2003: 129).) In 1896, Oerlikon installed the first commercial example of the system on the Lugano Tramway. Three-phase motors, which run at constant speed and provide regenerative braking, are well suited to steeply graded routes and the first mainline three-phase locomotives were installed by Brown (by then in partnership with Walter Boveri) in 1899 on the BurgdorfThun line, Switzerland. Each thirty-tonne locomotive had two  motors. A development by Kand of the Ganz works, Budapest, working with Westinghouse of Italy, introduced an electro-mechanical converter, allowing the use of three-phase motors powered from single-phase alternating current, thus eliminating the need for two overhead conductor wires.()The first implementation of industrial frequency single-phase AC supply for locomotives came from Oerlikon in 1901, using the designs of Hans Behn-Eschenburg and Emil Huber-Stockar; installation on the Seebach-Wettingen line of the Swiss Federal Railways was completed in 1904. The  15 kV, 50 Hz , 48 tonne locomotives used transformers and rotary converters to power DC traction motors.(Duffy (2003: 124))Italian railways were the first in the world to introduce electric traction for the entire length of a mainline rather than just a short stretch, using a system from Westinghouse, designed by Klmn Kand and a team from the Ganz works.(Duffy (2003: 120121))() The 106 km Valtellina line was opened on 4 September 1902. The electrical system was three-phase at 3 kV 15 Hz. The converter transformed single-phase current into three-phase alternating current within the locomotive. The voltage was significantly higher than used earlier and it required new designs for electric motors and switching devices.()() During the period of electrification of the Italian railways, some tests were made as to which type of power supply to use: in some sections there was a 3,600 V 16 Hz three-phase power supply, in others there was 1,500 V DC, 3 kV DC and 10 kV AC 50 Hz supply. During the 1930s, 3kV DC power was chosen for the entire Italian railway system. (Nowadays, 1,500 V DC is still used on some lines near France and 25kV 50 Hz is used on high speed trains)(Kand designed a three phase AC traction in Evian Les Bains (Switzerland) in 1898.Intermodal.jpg|thumb|A Swiss Re 420 leads a freight train down the South side of the Gotthard line, which was electrified in 1922. The masts and lines of the catenary can be seen.In 1923, the first phase-converter locomotive in Hungary was constructed on the basis of Kands designs and serial production began soon after.  The first installation, at 50 Hz, 16 kV, was in 1932 on the 56 km section of the Hungarian State Railways between Budapest and Komrom. This proved successful and the electrification was extended to Hegyeshalom in 1934.(Duffy (2003: 273274))In Europe, electrification projects initially focused on mountainous regions for several reasons: coal supplies were difficult, power was readily available, and electric locomotives gave more traction on steeper lines. This was particularly applicable in Switzerland, where today close to 100% of lines are electrified. An important contribution to the wider adoption of AC traction came from SNCF of France after War II. The company had assessed the industrial-frequency AC line routed through the steep Hllental Valley, Germany, which was under French administration following the war. After trials, the company decided that the performance of AC locomotives was sufficiently developed to allow all its future installations, regardless of terrain, to be of this standard, with its associated cheaper and more efficient infrastructure.( The SNCF decision, ignoring as it did the  of high-voltage DC already installed on French routes, was influential in the standard selected for other countries in Europe.(The 1960s saw the electrification of many European main lines (Eastern Europe included). European electric locomotives technology had improved steadily from the 1920s onwards. By comparison, the Road class EP-2 (1918) weighed 240 t, with a power of 3,330 kW and a maximum speed of 112 km/h; in 1935, German E 18 had a power of 2,800 kW, but weighed only 108 tons and had a maximum speed of 150 km/h. On 29 March 1955, French locomotive CC 7107 reached a speed of 331 km/h. In 1960 the SJ Class Dm 3 locomotives introduced on the Swedish Railways produced a record 7,200 kW. Locomotives capable of commercial passenger service at 200 km/h appeared in Germany and France in the same period. Further improvements resulted from the introduction of electronic control systems, which permitted the use of increasingly lighter and more powerful motors that could be fitted entirely inside the bogies (standardising from the 1990s onwards on asynchronous three-phase motors, fed through GTO-inverters).In the 1980s, development of very high-speed service brought a revival of electrification. The Japanese Shinkansen and the French TGV were the first systems for which devoted high-speed lines were built from scratch. Similar programs were undertaken in Italy, Germany and Spain; in the United States the only new mainline service was an extension of electrification over the Northeast Corridor from Haven, Connecticut to Massachusetts, though new rail systems, using electrically powered cars, continued to be built.On 2 September 2006, a standard production Siemens Electric locomotive of the Eurosprinter type ES64-U4 (BB Class 1216) achieved a speed of 357 km/h, the record for a locomotive-hauled train, on the new line between Ingolstadt and Nuremberg.()Electric locomotive typesFile:ElectricLocomotiveCabine.jpg|thumb|The operating controls of the  gauge cogwheel electric locomotive BDeh 4/4 view, operating in line Luzern-Engelberg. The wheel controls motor power, not driving direction.File:DC Electric Locomotive.jpg|thumb|right|Electric locomotive used in mining operations in Flon, Manitoba. This locomotive is on display and not currently in service.An electric locomotive can be supplied with power from*energy storage systems, as battery or ultracapacitor-powered mining locomotives.* A stationary source, such as a rail or overhead wire.This is in marked contrast to a locomotive, which combines an onboard diesel engine with an electrical transmission or store (battery, ultracapacitor) system.The distinguishing design features of electric locomotives are:*The type of electrical power used, either current or current.*The method for store (batteries, ultracapacitors) or collecting (transmission) electrical power.*The means used to mechanically couple the motors to the driving wheels (drivers).Direct and alternating currentThe most fundamental difference lies in the choice of direct (DC) or current (AC). The earliest systems used direct current as, initially, alternating current was not well understood and insulation material for high voltage lines was not available. Direct current locomotives typically run at relatively low voltage (600 to 3,000 volts); the equipment is therefore relatively massive because the currents involved are large in order to transmit sufficient power. Power must be supplied at frequent intervals as the high currents result in large transmission system losses.As alternating current motors were developed, they became the predominant type, particularly on longer routes. High voltages (tens of thousands of volts) are used because this allows the use of low currents; transmission losses are proportional to the square of the current (e.g. twice the current means four times the loss).  Thus, high power can be conducted over long distances on lighter and cheaper wires.  Transformers in the locomotives transform this power to a low voltage and high current for the motors.(current#Transmission, distribution, and domestic power supply)A similar high voltage, low current system could not be employed with direct current locomotives because there is no easy way to do the voltage/current transformation for DC so efficiently as achieved by AC transformers.File:FSE554.jpg|thumb|right|Italian freight locomotive E554 working with three-phase current. Note the two current collectors with separate heads for each phase. Picture taken in Liguria 1974.AC traction still occasionally uses dual overhead wires instead of single phase lines. The resulting three-phase current drives motors, which do not have sensitive commutators and permit easy realisation of a brake. Speed is controlled by changing the number of pole pairs in the stator circuit, with acceleration controlled by switching additional resistors in, or out, of the rotor circuit. The two-phase lines are heavy and complicated near switches, where the phases have to cross each other. The system was widely used in the northern part of Italy until 1976 and is still in use on some Swiss railways. The simple feasibility of a fail safe electric brake is an advantage of the system, while the speed control and the two-phase lines are problematic.File:SJ night train in the Bjrnfjell.jpg|thumb|220px|left|The Swedish locomotive was the first series locomotive that used thyristors with DC motors.Rectifier locomotives, which used AC power transmission and DC motors, were common, though DC commutators had problems both in starting and at low velocities. Todays advanced electric locomotives use brushless three-phase AC induction motors. These polyphase machines are powered from GTO-, IGCT- or IGBT-based inverters. The cost of electronic devices in a modern locomotive can be up to 50% of the total cost of the vehicle.Electric traction allows the use of braking, in which the motors are used as brakes and become generators that transform the motion of the train into electrical power that is then fed back into the lines. This system is particularly advantageous in mountainous operations, as descending locomotives can produce a large portion of the power required for ascending trains.Most systems have a characteristic voltage and, in the case of AC power, a system frequency. Many locomotives over the years were equipped to handle multiple voltages and frequencies as systems came to overlap or were upgraded. American FL9 locomotives were equipped to handle power from two different electrical systems and could also operate as conventional diesel-electrics.While recently designed systems invariably operate on alternating current, many existing current systems are still in use &ndash; e.g. in Africa and the Kingdom (750 V and 1,500 V); Netherlands, Japan, Mumbai,  Ireland (1,500 V); Slovenia, Belgium, Italy, Poland, Russia, Spain (3,000 V) and the cities of DC (750 V).Power transmissionlichtrail.jpg|thumb|A modern pantograph. The device shown is technically a half-pantograph.Electrical circuits require two connections (or for three phase AC, three connections). From the very beginning, the trackwork itself was used for one side of the circuit. Unlike railroads, however, the trackwork normally supplies only one side, the other side(s) of the circuit being provided separately.The original and Ohio Railroad electrification used a sliding shoe in an overhead channel, a system quickly found to be unsatisfactory. It was replaced with a rail system, in which a pickup (the shoe) rode underneath or on top of a smaller rail parallel to the main track, somewhat above ground level. There were multiple pickups on both sides of the locomotive in order to accommodate the breaks in the third rail required by trackwork. This system is preferred in subways because of the close clearances it affords.However, railways generally tend to prefer lines, often called catenaries after the support system used to hold the wire parallel to the ground. Three collection methods are possible:*pole: a long flexible pole, which engages the line with a wheel or shoe.*collector: a frame that holds a long collecting rod against the wire.*Pantograph: a hinged frame that holds the collecting shoes against the wire in a fixed geometry.Of the three, the pantograph method is best suited for high-speed operation.  Some locomotives are equipped to use both overhead and third rail collection (e.g. Rail Class 92).Driving the wheelsFile:MILW Bi-Polar.jpg|thumb|right|One of the Road EP-2 Bi-polar electricsDuring the initial development of railroad electrical propulsion, a number of drive systems were devised to couple the output of the motors to the wheels.  Early locomotives used often jackshaft drives. In this arrangement, the traction motor is mounted within the body of the locomotive and drives the jackshaft through a set of gears.  This system was employed because the first traction motors were too large and heavy to mount directly on the axles. Due to the number of mechanical parts involved, frequent maintenance was necessary. The jackshaft drive was abandoned for all but the smallest units when smaller and lighter motors were developed,Several other systems were devised as the electric locomotive matured.  The drive was a fully spring-loaded system, in which the weight of the driving motors was completely disconnected from the driving wheels. First used in electric locomotives from the 1920s, the Buchli drive was mainly used by the French SNCF and Federal Railways. The drive was also developed about this time and mounted the traction motor above or to the side of the axle and coupled to the axle through a reduction gear and a semi-flexible hollow shaft - the quill. The Pennsylvania Railroad GG1 locomotive used a quill drive. Again, as traction motors continued to shrink in size and weight, quill drives gradually fell out of favour.Another drive example was the bi-polar system, in which the motor armature was the axle itself, the frame and field assembly of the motor being attached to the truck (bogie) in a fixed position. The motor had two field poles, which allowed a limited amount of vertical movement of the armature. This system was of limited value since the power output of each motor was limited. The EP-2 bi-polar electrics used by the Road compensated for this problem by using a large number of powered axles.Modern electric locomotives, like their Diesel-electric counterparts, almost universally use axle-hung traction motors, with one motor for each powered axle. In this arrangement, one side of the motor housing is supported by plain bearings riding on a ground and polished journal that is integral to the axle. The other side of the housing has a tongue-shaped protuberance that engages a matching slot in the truck (bogie) bolster, its purpose being to act as a torque reaction device, as well as a support. Power transfer from motor to axle is effected by spur gearing, in which a pinion on the motor shaft engages a gear on the axle. Both gears are enclosed in a liquid-tight housing containing lubricating oil. The type of service in which the locomotive is used dictates the gear ratio employed. Numerically high ratios are commonly found on freight units, whereas numerically low ratios are typical of passenger engines.Wheel arrangementsFile:PRR GG1 4890 at NRM, Green Bay, 20040426.jpg|thumb|A GG1 electric locomotiveThe notation system for classifying locomotives is not adequate for describing the varieties of electric locomotive arrangements, though the Railroad applied classes to its electric locomotives as if they were steam or concatenations of such. For example, the GG1 class indicates that it is arranged like two 4-6-0 class G locomotives that are coupled back-to-back.In any case, the classification system was typically used for electric locomotives, as it could handle the complex arrangements of powered and unpowered axles and could distinguish between coupled and uncoupled drive systems.Electric traction around the worldAsiaJapanThe rail system of Japan consists of the following (as of 2005)(CIA - The World Factbook -- Japan):*  of  gauge, of which  is electrified;*  of  gauge, all electrified;*  of  gauge, all electrified;*  of  gauge, all electrified.Electrification systems used by the JR group, Japans formerly state owned operators, are 1,500V DC and 20kV AC for conventional lines and 25kV AC for Shinkansen. Electrification with 600V DC and 750V DC are also seen in private lines. The frequency of the AC power supply is 50 Hz in Eastern Japan and 60 Hz in Western Japan.Japan has come close to complete electrification largely due to the relatively short line distances and mountainous terrain which make electrical service a particularly economical investment. Additionally, the mix of freight to passenger service is weighted much more toward passenger service (even in rural areas) than in many other countries, and this has helped drive government investment into electrification of many remote lines.Electrification began in earnest for local railways in the 1920s and main lines electrification began following World War II using a universal 1,500V DC standard and eventually, a 20kV standard for rapid intercity main lines (this is often overlaying 1,500V DC lines) and a 25kV AC standard for high-speed Shinkansen lines). Because most of the electrification infrastructure was destroyed in the war, the only variances to this standard with significant traffic are a few of the older subway lines in Tokyo and Osaka. The Main Line, Japans busiest line, completed electrification in 1956 and Shinkansen was complete in 1964.  By the mid 1970s, most main lines had been converted. During the 1970s and into the 1980s, when a fast growing Japanese economy encouraged massive infrastructure spending, almost every line with any significant traffic was electrified. Though the massive debts incurred for these upgrades (along with the more publicised expense of Shinkansen expansions) led to the privatization and break-up of the national rail company. By the time of the breakup in 1987, electric service had penetrated to every line with significant traffic. In the 1990s, and 2000s, rural infrastructure was the focus of a lot of government stimulus funding and this included some rail electrification on infrequently used lines, as well as quite a lot of funding for further expanding the Shinkansen network (which, as with all high speed trains, is electric). The latter was mostly in the form of loans rather than direct investment as in the former.MalaysiaTanah Melayu of Malaysia operated 25 kV AC multiple unit services, starting from their Komuter in 1995. In December 2009, a fleet of new ETS are arrived.AustraliaBoth Railways and South Wales Government Railways, which pioneered electric traction in Australia in the early 20th century and continue to operate 1,500 V DC Multiple Unit services, have withdrawn their fleets of main line electric locomotives.In both states, the use of electric locomotives on principal interurban routes proved to be a qualified success. In Victoria, because only one major line (the Gippsland line) had been electrified, the economic advantages of electric traction were not fully realised due to the need to change locomotives for trains that extended beyond the range of the electrified network. VRs entire electric locomotive fleet was withdrawn from service by 1987() and the Gippsland line electrification was dismantled by 2004.() Similarly, the new fleet of 86 class locomotives introduced to NSW in 1983 had a relatively short life as the costs of changing locomotives at the extremities of the electrified network, together with the higher charges levied for electricity use, saw diesel-electric locomotives make inroads into the electrified network and the electric locomotive fleet was progressively withdrawn.() Electric car trains are still used for urban passenger services.Rail, conversely, implemented electrification relatively recently and utilises the more recent kV AC technology with around 1,000 km of the QR gauge network now electrified. It operates a fleet of electric locomotives to transport coal for export, the most recent of which are those of the 3,000 kW (4,020 HP) 3300/3400 Class.() Queensland Rail is currently rebuilding its 3100 and 3200 class locos into the 3700 class, which use AC traction and only need three locomotives on a coal train rather than five. Queensland Rail is getting thirty 3800 class locomotives from Siemens in Munich, Germany, which will arrive during late 2008 to 2009. QRNational (Queensland Rails Coal and Freight after separation) has increased the order of 3800 class locomotives from Germany. They continue to arrive late into 2010.EuropeElectrification is widespread in Europe. Due to higher density schedules, the operating costs of the locomotives are more dominant with respect to the infrastructure costs than in the US and electric locomotives have much lower operating costs than diesels. In addition, governments were motivated to electrify their railway networks due to coal shortages experienced during the First and Second World Wars.It should also be noted that diesel locomotives have little power compared to electric locomotives, given the same weight and dimensions. For instance, the 2,200 kW of a modern Rail Class 66 were already met in 1927 by the electric Ae 4/7 (2,300 kW), which is even a bit lighter. However, for low speeds, tractive effort is more important than power. This is why diesel engines are competitive for slow freight traffic (as it is common in the US) but not for passenger or mixed passenger/freight traffic like on many European railway lines, especially where heavy freight trains must be run at comparatively high speeds (80 km/h or more).These factors led to high degrees of electrification in most European countries. In some countries like Switzerland, even electric shunters are common and many private sidings can be served by electric locomotives. During War II, when materials to build new electric locomotives were not available, the Federal Railways installed electric heating elements, fed from the overhead supply, in the boilers of some steam shunters to deal with the shortage of imported coal.()()The recent political developments in many European countries to enhance public transit have led to another boost for electric traction. High-speed trains like the TGV, ICE, AVE and Pendolino can only be run economically using electric traction and the operation of branch lines is usually less in deficit when using electric traction, due to cheaper and faster rolling stock and more passengers due to more frequent service and more comfort. In addition, gaps of un-electrified track are closed to avoid replacing electric locomotives by diesels for these sections. The necessary modernisation and electrification of these lines is possible due to financing of the railway infrastructure by the state.IndiaIn India, both AC and DC type of electrified train systems operate today. A 1,500 V DC-based train system is only operating in the Mumbai area. It is being converted to the 25 kV AC system. The rest of the India, where routes are electrified fully, operate under the 25 kV AC overhead wire.As of 2006, Indian railways haul 80% of freight and 85% of passenger traffic with electric locomotives.(Early 2800 hp SNCF design for 25kV AC, with ignitron rectifiers. Introduced in 1959, they were mostly deployed by ER in the Howrah-Asansol-Dhanbad-Mughalsarai section. They were less frequently found upstream in the Delhi-Kanpur-Mughalsarai section and in the Igatpuri-Bhusaval section of the Central Railway. They were mostly used for non-express passenger trains but some were used double-headed for freight service. Some were still 12/98 in operation on ER (Sealdah-Lalgola passenger etc.).WAM-1s are significant in the history of electric traction in India as they were among the first AC electrics to run in India. Like the WAG-1s, some of their advanced features turned out to be unsuitable for Indian conditions.Manufactured by Kraus-Maffei, Krupp, SFAC, La Brugeoise & Nivelle (50 cycles European group). Ignitron rectifiers feed four DC traction motors that accept pulsating current input. Motors are connected to the axles by a Jacquemin drive. Speed control is by tap-changer on the input transformer (motors permanently wired in parallel). The superstructure is mounted on bogies with pendular suspension and equalizer beams. The electricals are from ACEC, AEG, Alstom, Brown Boveri, Siemens and others. B-B (monomotor bogies). Jeumont transformer (20 taps), Oerlikon exhauster, Arno rotary converter. Air loco brakes, vacuum train brakes.Manufacturers: Kraus-Maffei, Krupp, SFAC, La Brugeoise & Nivelle (50 cycles European group)Traction Motors: Siemens/ACEC/Alstom MG 710A (740hp, 1250V, 480A, 1000 rpm, weight 2750kg). Fully suspended, force-ventilated.Rectifiers: Four water-cooled ignitrons from SGT, each rated for 575kW / 1250V.) Russia and former USSR Russia and other countries of the former USSR have a mix of 3,300 V DC and 25 kV AC electric railroads due to historical reasons.The special junction stations (around 15 over the whole former USSR - Vladimir, Mariinsk near Krasnoyarsk etc.) were equipped with contact wiring switchable from DC to AC. Locomotive replacement is essential at these stations and is performed together with the contact wiring switching.Most Soviet, Czech (USSR ordered the passenger electric locomotives to Czech Skoda factory), Russian and Ukrainian locomotives can only operate as DC or as AC. For instance, VL80 is an AC machine, with VL10 being something like a DC version of VL80. There were some half-experimental small-series like VL82, which could switch from AC to DC and were used in small amounts around the city of Kharkov in Ukraine. Also, the latest Russian passenger locomotive EP10 is dual-system.Historically, first the 3,300 V DC wiring was used due to vehicle simplicity. The first experimental track was in Georgian mountains, then the suburban zones of the largest cities were electrified for motor-car locomotive-less trains to be used - very advantageous due to much better dynamic of such a train compared to the steam one, which is important for the suburban service with frequent stops. Then the large mountain line between Ufa and Chelyabinsk was electrified.For some time, electric railways were only considered to be suitable for suburban or mountain lines. In around 1950, a decision was made (according to the legend - by Stalin) to electrify the highly loaded plain prairie line of Omsk-Novosibirsk. After this, electrifying the major railroads with 3,000 V DC became a mainstream.25 kV AC contact wiring started in the USSR in around 1960, when the industry managed to build the rectifier-based AC-wire DC-motor locomotive (all Soviet and Czech AC locomotives were such; only the post-Soviet ones switched to electronically controlled induction motors). The first major line with AC power was Mariinsk-Krasnoyarsk-Tayshet-Zima; the lines in European Russia like Moscow-Rostov-on-Don followed.In 1990s, some DC lines were rebuilt as AC ones to allow the usage of the huge 10 MWt AC locomotive of VL85. The line around Irkutsk is one of them. The DC locomotives freed by this rebuild were transferred to St. Petersburg region.The Railway has been partly electrified since 1929 and entirely electric hauled since 2002. The system is 25 kV AC 50 Hz after the junction station of Mariinsk near Krasnoyarsk, 3,000 V DC before it and train weights are up to 6,000 tonnes.()United StatesFor most large systems, the cost of electrifying the whole system is impractical and generally only some divisions are electrified. In the United States, only certain dense urban areas and some mountainous areas were electrified and the latter have all been discontinued. The junction between electrified and non-electrified territory is the locale of engine changes; for example, Amtrak trains had extended stops in Haven, Connecticut as diesel and electric locomotives were swapped, a delay which contributed to the electrification of the remaining segment of the Corridor in 2000.(New York to Boston, under wire - Amtrak begins all-electric Northeast Corridor service between Boston and Washington, D.C, Railway Age, March 2000, accessed from FindArticles.com on 28 Sep. 2006.)In North America, the flexibility of diesel locomotives and the relative low cost of their infrastructure has led them to prevail except where legal or other operational constraints dictate the use of electricity. An example of the latter is the use of electric locomotives by Amtrak and railroads in The Northeast (e.g. Jersey Transit New York corridor uses ALP-46 electric locomotives, due to the prohibition on diesel operation in the Hudson and River Tunnels leading to Penn Station).CanadaNo railways in Canada use electric locomotives on their lines as of January 2011.mtropolitaine de transport (AMT) has ordered the ALP-45DP dual mode locomotives for use on the Line (AMT). The locomotives will run as electric while in the poorly ventilated Royal Tunnel only and as diesel elsewhere.Transit has completed a study on electrifying some of their commuter rail lines (Georgetown/Air Rail Link & Lakeshore), but so far, no target date or purchases have been initiated.(Electrification Study Highlights)Battery locomotives  File:Battery loco 16 at West Ham.JPG|thumb|right|A Underground battery-electric locomotive at Ham stationA battery locomotive (or battery-electric locomotive) is a type of electric locomotive powered by on-board batteries; a kind of electric vehicle. Such locomotives are used where a conventional diesel or electric locomotive would be unsuitable. An example of use is the hauling of maintenance trains on electrified lines when the electricity supply is turned off, such as by the Underground battery-electric locomotives.Another use for battery locomotives is in industrial facilities  as an alternative to the locomotive  where a combustion-powered locomotive (i.e., steam- or diesel-powered) could cause a safety issue, due to the risks of fire, explosion or fumes in a confined space. Battery locomotives are preferred for mines where gas could be ignited by trolley-powered units arcing at the collection shoes, or where resistance could develop in the supply or return circuits, especially at rail joints, and allow dangerous current leakage into the ground.() An early example was at the Kennecott Copper Mine, Alaska, where in 1917 the underground haulage ways were widened to enable working by two  battery locomotives of 4 tons.()In 1928, Kennecott Copper ordered four 700-series electric locomotives with on-board batteries.  These locomotives weighed 85 tons and operated on 750-volt overhead trolley wire with considerable further range whilst running on batteries.(List of Kennecott Copper locomotives)  The locomotives provided several decades of service using battery (Edison) technology.  The batteries were replaced with lead-acid batteries, and the locomotives were retired shortly afterward.  All four locomotives were donated to museums, but one was scrapped.  The others can be seen at the and Scenic Valley Railroad, Iowa, and at the Railway Museum in Rio Vista, California.See also* electrification system* train* brake (rail)* Railway brakes* Boxcab* Davenport - electric locomotive pioneer* Grafton Page - electrical pioneer* Battery powered railcarsReferencesFurther reading***External links*Electric traction*Electric engines*Railroad tapping into wind and solar powerbe:elctriclokomotivada:Ellokomotivde:Elektrolokomotiveelctricalectriquelokomotivahu:Villamosmozdonylocomotiefja:pl:Elektrowzelectricru:ruelokomotivafi:Shkveturisv:Ellokuk:zh:
393520
Rugeley
Rugeley is a historic town in the county of Staffordshire, England. It lies on the northern edge of Chase, and is situated roughly midway between the towns of Stafford, Cannock, Lichfield, and Uttoxeter. The population as at the 2001 census was 22,724 (including the Brereton and Etchinghill wards).(Rugeley Online - Statistics)The town was a centre of mining until 1991, when the Lea Hall colliery was demolished. The Rugeley B coal-fired power station dominates the skyline where a gas desulfurization plant is currently being constructed. This will allow it to continue to generate electricity and comply with environmental legislation. The former Rugeley A station took its fuel directly from the neighbouring mine by conveyor belt. This was the first such arrangement in Britain. It is twinned with Springs, Illinois in the States.TransportRugeley has two railway stations, Rugeley Town and Rugeley Trent Valley, which lie on the Line connecting Rugeley, Walsall, and Birmingham. This line has not yet been electrified, and so the service is functional but slow, a typical end-to-end journey taking 54 minutes. Rugeley Trent Valley also lies on the Coast Main Line, and now has a regular hourly service to London via Lichfield, Nuneaton, Rugby and Milton Keynes, and to Crewe via Stafford and Stoke-on-Trent.The major roads into Rugeley are the A460 from Cannock, and the A51 Lichfield to Stone. A new eastern bypass was opened in 2007 to take the A51 through traffic out of the congested town centre.The Trent and the and Mersey Canal both pass through the town.DemographicsRugeley is a former mining town and, as such, suffers from a moderate level of social deprivation. Parts of the town consist of council or ex council house stock. However, on the fringes of Rugeley housing can be considerably more expensive, particularly in Etchinghill. A large number of new houses have been built recently, notably along Hednesford Road and there are concerns that these estates represent unwanted incursions into belt land.AmenitiesRugeley has a leisure centre on Burnthill lane, Rugeley has also benefitted from a skate park being built opposite Elmore Park. Rugeley has a reasonably sized town centre which boasts an outdoor market 3 days per week on Tuesday, Thursday and Saturday. It also has an indoor market and a shopping centre of sorts called the Brewery Street Arcade. Rugeley has a number of well known high street names like Boots, Argos and Greggs. It has a Morrisons but Tesco has been refused permission to build a supermarket in the Springfields area of the town. Rugeley has a number of public houses and takeaways and Horsefair is reputed to contain one of the densest concentrations of takeaways and public houses in Europe. Residents of the town benefit from their proximity to Chase and indeed there is now a heritage trail funded by the National Lottery linking the town to Hednesford and Cannock with excellent disabled access. The trail is now complete and contains numerous notice boards highlighting the towns history.Rugeley also has a state of the art health centre off Sandy Lane, a replacement for its somewhat dilapidated predecessor on Horsefair. Technically, two separate surgeries coexist there with chairs in the waiting room oriented one of two ways towards the plasma screen that informs patients of their appointment.The town also has a recording studio, Abbeysound, housed in a former convent in Heron Street, which is also home to Rugeley Snooker & Poker ClubsRugeley is well served by sports clubs, playing home to two Cricket teams (Rugeley CC and Trent Valley CC), several Football teams (including a spectrum of junior and senior sides), as well as a successful Rifle Club with both indoor and outdoor ranges, catering for .22 and air gun target shooting.The Lea Hall Social Club serves Rugeley residents with a variety of facilities including cricket and football pitches, tennis courts and a crown bowling green.MicroclimatesIt is well known in the Rugeley area that snowfall amounts can vary considerably between the town and nearby Chase. Generally speaking, Chase and Cannock receives significantly more snowfall than Rugeley. One culprit is elevation, much of the Chase is above 150m with a peak at Ring of 244m. Another culprit is the power station, which can warm snowfall sufficiently to create a significant snow free zone where snow is on the threshold of sticking. Rugeley also lies in Valley which can exhibit noticeable temperature inversions on cold, clear nights. It is not uncommon for lower Etchinghill and the town to be under frost and fog and for the estates at elevation, such as the Pear Tree Estate, to be frost free.HistoryThe town, historically known as Rudgeley, is listed in the Book. This name is thought to be derived from Ridge lee, or the hill over the field. In the mediaeval period, it thrived on iron workings and was also a site of glass manufacturing.Rugeley has recently had some new, modern pubs including the Glass Works (Brewery St) and Wetherspoons.  There is a charter fair that occurs during the first weekend in June, which is a huge attraction with most people from the town joining in-a fireworks display follows.  There is a Christmas lights switchon during December, which also includes a market and late night opening of shops.St. Augustine Church in Rugeley has memorials to the Levett family, who live at nearby Hall and who established the Rugeley Home and Cottage Hospital on Church Street in 1866.(Rugeley, A History of the County of Stafford, Victoria County History, L. Margaret Midgley, British History Online, 1959)(Rugeley, Churches, A History of the County of Stafford, Victoria County History, L. Margaret Midgeley, 1959, British History Online)FutureRugeley suffered a lack of employment when Lea Hall Colliery closed in the 1980s. However, a number of large industrial units have, and are still being built on the Towers Business park, a brownfield site situated on the former ground of the colliery. In June 2011, Amazon.co.uk announced they were coming to Rugeley with a Distribution Warehouse, creating 900 new jobs.Famous peopleWilliam PalmerIn 1855, the town gained notoriety when a local doctor, William Palmer, was accused of murdering an acquaintance, John Parsons Cook (who is buried in a still visible grave in the local St Augustines churchyard). It was claimed that Cook had been poisoned, and in the months that followed, Palmer was implicated in the deaths of several other persons, including his own wife and brother, and possibly even some of his own children. He was put on trial for the murder of Cook in 1856, and an of Parliament was passed to allow the trial to be held at the Bailey, London, as it was felt that a fair jury could not be found in Staffordshire. Palmer was found guilty of murder, and hanged publicly outside Stafford gaol on June 14, 1856.Local legend has is that, on being instructed to step on to the gallows trap-door he asked the now famous question Is it safe?. Furthermore, following the uproar surrounding the discovery of Palmers activities, the town put in a special request to the Prime Minister requesting that they be permitted to change the name of the town to disassociate themselves from the murders. Unfortunately, the Prime Minister at the time was Palmerston , who agreed to the request only on the condition that the town be named after him. For obvious reasons the locals declined this offer. The story of Palmer was told in Life and Crimes of William Palmer (1998), starring Keith Allen in the role of the infamous doctor.George EdaljiErnest Thompson Edalji (March 1876  June 17, 1953) was famously and wrongly convicted of one of the Great Wyrley Outrages, (the village of Wyrley being some eight-and-a-half miles south of Rugeley, south of the Cannock Chase district and north of Walsall) but cleared as the result of an investigation by Conan Doyle. Julian Barnes 2005 novel & George recounts the entire episode in great detail, though it does not always stick to the historical record (see Roger Oldfields book Outrage: The Edalji Five and the Shadow of Sherlock Holmes, Vanguard Press). Edalji was educated at a Rugeley grammar school in the 1880s.Christina CollinsThe body of Christina Collins was discovered in the Trent and Mersey canal in Rugeley on 17 June 1839. She was believed to have been raped and murdered by Shale who had agreed to transport her from Liverpool to London to join her husband. The steps which she was carried up are still known as the bloody steps to this day. Although, as they are made from sandstone, the steps have no doubt been replaced several times, local legend has it that they sometimes ooze blood and her ghost appears upon them. Christinas grave can still be seen today in the churchyard at St Augustines church. Three of the four bargemen were charged with her murder. The story of her murder was the inspiration for an Inspector Morse mystery first broadcast in 1998, entitled Wench is Dead.Nearby placesTowns and cities* Cannock* Hednesford* Stafford* LichfieldVillages* Bromley* Admaston* Armitage* Blithbury* Brereton* Wood* Colton* Colwich* Hay* Etchinghill* Haywood* Ridware* Handsacre* Ridware* Bromley* Haywood* Longdon* Ridware* Mill* LongdonOther* Centre* Reservoir* Heath* ShugboroughTwin town*  Springs, Illinois, since 1957.References(External links* Brereton and Rugeley Parish Website* Map of Rugeley at Streetmap.co.uk* Rugeley Bypass* Rugeley Power Station* Rugeley Cricket Club* Rugeley Rifle Club* Rugeley Rangers Football Club* Lea Hall Miners Welfare CEntre and Social Clubbg:de:Rugeleyit:Rugeleynl:Rugeleynn:Rugeleypl:Rugeleyro:Rugeleysimple:Rugeleyvo:Rugeley
395422
Hastings_County
:For other uses, see (disambiguation).footnotes              Hastings County is located in the province of Ontario, Canada. It is The Cheese Capital of Canada.(Trade-marks databasehttp://strategis.ic.gc.ca/app/cipo/trademarks/search/viewTrademark.do;jsessionid0000CzSOb6qLbZXZVnZSGlkkb0T:1247nfca5?languageeng&fileNumber0907592&extension0&startingDocumentIndexOnPage1)  Geographically, it is located on the border of Ontario and Ontario.  The population was 125,915 in 2001 and grew to 130,474 in the 2006 Canada Census. With the area of  reaching nearly  from north to south, Hastings County is the second largest county in Ontario.The seat of the county is Belleville.MunicipalitiesThe 14 municipalities within the county are:* Town of Bancroft* Town of Deseronto* Municipality of Centre Hastings* Municipality of Hastings Highlands* Township of Carlow/Mayo* Township of Faraday* Township of Limerick* Township of Madoc* Municipality (township) of Marmora and Lake* Township of Stirling-Rawdon* Township of Tudor & Cashel* Municipality of Tweed* Township of Tyendinaga* Township of WollastonThe cities of Belleville and Quinte West are separated municipalities.From 1837 to 1849, it was known as Victoria District for administrative purposes. The district town was Belleville.28 Ontario.JPG|thumb|left|230px|The northern portion of Hastings County is characterized by the rugged landscape of the Madawaska Highlands. History The first boundaries of Hastings County were established 1792 by Lieutenant-Governor Graves Simcoe. The southern boundary was the Bay of Quinte, the eastern boundary was Lennox County and the western boundary ran from the Trent River to the Ottawa River, in a triangular shape. The County consisted of Sidney, Thurlow, Rawdon, Huntingdon and Hungerford townships as well as the Mohawk Tract. The area was named for Rawdon-Hastings.Three new townships; Elzevir, Madoc and Marmora were created in 1821 and on Monday, October 1, 1821 the first Hastings County fair was held in Belleville . The largest prize paid was to Captain Daniel Ostrom of Sydney at $20 and Ruliff Purdy of Sidney received the most prizes totaling $106.50.While in this time agriculture was the most important industry in Hastings County, by 1822 (when the Marmora Iron Works was approaching its peak production) mining was playing an increasingly more important role in the areas economy.Prominent citizens of Hastings County and Ameliasburgh Township unsuccessfully petitioned the provincial government for district status during 1817, 1818, 1823 and 1825. After Prince Edward County successfully achieved its own government in 1831, Hastings County continued to send petitions throughout the 30s before finally achieving the status of a separate district in March 1837. Belleville was named the countys District Town.From 1839 until 1849, Hastings County was renamed Victoria District after Victoria. By 1841 the county had access to local courts but no local government was in place. On February 8, 1842 the Victoria Districts first council met under warden William Hutton. During much of this time roads and bridges were the most important issues the council dealt with.Edward Fidlar became the first warden of Hastings County with their first meeting on January 28, 1850. By this time the Hastings County Council was also interested in education and the building of the railroad.On October 27, 1856 the first railroad train arrived in Belleville and by 1864 around 100 people were employed by the railroad.In August 1866, discovery of gold at Eldorado, near Madoc, caused great excitement throughout Hastings County as people flooded to the area from all over North America. The railroads and  of good gravel roads opened these areas to settlement by 1880.In 1889 the Belleville Waterworks was created as a private company, which was then bought by the city of Belleville in 1889. In 1911, Hastings County was the first in the province to appoint a reforestation committee, which was instrumental in passing laws around county forests. Postal service began in the area in 1913.(Historic Hastings by Gerald E. Boyce)TransportationThe county is served by Highway 401 in the south, Highway 7, a leg of the Highway, in the central region, Highways 62 and 37 travelling north to south, Highway 28 travelling east to west in the northern region, and Highway 127 travelling north from Maynooth, also in the northern region. County Council Warden: Jo-Anne AlbertTown of Bancroft: Bernice Jenckins Hastings Highlands: Ron Emond Township of Carlow/Mayo: Bonnie Adams Municipality of Centre Hastings: Owen Ketcheson Town of Deseronto: Norm Clark Township of Faraday: Carl Tinney Township of Limerick: David Golem Township of Madoc: Bob Sager Municipality of Marmora & Lake: Terry Clemens Township of Stirling/Rawdon: Rodney Cooney Municipality of Tweed: Jo-Anne Albert Township of Tudor & Cashel: Wanda Donaldson Township of Tyendinaga: Rick Phillips Township of Wollaston: Dan McCawSee also* Ontario* Ontario* OntarioReferences(External links* County of Hastings* Economic DevelopmentCountydi Hastingsja:Hastingsde Hastings
398969
History_of_Seattle_before_1900
History of Seattle before 1900IntroductionTwo conflicting perspectives exist for the early history of Seattle. There is what one might call the establishment view, which favors the centrality of the Party (generally the Denny, Mercer, Terry, and Boren families), and Yesler. A second, less didactic view, advanced particularly by historian Speidel and others such as Murray Morgan, sees David Swinson Doc Maynard as a key figure, perhaps the key figure. In the late nineteenth century, when Seattle had become a thriving town, several members of the Denny Party still survived; they and many of their descendants were in local positions of power and influence. Maynard was about ten years older and died relatively young, so he was not around to make his own case. The Denny Party were generally conservative Methodists, teetotalers, Whigs and Republicans, while Maynard was a drinker and a Democrat. He felt that well-run prostitution could be a healthy part of a citys economy. He was also on friendly terms with the regions Native Americans, while many of the Denny Party were not. Thus Maynard was not on the best of terms with what became the Seattle Establishment, especially after the Sound War. He was nearly written out of the citys history until Morgans 1951 book Skid Road and Speidels research in the 1960s and 1970s.FoundingWhat is now Seattle has been inhabited since at least the end of the last glacial period (c. 8000 BCE&mdash;10,000 years ago). Archaeological excavations at what is now called West Point in Discovery Park, Magnolia confirm settlement within the current city for at least 4,000 years and probably much longer.() The area of  (herring house) and later  (where there are clams) at the then-mouth of the River in what is now the Industrial District had been inhabited since the 6th century CE.(Dailey (map with village 33, referencing his footnotes 2, 9, and 10)) The DkhwDuwAbsh (People of the Inside), and the Xachuabsh (People of the Large Lake),(For a pronunciation brief, see the footnote in tribe.) of the (Skagit-Nisqually) Lushootseed Salish Native American Nations occupied at least 17 villages in the mid-1850s (13 within what are now the city limits),((1) After historical epidemiology 62% losses due to introduced diseases. (1.1)Boyd) living in some 93 permanent longhouses (khwaaclal) along the lower Duwamish River, Bay, Bay, Bay, Washington within what is now Seattle, as well as Sammamish, and the Duwamish, Black, and Cedar Rivers in what is now metropolitan Seattle.((1) and (2) (3) Page links to Village Descriptions Duwamish-Seattle section http://coastsalishmap.org/Village_Descriptions_Duwamish-Seattle.htm. Dailey referenced Puget Sound Geography by T. T. Waterman. Washington DC: National Anthropological Archives, mss. n.d. 2; Duwamish et al. vs. United States of America, F-275. Washington DC: US Court of Claims, 1927. 5; Indian Lake Washington by David Buerge in the Seattle Weekly, 17 August 1984 8; Seattle Before Seattle by David Buerge in the Seattle Weekly, 1723 December 1980. 9; The Puyallup-Nisqually by Marian W. Smith. New York: Columbia University Press, 1940. 10. Recommended start is Coast Salish Villages of Puget Sound http://coastsalishmap.org/start_page.htm. (4)  (5)) The DkhwDuwAbsh and Xachuabsh are today represented by the Duwamish Tribe.Vancouver was the first European to visit the Seattle area in May 1792 during his 1791-95 expedition to chart the Northwest(); the first White forays for sites in the area were in the 1830s.(Morgan (1951, 1982), pp. 21&ndash;22)The founding of Seattle is usually dated from the arrival of the Party on November 13, 1851 at Alki Point. The group had travelled overland from the Midwest to Oregon, then made a short ocean journey up the Pacific coast into Sound, with the express intent of founding a town. The next April, A. Denny abandoned the original site at Alki in favor of a better-protected site on Bay, near the south end of what is now downtown Seattle. Around the same time, Doc Maynard began settling the land immediately south of Dennys. C. Terry and others hung on at Alki for a few more years, but eventually it became clear that Maynard and Denny had chosen the better location.The first plats for Seattle were filed on May 23, 1853. Nominal legal land settlement was provisionally established in 1855 (with treaty terms for what is now Seattle not implemented). Doc Maynards land claim lay south of todays Yesler Way, encompassing most of todays Pioneer Square Historical District and the International District. He based his street grid on strict compass bearings. The more northerly plats of A. Denny and D. Boren encompassed Pioneer Square north of what is now Yesler Way; the heart of the current downtown; and the western slope of First Hill. These had street grids that more or less followed the shoreline. The downtown grid from Yesler Way north to Stewart Street is oriented 32 degrees west of north; from Stewart north to Denny Way the orientation is 49 degrees west of north. The result is a tangle of streets where the grids clash. (See also layout of Seattle.)Both Alki and the settlement that was to become Seattle relied in their early decades on the timber industry, shipping out logs (and, later, milled timber) to build and rebuild Francisco which, as Bill Speidel points out, kept burning down. Seattle and Alki offered plenty of trees to build San Francisco and plenty of hills to slide them down to water. A climax forest of trees up to 1,000&ndash;2,000 years old and towering as high as nearly   covered much of what is now Seattle. Today, none of that size remain anywhere in the world.((1) Dolan & True (2003), pp. 142, 144 (2) Van Pelt (2001) pp. xxii, 181&ndash;185, 187&ndash;191)Relations with the nativesThis section draws heavily on Bill Speidel, Sons of the Profits (1967) and Doc Maynard (1978). Doc Maynard and Murray Morgan, Skid Road (1951, 1960, 1982) are especially useful on the events regarding resistance nominally led by Kamiakim in the January 1856 attack on the town. Generally before the Point Elliott Treaty The early Seattle settlers had a sometimes rocky relationship with the local Native Americans. There is no question that the settlers were steadily taking away native lands and, in many cases, treating the natives terribly. There were numerous deadly attacks by settlers against natives and by natives against settlers.Bill Speidel writes in Sons of the Profits, The general consensus of the community was that killing an Indian was a matter of no graver consequence than shooting a cougar or a bear... Against this background, Doc Maynard stands out for his excellent relations with the natives. He and Seattle were friends and allies: Maynard certainly profited greatly from this friendship, but that should not diminish the fact that during the outbreak of violent hostilities in 1856 he risked the wrath of his fellow settlers by protecting neutral Indians. However, outside of some old-time trappers and traders, he was almost unique in his attitude.Denny and Edward Lander (the latter was the first local federal judge) also stood out in that they believed that the law should be applied fairly and equally: to them, murder was murder, regardless of the race of the victim. However, it was impossible to get this view upheld by a jury. In Sons of the Profits Speidel recounts a case of two vigilantes who had hanged a native man. After a series of (possibly deliberate) irregularities in their trial, the jury acquitted these obviously guilty men on a technicality.Territorial Governor Stevens probably did more damage to relations between settlers and natives than any one other person. He put a bounty on scalps of bad Indians. He declared martial law to prevent Lander from issuing writs of corpus for people who were held in jail for little other reason than sympathizing with the natives. On at least two occasions, he actually had Lander himself jailed.Perhaps worst of all in its consequences for relations, he dealt dishonestly in treaties, among other things making oral promises that were not matched by what was written down. The local natives had at least a thirty-year history of dealing with the Bay Company, who had developed a reputation for driving a hard bargain, but sticking honestly to what they agreed to, and for treating Whites and Indians impartially. This continued through the dealings of the local of Indian Affairs Superintendent General, Palmer, who (along with Maynards brother-in-law, Indian Agent Mike Simmons) was among the few even-handed men in the BIA.Consequently when Stevens, in drafting treaties, acted in a manner that Judge Wickerson would characterize forty years later as unfair, unjust, ungenerous, and illegal, some natives, quite unprepared for such behavior by the official representatives of the white mans power, were angered to the point of war. The unjust and deliberately confusing Western Washington treaties such as that of Medicine Creek (December 26, 1854) and Point Elliott (now Mukilteo) (January 22, 1855) were followed by the yet more provocative treaty of Walla Walla (May 21, 1855), as Stevens pointedly ignored federal government instructions to stick to sorting out the areas where natives and settlers found themselves immediately adjacent to one another, or, from the other perspective, where settlers moved right in on Native places. Generally after the Point Elliott Treaty By the time of the of Point Elliott, Maynard had already made an ally of Chief Seattle by arranging to have him somewhat compensated for the use of his name for the new town. Chief Seattles ancestral religion and Salish culture have beliefs opposed to speaking or using a persons name after that persons death and prior to protocols, so this was not a simple matter, although Chief Seattle soon converted to a somewhat eclectic Roman Catholicism. (See also Duwamish). At Point Elliott, Maynard cemented this alliance (and greatly benefited his emerging town) by getting Chief Seattle and the Duwamish a separate, more favorable treaty, which, in exchange for a relatively large reservation (promised, not yet ever fulfilled), Natives abandoned all aboriginal title to 54,790 acres (221.7 km), constituting an area almost identical to the eventual twentieth-century city limits of the City of Seattle, for nearly nothing at the time.With Stevens in Eastern Washington sowing discord, Secretary of State Charles Mason was left in charge of the state government. Yakama Chief Kamiakim had effectively declared war and told nations such as the Duwamish that they could either join him or would be treated as enemies. By autumn, there had been an exchange of massacres by Whites and settlers, in which both sides seemed ready to kill whichever people of the other race were at hand, with no regard for whether these particular individuals had in any way previously wronged them. (This cycle of retaliatory violence would reach its logical conclusion two years after the war, when the brilliant and generally respected siab Lescay (Leschi) was tried and condemned to death for a murder he almost certainly did not commit, and hanged before his appeal could be properly heard.)Maynard got Mike Simmons to deputize him as a Special Indian Agent, then&mdash;in a complex, multi-way transaction&mdash;cemented a relationship with acting governor Mason and some other key figures by selling them some prime Seattle real estate at a good price. He then used the money from the transaction to buy supplies and a boat to ferry Chief Seattle and his Duwamish to what was effectively a privately-funded reservation at Port Madison, west of Puget Sound. He also, at enormous personal risk, spent the first several weeks of November 1855 traveling around eastern King County, which was already penetrated by some of Kamiakims men, informing several hundred other neutral natives that there was a safe place they could go. Most of them took him up on it. Induced fear effected abandonment of places Natives were otherwise loath to leave.(In Doc Maynard, Bill Speidel reports that not all of the Seattle businessmen were pleased with his getting the local Indians out of the way. Henry Yesler and others found themselves deprived of much of their labor force and wrote letters of protest to the territorial government.)Shortly before Stevens returned to Olympia January 16, 1856, Captain E.D. Keyes had managed an uneasy informal truce by communicating with, among others, Chief Leschi. Stevens promptly undercut the truce, saying of the natives, Nothing but death is mete punishment for their perfidy.On January 25, 1856, Stevens announced, The town of Seattle is in as much danger of an Indian attack as are the cities of San Francisco or New York.On January 26, 1856, natives attacked the Seattle settlement. Friendly Indians permitted to stay in Seattle had warned the Whites, and sentries had been put on patrol. In the morning, acting on tip, a shell was lobbed into the forest above the town, what is now First Hill. First fire. The Indians fired back, small arms. Settlers rushed from their cabins to the blockhouse. The defenses were based on a large wooden blockhouse, a five-foot-high wood-and-earth breastworks, various ravines&mdash;and the cannon just offshore zeroed (bearing and range laid in). The settlement was defended at the time by the 150 man, 566 ton, 16 gun sloop-of-war Decatur, the bark Bronte, seven out-of-town civilian volunteers, fifty local volunteers, and at least 6 Marines from the Decatur The number of attackers is impossible to establish: estimates range from a mere thirty to 2000 with more than a hundred killed, another hundred wounded. Not so much as a single Indian body was ever found, not even a sign of blood. The Indians had made no attempt to storm the stockade. No one in the blockhouse was much interested in venturing out on attack. Both sides had paused for dinner. There were two known fatalities: a young volunteer and a 14-year-old boy, both of whom had neglected to stay behind cover. No one who kept inside the stockade was wounded. A few things do seem clear in this fog of war: nearly all of the local volunteers hardly left the blockhouse, the Navy took no combat casualties in this land battle, and Kamiakims forces were successfully driven off, but also took few (if any) fatalities.(Morgan (1951, 1982), pp. 31&ndash;51) Still, they seem to have drawn the conclusion that attacking a major settlement wasnt worth the trouble. The only remaining major battle of the war was to occur March 10 at Connells Prairie near Puyallup. After the skirmish Battle of Seattle The cessation of general hostilities did not diminish Stevens crusading zeal against the natives. He encouraged fratricidal war by offering the good Indians a bounty for scalps of the bad Indians. The largest collector of such rewards was Chief Seattles sworn rival, Chief Patkanim, a leader among the Snoqualmie and Snohomish. According to Speidel, Patkanim was not above killing and scalping his own slaves as a means of generating income. Speidel also narrates (in Sons of the Profits) that on one occasion this led to a native being killed and scalped in Stevens own office.Stevens continually attempted to recruit Chief Seattle and the Duwamish to this cause. Maynard and Chief Seattle, who had already gone to great lengths to help keep the Duwamish at a safe distance from Patkanim, never actually refused the Governors request, but instead maintained a successful pattern of stalling and passive resistance to avoid ever providing any Duwamish fighters to further Stevens scheme.A smallpox epidemic broke out among the Northwest tribes in 1862, killing roughly half of the native population. Documentation in archives and historical epidemiology demonstrates that Governmental policies furthered the progress of the epidemic among the natives.((1) Boyd (2) Lange (4 February 2003, Essay 5171) (2.1) Lange (8 December 2000, Essay 3176) Summary)The Seattle Establishment, including Doc Maynard, petitioned the Territorial Delegate to Congress in 1866 to deny treaty rights to the Duwamish. The commitments made by the United States government in the Point Elliott Treaty have not yet been met.( Wilma referenced Petition: To the Honorable Arthur A. Denny, Delegate to Congress from Washington Territory, n.d., National Archives Roll 909, Letters Received by the Office of Indian Affairs, 1824-81; Pioneer Association of the State of Washington, A Petition to Support Recognition of The Duwamish Indians as a Tribe, June 18, 1988, in possession of Ken Tollefson, Seattle, Washington.)Yeslers MillAt first, Alki was larger than Seattle. It was platted into six blocks of eight lots... and most of them had buildings on them that were in use. There werent eight level, usable blocks in all of Seattle.(Speidel (1967), p. 31) However, when Henry Yesler broughtfinancial backing from a Ohio capitalist, John E. McLain, to start a steam sawmill once he had isolated the perfect location for such a structure,(Speidel (1967), p. 60) he chose a Seattle location, on the waterfront where Maynard and Dennys plats met. Thereafter, Seattle would dominate the lumber industry.Yesler selected this location because of a critical flaw with Alki as a port: During the winter, the north wind, building up the tides in front of it, comes sweeping down the Sound out of Canada, piling mighty waves on Alki Point. Beginning with Terry... nobody has been able to build anything out in the water at Alki that will withstand those waves.(Speidel (1967), p. 33)The road leading down the hill to that mill, later called Mill Street and now known as Yesler Way, was originally known as the Road, the route for skidding logs down to the mill, hence the term Skid Road or corrupted as Row for a rundown or dilapidated urban area as the mill declined and the area collapsed with the Crash and Depression.( Authors referenced Walt Crowley, National Trust Guide Seattle (New York: John Wiley & Sons, Inc., 1998); Lee Moriwaki, Downtowns Changing Face, The Seattle Times, February 23, 1997. Information on the Smith Tower was corrected on September 2, 2004.)Via the bargaining power of his mill, Yesler wrangled about 20,220 square feet (1,900 m) of prime land from some of the original settlers. Besides his mill, Yesler started a cookhouse that did more to set the heart of the city in the middle of Yeslers property holdings than anything else Henry did. Henry never did make a lot of money out of his mill. It was the strategic location of his land that made him a millionaire.(Speidel (1967), p. 63) Like many of Seattles early entrepreneurs, Yesler was not always the most scrupulous about how he made his money; he borrowed $30,000 at 8% interest to build the mill, and repaid McLain only after McLain took Yesler to court three times.A city growsthumb|400px|Seattle, engraving from Harpers New Monthly Magazine (September 1870).The first Seattle fortunes were founded on logs, and later milled timber, shipped south for the construction of buildings in San Francisco. Seattle itself, in the early years, was, of course, also a place of wooden buildings, and remained so until the Great Fire of June 6, 1889. Even the early system of delivering water to the settlement used hollowed-out logs for pipes. Seattle in its early years relied on the timber industry, shipping logs (and, later, milled timber) to Francisco.Terry sold out Alki (which, after his departure barely held on as a settlement), moved to Seattle and began acquiring land. He either owned or partially owned the first ships that allowed Seattles timber industry to exist by providing a means to move the product to market. He eventually gave a land grant to the University of the Territory of Washington that housed its original campus and today makes the of Washington a downtown landlord collecting rents of more than $1 million a year. He worked in politics to establish street grades, a water system, and a host of other services (which, not coincidentally, benefited him as one of the citys largest landholders).Meanwhile, Arthur Denny became the second richest man in town, after Yesler, and got himself elected to territorial legislature. From that position, he tried unsuccessfully to get the territorial capital moved to Seattle from its then supposedly temporary location in Olympia. The other potential money prizes were the territorial penitentiary and the territorial university. When the politics all played out, Vancouver wound up as the proposed capital, Port Townsend was supposed to get the penitentiary, and Seattle got the university. Apparently, Seattle was the only real winner in this deal: to this day, Olympia remains the capital of Washington; the main state penitentiary is in Walla Walla.The legislature had tacked on the requirement that a grant of 10 acres (4 ha) of land would be required for the university to be built, which they presumably thought would be sufficient to prevent its construction. However, Denny wanted his town to grow and donated the land, creating what would be one of the biggest and most effective central core properties in the United States.(Speidel (1967), p. 89) The University of the Territory of Washington (later the of Washington) opened on November 4, 1861. There were barely enough students to run it as a high school, let alone as a university, but over time it grew into its originally grandiose name.The logging town developed rapidly into a small city. Despite being officially founded by the Methodists of the Denny Party, Seattle quickly developed a reputation as a wide-open town, a haven for prostitution, liquor, and gambling. Some attribute this, at least in part, to Maynard, who arrived separately from the Denny Party, and who had a rather different view of what it would take to build a city, based on his experience in growing Ohio. By selling some of his land cheaply on condition that businesses be soon built upon them, he recruited professionals, such as blacksmiths and purveyors of vice, who enhanced the value of his remaining land. The citys first brothel dated from 1861 and was founded by one John Pinnell (or Pennell), who was already involved in similar business in San Francisco. estate records show that nearly all of the citys first 60 businesses were on, or immediately adjacent to, Maynards plat.Seattle was incorporated as a town January 14, 1865. The incorporators were C. Terry, L. Yesler, T. Denny, Plummer and Burnett, an officer of the largest Puget Sound lumber company & Talbot. That charter was voided January 18, 1867, in response to unrest. Seattle was re-incorporated as a city on December 2, 1869. At the times of incorporation, the population was approximately 350 and 1,000, respectively.(Clarence B. Bagley, History of Seattle from the Earliest Settlement to the Present Time, Vol. 2 (Chicago: S.J. Publishing Co., 1916), p. 698. NB: Per Original source not checked) Railroad rivalry and encroaching civilization thumb|Seattle, looking south from Pine Street, 1880.On July 14, 1873 the Pacific Railway announced that they had chosen the then-small town of Tacoma over Seattle as the Western terminus of their transcontinental railroad. The railroad barons appear to have been gambling on the advantage they could gain from being able to buy up the land around their terminus cheaply instead of bringing the railroad into a more established Pacific port town.Unwilling to be bypassed, the citizens of Seattle chartered their own railroad, the Seattle & Walla Walla. This project did not get very far, though after later reorganization it did bring coal, fueling industry in Seattle. The later Lake Shore & Eastern Railway was only moderately more successful, although it did provide a route for logs to come to the city from as far away as Washington, boost development of towns, and help Seattle hit the jackpot with the Northern Pacific. The Great Northern Railway did finally come to Seattle in 1884, winning Seattle a place in competition for freight, though it would be 1906 before Seattle finally acquired a major rail passenger terminal. The Seattle, Lake Shore & Eastern was, over the years, incorporated into the Northern Pacific and then the Northern railways.((1) Speidel (1967), pp. 196&ndash;197, 200 (2) Dorpat (1994), ch. 42) The line was abandoned as a railroad in 1971 with the general decline in rail, and became in 1978 a foot and bicycle route renamed the Trail, then gradually greatly extended.As has been remarked, Seattle in this era was an open and often relatively lawless town. Although it boasted two English-language newspapers (and, for a while, a third in Norwegian), and telephones had arrived in town, lynch law sometimes prevailed (there were at least four lynchings in 1882), schools barely operated, and indoor plumbing was a rare novelty. In the low mud flats where much of the city was built, sewage was almost as likely to come in on the tide as to flow away. Potholes in the street were so bad that legend has it there was at least one fatal drowning.The 1882 lynchings are well described in Murray Morgans book Skid Road. The events involved a mob defying an armed sheriff, successfully disarming the sheriffs deputies, and assaulting Judge Roger Sherman Greene, who attempted to slash the ropes by which the lynching victims were to be hanged. Judge Greene, while not doubting the actual guilt of the lynched men, was later to write that the lynchers were co-criminal with the lynched.thumb|Some Seattle schools in 1900.In an era during which the Washington Territory was one of the first parts of the U.S. to (briefly) allow suffrage, Seattle women attempted to counter these trends and to be a civilizing influence. On April 4, 1884, 15 Seattle women founded The Ladies Relief Society to address the number of needy and suffering cases within the limits of the city. This eventually resulted in the founding of the Seattle Childrens Home, still in operation today.Other signs of encroaching civilization were the citys first bathtub with plumbing 1870,(Phelps, p.198) and first streetcar in 1884, followed by a cable car from downtown over First Hill to Leschi Park in 1887. In 1885, the city passed an ordinance requiring attached sewer lines for all new residences. In 1886, the city got its first YMCA gymnasium, and in 1888 the exclusive Club was founded. On December 24, 1888, ferry service was inaugurated, connecting Seattle to West Seattle, near the location of the Denny Partys first attempt at settling at Alki and reviving that settlement. A year later, a bridge was built across Bay, providing a land route to the nearby town of Ballard, which after 17 years would be annexed to Seattle.The relative fortunes of Seattle and Tacoma clearly show the nature of Seattles growth. Though both Seattle and Tacoma grew at a rapid rate from 1880 to 1890, based on the strength of their timber industries, Seattles growth as an exporter of services and manufactured goods continued for another two decades, while Tacomas growth dropped almost to zero. The reason for this lies in Tacomas nature as a company town and Seattles successful avoidance of that condition.Both Seattle and Tacoma in the 1880s were essentially lumber towns, built on the resulting export income. All over the Puget Sound there are communities that started with the same assets, timber and a port. However, Seattles early lead with Yeslers mill and other enterprises meant that its economy was based on manufacturing as well as lumber, and was thus far more diversified than Tacomas. The Northern Pacific Railway terminus only increased Tacomas lumber trade instead of diversifying the economy. Meanwhile, Seattle became the hub for the region and the railroad had to come.Relations between whites and ChineseChinese first arrived in Seattle around 1860. The Northern Pacific Railway completed the project of laying tracks from Superior to Washington, in 1883, leaving many Chinese laborers without employment. In 1883, Chinese laborers played a key role in the first effort at digging the Cut to connect Unions Bay to Washingtons Union Bay.Seattles Chinese district, located near the present day Occidental Park, was a mixed neighborhood of residences over stores, laundries, and other retail storefronts.( accessdate  Sources provided with endnotes http://www.nps.gov/klse/hrs/hrsend.htm.) In fall 1885, with a shortage of jobs in the West, many workers turned violently anti-Chinese, complaining of overly cheap labor competition. In the Pacific Northwest, this had the unusual character that the anti-Chinese mobs included significant numbers of the native Indians as well as European-Americans.The first massacre of Chinese occurred at Springs, Wyoming, September 2, 1885. On September 7, Chinese hop-pickers were massacred in the Squak valley near present-day Issaquah. Similar incidents occurred in the nearby mining camps at Coal Creek and Black Diamond. Many Chinese headed from these isolated rural areas into the cities, but it did them little good: on October 24, a mob burned a large portion of Seattles Chinatown; on November 3, a mob of 300 expelled the Chinese in Tacoma (loading them into boxcars with surprisingly little actual violence) before moving on to force similar expulsions in smaller towns.((1) Harpweek http://www.harpweek.com/, on-line database of Harpers Weekly, oldest extant periodical in the U.S. (2)Morgan, p.82, 85)Violent opposition to the Chinese at this time was inseparable from union organizing. The pro-labor Seattle Call routinely described the Chinese in brutally racist terms; leading figures in the anti-Chinese movement included of Labor organizer Dan Cronin and Seattle socialist agitator Kenworthy; the utopian socialist Venable Smith was also of this party. Nor did the Chinese have many strong defenders among the wealthier classes, who, however, mostly favored a more orderly departure of the Chinese to massacre and riot (the policy of Henry Yesler, who was serving as mayor at this time).(Morgan (1960), pp. 80&ndash;86)Among the few defenders of the rule of law were the Methodist Episcopal Ministers Association and Judge Thomas Burke. Burke, an Irish immigrant and generally a friend of labor, was nonetheless a stronger defender of the Constitution; he also spoke out that his fellow Irish should identify with the Chinese as fellow immigrants, a view which fell almost entirely on deaf ears.(Ibid, pp. 86&ndash;87)On February 7, 1886, well-organized anti-Chinese order committees descended on Seattles Chinatown, claiming to be health inspectors, declaring Chinese-occupied buildings to be unfit for habitation, rousting out the residents and herding them down to the harbor, where the Queen of the Pacific was docked. The police were willing to intervene only to the point of preventing the Chinese from being physically harmed, not to challenging the mob. It is quite probable that if ships captain Jack Alexander had been willing simply to board the Chinese and take them away, the mob would entirely have ruled the day; however, he was not in the business of hauling non-paying passengers. The mob raised several hundred dollars, 86 Chinese were boarded, but this delay gave the mayor, Judge Burke, the U.S. Attorney, and others time both to rally the Home Guard and to serve Alexander with a writ of habeas corpus. A plot to deport the Chinese by rail was foiled when Sheriff McGraw threatened to prosecute the railroad superintendent for kidnapping.(Ibid, pp. 90&ndash;93)The following day, Judge Greene made it clear that those Chinese who wished to remain would be protected, but by now, after what they had been through, all but sixteen preferred to leave. Alexander, by now, was anxious to keep his operations strictly legal,(Ibid, p. 93) and would board only the 196 passengers for which his ship was rated, slightly more than half of the Chinese who were ready to leave. Possibly due to poor communication, the anti-Chinese faction were unsatisfied; a resulting scuffle resulted in one dead and four others wounded among the anti-Chinese faction, and martial law was imposed. Ultimately, the bulk of the Chinese remained in Seattle, and the U.S. government out of humane consideration and without reference to liability paid out $276,619.15 to the Chinese government, but nothing to the victims themselves.(Ibid, pp. 93&ndash;97)The Great Seattle FireThe early Seattle era came to a stunning halt with the Seattle Fire of June 6, 1889. It burned 29 city blocks, destroying most of the central business district; no one, however, perished in the flames, and the city quickly rebounded from the destruction. Thanks in part to credit arranged by Furth (as well as, according to Speidel, brothel-owner Lou Graham), Seattle rebuilt from the ashes with astounding rapidity. A new zoning code resulted in a downtown of brick and stone buildings, rather than wood. In the single year after the fire, the city grew from 25,000 to 40,000 inhabitants, largely because of the enormous number of construction jobs suddenly created.(Speidel (1989), p. 52.)Labor history in 19th century SeattleBeer - tinfoiling - 1900.jpg|thumb|Tinfoiling Rainier Beer bottles, 1900.The Pacific Northwest economy during the nineteenth century was heavily rooted in extractive industries, mainly logging. Still, Seattle was becoming a city, and union organizing arrived first in the form of a skilled craft union. In 1882, Seattle printers formed the Seattle Typographical Union Local 202. Dockworkers followed in 1886, cigarmakers in 1887, tailors in 1889, and both brewers and musicians in 1890. Even the newsboys unionized in 1892, followed by more organizing, mostly of craft unions.According to various analyses and as evident through general readings in news coverage of the time, the history of labor in this period is inseparable from the issue of anti-Chinese vigilantism, as discussed above. A rough-and-ready approach to labor organizing was typical of the period, and there is no question that white Seattle-area laborers at this time saw cheap Chinese labor as their prime competition and strove to eliminate it by eliminating the Chinese immigrants.This section is still mostly a stub. You can help Wikipedia by fixing it.The Klondike Gold Rush1897.JPG|thumb|The Central Waterfront during the Gold Rush (1897).thumb|Railroad Avenue (now Alaskan Way) along the Seattle waterfront, 1900Seattle, as well as the rest of the nation, was hard hit by the of 1893, and to a lesser extent, the of 1896. Unlike many other cities, it soon found salvation in the form of becoming the main transportation and supply center for stampeders heading for the gold rush. When the steamer S.S. Portland arrived at Schwabachers Wharf in Seattle July 17, 1897, the Post-Intelligencer scooped all other U.S. newspapers with the story that a ton of gold had arrived from Alaska. A publicity campaign engineered largely by Brainerd successfully convinced the world that Seattle was the place to outfit yourself for the journey to Alaska, and Seattle became a household word, literally overnight. The miners mined the gold. Seattle mined the miners.()Seattles relationship with Alaska during this period was generally one of rapacity. Besides the mining, on October 18, 1899, a Chamber of Commerce Committee of Fifteen, just back from a goodwill visit to Alaska, proudly unveiled a  pole from Tongass, Alaska in Pioneer Square. The problem was, the pole had been stolen from the Tlingit village of Gaash on Cape Fox. A federal grand jury in Alaska indicted eight of Seattles most prominent citizens for theft of government property. A nominal fine was assessed((1) Wilma (1 January 2000, Essay 2076)) The village was repaid when the original burned and the Chamber of Commerce commissioned a replacement&mdash;and paid twice. Thank you for the check, wrote the Gaash village leaders. That was payment for the first one. Send another check for the replacement. See also * tribe* Damnable* Springs massacre Notes and references Much of the content of this page is from Seattle: Booms and Busts, by Emmett Shear; Shear has granted blanket permission for material from that paper to be reused in Wikipedia. Bibliography *  and * * *  Page links to Village Descriptions Duwamish-Seattle section. Dailey referenced Puget Sound Geography by T. T. Waterman. Washington DC: National Anthropological Archives, mss. n.d. 2; Duwamish et al. vs. United States of America, F-275. Washington DC: US Court of Claims, 1927. 5; Indian Lake Washington by David Buerge in the Seattle Weekly, 17 August 1984 8; Seattle Before Seattle by David Buerge in the Seattle Weekly, 1723 December 1980. 9; The Puyallup-Nisqually by Marian W. Smith. New York: Columbia University Press, 1940. 10. Recommended start is Coast Salish Villages of Puget Sound* *  2d edition of vol. I of III* *  Lange referenced a very extensive list. Summary article**  accessdate   Lange referenced Lange, Smallpox Epidemic of 1862 among Northwest Coast and Puget Sound Indians http://www.historylink.org/essays/output.cfm?file_id5171, HistoryLink.org Online Encyclopedia of Washington State History. Accessed 8 December 2000.*  chapter * *  * * *  Speidel provides a substantial bibliography with extensive primary sources.*  Speidel provides a substantial bibliography with extensive primary sources.* .* *  Wilma referenced Petition: To the Honorable Arthur A. Denny, Delegate to Congress from Washington Territory, n.d., National Archives Roll 909, Letters Received by the Office of Indian Affairs, 1824-81; Pioneer Association of the State of Washington, A Petition to Support Recognition of The Duwamish Indians as a Tribe, June 18, 1988, in possession of Ken Tollefson, Seattle, Washington.*  Wilam referenced Paul Dorpat, Seattle Now and Then Vol. 2 (Seattle: Tartu Publications, 1984), 32-35; Joseph H. Wherry, The Totem Pole Indians, (New York: Wilfred Funk, Inc., 1964), 64, 89; William C. Speidel, Sons of the Profits (Seattle: Nettle Creek Publishing Co., 1967), 329-331; Viola Garfield, Seattles Totem Poles (Bellevue, WA: Thistle Press, 1996), 9; Seattle Department of Parks and Recreation, Data on the History of Seattle Park System Vol. 4 (Seattle: Seattle Parks Department, 1978); James William Clise, Personal Memoirs 1855-1935 Mimeograph, Altadena, California, 1935, Seattle Public Library. Further reading * HistoryLink.org Encyclopedia of Washington State History http://www.historylink.org provides a collection of articles on Seattle and Washington State history, unparalleled in its niche.* Seattle Museum of History and Industry. With the Seattle Room at the Public Library, these host the most extensive archives about Seattle.* Washington State History Museum, Washington State Historical Society*University of Washington Libraries: Digital Collections:** William F. Boyd Photograph Album 43 photographs of early Seattle, particularly scenes of the aftermath of the Seattle Fire of June 6, 1889, and Washington state, ca. 1888-1893.** Boyd and Braas Photographs 45 photographs, c. 1888-1893, of early Seattle, including the waterfront and street scenes, Madrona and Leschi parks, Native American hop pickers, and portraits of Seattle pioneers.** Frank La Roche Photographs. 312 photographs c. 1888-1910 depicting scenes of the 1898 Gold Rush, Seattle, Washington state, Alaska, western United States, and Canada.** Lake Union Improvement Company Photograph Album A small photograph album (ca. 1891) used as a sales tool. Photographed by Frank La Roche, it contains an historical photographic record of early Seattle and its expansion northwards along the shores of Union.** Theodore E. Peiser Photographs. 140 images from the later part of the 19th century to about 1907. Among his subjects were images of troops preparing to embark from Lawton to China in 1900, the Territorial University (later of Washington), and early Seattle scenes.** Prosch Seattle Views Album. 169 images by Thomas Prosch, one of Seattles earliest pioneers, documenting the early history of Seattle and vicinity, c. 1851-1906.**Seattle Photographs Ongoing database of over 1,700 historical photographs of Seattle with special emphasis on images depicting neighborhoods, recreational activities including baseball, the Great Seattle Fire of 1889, The Great Snow of 1916, theaters and transportation.** Arthur Churchill Warner Photographs. Images by the pioneer photographer A.C. Warner, from the late 19th and early 20th centuries, of Seattle conventional street scenes, waterfront activity, city parks, and regrading of downtown.
400719
Virgil_Earp
 occupation   Union soldier, Constable, Deputy U.S. Marshal for the Arizona Territory, Marshal, farmer, rail construction, stagecoach driver, sawyer, mailman, prospector, saloon-keeperVirgil Walter Earp (July 18, 1843October 19, 1905) fought in the Civil War. He was U.S. Deputy Marshal for south-eastern Arizona and Tombstone City Marshal at the time of the at the O.K. Corral in the Territory. Two months after the shootout in Tombstone, outlaw Cowboys ambushed Virgil on the streets of Tombstone, shattering his left arm, leaving him maimed for life. His brother Earp was assassinated in March and Virgil left Tombstone for California to live with his parents and recuperate. When 16 years old, Virgil was married in  Iowa. While Earp served in the Union Army during the American Civil War, his wife received a false report that he had died and, so, moved to Oregon with her parents. Virgil did not see her or his daughter again for 37 years. He married two more times.Virgil held a variety of jobs throughout his life, though he primarily worked in law enforcement. His younger brother Wyatt, who spent most of his life as a gambler, became better known as a lawman because of writer Stuart N. Lakes fictionalized 1931 biography Wyatt Earp: Frontier Marshal and later portrayals of him in movies and fiction as Old Wests toughest and deadliest gunmen of his day.()() Early life Virgil Earp was born in Kentucky, the second son of Nicholas Earp and Virginia Ann Cooksey. In February 1860, while living in Iowa, 16 year-old Virgil eloped with 18 year-old Dutch immigrant Magdalena C. Ellen Rysdam (born November 25, 1842 in Utrecht, Netherlands  died May 3, 1910 in Cornelius, Oregon). They remained together for a year in spite of her parents (Gerrit Rysdam and Magdalena Catrina Van Velzen) disapproval.  Virgil and Ellen had a daughter, Nellie Jane Earp (January 7, 1862June 17, 1930). When Virgil left to serve in the Civil War, his daughter was two weeks old.On September 21, 1861, 18-year-old Virgil enlisted in the Army, serving with the 83rd Illinois Infantry from July 26, 1862 to June 24, 1865. Virgils older brother James had previously enlisted, but returned home in late 1861 after he was  badly wounded during a battle near Missouri. Virgils older half-brother Newton also enlisted with the Union and served throughout the war.In the summer of 1863, Ellen was told that Virgil had died in Tennessee and she left Pella with her parents and daughter for the Territory. She married John Van Rossem, who died shortly afterward, and married once again in 1867 to Thomas Eaton in Walla Walla, Territory. Virgil was reconnected with Ellen and their daughter 37 years later.In 1868, Nicholas Earp took his family east again, eventually settling in Lamar, Missouri. Virgil worked the farm and help operate a grocery store. Earp was discharged from the military on June 26, 1865 and returned to Iowa. Finding his wife and family had disappeared, he left Pella and headed to California to join the rest of the Earp family. He married Rosella Dragoo (born in France in 1853) on August 28, 1870 in Lamar, Missouri. His father was of the peace, but there are no further records of Rosilla.()Virgil later met Alvira Allie Sullivan from Nebraska in 1874. They established a common-law relationship that lasted the remainder of his life. During his life Virgil worked at many jobs. Farming, rail construction in Wyoming, stagecoach driver, a sawmill sawyer in Prescott, Arizona Territory, mailman, and later in life, prospector. A tight-knit family, the Earps generally kept close contact with one another, and often trailed along together to different living locations.Virgil spent some time in City, Kansas in 1877 with his younger brother Wyatt, though it is not certain if Virgil ever held any law enforcement position there. From Dodge City, Virgil and his wife moved to Prescott in July 1877, then the capital of Territory.( First published in Real West Magazine in January 1982. Annotated by Robert F. Palmquist) There, in October 1877, Virgil Earp was deputized by County, Arizona Sheriff Ed Bowers during a street gunfight. During the fight, Virgil killed one of the robbers, shooting him twice through the head with a Winchester rifle. In 1878, Virgil served in Prescott as a village night watchman for a couple of months, and was later elected as a constable in Prescott. Tombstone While in Prescott, Arizona, Virgil was appointed Deputy U.S. Marshal for the eastern portion of Pima County on November 27, 1879 by U.S. Marshall Crawley Dake. He was asked by Dake to move to Tombstone to help resolve ongoing problems with lawless Cowboys. In an interview after he left Tombstone, Virgil noted that The first stage that went out of Prescott toward Tombstone was robbed. Robberies were frequent and became expensive.( Virgil joined his brothers Wyatt and Jim in Tombstone in December 1879.On October 30, 1880, after town marshal Fred White was shot and killed by outlaw and gunman Curly Bill Brocius, Virgil was also appointed acting town marshal of Tombstone. Virgil now held both the local town marshal position and a federal law enforcement. But less than two weeks later Sippy beat Virgil for the town marshal job in a special election. When Tombstone was incorporated as a city on February 1, 1881, Virgil chose not to run against Sippy.However, Sippy was known to be in financial trouble. He requested a two-week leave of absence on June 6, 1881, and the city council once again appointed Virgil as temporary city marshal. On June 22, the center section of Tombstone was devastated by a fire. Virgil kept looting under control and chased off lot jumpers who tried to take over property. On June 28, it was learned that Sippy had left about $3,000 in bad debt and financial improprieties in his office. Virgil was appointed by Tombstone Mayor Clum as the permanent city marshal and paid $150.00 per month.()Conflict with CowboysTo reduce crime in Tombstone, the City Council enacted an ordinance in April 1881 that prohibited anyone from carrying a deadly weapon. Anyone entering town was required to deposit their weapons at a livery or saloon soon after entering town. The ordinance led directly to a confrontation that resulted in a shoot out with local Cowboys.()On October 26, 1881, Virgil learned that several Cowboys who had been threatening the Earps for several months were in town and armed in violation of the ordinance. Assisted by his deputy Morgan Earp and temporary deputies Wyatt Earp and John Doc Holliday, Virgil went to disarm Frank and McLaury, Ike and Clanton, and Claiborne. That confrontation turned into a shoot out that is now known world-wide as the at the O.K. Corral. Gunfight at the O.K. Corral The gunfight and later media portrayals made Wyatt Earp a legend. He is often depicted as the central lawman, but he was only Virgils temporary assistant. Wyatt had acted as city marshal the week prior when Virgil was out of town. Virgil was the city marshal and Deputy U.S. Marshal. Although Wyatt had  previously served in Kansas and Dodge City as a lawman, Virgil had three years of Civil War service which had given him more combat and shooting experience. He had also served as a lawman off and on since the war.Before the Gunfight at the O.K. Corral, Wyatt had been in only one shootout and Morgan had never been in any gun battles. Claiborne had been in one gunfight prior to the shootout and was the only member of the Cowboy faction that had prior gunfighting experience (not counting the Skeleton Canyon massacre, in which the McLaurys and Clantons took part). Doc Holliday, despite his reputation, had no documented gunfights to his credit, other than a couple of drunken brawls, and only his own tales of fights with unnamed men he claimed to have shot.During the gunfight, Virgil Earp was shot through the calf (he thought by Billy Clanton). Three days after the O.K. Corral gunfight, the city council suspended Virgil as City Marshall pending outcome of the preliminary hearing. Virgil was eventually exonerated of wrongdoing, but his reputation suffered thereafter. Assassination attempt After the at the O.K. Corral the Earps relocated their families to the Cosmopolitan Hotel for mutual support and protection.( At about 11:30 p.m. on December 28, 1881, three men hidden in the upper story of an unfinished building across Allen street from the hotel ambushed Virgil from behind as he walked from the Oriental Saloon to his room. Virgil was hit in the back and left arm by three loads of double-barreled buckshot from about .() The Crystal Palace Saloon and the Eagle Brewery beyond Virgil were struck by buckshot, breaking windows and narrowly missing patrons.( George Parsons wrote that he heard four shots in quick succession. Seriously wounded, Virgil staggered into the hotel. Wyatt, assuming that Virgil was dying, telegraphed U.S. Marshal Crawley P. Dake.(): Tombstone, Arizona Territory, December 29, 1881: Virgil Earp was shot by concealed assassins last night. His wounds are fatal. Telegraph me appointment with power to appoint deputies. Local authorities are doing nothing. The lives of other citizens are threatened. Wyatt Earp(Dr. George Emory Goodfellow removed  of shattered humerus bone from Virgils left arm, leaving his arm permanently crippled. While the doctors worked on his arm, Virgil told his wife Allie, Never mind, Ive got one arm left to hug you with.()Commenting on the telegram received by Dake from Wyatt Earp, the Weekly Arizona Miner wrote about the repeated threats received by the Earps and others. For some time, the Earps, Doc Holiday, Tom Fitch and others who upheld and defended the Earps in their late trial have received, almost daily, anonymous letters, warning them to leave town or suffer death, supposed to have been written by friends of the Clanton and McLowry boys, three of whom the Earps and Holliday killed and little attention was paid to them as they were believed to be idle boasts but the shooting of Virgil Earp last night shows that the men were in earnest.()The suspected shooters were later identified as Phin Clanton, Clanton, Barnes, Ringo, Hank Swilling and Spence.()  Although Clantons hat was found near the shooting, the evidence was circumstantial, and the men were acquitted.( On January 31, Ike and Phin were brought before Judge William H. Stilwell on suspicion of shooting Virgil. The district attorney asked that bail be set at $5,000, but the judge released both men on $1,500 bond, indicating he thought the prosecutions case was weak.()On February 2, 1882, Clantons attorney brought in seven witnesses who testified that Clanton was in Charleston at the time of Virgils shooting.  Ike was acquitted and released.() Departs for California After his shooting, Virgil spent the next three months recuperating in bed. He was just starting to get back on his feet when on Saturday, March 18, 1882, Virgils younger brother Earp was killed in another ambush. On March 19, Wyatts 34th birthday,() he and James accompanied Morgans body to Benson, where it was loaded aboard a freight train for California, watched over by James and two or three friends. They took Morgan to the Earp family home in California. It was not practical given Virgils injuries to transport him and his wife Allie out of Tombstone at the same time as Morgan.(On Monday, March 20, Virgil and Allie left Tombstone for California under heavy guard. They were escorted by Wyatt and deputies Earp, Holliday, McMasters, and Turkey Creek Jack Johnson. Wyatt reported later that he received word in Contention that Clanton, Stilwell, Swilling, and another cowboy were watching the passenger trains in Tucson with the aim to kill Virgil. The group drove two wagons to the New Mexico and Arizona Railroad terminal  away in Benson and boarded the train to Tucson. Virgil was so weak he had to be carried up the steps of the train.(Wyatt and his deputies had initially planned to travel only as far as Benson, but when they learned that Stilwell and others were looking for Virgil, they remained with Virgil and Allie through to Tucson. The men were well armed with pistols, rifles and shotguns. McMaster wore two cartridge belts. Allie wore Virgils pistol belt during the journey so it would be handy.() Virgil told the San Francisco Examiner two months later that upon getting off the train in Tucson, Almost the first men we met on the platform there were Stilwell and his friends, armed to the teeth. They fell back into the crowd as soon as they saw I had an escort, and the boys took me to the hotel to supper.() Guarded by his brothers and the deputies, Virgil and Allie had dinner at Porters Hotel in Tucson. Their guards helped them board the train for California, and once they were safely seated, kept a watch for the Cowboys.(As Virgils train was pulling out of Tucson on its way to California, gunfire was heard. Witnesses gave contradictory accounts about the number of men seen near the tracks and numbers of shots fires. Some said the Earps were armed after leaving Porters Hotel and others said they were not. Witnesses saw men running with weapons but could not identify anyone in the dark.() Wyatt said later that he and his deputies spotted Stilwell and another man he believed to be Ike Clanton armed with shotguns lying on a flatcar.Wyatt, quoted in the Denver Republican, said I ran straight for Stilwell. It was he who killed my brother. What a coward he was! He couldnt shoot when I came near him. He stood there helpless and trembling for his life. As I rushed upon him he put out his hands and clutched at my shotgun. I let go both barrels, and he tumbled down dead and mangled at my feet.()When Wyatt and his men approached, the two men ran. Stilwell stumbled, allowing Wyatt to reach him. Wyatt later said he shot Stilwell as Frank attempted to push the barrel of Earps shotgun away. Wyatt said Stilwell cried Morg! before he was killed.  Stilwells body, riddled with buckshot from two shotgun rounds, one in his leg and the second in his chest with powder burns, and four other bullet wounds, was found the next morning near the tracks.(() Ike Clanton got away. When the Tucson sheriff learned who was responsible for Stilwells death, he issued warrants for the lawmens arrest.Clanton gave an interview afterward to the newspapers in which he claimed that he and Stilwell had been in Tucson to respond to a federal charges about interfering with a U.S. mail carrier, stemming from his alleged involvement in robbing the Sandy Bob line of the Bisbee stage on September 8, 1881.()() Clanton said that they had heard that the Earps were coming via the train and they had plans to kill Stilwell. According to Clanton, Stilwell disappeared from the hotel before he was found several blocks away, shot dead by the tracks. Later life and death After receiving his injuries in Tombstone, Virgil spent the next two years recovering from his injuries, primarily at his parents home in California. He sought treatment for his wounds in San Francisco and was interviewed on the Pacific train by a reporter that ran in the San Francisco Examiner on May 27, 1882. The reporter described Virgils appearance.Despite the use of only one arm, Virgil was hired by the Southern Pacific Railroad to guard its tracks in Coltons famous battle of the crossing. Virgil joined in the war as the Southern Pacific attempted to stop the Southern Railroad, a subsidiary of the Topeka and Santa Fe Railway, from installing a crossing over the Southern Pacific tracks in Colton to gain access to California. Governor Waterman deputized a posse from Bernardino, California and came down in person to enforce construction of the crossing, ending the Southern Pacifics railroad monopoly in Southern California.(In 1884 Virgils father, Porter Earp was elected of the peace. Two years later, Virgil Earp opened a private detective agency, which by all accounts was abandoned in 1886, when he was elected village constable in July.When Colton was incorporated as a city, Virgil was elected as Coltons first City Marshal on July 11, 1887. He was paid $75 a month and was re-elected to another term in 1888. Among other duties, he was reported to have cleared blocked sewers and kept track of the electric light bulbs.(True West Magazine) Virgil and Allies Colton home still stands at 528 West H Street.In 1888 Virgil resigned as city marshal and he and Allie left Colton for San Bernardino. Five years later, in 1893, he and his wife moved to the short-lived mining town California. According to his wife, he owned and operated the only two story building in town, Earp Hall, a saloon and meeting hall used for public gatherings and even the towns church services. His business success in Vanderbilt did not match his success in politics, and he lost the election for town constable in 1894.In 1895, Virgil and Allie traveled to Colorado where they met Virgils brother Wyatt. They stayed briefly and soon moved back to Prescott in County, Arizona where Virgil became involved in mining. They moved south after that and began ranching in the Kirkland Valley. Virgil was nominated as a candidate for County, Arizona Sheriff in 1900, but pulled out of the election for health reasons. Reunites with first wife In 1898 Virgil received a startling letter from a Mrs. Levi Law. After returning from the Civil War as a young man, his wife Ellen and daughter Nellie had disappeared, having been told that Virgil had been killed in the war. Mrs. Levi Law was Virgils daughter. The next year, encouraged by his wife, Virgil traveled to Oregon where he was reunited with Ellen and Nellie Jane Law.( On April 22, 1898, Oregonian reported that Virgil ...is now enjoying a very pleasant visit with her and his two grandchildren at her home, which is near that of Mrs. Eaton, in North Portland. He also met three grandchildren he never knew existed.() Nellie Jane visited her father and Allie in Arizona the next year.( Later that year, according to her letter to Oregonian, Nellie Jane visited Virgil and Allie Earp at their home in Arizona.( Death in Nevada Before 1904, Earp returned to Colton where city records show that he along with three others unsuccessfully petitioned the city leaders to repeal a temperance law that only allowed one saloon in town. In 1904, he left California for the last time and joined Wyatt in the boom town of Nevada, where he became a deputy sheriff for County, Nevada. After suffering from pneumonia for six months, Virgil died on October 19, 1905,( leaving Wyatt as the last surviving participant of the Gunfight at the O.K. Corral.At the request of his daughter Nellie Jane Bohn, Allie allowed his remains to be sent to Portland, Oregon and buried in the River View Cemetery. After the death of her husband, Allie (Alvira Allie Packingham Sullivan Earp) moved back to California to be near Virgils family, where she lived 42 years. She died at age 99 in 1947. She was buried in San Bernardino, California.( See also * Earps family References  External links * Before the O.K. Corral - How the Civil War Brought Virgil Earp to Portland* Lawman Virgil Earp* A page concerning his life, family, marriages and grave* A genealogical profile of him* Original Document of Civil War Pension Index Card for Virgil Earp* EarpEarpEarpEarp
402568
List_of_Swedish_entrepreneurs
This is a list of Swedish entrepreneurs and businessmen.*Barnevik (born 1941), industry leader (ABB)*Bergqvist*Daln, (1869-1937), founder of AGA and Prize laureate*Ericson, (1802-1860), railroad pioneer (SJ)*Ericsson, (1803-1889), inventor and engineer (Monitor)*Magnus Ericsson, (1846-1926), founder of Ericsson*Gabrielsson, (1891-1962), industrialist, co-founder of Volvo*Hammerich, former vice president of Saab*Hult*Petter Johansson (1853-1943), inventor*af Jochnick, founder of Oriflame*af Jochnick, founders of Oriflame*Kamprad, (born 1926), founder of IKEA*Karlsson*Kreuger, (1880-1932), industrialist and financier*Lans*de Laval, (1845-1913), founder of Laval*H. Lundin, oil and mining entrepreneur*Nobel, (1833-1896), industrialist, instituted the Prizes*Nordholm, (1897-1989), entrepreneur*Persson, (1917-2002), founder of & Mauritz*Rausing, founder of Pak*Olsson Smith, (1836-1913), spirits manufacturer*Stael von Holstein, founder of MediaLab*Suell, (1744-1818), founder of Malm harbour*Ullman*Axel Lennart Wenner-Gren, founder of Electrolux*Wallenius (1902  1970)*Wenstrm, industrialist*Wingquist, (1876-1953), engineer, inventor, industrialist, co-founder of SKF*Zennstrm, founder of KaZaA and Skype See also *Stock Exchange*of Swedish Enterprise*of Swedish companies
404129
Oskar_Ursinus
Carl Oskar Ursinus (March 11, 1877 &ndash; July 6, 1952) was a pioneer of German aviation and is remembered mainly for his contributions to sailplane designs and the sport of gliding. He has been nicknamed the Rhnvater (Rhn father) because he founded Germanys first gliding club at the Wasserkuppe in the Mountains in 1920. Ursinus was born in Weienfels and attended Technical College in Mittweida. After graduation, he worked for Borsig on compressors for locomotives and spent some time working on mining machinery in Romania for the firm. In 1908, back in Germany, Ursinus began to publish a magazine titled Flugsport (Sports Flying), since he had become fascinated by the new technology of flight. The magazine helped establish a network amongst Germanys aviation enthusiasts and led to the organisation of Germanys first international airshow. He was conscripted into the German Army in 1914 and requested a position in aircraft design. The request was approved and he was posted to Waggonfabrik designing warplanes. The famous series of Gotha bombers used by the German air corps throughout War I were all based on an Ursinus design of 1915 that was refined and manufactured as the G.I. Ursinus real passion, however, was for seaplanes, and in 1916 he designed a revolutionary seaplane fighter with retractable floats that was unfortunately destroyed before testing was complete.Following the war, the of Versailles prohibited Germany from building powered aircraft, and the attention of German aviators therefore turned to gliding. A plateau particularly suited to gliding, the Wasserkuppe, became a focal point for this activity, and in 1920, Ursinus organised a competition there. Twenty-four people attended the meeting between 15 July and 15 September 1920 including Hirth and other gliding pioneers. (see also Gesellschaft.)Over the next decade, this grew in importance to become an international event. Ursinus also constructed the first clubhouse on the Wasserkuppe in 1924. He was pursuing experiments in flight when the outbreak of War II intervened.Following the war, powered flying was once again forbidden in Germany, but Ursinus lived just long enough to see this prohibition lifted.Today, he is regarded in Germany as the father of gliding, and Germanys association for aircraft, the Ursinus-Vereinigung (Oskar Ursinus Association) bears his name.Oskar UrsinusUrsinusUrsinus
405429
Murray_cod
Mitchell, 1838):This article is about the Australian freshwater fish. For other uses, see (disambiguation) and (disambiguation)The Murray cod (Maccullochella peelii) is a large Australian predatory freshwater fish of the Maccullochella genus and the Percichthyidae family. Although the species is a called cod in the vernacular, it is not related to the northern hemisphere marine cod (Gadus) species. The Murray cod is an important and charismatic part of Australias vertebrate wildlife and is found in the Murray-Darling river system in Australia.  The Murray cod is the largest exclusively freshwater fish in Australia, and one of the largest in the world.  Other common names for Murray cod include cod, greenfish and goodoo.The scientific name of Murray cod derives from an early Australian fish researcher with the surname McCulloch and the river from which the explorer Mitchell first scientifically described the species, the Peel River.  This was for a number of years changed to M. peelii peelii to differentiate Murray cod from River cod, which were designated as a subspecies of Murray cod.  However, as of 2010 Mary River cod have been raised to full species status (M. mariensis) () and thus Murray cod have reverted simply to M. peelii.Murray cod populations have declined severely since European colonisation of Australia due to a number of causes including severe overfishing, river regulation and habitat degradation and are now a listed threatened species.  However, they once inhabited almost the entire Basin, Australias largest river system, in very great numbers.A long-lived fish, adult Murray cod are carnivorous and mainly eat other fish.  The species exhibits a high degree of parental care for their eggs, which are spawned in the spring and are generally laid in hollow logs or on other hard surfaces. Murray cod are a popular angling target and aquaculture species.  Often available through the aquarium trade, they are also a popular aquarium species in Australia.Descriptionthumb|A Murray cod, displaying characteristic mottled green colouration. The fish was carefully released after the photo.Murray cod are a large grouper-like fish with deep, elongated bodies() that are round in cross section.  They have a broad, scooped head, and a large mouth lined with pads of very small needle-like teeth.  The jaws of the Murray cod are equal, or the lower jaw protrudes slightly.()()()The spiny fin of Murray cod is moderate to low in height and is partially separated by a notch from the high, rounded soft dorsal fin.(  Soft dorsal, anal and caudal (tail) fins are all large and rounded, and are dusky grey or black with distinct white edges.((  The large, rounded pectoral fins are usually similar in colour to the flanks.  The pelvic fins are large and angular and set forward of the pectoral fins.  The leading white-coloured rays on the pelvic fins split into two trailing white filaments,( while the pelvic fins themselves are usually a translucent white or cream, tending toward opacity in large fish.Murray cod are white to cream on their ventral (belly) surface.((  Their back and flanks are usually yellowish-green to green, overlain with heavy darker green, but occasionally brown or black, mottling.(((  The effect is a marbled appearance sometimes reminiscent of a leopards markings.  Colouration is related to water clarity;( colouration is intense in fish from clear water habitats. Small to medium sized Murray cod from clear water habitats often have striking and very distinct colouration. Very large fish tend towards a speckled grey-green colouration.()SizeMurray cod are large fish, with adult fish regularly reaching 80100 centimetres (3239 in) in length in all but the very smallest waterways.  Murray cod are capable of growing well over 1 metre (3 ft) in length and the largest on record was over 1.8 metres (6 ft) and approximately 113 kilograms (250 lb) in weight.(((  Large breeding fish are rare in most wild populations today due to overfishing.()()()()Related SpeciesMurray cod.JPG|thumb|left|Murray cod push significant distances into upland river habitatsMurray cod continue a pattern present in Murray-Darling native fish genera of speciation into lowland and specialist upland species: Murray cod are the primarily lowland species and the endangered cod are the specialist upland species.  The pattern is slightly blurred in the cod species because, being adaptable and successful fish, Murray cod push significant distances into upland habitats, while the now endangered cod stray (or did stray, before their decline) well down the upland/lowland transition zone, which can be extensive in Murray-Darling rivers.  Nevertheless, the basic pattern of speciation into a primarily lowland species and a specialist upland species is present.(Murray cod, like a number of other Murray-Darling native fish species, have also managed to cross the Dividing Range at least once through natural capture events, leading to several species and sub-species of coastal cod.  The best known are freshwater cod of the Clarence River system in northern South Wales, and River cod of the Mary River system in south eastern Queensland, both of which are endangered but survive today.  Coastal cod were also found in the River system in northern New South Wales and the River system in southern Queensland, but are now extinct.(()TaxonomyIn the 1800s and early 1900s, commercial fishermen, recreational fishermen, riverside residents and some fisheries scientists (e.g. Anderson, Stead, Langtry) distinctly recognised two species of cod in the southern Basin, Murray cod and cod or blue nose cod.  Taxonomically however, confusion abounded.  Only one species of cod was taxonomically recognised, the Murray cod (then named Maccullochella macquariensis, after an early Australian fish researcher with the surname McCulloch() and the Macquarie River in South Wales where the holotype was captured() and as trout cod declined into near extinction over the 1900s the distinction between the two species was eroded and finally questioned.  In the 1970s early genetic techniques confirmed forever that cod were a separate species and further showed that the original Murray cod specimen was in fact a trout cod.  Following the rules of classification, the name M. macquariensis remained with the original specimen, now known to be the trout cod, and a new name, M. peelii, for the Peel River( where the new holotype was captured, was coined for the Murray cod. Subsequently, two further cod were identified as separate species, the freshwater cod (M. ikei) and the River cod (M. mariensis).((RangeThe Murray cod is named after the River.  The Murray River is part of the Basin in eastern Australia, Australias largest and most important river system, draining approximately 14% of the continent.(() The Murray cods natural range encompasses virtually the whole Murray-Darling Basin,(( particularly the lowland areas, and extending well into upland areas  to about  elevation in the southern half of the basin and to about  in the northern half of the basin.(thumb|Distribution of Murray cod((Consequently, Murray cod inhabit a remarkably wide variety of habitats, from cool, clear, fast-flowing streams with riffle-and-pool structure and rocky substrates in upland areas to large, slow flowing, meandering rivers in the extensive alluvial lowland reaches of the Murray-Darling Basin.((()()thumb|left|A small Murray cod from a run in an upland riverMurray cod have died out in many of their upland habitats, particularly in the southern Murray-Darling Basin, due to a combination of overfishing, siltation, dams and weirs blocking migration, pollution from arsenic-based sheep-dips, mining and in some cases, introduced trout stockings, which causes competition between juvenile Murray cod and introduced trout species.(AgeMurray cod are very long-lived, which is characteristic of many freshwater native fish in Australia.( Longevity is a survival strategy in variable Australian environment to ensure that most adults participate in at least one exceptional spawning and recruitment event, which are often linked to unusually wet Nia years and may only occur every one or two decades.(  Murray cod are the most long-lived freshwater native fish in Australia.(  The oldest Murray cod aged yet was 48 years of age,() and the even larger specimens of years past leave little doubt that the species can reach considerably greater ages, of 70 years or more.(DietThe Murray cod is an predator that will eat almost anything smaller than itself, including finned fishes such as introduced carp, goldfish, redfin, native perch, bream, eel-tailed catfish, western carp gudgeon and smelt, and crustaceans such as yabbies, shrimp and Murray River crayfish. A recent study has confirmed that fish compose the majority of the diet of mature Murray cod in lowland river and impoundment habitats, and that Murray cod are apex predators in these habitats.()  Murray cod have also been known to eat ducks, cormorants, freshwater tortoises, water dragons, snakes, mice and frogs.  The observations of the recreational fishermen fishing for Murray cod with surface lures at night reveal that the popular description of Murray cod as a demersal predator is only partially correct.  While this behaviour is typical during the day, at night Murray cod are active pelagic predators, venturing into shallow waters and frequently taking prey from the surface.()ReproductionMurray cod reach sexual maturity between four and six years of age.(()()  Sexual maturity in Murray cod is dependent on age.((  Therefore, roughly 70% of wild river Murray cod, with their slower growth rate, have reached sexual maturity by 50 centimetres (20 in) in length.  Wild Murray cod in impoundments like Mulwala, with their faster growth rates, do not reach sexual maturity until they are well over 60 centimetres (2 ft) in length.(((  This data strongly indicates that the 60 centimetres (20 in) size limit for Murray cod is inadequate and should be increased substantially to allow greater chance of reproduction before capture.Large female Murray cod that are in the 1535 kilogram (3580 lb) range are the most important breeders because they produce the most eggs and for other reasons;( research is now showing large females in most fish species are also important because they produce larger larvae with larger yolk sacs, and are also more experienced breeders that display optimal breeding behaviours.(()()()  Such large females may also have valuable, successful genes to pass on.(  All of these factors mean the spawnings of large female fish have far higher larval survival rates and make far greater reproductive contributions than the spawnings of small female fish.((((Female Murray cod, upon first reaching sexual maturity, will have egg counts of no more than around 10,000.  Very large female Murray cod can have egg counts as high as 80,00090,000,( although a recent, very large 33 kg specimen yielded an egg count of 110,000 viable eggs.(  Egg counts in female Murray cod of all sizes are relatively low compared to many fish species.(()Murray cod spawn in spring, cued by rising water temperatures and increasing photoperiod (daylight length).  Initially, fish biologists working with Murray cod considered spring floods and temperatures of 2021 Celsius (68-70F) to be necessary( and that spring flooding is critical for successful recruitment (i.e. survival to juvenile stages) of young cod by providing an influx of pelagic zooplankton and early life-stage macroinvertebrates off the flood plain into the main river channel for first feeding, but more recent research has shown Murray cod breed annually, with or without spring floods, and at temperatures as low as 15 Celsius (59F).((((()  Additionally, recent research has shown abundant epibenthic/epiphytic (bottom dwelling/edge clinging) prey in non-flooded lowland rivers,(() traits in Murray cod larvae that should allow survival in  a variety of challenging conditions,() and a significant proportion of Murray cod larvae feeding successfully in non-flooded rivers.(()Latest research has also shown that Murray cod in fact live their entire life cycle within the main channel of the stream.  Earlier ideas that Murray cod spawn on floodplains, or that Murray cod larvae feed on floodplains, are incorrect.  Murray cod breed in the main river channel or, in times of spring flood, the inundated upper portion of the main channel and tributary channels, but not on floodplains.  Murray cod larvae feed within the main river channel or, in times of spring flood, on the inundated upper portion of the main channel and the channel/floodplain boundary, but not on the floodplain.()Spawning is preceded by significant upstream migrations if high spring flows or floods allow.  Radio-tracked Murray cod in the Murray River have migrated up to 120 kilometres (75 mi) upstream to spawn, before returning to exactly the same snag they departed from, an unusual homing behaviour in a freshwater fish.(  Decades of observations by recreational and commercial fishermen suggest such spring spawning migrations are common across the Murray cods geographical range.(  Spawning is initiated by pairing up and courtship rituals.  During the courtship ritual a spawning site is selected and cleaned  hard surfaces such as rocks in upland rivers, and logs and occasionally clay banks in lowland rivers, at a depth of 23 metres (610 ft), are selected.  The female lays the large adhesive eggs as a mat on the spawning surface, which the male fertilises.  The female then leaves the spawning site.  The male remains to guard the eggs during incubation, which takes six to ten days (depending on water temperature), and to guard the hatched larvae for a further week or so until they disperse.  Larvae disperse from the nest site by drifting in river currents at night, and continue this behaviour for around four to seven days.((((()()()()  During this dispersal process larvae simultaneously absorb the remainder of their yolk sac and begin to feed on pelagic zooplankton, small, early life-stage macroinvertebrates and epibenthic/epiphytic (bottom dwelling/edge clinging) microinvertebrates.((This information shows that the relationship between river flows and Murray cod recruitment are more complex than first thought, and that in less regulated rivers, Murray cod may be able to recruit under a range of conditions including stable low flows.  (Significant recruitment of Murray cod in low flow conditions in less regulated lowland rivers has now been proven.)  This information also suggests that non-river-regulation related causes of degradation are playing a larger role in the survival and recruitment of Murray cod larvae than first thought; competition from extremely large numbers of invasive carp larvae are negatively affecting the survival and recruitment of Murray cod larvae to a much greater degree than first thought;() and that decades of overfishing is playing a far larger role in the current state of Murray cod stocks, through depletion of spawning adults, than first thought.(These findings do not mean that river regulation and water extraction have not had adverse effects on fish stocks.  Rather, river regulation has been a major factor in the decline of Murray cod and other native fish.(  Thermal pollution is also a major problem (see below), there is evidence that strong Murray cod recruitment events (which may be important for sustaining Murray cod populations over the long term) can result from spring flooding, and copious evidence that the health of Australian lowland river ecosystems generally rely on periodic spring flooding.(()  Also, due to the regulation of most of the rivers in the Murray-Darling river system, mainly for irrigation purposes, only exceptional spring floods manage to break free.  The long term viability of wild Murray cod, other native fish species and river ecosystems, in the face of this fact, are of great concern.(ConservationMurray cod were originally the most common large native fish in the Basin. Contrary to some fishery department literature, the first serious declines in Murray cod were caused by overfishing  extremely severe overfishing. In the latter half of the 1800s and the early 1900s, Murray cod  very large, very long-lived fish  were caught in unimaginable numbers by both commercial and recreational fishermen.  For example, one commercial fishing operation commenced on the River near Echuca in 1855, targeting Murray cod over hundreds of kilometres of river, and yet within eight years, grave concerns over the sustainability of this operation, and complaints about the near-absence of Murray cod in their heavily fished grounds, were being raised in the main state newspaper, The Argus.() And yet fishing effort continued to increase in the region so that in the late 1880s and early 1890s, between 40,000 and 150,000 kg of mostly Murray cod (between 7,500 and 27,000 fish, at an average weight of 5.5 kg) were caught near Echuca.( Similarly, in 1883, more than 147,000 kg of Murray cod were sent to Melbourne from just one river town (Moama).( By the 1920s Murray cod had been overfished to the point where large-scale commercial fishing operations were no longer feasible.(( Recreational fishermen took similarly excessive hauls during this era, using rods and reels, handlines, setlines, drum nets, gill nets and even explosives, with hauls often either wasted or illegally sold. Perhaps this extreme overfishing and its impacts of wild Murray cod stocks is best summarised by a short article in the Register News (a South Australian newspaper) in 1929:In last 29 years 26,214,502 lbs (nearly 11,703 tons) kg of Murray cod has been eaten by the people of Melbourne. The Superintendent of Markets (Mr G. B. Minns) included these figures in a statement he made today pointing out that the supply was declining. In 1918, the peak year, 2,229,024 lbs kg was received at the market, but since 1921, when 1,101,520 lbs kg was sent to Melbourne, supply has decreased. Last year 1928 it was only 551,040 lbs kg.()Incredibly, 20 years later the aquatic ecologist J.O. Langtry was still compelled to criticise the extremely heavy, lawless, fishing pressure, in the form of both uncontrolled small-scale commercial fishing and rampant illegal fishing, he was confronted with in all reaches of the Murray River he investigated in 19491950.(Indeed, a thorough reading of historical newspaper articles and historical government reports reveals that the whole history of wild Murray cod between the mid1800s and the mid1900s was one of citizen agitation, government inaction, and ongoing stock decline. For decade after decade, riverside residents, commercial fishermen, recreational fishermen, local fisheries inspectors, fish retailers and others agitated in newspapers and other fora about the evidently, continuously declining Murray cod stocks, to be met in turn either with government denials, or conversely, with various ineffective inquiries into Murray cod stocks and fisheries, and various ineffective control measures. For decade after decade, debate about excessive fishing pressure, number of fishermen, number of nets, net mesh size, bag limits, minimum size limits and take of small cod, closed seasons and the taking of spawning cod full of eggs during spring, and other sundry issues, raged on and on without proper resolution, with fishing regulations either not amended, or amended and largely unenforced and completely ignored, and with heavy commercial, recreational and illegal fishing pressure continuing unrelenting and unabated. The end result was a Murray cod population, initially unimaginably abundant, continually fished down and down and down without pause, until in the early to mid 20th century a number of other factors such as river regulation (listed below) emerged to drive the species even further into decline. All of these drivers of decline have left this iconic Australian fish in a perilous situation.  There are now grave concerns for the long term survival of wild Murray cod populations.((Victorian Department of Sustainability and Environment, 2004, Codwatch Newsletter Number 25, http://www.greenhouse.vic.gov.au/CA256F310024B628/0/C95F6E2F115D3706CA2571480003EB28/$File/Codwatch+25+November+2004.pdf, Retrieved 28 September 2007)(thumb|An example of extreme, severe, overfishing of Murray cod in the late 1800s, which cause the first strong declines in the species. Such catches were typical for the period.Although angler effects are sometimes disregarded in the overall picture today, recent population studies have shown that while all year classes are well represented up to the minimum legal angling size (now 60 centimetres in most states), above that size, numbers of fish are dramatically reduced almost to the point of non-existence in many waters.((  Some emphasis has been made of the results of two small surveys which suggested a majority of Murray cod are released by anglers.  However, there are valid questions as to the representativeness of these surveys, these surveys do not explain the dramatic disappearance of large numbers of young Murray cod at exactly the minimum size limit, and most importantly, any emphasis on these surveys miss the fundamental point  as a large, long-lived species with relatively low fecundity and delayed sexual maturity wild Murray cod populations are extremely vulnerable to overfishing, even with only modest angler-kill.((  A tightening of fishing regulations for wild Murray cod, as referred to above, and a switch by fishermen to a largely and release approach for wild Murray cod would alleviate this problem.(Another issue is that Murray cod caught and released in winter, while developing their eggs, or in spring prior to spawning, resorb their eggs and do not spawn.((()  This may be a minor issue compared to some of the other threats facing Murray cod, nevertheless, concerned fishermen try to avoid catching wild Murray cod at these times.(  At this point in time a closed season is in place for the spring spawning period, during which anglers are not allowed to target Murray cod, even on a catch and release basis.State Government Fisheries departments support Murray cod populations by stocking with hatchery bred fish, especially in man made lakes.(  Important issues affecting restoration of cod populations, such as the need for spring floods and excessive angler take, although yet to be addressed,( will be dealt with in the National Recovery Plan when it is completed.()Effects of river regulationThe river and southern tributaries originally displayed a pattern of high flows in winter, high flows and floods in spring, and low flows in summer and autumn.  The breeding of Murray cod and other Murray-Darling native fish was adapted to these natural flow patterns.  River regulation for irrigation has reversed these natural flow patterns, with negative effects on the breeding and recruitment of Murray cod.  The Murray and most southern tributaries now experience high irrigation flows in summer and autumn and low flows in winter and spring.  Small and medium floods including the once annual spring flood-pulse have been completely eliminated.((()()It is estimated that flows at the river mouth by 1995 had declined to only 27% of natural outflows.(Murray Darling Basin Commission, Water Audit Report 2004/2005 http://www.mdbc.gov.au/__data/page/101/WAM-Report-2004-05.pdf, retrieved 28 September 2007)  The probability of the bottom end of the Murray experiencing drought like flows had increased from 5% under natural conditions to 60% by 1995.(pollution is the artificial reduction in water temperatures, especially in summer and autumn, caused when frigid water is released from the bottom of reservoirs for irrigation demands.  Thermal pollution inhibits both the breeding of Murray cod and the survival of Murray cod larvae, and in extreme cases inhibits even the survival of adult Murray cod.(The rare floods that do break free of the dams and weirs of the Murray-Darling system have their magnitude and duration deliberately curtailed by river regulators.  Increasing research indicates this management practice is very harmful and drastically reduces the general ecosystem benefits and breeding and recruitment opportunities for Murray cod and other Murray-Darling native fish species these now rare floods can provide.((((Physical barriers to fish movementDams, weirs and other instream barriers block the migration of adult and juvenile Murray cod and prevent recolonisation of habitats and maintenance of isolated populations.(  Additionally, recent study has proven approximately 50% of Murray cod larvae are killed when they pass through undershot weirs.()Habitat degradation / siltationHundreds of thousands, perhaps more than a million, submerged timber snags, mainly Red Gum, have been removed from lowland reaches of the Murray-Darling basin over the past 150 years.() The removal of such a vast number of snags has had devastating impacts on Murray cod and river ecosystems.  Snags are critical habitats and spawning sites for Murray cod.  Snags are also critical for the functioning of lowland river ecosystems  as one of the few hard substrates in lowland river channels composed of fine silts snags are crucial sites for biofilm growth, macroinvertebrate grazing and general in-stream productivity.((Vegetation clearing and cattle trampling river banks create severe siltation, which fill in pools, degrade river ecosystems and make rivers and streams uninhabitable for Murray cod.(  This is exacerbated by removal of riparian (riverbank) vegetation which causes siltation and degrades river ecosystems in many ways.(OverfishingWhile extremely severe commercial and recreational overfishing in the 1800s and the early 1900s caused the first strong declines of Murray cod, overfishing by recreational fishermen, aided by inadequate fishing regulations, continues today and remains an extremely serious threat to Murray cod.  The current size limit of 60 centimetres in most states is inadequate now that scientific studies have documented average size at sexual maturity in Murray cod.(  This and catch data and computer modelling exercises( on wild Murray cod stocks indicate measures such as raising the size limit to 70 centimetres and reducing the bag and possession limits from 2 and 4 fish respectively to 1 fish are urgently needed to maintain the long term viability of wild Murray cod populations. At this point there are no immediate moves to implement these reforms.Introduced carpEvidence is mounting that there is serious competition for food between larval/early juvenile introduced carp and larval/early juvenile native fish.( Introduced carp dominate the fish faunas of lowland Murray-Darling rivers; the sheer amount of biomass carp now take up, and the large numbers of larvae carp produce, causes serious negative effects on river ecosystems and native fish.(Introduced pathogensMurray cod have soft skin and fine scales that leave them vulnerable to infection from exotic disease organisms.  The following exotic disease organisms all seriously affect wild Murray cod; all have been introduced by imports of exotic fish.  Chilodenella is a single-celled, parasitic protozoa that infects the skin of Murray cod and has caused a number of serious kills of wild Murray cod.  Saprolegnia is a fungus that frequently infects Murray cod eggs and the skin of Murray cod that have been roughly handled through poor catch and release technique. (It is essential that Murray cod intended for release are not put down any hard, dry, rough or hot surfaces, e.g. boat gunwhales, boat floors, dry grass, dry rocks, gravel banks, dry towels or mats, etc.) Wild Murray cod populations across their range suffer extremely severe infestations of Lernaea or anchor worm, a parasitic copepod that burrows into the skin of Murray cod.  Severe Lernaea infestations probably causes the death of many more adult Murray cod than commonly recognised.  Ebner( reports a young adult Murray cod seemingly killed by severe Lernaea infestation.Relationship with humansImage:Tocumwal Big Cod.JPG|thumb|Statue of a Murray cod in Tocumwal, South WalesMurray cod play a very important role in the mythology of many Aboriginal tribes in the Murray-Darling Basin,( and for some tribes, particular those living along the Murray River, Murray cod were the icon species.(Unaipon, D. (2001) Legendary Tales of the Australian Aborigines, p. 17, The Miegunyah Press, Melbourne. ISBN 0522852467.)  The myths of these tribes describe the creation of the Murray River by a gigantic Murray cod fleeing down a small creek to escape from a renowned hunter.  In these myths, the fleeing Murray cod enlarges the river and the beating of its tail create the bends in it.  The cod is eventually speared near the terminus of the Murray River, chopped into pieces, and the pieces thrown back into the river.  The pieces become all the other fish species of the river.  The cods head is kept intact, told to keep being Murray cod, and also thrown back into the river.((In aquariumsHatchery bred Murray cod are now readily available in aquarium stores in southern Australia.  Murray cod make immensely attractive, rewarding and responsive aquarium fish.(  Watching one of these predatory Australian native fish attack and eat a live shrimp or fish can be an awe-inspiring display.thumb|left|A juvenile Murray cod in an aquarium displaying interactive behaviour with the photographerWhile slow growing overall, Murray cod will grow quickly in their first three to four years of life, so large tanks are advisable  a minimum of four ft in length, and preferably five or six foot.(  Murray cod like having structure they can retreat to, so structure such as sunken timber pieces will be appreciated.(Murray cod experience very cold water temperatures in the wild in winter, so they do not need water heaters.  A temperature of 24 Celsius (75F) however, will enable fast (optimum) growth, which given the large size Murray cod reach, is generally not desirable.  Some experienced aquarists use water heaters and a temperature of 24C to grow Murray cod quickly to a size (1520 centimetres, 68 in) where they can be conveniently fed on feeder fish, fish pieces and other foods, whereupon they gradually turn off and remove the water heater to slow growth rates back to more manageable levels.(  Conversely, Murray cod are susceptible to extremely high water temperatures  temperatures above 30 Celsius (86F) are not recommended, and temperatures significantly above 30 Celsius will cause death, the upper limit being listed as 33 Celsius (91F).(  Soft drink bottles filled with water and frozen can be used as an emergency measure to reduce tank temperatures.Unlike many freshwater aquarium fish, Murray cod are highly tolerant of salt due to the raised salinity levels they sometimes experience in the lowland reaches of the Murray-Darling Basin during extreme drought.(  Common salt is a useful tool for keeping Murray cod in tanks, a salinity of 0.5 to 1 gram per litre improves health and keeps most pathogens at bay.(  Ensure, however, that the sea salt used is free of additives such as iodine, copper salts and free flow agent.(Caution, and ideally, quarantine procedures, should be used to ensure that feeder fish do not introduce diseases to the tank.  With soft skin, Murray cod can be susceptible to white-spot or ich ( a common term in aquarium use, short for multifiliis) and fungal skin infections.(  At a minimum, disinfect all live food for an hour in a 10 gram per litre salt solution before feeding.(Water pH should be kept neutral or slightly alkaline; a pH between 7.0 and 8.0 is  acceptable, and 7.07.5 is ideal.(  A small amount of shell grit will provide a buffer against violent pH swings.(Small Murray cod in aquariums can be very timid,( however, this is usually only a problem for the first few months of life.(  Most Murray cod in aquariums, upon reaching a certain size, suddenly gain confidence and then become inquisitive, responsive and rewarding aquarium fish.(ReferencesAdditional References* * External links*Native Fish Australia - Murray cod page*Murray Cod Magic Vol 1 - Great Murray Cod Information DVDde Murrayja:peelii peeliipeeliisv:Murraytorsk
406624
Time_series
thumb|250px|Time series: random data plus trend, with best-fit line and different smoothingsIn statistics, processing, econometrics and finance, a time series is a sequence of points, measured typically at successive times spaced at uniform time intervals. Examples of time series are the daily closing value of the Dow Jones index or the annual flow volume of the Nile River at Aswan. Time series analysis comprises methods for analyzing time series data in order to extract meaningful statistics and other characteristics of the data. Time series forecasting is the use of a model to forecast future events based on known past events to predict data points before they are measured. Time series are very frequently plotted via charts.Time series data have a natural temporal ordering.  This makes time series analysis distinct from other common data analysis problems, in which there is no natural ordering of the observations (e.g. explaining peoples wages by reference to their education level, where the individuals data could be entered in any order).  Time series analysis is also distinct from data analysis where the observations typically relate to geographical locations (e.g. accounting for house prices by the location as well as the intrinsic characteristics of the houses). A time series model will generally reflect the fact that observations close together in time will be more closely related than observations further apart. In addition, time series models will often make use of the natural one-way ordering of time so that values for a given period will be expressed as deriving in some way from past values, rather than from future values (see reversibility.)Methods for time series analyses may be divided into two classes: frequency-domain methods and time-domain methods. The former include analysis and recently analysis; the latter include auto-correlation and cross-correlation analysis.AnalysisThere are several types of data analysis available for time series which are appropriate for different purposes.General exploration* Graphical examination of data series* Autocorrelation analysis to examine dependence* analysis to examine cyclic behaviour which need not be related to seasonality. For example, sun spot activity varies over 11 year cycles.(Bloomfield, P. (1976). Fourier analysis of time series: An introduction. New York: Wiley.)(Shumway, R. H. (1988). Applied statistical time series analysis. Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice Hall.) Other common examples include celestial phenomena, weather patterns, neural activity, commodity prices, and economic activity.Description* Separation into components representing trend, seasonality, slow and fast variation, cyclical irregular: see of time series* Simple properties of distributionsPrediction and forecasting* Fully formed statistical models for simulation purposes, so as to generate alternative versions of the time series, representing what might happen over non-specific time-periods in the future* Simple or fully formed statistical models to describe the likely outcome of the time series in the immediate future, given knowledge of the most recent outcomes (forecasting).ModelsModels for time series data can have many forms and represent different processes. When modeling variations in the level of a process, three broad classes of practical importance are the autoregressive (AR) models, the integrated (I) models, and the moving average (MA) models. These three classes depend linearly(Gershenfeld, N. (1999). The nature of mathematical modeling. p.205-08) on previous data points. Combinations of these ideas produce moving average (ARMA) and integrated moving average (ARIMA) models. The fractionally integrated moving average (ARFIMA) model generalizes the former three. Extensions of these classes to deal with vector-valued data are available under the heading of multivariate time-series models and sometimes the preceding acronyms are extended by including an initial V for vector. An additional set of extensions of these models is available for use where the observed time-series is driven by some forcing time-series (which may not have a causal effect on the observed series): the distinction from the multivariate case is that the forcing series may be deterministic or under the experimenters control. For these models, the acronyms are extended with a final X for exogenous.Non-linear dependence of the level of a series on previous data points is of interest, partly because of the possibility of producing a chaotic time series. However, more importantly, empirical investigations can indicate the advantage of using predictions derived from non-linear models, over those from linear models, as for example in autoregressive exogenous models.Among other types of non-linear time series models, there are models to represent the changes of variance along time (heteroskedasticity). These models represent conditional heteroskedasticity (ARCH) and the collection comprises a wide variety of representation (GARCH, TARCH, EGARCH, FIGARCH, CGARCH, etc.). Here changes in variability are related to, or predicted by, recent past values of the observed series. This is in contrast to other possible representations of locally varying variability, where the variability might be modelled as being driven by a separate time-varying process, as in a stochastic model.In recent work on model-free analyses, wavelet transform based methods (for example locally stationary wavelets and wavelet decomposed neural networks) have gained favor. Multiscale (often referred to as multiresolution) techniques decompose a given time series, attempting to illustrate time dependence at multiple scales.NotationA number of different notations are in use for time-series analysis. A common notation specifying a time series X that is indexed by the numbers is written:X  {X1, X2, ...}.Another common notation is:Y  {Yt: t &isin; T},where T is the set.ConditionsThere are two sets of conditions under which much of the theory is built:* process* ErgodicityHowever, ideas of stationarity must be expanded to consider two important ideas: stationarity and second-order stationarity. Both models and applications can be developed under each of these conditions, although the models in the latter case might be considered as only partly specified.In addition, time-series analysis can be applied where the series are seasonally stationary or non-stationary. Situations where the amplitudes of frequency components change with time can be dealt with in analysis which makes use of a representation of a time-series or signal.(Boashash, B. (ed.), (2003) Time-Frequency Signal Analysis and Processing: A Comprehensive Reference, Elsevier Science, Oxford, 2003 ISBN ISBN 0080443354)ModelsThe general representation of an autoregressive model, well-known as AR(p), is:  Y_t \alpha_0+\alpha_1 Y_{t-1}+\alpha_2 Y_{t-2}+\cdots+\alpha_p Y_{t-p}+\varepsilon_t\, where the term t is the source of randomness and is called noise. It is assumed to have the following characteristics::* E\varepsilon_t0 \, ,:* E\varepsilon^2_t\sigma^2 \, ,:* E\varepsilon_t\varepsilon_s0 \quad \text{ for all } t\nots \, . With these assumptions, the process is specified up to second-order moments and, subject to conditions on the coefficients, may be second-order stationary.If the noise also has a distribution, it is called normal or Gaussian white noise. In this case, the AR process may be stationary, again subject to conditions on the coefficients.Related toolsTools for investigating time-series data include:* Consideration of the autocorrelation function and the spectral density function (also functions and density functions)* Performing a transform to investigate the series in the domain* Use of a filter to remove unwanted noise* components analysis (or orthogonal function analysis)* spectrum analysis* neural networks* Markov model* time warping* Bayesian network* Time-frequency analysis techniques:** Fourier Transform** wavelet transform** Fourier transform** transform** Fourier transform* Chaotic analysis** dimension** plots** quantification analysis** exponents** encodingSee also* time series* of time series* adjustment* processing* estimationReferencesFurther reading*Bloomfield, P. (1976). Fourier analysis of time series: An introduction. New York: Wiley.**Brillinger, D. R. (1975). Time series: Data analysis and theory. New York: Holt, Rinehart. & Winston.*Brigham, E. O. (1974). The fast Fourier transform. Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice-Hall.*Elliott, D. F., & Rao, K. R. (1982). Fast transforms: Algorithms, analyses, applications. New York: Academic Press.***Jenkins, G. M., & Watts, D. G. (1968). Spectral analysis and its applications. San Francisco: Holden-Day.*Priestley, M. B. (1981). Spectral analysis and time series. New York: Academic Press.**Shumway, R. H. (1988). Applied statistical time series analysis. Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice Hall.*Wiener, N.(1964). Extrapolation, Interpolation, and Smoothing of Stationary Time Series.The MIT Press.*Wei, W. W. (1989). Time series analysis: Univariate and multivariate methods. New York: Addison-Wesley.*Weigend, A. S., and N. A. Gershenfeld (Eds.) (1994) Time Series Prediction: Forecasting the Future and Understanding the Past. Proceedings of the NATO Advanced Research Workshop on Comparative Time Series Analysis (Santa Fe, May 1992) MA: Addison-Wesley.*Durbin J., and Koopman S.J. (2001) Time Series Analysis by State Space Methods. Oxford University Press.External links* A First Course on Time Series Analysis - an open source book on time series analysis with SAS* Introduction to Time series Analysis (Engineering Statistics Handbook) - A practical guide to Time series analysis* List of Free Software for Time Series Analysis* Online Tutorial Recurrence Plot (Flash animation); lots of examples* Measuring the Complexity of a time series* Measures of Analysis of Time Series toolkit (MATLAB)* iSAX: Indexing and Mining Terabyte Sized Time Series* Harvard Time Series Center* STATStream: a Toolkit for High Speed Statistical Time Series Analysis* Data Stream Algorithms* Bibliography of symbolic time-series analysis* The Santa Fe Time Series Competition Datatemporaladade:Zeitreihenanalysetemporalserietemporelletemporalko:waktustoricanl:Tijdreeksanalyseja:czasowytemporalvrstewaktufi:Aikasarjaserisithi gianzh:
407954
New_Mills
New Mills is a town in Derbyshire, England approximately  south-east of Stockport and  from Manchester. It is sited at the confluence of the rivers Goyt and Sett, on the border of Cheshire. The town stands above the Torrs, a  deep gorge, cut through Woodhead Hill Sandstone of the Carboniferous period. It is situated at the north-western edge of the District, Englands first national park. It has a population of approximately 10,000. New Mills can refer to the built-up area that includes Newtown and Low Leighton, or the civil parish that includes the villages and hamlets of Thornsett, Bar, Rowarth, Brookbottom, Gowhole, and most of Vale.New Mills was first noted for mining, and then for cotton spinning and then bleaching and calico printing. New Mills was served by the Forest Canal, three railway lines and the A6 trunk road. Redundant mills were bought up in the mid-twentieth century by a childrens sweet manufacturer. New Mills was a stronghold of Methodism.HistoryNew Mills is in the area formerly known as Bowden Middlecale() which was a grouping of ten hamlets. The name of New Mylne (New Mills) was given to it from a corn-mill, erected in 1391, near to the present Salem Mill on the Sett in the hamlet of Ollersett.(New Mills Local History Society Web site) This was adjacent to a convenient bridge over the Sett. By the late sixteenth century the name was applied to the group of houses that grew up round it. mining was the first industry of the district, with up to 40 small pits and mines exploiting the Yard Seam. The climate, good construction stone and the availability of stable land by fast-flowing water was ideal for cotton spinning. mills and print-works were built in the Torrs Gorge from 1788. Dwellings were built on the sides of the gorge, sometimes with one home built on top of another, both being entered at their respective street levels. Examples still exist on Station Road and Meal Street.By 1810, New Mills had nine cotton mills, plus three weaving mills and at least three printworks.(Pigots Directory 1835 describes New Mills::NEW MILLS, an extensive hamlet, in the parish of Glossop, and in the High Peak hundred, is 14 miles from Manchester, 6 from Chapel-en-le-Frith, and 8 from Stockport. It is pleasantly situate on the borders of Derbyshire and Cheshire; and, within a comparatively few years, has risen to importance in the manufacturing district; cotton spinning being carried on here to a considerable extent, affording employment to numerous hands.:The factories are in a great measure hid from public view in passing through the village, being built at the foot of the stream, under high towering rocks. Good house coal, as well as other kinds for the purposes of machinery, is obtained near to the village, the top bed strata running from sixteen to twenty inches thick. The village is built chiefly upon a stone quarry, but the soil in many parts is fertile, producing good crops of wheat and potatoes.()A second group of later mills formed by the newly opened Forest Canal in Newtown, a hamlet 800 m away on the other side of the Goyt in what was then the parish of Disley in Cheshire. Increasingly these mills and houses merged into New Mills. The soft iron-free water was suitable for bleaching and finishing and printing. With the advent of steam, and the growth of the canal network to transport raw cotton, coal and the finished product, bigger mills were built and the smaller isolated rural mills were no longer competitive. By 1846, most of New Mills mills had stopped spinning. The small mills moved out of cotton; the larger mills along the canal moved into finishing. Torr Vale Mill had added a weaving shed in 1836, and moved into producing towelling.(The commercial method of calico printing using engraved rollers was invented in 1821 in New Mills. John Potts of Potts, Oliver and Potts used a copper-engraved master to produce rollers to transfer the inks.()Before the construction of the high-level bridges the Torrs was a major obstacle; traffic had to descend  to cross the Goyt and then climb   on the other bank. The first bridge to be constructed was the Queens Bridge on Church Road. The Union Road bridge was built in 1884;() obtaining the land was difficult, as the arches needed to pass close to Torr Mill and properties on the Cheshire (south) bank, and Torr Top Hall had to be demolished. The new road was named after the union of the two halves of the town. The first station in New Mills was at Newtown, on the Disley and Whaley Bridge Railway; this opened 9 June 1855. This followed the line of the Forest Canal staying safely away from the Torrs.  The and Midland Railway Companies Committee company built two viaducts across the Goyt: one for a line to Mills Central that opened in 1864, and one for the fast line through the Tunnel which opened in 1904. Cotton continued to be worked at Torr Vale Mill until 2000, giving the mill over two hundred years of service. In the great storm of June 1872, Grove Mill and Torr Vale weir were destroyed; at Rock Mill, then being used to make paper, two blocks of buildings and considerable stock and some machinery were lost, but the only fatalities were two cows.()The River Goyt at about two oclock a.m. on Wednesday was from 12ft to 14ft above its usual height...At New Mills, where the Goyt is joined by the River Kinder, extensive damage was done to property. The paper works of Messrs. Schlosser and Co. were damaged upwards of 1,500 as two blocks of buildings were completely washed away  one portion contained a large quantity of paper. The works of Mr. W.S. Lowe also sufferd severely, the damage being estimated at 300. Two strong stone weirs were washed away and two bridges; many acres of land were flooded.() - Manchester Times This was minor compared with events at Bridge, where Reservoir was overtopped and another reservoir known as Adsheads Pools breached completely, the waters sweeping through the centre of the village of Hurdsfield.(  The June 1930 flood was more serious for New Mills. Heavy rain over the area culminating in a cloudburst over Rowarth caused the River Sett to rise rapidly by up to . Many properties on Brookside were flooded and destroyed and one rescuer was drowned. Hyde Bank Road was engulfed and buildings collapsed at Arnfields foundry. At Rowarth, the remains of the Little Mill and the landlord of the Little Mill Inn were swept away. At Watford Bridge the river took away part of the printworks, and at Bate Mill gouged a new channel taking with it the sewage plant, 250 tons of coal, most of the road and the gas main. At Birch Vale, the problem was caused by the waters cascading down from Pike; the culvert being inadequate, the roadways became rivers washing away sections of walling. Much livestock perished.(Governancethumb|New Mills Town Hall (built 1871, clock tower added 1875)Now almost entirely in Derbyshire, New Mills straddled the historic county boundaries of Derbyshire and Cheshire. The traditional boundary was the River Goyt: Low Leighton, Torr Top and Hidebank were always in Derbyshire, but Torr Vale Road and all of Newtown were in Cheshire. Indeed, today, all the housing to the west of the traffic lights on the Buxton Road remains in the parish of Disley in Cheshire. The area was part of the Royal Forest of the Peak which passed into the hands of the of Lancaster in 1372. The ten hamlets, in three groups:*Great Hamlet, Phoside and Kinder;*Beard, Ollersett, Thornsett and Whitle;*Chinley, Bugsworth and Brownsidemade up Bowden Middlecale. The new manorial mill or the New Mylne of 1391 was at Beard. In 1713 the hamlets of Beard, Ollersett, Thornsett and Whitle were formed into a township and a new corn mill was built at Ollersett. This was superseded by the New Mills Urban Sanitary Authority in 1876.( The New Mills Urban District Council operated from 1894 until 1974, when it was abolished. The town now has a town council,(Town council) is part of High Peak Council, and County Council.Bingham, a Conservative Party member, is the of Parliament for the High Peak constituency.On Derbyshire County Council, New Mills is in the New Mills division along with Hayfield and Sett. The seat is held by Beth Atkins for the Liberal Democrats. On High Peak Council, Sett has one councillor, New Mills East has two councillors and New Mills West has two councillors.() The New Mills Town Council is chaired by the Democrats.GeographyNew Mills is approximately  NNW of London and 8 miles (13 km) south-east of Stockport. It borders on Disley, in Cheshire, and Marple, in the Stockport Metropolitan Borough in Manchester. The town is on the north-western edge of the District, but only a small part of it is included within the boundaries of the National Park. The town includes the hamlets of Thornsett, Hague Bar, Rowarth, Brookbottom, Gowhole, and most of Vale.At its lowest point the parish is about 120m above sea level, but the valley sides rise to 370m at the highest points above Rowarth. The watercourses to the north, particularly the Rowarth Brook, drain the southward slopes of  Mellor Moor, Cown Edge and Pike. The Sett and its tributary the Kinder drain much of the plateau of Scout; the Sett flows through Hayfield before passing through Birch Vale to the Torrs and the River Goyt. The Goyt rises on the moors of Edge, near the Dane and the and Fiddle Inn between Buxton and Macclesfield. It passes through Bridge, where it is joined by the Todd Brook and the Black Brook from Chapel-en-le-Frith. The sides of the Goyt valley have been used to carry two railway lines, the Forest Canal and the A6 trunk road from London to Carlisle via Manchester; these all pass through New Mills.Geologically speaking, New Mills lies in the northsouth-orientated syncline, the Trough. The base rocks are from the Carboniferous period, with underlying Namurian gritstone sandstones, from 333 M a.to 313 M a. Above there are measures present (Langsettian from 312 M a.).() This was folded in the orogeny into the Goyt Trough syncline. Coal has been mined at over 30 locations in the area, including Pingot Pit. There are three narrow seams of coal present: the Red Ash, Little Mine and the Yard Seam. The Yard Coal is so named because that is the average thickness of the seam; it is the lowest seam and rests on Woodhead Hill Sandstone. In these seams ore has also been extracted.() Beardmoor Colliery, Ollersett or Burnt Edge Colliery and Lee or New Mills Colliery all worked the  seam.  of coal weighs about half an imperial ton, and the Yard Seam would produce 4500 tons per acre. Bigrave Edge or Broadmoor Edge Colliery worked the Red Ash seam, which was only  thick.()The syncline was buried in younger rocks of the Period. These were eroded, not least by the scouring of the Age ice sheets and the pressures of the meltwaters when temperatures rose. New Mills was on the margins of glaciation, and the meltwaters sought additional routes under the ice for run off. They exploited faults and crevices in the underlying rock. In the Torrs Gorge, the Rivers Goyt and Sett cut a new channel into the strata of the Woodhead Hill Sandstone which forms the centre of New Mills. A mantle of glacial sediment, principally gravels, covered the whole of the braided valleys. In the Pleistocene period, of 12.9 k a to 11.6 k a, the rivers re-formed into single channels, and meanders were formed. These became very distorted above the constrictions of the gorges. Down cutting occurred, exposing previous layers, creating terraces that were covered with silty clay alluvium.(TransportRailNew Mills is served by two railway stations: New Mills Central on the Valley line on the north bank of the Goyt, and New Mills Newtown on the Line which runs on the south bank on the 175m contour.  The main Manchester to Sheffield fast line passes through between the town centre and Newtown, by-passing the stations. It emerges from the Disley Tunnel on a lower (150m) contour than the canal on the south bank, crosses the Goyt on a viaduct, and is joined by the Hope Valley Line at New Mills South Junction. A short branch of the Midland railway once led to the village of Hayfield. This was dismantled in 1970 and is now the Valley Trail, which stretches for 2 miles to the north-east of the town.BusThe town also has a bus station, which is served by Bowers Coaches 61 (Glossop/New Mills/Buxton), Bowers Coaches 62 and 62a (Chapel-en-le-Frith/Hayfield/New Mills/Marple), TM Travel 67 (Manchester/New Mills/Tideswell/Chesterfield), Stagecoach Manchester 358 (Hayfield/New Mills/Marple/Stockport) and Bowers Coaches 389 (New Mills town services).Road & canalThe A6 road passes through Newtown, a little to the south and slightly above the Buxton Line. The Forest Canal was watered in 1796. It passes through Newtown, where there is a marina. It follows the 155m contour.EducationThe principal secondary school is the Mills School Business & Enterprise College.() This comprehensive school occupies the buildings of the former New Mills Grammar School and educates children from 11 to 19 years of age. There are six primary schools: St. Georges school (CE), St. Marys (RC), New Mills County Primary, Newtown, Hague Bar and Thornsett.EconomyNew Mills economy was originally built on agriculture, then coal mining and then cotton spinning and bleaching. There was a little weaving but cotton bleaching and calico printing continued into the second half of the twentieth century. The mills have now all closed. Today Matlow, who make childrens sweets, is a large employer.( The company transferred to New Mills from London during Blitz and has remained ever since.(Swizzels Matlow website) Famous brands include Violets, Refresher chews, Drumstick lollies and - perhaps most famously - Hearts.(Swizells Matlow literacy exercise) Folk memory relates that children from local schools were often asked to test new sweet flavours that were created..There is also a history of iron working, though this has ceased. Ironstone was also found in shales of the lower coal measures, and early water-powered charcoal furnaces was located at Jow-Hole furnace towards Vale. In the nineteenth century, the Midland Iron Works occupied Barnes Mill in the Torrs; the Victoria Foundry was on Hyde Bank Road (among their products were gas lamp posts for the town council) as was the other small foundry in Wildes scrapyard. On Albion Road in Newtown is John Hawthorns foundry. There was also a brass foundry, on the site of the current Heritage Centre.(NMLHS- Newsletter No 15)Tourism was boosted in 1984 when the Torrs was reopened as a riverside park, and further when the spectacular Millennium Walkway opened in 1999, joining the two ends of the gorge.The English Campaign has its headquarters in the town.(Plain English Campaign website)LandmarksNew Mills sits atop The Torrs, a dramatic gorge through which the Rivers Goyt and Sett flow. Nestled in a bend of the Goyt is Vale Mill, a Grade II* listed building. The Torrs Millennium Walkway, overlooking the mill, was built at a cost of 525,000 (almost half from the Millennium Commission) by Derbyshire County Councils in-house engineers. The walkway spans the otherwise inaccessible cliff wall above the River Goyt. Part rises from the riverbed on stilts and part is cantilevered off the railway retaining wall. It provided the final link in the  Way and was opened in April 2000.()Torrs Hydro is a 2.4-metre-diameter Reverse Screw micro hydroelectric scheme at the Torr Weir on the Goyt. It generates 70 kW of electricity. Nicknamed Archie, it is owned by the community.() The electriciy is supplied to the Co-operative supermarket, and any excess is fed back into the National Grid.Religious sitesThe area around Mellor and New Mills has a strong Methodist tradition. Wesley first preached in the area in 1740, at a sheepfold at the Bongs in neighbouring Mellor.() He visited again on 28 April 1745, 12 May 1747 and 31 August 1748. The Wesleyan Methodists were established in 1748. At first, meetings were held in peoples homes; then land was bought on the High Street for a Wesleyan chapel in 1766.( This was the first place of worship in the town. Wesley visited again in 1768, 1772, 1774, 1776, 1779, 1782 and 1788.( By 1808 that chapel was too small, and a larger one was built in St Georges Road, Brookside (Low Leighton).The church was influential and many of the millowners were members: Samuel Schofield, of Warksmoor House and of Torr Mill, the Armstrongs of Torr Vale Mill,  the Hibbert family, including Robert Hibbert, of Warksmoor who built the first cotton mill in Newtown, the Barnes, Thatchers, Arnfields, Bridges, Willans and Bennetts, all industrialists, are buried in the chapel. The larger chapel was closed and demolished in the 1960s and the Methodists have reverted to the High Street Chapel.( The Association Methodists stone chapel was erected in 1838, and the Primitive Methodists built one in 1827. The Friends Meeting House dating from 1717 is in Low Leighton, and the independents, the Congregational church (Providence church), was built on Mellor Road, Whitle, in 1823.(The hamlets of Bowden Middlecale and Mellor were originally in the ancient parish of Glossop. Chapelries were established at Mellor and Hayfield, and New Mills was split between the two. The of England parish church of St Georges was built in 1839 to a simple renaissance plan with galleries; it has 7 bays, decorated with simple Gothic-style lancet windows. It 1844 the hamlets of Beard, Ollersett, Thornsett and Whitle  became a parish. The Church of the Annunciation, St. Marys Road is the Roman Catholic church. It is in the parish of St Mary, Marple Bridge and New Mills in the Diocese of Nottingham. The building was built in the Gothic style in 1846; its spire is  high.()Culture and communityNew Mills plays host to the One World Festival () every June.  The festival incorporates a mixture of serious issues, good music and fun in the open air. The free one-day event raises awareness of organisations that work for a better, fairer world. In 2008 the festivals theme was Reduce, Re-use, Recycle. Part of this theme has been to launch a campaign to make New Mills plastic-bag-free under the banner One World, One Bag.Conservation AreaNew Mills town centre has been designated a Conservation Area. The Conservation Area was originally established in 1985, although has been extended several times since then.(High Peak Borough Council website) Currently, the Conservation Area extends to encompass the Jodrell Street, Spring Bank and High Lea areas of the town.( High Peak Borough Council website)High Peak Borough Council have produced a Conservation Area Character Appraisal document, outlining the reasons that the Conservation Area has been designated as such. In justifying the reasons for designation, this document states of the town: New Mills is a town of dramatic topography and origins that date back to the 14th century. Its topography and the supply of fast flowing waters led to its development as a thriving mill town and important centre for the textile industry. Its impressive landscape developed much of its developed form and the townscape that we still see today.( High Peak Borough Council website)Sport and leisureMills A.F.C. (The Millers) are the local football team and play in the North West Counties League Premier Division. The football ground at Church Lane boasts two pitches &mdash; one all weather &mdash; and floodlights. New Mills Cricket Club, with their ground on Church Road, play in the Derbyshire and Cheshire League. There is a leisure centre, including a swimming pool, which opened in 1980. Until the early 1980s, the town held an annual cycle race.New Mills Golf Club is a members club set on the top of the northerly hill overlooking the town, with views of Kinder Scout, the city of Manchester and the Welsh mountains. The course was formed in 1907 and extended to its current 18-hole, 5604-yard par 69 course in 2003 prior to the clubhouse extension and centenary celebration in 2007.Notable residents*Thomas Handford: The interpretation plaque at the towns former prison tells it all:: A working man, a teetotaler for ten years, who was formerly a notorious drinker and a notorious poacher has recently invested his sober earnings in the purchase of the town prison which he has converted into a comfortable dwelling house. Frequently an inmate of the prison whilst a drunkard and poacher, he is now owner of the whole and occupier of the premises. Thomas Handford 1854 .()See also*of mills in DerbyshireReferencesExternal links*New Mills Local History Society*Steve Lewis: History of New Mills*New Mills Festival Website - Current*The New Mills School website*Torrs Hydro New MillsMillsMillsMillsMillsMillsMillsMills
409184
Shirley_Strickland
  }}Shirley Barbara Strickland AO, MBE (18 July 1925 &ndash; 11 February 2004), later Shirley de la Hunty, was an Australian athlete. She won more Olympic medals than any other Australian in running sports.FamilyShirley was the only daughter, the second of five children.  She grew up on the family farm east of the wheatbelt town of Western Australia.Her father, Strickland, had been a worker at Kalgoorlie in the goldfields of Australia, Australia and also an athlete( ).  He was unable to compete in the Summer Olympics because he lacked the money for a trip to Paris.() Instead, in 1900, he directed his efforts to the Gift 130-yard (120-m) foot-race, winning in 12 seconds off a handicap of 10 yards.() His performance was considered to be as good as Rowleys times, which won the Australian amateur sprint titles that season. Rowley went on to win two medals in the sprints at the 1900 Paris Olympics. He subsequently went on to play one senior game of Rules football with Melbourne VFL team St Kilda in 1900.()Her mother, Violet Edith Merry, was American-born with a British mining engineer father and a Norwegian mother(. EducationShirley Stricklands early education was by correspondence. From 1934 to 1937 she attended the newly established local East Pithara School, winning a scholarship to attend Northam High School( ), where, in 1939, she won 47 out of 49 events as a schoolgirl athlete.() After high school she entered the of Western Australia where she graduated as a Bachelor of Science in 1946 with honors in physics. In her spare time, she lectured mathematics and physics to returned servicemen at Technical College, played wing in the university hockey team and gained a reputation as an extremely gifted sprinter and hurdler. While teaching at Perth Technical College, she was coached by Austin Robertson, a former world professional sprint champion and South Melbourne footballer.( She improved her 100 m yards time from 11.8 to 11.0 flat. At the 1947 Western Australia state titles, she won the 100 yards, 220 yards, 440 yards, the 90 m yards hurdles and the put.Athletic careerThe second World War was disruptive to womens athletics in Australia. Some runners, including Strickland, joined up to help the war effort.()The following year, she took up running seriously, with great success. She won the national title in the 80 m hurdles in 1948 and was part of the Australian delegation for the Summer Olympics in London. There, Strickland finished third in both the 100 m and 80 m hurdles and won a silver medal in the 4x100 m relay. After winning three gold medals in the 1950 Empire Games, she won her first Olympic title at the 1952 Games in Helsinki; she won the 80 m hurdles in record time (10.9 s). A baton mix-up cost her a second gold in the 4x100 m relay. In the 100 m, she again won the bronze.She set a new world record of 11.3 s for the 100 m in Poland in 1955, and in the 1956 Olympics, she won again in the 80 m hurdles and with the Australian 4x100 m relay team.Post-athleticsShe maintained her Olympic involvement, in athlete administration, with the Australian teams during the 1968 and 1976 Olympics in Mexico City and Montreal.Shirley de la Hunty stood several times without success as a candidate for the Democrats in the 1980s, resigning from the party to contest the 1989 WA Legislative Council election as an independent, again without success. She later served as a local government councillor for the of Melville.She was one of the bearers of the Torch at the opening ceremony of the Summer Olympics in Sydney, South Wales.  She carried the Olympic Torch as one of the runners for the final segment in the stadium, before the lighting of the Flame.In 2001 Shirley attracted media attention by auctioning all of her sporting memorabilia including her Olympic gold medals.( She was criticised by some for that but asserted she had a right to do so and the income generated would help pay for her grandchildrens education and allow a sizable donation to assist in securing old-growth forests from use by developers.  Her memorabilia was eventually acquired for the MCG Museum in Melbourne by a group of anonymous businessmen who shared her wish that the memorabilia would stay in Australia.Personal lifeIn 1950, she married geologist Lawrence Edmund de la Hunty, who had been one of her students in physics lectures. She had four children: Phillip (born 1953), Barbara (1957), Matthew (1960) and David (1963).  Matthew was the lead singer in Tales and True. Lawrence died of a heart attack in 1980.Her body was found on 16 February 2004 on her kitchen floor, but the coroner determined that she died on the evening of 11 February.  There was no full autopsy and the coroner said the cause of death was unascertainable, though not inconsistent with natural causes. She was honoured with a state funeral.In 2005, some members of her family approached the coroner regarding the circumstances of her death. In 2006 an investigation was conducted by detectives from the major crime squad. In 2008 probate was granted after a dispute over her will was resolved in the Supreme Court.ReferencesExternal links* Film Australia: Oral biography with video clipsBibliography* StricklandStricklandStrickland de la HuntyDe La Hunty-StricklandStricklandStricklandStricklandja:StricklandStricklandStricklandStricklandStrickland
409972
American_Indian_Movement
right|300px|thumb|Flag of the American Indian MovementThe American Indian Movement (AIM) is a Native American activist organization in the States, founded in 1968 in Minnesota by urban Native Americans. The national AIM agenda focuses on spirituality, leadership, and sovereignty. AIM was founded in 1968 by Banks, Mitchell, Powless, Bellecourt, Goodsky, Benton-Banai, and a number of others in Minneapolis Native American community.(Dennis Banks, Richard Erdoes. Ojibwa Warrior: Dennis Banks and the Rise of the American Indian Movement (Norman, OK: University of Oklahoma Press, 2004), pp. 62, 64. ISBN 978-0-8061-3580-9) Means, born Oglala Lakota, was an early leader in 1970s protests.The organization was formed to address various issues concerning the Native American urban community in Minneapolis, including poverty, housing, treaty issues, and police harassment.(Miner, Marlyce. The American Indian Movement)  From its beginnings in Minnesota, AIM soon attracted members from across the United States (and Canada). It participated in the Rainbow Coalition organized by the rights activist Hampton. Charles Deegan Sr. was involved with the AIM Patrol.In October 1972 AIM gathered members from across the country to march to Washington, DC on what they called the Trail of Broken Treaties. AIM gained international press when it seized the of Indian Affairs national headquarters and presented a 20-point list of demands of the federal government. In 1973 it led a 71-day armed standoff with federal forces at Wounded Knee, Dakota, on the Pine Ridge Indian Reservation.In the decades since AIMs founding, the group has led protests advocating indigenous American interests, inspired cultural renewal, monitored police activities, and coordinated employment programs in cities and in rural reservation communities across the United States. AIM has often supported indigenous interests outside the United States as well. By 1993 AIM had split into two main factions, with the AIM-Grand Governing Council based in Minneapolis and affirming its right to use the name and trademarks for affiliated chapters. Background 1960s Presidents F. Kennedy and Johnson both made efforts to reform the damage done to the Indian nations. On March 6, 1968, Johnson signed Executive Order 11399, establishing the Council on Indian Opportunity (NCIO). President Johnson said the time has come to focus our efforts on the plight of the American Indian, and NCIOs formation would launch an undivided, Government-wide effort in this area. While knowing little of the American Indian issues, Johnson tried to connect the nations trust responsibility to the tribes and nations to civil rights, an area with which he was much more familiar.(Records of the National Council on Indian Opportunity, LexisNexis)In Congress, the Democratic chairman of the House Subcommittee on Indian Affairs, Haley from Florida, supported Indian rights; for example, he thought Indians should participate more in policy matters, but the right of self-determination is in the Congress as a representative of all the people. (Thomas Clarkin. Federal Indian Policy in the Kennedy and Johnson Administrations, 1961-1969 (2001) University of New Mexico Press, p. 157 ISBN 978-0-8263-2262-3) In the 1960s Haley met with presidents Kennedy and Johnson, and pressed for Indian self-determination and control in transactions over land. One struggle was over the long-term leasing of American Indian land.(Robert Burnett, Richard Erdoes. The Tortured Americans Englewood Cliffs, New Jersey: Prentice-Hall (1971) ISNB 9780139255458) Non-Indian businesses and banks said they could not invest in leases of 25 years, even with generous options, as the time was too short for land-based transactions. Relieving the long-term poverty on most reservations through business partnerships by leasing land was seen as infeasible. A return to the 19th century 99-year leases was seen as a possible solution. But, an Interior Department memo said, a 99-year lease is in the nature of a conveyance of the land.  These battles over land had their beginnings in the 1870s when federal policy often related to wholesale taking, not leases. In the 1950s, many Native Americans believed that leases were too frequently a way for outsiders to control Indian land.Wallace Mad Bear Anderson was a Tuscarora leader in New York in the 1950s. He struggled to resist the New York City planner Moses plan to take tribal land in upstate New York for use in a state hydropower project to supply New York City. The struggle ended in a bitter compromise.(Wilson, Edmund. Apologies to the Iroquois : with a study of The Mohawks in high steel by Joseph Mitchell. New York: Farrar, Straus and Cudahy, 1959. 310p.  ) The initial AIM movement As had rights and antiwar activists, AIM used the American press and media to present its message to the United States public. It created events to attract the press. If successful, news outlets would seek out AIM spokespersons for interviews. Rather than relying on traditional lobbying efforts, AIM took its message directly to the American public. Its leaders looked for opportunities to gain publicity.  Sound bites such as the Song became associated with the movement. Events  During ceremonies on Thanksgiving Day 1970 to commemorate the 350th anniversary of the Pilgrims landing at Plymouth Rock, AIM seized the replica of the Mayflower in Boston. In 1971, members occupied Rushmore for a few days, as it was created in the Hills of South Dakota, long sacred to the Sioux. This area was within the Sioux Reservation ascreated by the US of Fort Laramie in 1868.  After the discovery of gold, the federal government took the land in 1877 and sold it for mining and settlement to European Americans.Also in 1971 AIM began to highlight and protest problems with the of Indian Affairs (BIA), which administered programs and land trusts for Native Americans.  The group briefly occupied BIA headquarters in Washington, DC. A brief arrest, reversal of charges for unlawful entry and a meeting with Louis Bruce, the Mohawk/Lakota BIA Commissioner, ended AIMs first event in the capital.(B.I.A Im Not Your Indian Any More, Akwesasne Notes, p.47)  In 1972, activists marched across country on the Trail of Broken Treaties and took over the of Indian Affairs (BIA), occupying it for several days and doing millions of dollars in damage.(Legislative Review, Nov 1972)AIM developed a 20-point list to summarize its issues with federal treaties and promises, which they publicized during their occupation in 1972. Twelve points addressed treaty responsibilities which the protesters believed the U.S. government had failed to fulfill:* Restore treaty making (ended by Congress in 1871);* Establish a treaty commission to make new treaties (with sovereign Native Nations);* Provide opportunities for Indian leaders to address Congress directly;* Review treaty commitments and violations;* Have unratified treaties reviewed by the Senate;* Ensure that all American Indians are governed by treaty relations;* Provide relief to Native Nations as compensation for treaty rights violations;* Recognize the right of Indians to interpret treaties;* Create a Joint Congressional Committee to reconstruct relations with Indians;* Restore  of land taken away from Native Nations by the United States;* Restore terminated rights of Native Nations;* Repeal state jurisdiction on Native Nations (Law 280);* Provide Federal protection for offenses against Indians;* Abolish the Bureau of Indian Affairs;* Create a new office of Federal Indian Relations;* Remedy breakdown in the constitutionally prescribed relationships between the United States and Native Nations;* Ensure immunity of Native Nations from state commerce regulation, taxes, and trade restrictions;* Protect Indian religious freedom and cultural integrity;* Establish national Indian voting with local options; free national Indian organizations from governmental controls; and* Reclaim and affirm health, housing, employment, economic development, and education for all Indian people.(Twenty Points, American Indian Movement Website, see for the complete text of the Twenty Points)In 1973 AIM was invited to the Ridge Indian Reservation to help gain justice from border counties law enforcement and to moderate political factions on the reservation.  They became deeply involved and led an armed occupation of Wounded Knee on the Ridge Indian Reservation in 1973.  Other events during the 1970s were designed to achieve the goal of gaining public attention.  They ensured AIM would be noticed to highlight what they saw as the erosion of Indian rights and sovereignty.(Banks, pp. 108-113; Leonard Crow Dog; Richard Erdoes. Crow Dog: Four Generations of Sioux Medicine Men (New York: Harper Perennial, 1996), pp. 170-171 ISBN 978-0-06-092682-3)(Mary Crow Dog; Richard Erdoes. Lakota Woman (New York: HarperPerennial, 1990) p. 88 ISBN 978-0-06-097389-6)The Longest Walk and The Longest Walk 2The Longest Walk (1978) was an AIM-led spiritual walk across the country to support tribal sovereignty and bring attention to 11 pieces of anti-Indian legislation; AIM believed that the proposed legislation would have abrogated Indian Treaties, quantified and limited water rights, etc.  The first walk began on February 11, 1978 with a ceremony on Island, where a Sacred Pipe was loaded with tobacco. The Pipe was carried the entire distance. This  Walks purpose was to educate people about the US governments continuing threat to Tribal Sovereignty; it rallied thousands representing many Indian Nations throughout the United States and Canada. Traditional spiritual leaders from many tribes participated, leading traditional ceremonies.  International spiritual leaders, primarily from Japan, also supported the Walk.On July 15, 1978, The Longest Walk entered Washington D.C. with several thousand Indians and a number of non-Indian supporters.  The traditional elders led them to the Washington Monument, where the Pipe carried across the country was smoked. Over the following week, they held rallies at various sites to address issues: the 11 pieces of legislation, American Indian political prisoners, forced relocation at Big Mountain, the Nation, etc.  Non-Indian supporters included the American boxer Ali, US Senator Kennedy and the actor Brando. The US Congress voted against a proposed bill to abrogate treaties with Indian Nations. During the week after the activists arrived, Congress passed the Indian Religious Freedom Act, which allowed them the use of peyote in worship.  President Carter refused to meet with representatives of The Longest Walk.Thirty years later, AIM led the Longest Walk 2, which arrived in Washington in July 2008.  This  walk had started from the San Francisco Bay area. The Longest Walk 2 had representatives from more than 100 American Indian nations, and other indigenous participants, such as Maori. It also had non-indigenous supporters. The walk highlighted the need for protection of American Indian sacred sites, tribal sovereignty, environmental protection and action to stop global warming. Participants traveled on either the Northern Route (basically that of 1978) or the Southern Route or Northern Route. Participants crossed a total of 26 states on the two different routes.(The Northern Route was led by veterans of that action. The walkers used Sacred staffs to represent its issues; the group supported the protection of sacred sites of indigenous peoples, traditional tribal sovereignty, issues related to native prisoners, and the protection of children. They also commemorated the 30th anniversary of the original Longest Walk.()Walkers along the Southern Route picked up more than 8,000 bags of garbage on their way to Washington. In Washington, the Southern Route delivered a 30-page manifesto, The Manifesto of Change, and a list of demands, including mitigation for climate change, a call for environmental sustainability plans, protection of sacred sites, and renewal of improvement to Native American sovereignty and health.(Connection to other minoritiesAIMs leaders spoke out against injustices against their peoples, as had the African-American leaders of the Rights Movement. AIM leaders talked about high unemployment, slum housing, and racist treatment, fought for treaty rights and the reclamation of tribal land, and advocated on behalf of urban Indians.With its provocative events and advocacy for Indian rights, AIM attracted scrutiny from the Department of Justice (DOJ).(Ward Churchill; Jim Vander Wall. Agents of Repression: The FBIs Secret Wars against the Black Panther Party and the American Indian Movement, (Boston, MA: End Press, 1988) ) The Bureau of Investigation (FBI) used paid informants to report on AIMs activities and its members.(Banks, pp. 266-283)(United States Congress. Senate Committee on the Judiciary. Subcommittee to Investigate the Administration of the Internal Security Act and Other Internal Security Laws. Revolutionary activities within the United States the American Indian Movement: report of the Subcommittee to Investigate the Administration of the Internal Security Act and Other Internal Security Laws of the Committee on the Judiciary, United States Senate, Ninety-fourth Congress, second session., September 1976. )In February, 1973 AIM leaders Russell Means and Dennis Banks worked with Oglala Lakota people and AIM activists to occupy the small Indian community of Knee, South Dakota on the Pine Ridge Reservation.  They were protesting its corrupt government, federal issues, and the lack of justice from border counties. The FBI dispatched agents and Marshals to cordon off the site. Later a higher-ranking DOJ representative took control of the US governments response. Through the resulting siege that lasted for 71 days, twelve people were wounded, including an FBI agent left paralyzed; in April a Cherokee and a Lakota activist died of gunfire (at this point, the Oglala Lakota called an end to the occupation.)  Afterward, 1200 American Indians were arrested.  Wounded Knee drew international attention to the plight of American Indians. AIM leaders were tried in a Minnesota federal court.  The court dismissed their case on the basis of governmental prosecutorial misconduct.()History  AIM protestsAIM has opposed national and collegiate sports teams using figures of indigenous people as mascots and team names, such as the Indians, the Braves, the Blackhawks and the Redskins. AIM organized protests at Series and Bowl games against these teams. Protesters held signs with slogans such as Indians are people not mascots, or Being Indian is not a character you can play.(Activists Protest Indian as Mascot, The Herald of Arkansas State, 12 January 2006, Arkansas State University, accessed 8 April 2009)Although sports teams had ignored such requests by individual tribes for years, AIM received attention in the mascot debate. NCAA schools such as State University, of Utah, of Illinois and Michigan University have negotiated with the tribes whose names or images they had used for permission for continued use and to collaborate on portraying the mascot in a way that honors Native Americans. Goals and commitments AIM has been committed to improving conditions faced by native peoples.  They founded institutions to address needs, including the Heart of The Earth School, Little Earth Housing, International Indian Treaty Council, AIM StreetMedics, American Indian Opportunities and Industrialization Center (one of the largest Indian job training programs), KILI radio, and Indian Legal Rights Centers.(AIMovement.)In 1970, several members of AIM, including Banks and Means, traveled to Rushmore.  They converged at the mountain in order to protest the illegal seizure of the Sioux Nations sacred Hills in 1877 by the United States federal government, in violation of its earlier 1868 of Fort Laramie. The protest began to publicize the issues of the American Indian Movement.(Miner, Marlyce. The American Indian Movement)  In 1980, the US Supreme Court ruled that the federal government had illegally taken the Black Hills.  The government offered financial compensation, but the Oglala Sioux have refused it, insisting on return of the land to their people.  The settlement money is earning interest.Work at Pine Ridge Indian ReservationBorder town casesIn 1972 Raymond Yellow Thunder, a 51-year-old Lakota from Ridge Reservation, was murdered in Nebraska by two brothers, Leslie and Melvin Hare, younger white men. After their trial and conviction, the Hares received the minimal sentence for manslaughter. Members of AIM went to Gordon to protest the sentencing, as it was part of a pattern of law enforcement in border counties, where drinking was heavy, that did not provide justice to Native Americans.(Sanchez, John and Stuckey, E. Mary. The Rhetoric of American Indian Activism in the 1960s and 1970s. Communication Quarterly (2000) pp. 120-136 )  In the winter of 1973, Wesley Bad Heart Bull, a Lakota, was stabbed to death at a bar in South Dakota by Darrell Schmidt, a white male. The offender was jailed, but released on a $5000 bond and charged only with assault. In protest of the charges, a group of AIM members and leaders from Pine Ridge Reservation and leaders went to the county seat of South Dakota, to meet with the prosecutor. Police in riot gear allowed only four people to enter the county courthouse. The talks were not successful, and tempers rose over the police treatment; AIM activists caused $2 million in damages by attacking and burning the Custer Chamber of Commerce building, the courthouse, and two patrol cars. Many of the AIM demonstrators were arrested and charged; numerous people served sentences, including the mother of Wesley Bad Heart Bull.( 1973 Knee IncidentIn addition to the problems of violence in the border towns, many traditional people at the Ridge Indian Reservation were unhappy with the government of Richard Wilson, elected in 1972.  When their effort to impeach him in February 1973 failed, they met to plan protests and action. Many people on the reservation were unhappy about its longstanding poverty and failures of the federal government to live up to its treaties with Indian nations.  The women elders encouraged the men to act. On February 27, 1973, about 300  Lakota and AIM activists went to the hamlet of Wounded Knee for their protest. It developed into a 71-day siege, with the FBI cordoning off the area by using US Marshals and later National Guard units.( The occupation was symbolically held at the site of the 1890 Knee Massacre. The Oglala Lakota demanded a revival of treaty negotiations to begin to correct relations with the federal government, the respect of their sovereignty, and the removal of Wilson from office. The American Indians occupied the Sacred Heart Church, the Gildersleeve Trading Post and numerous homes of the village. Although periodic negotiations were held between AIM spokesman and U.S. government negotiators, gunfire occurred on both sides. A US Marshal was wounded severely and paralyzed.  In April, a Cherokee from North Carolina and a Lakota AIM member were shot and killed. The elders ended the occupation then.(After about a month, the Department of Justice excluded the press from access to Wounded Knee. (Before that, they were frequently interviewing Indian spokesmen and the event was receiving international coverage.)  The Awards ceremony was held in Hollywood, where the actor Brando, a supporter of AIM, asked an Apache actress, Littlefeather, to speak at the Oscars on his behalf. He had been nominated for his performance in Godfather and won. Littlefeather arrived in full Apache regalia and read his statement that, owing to the poor treatment of Native Americans in the film industry, Brando would not accept the award.  In interviews, she also talked about the Wounded Knee occupation. The event grabbed the attention of the US and the world media. The movement considered the Awards ceremony publicity, together with Wounded Knee, as a major event and public relations victory, as polls showed that Americans were sympathetic to the Indian cause.Pine Ridge Reservation violenceAIM members continued to be active at Pine Ridge, although Wilson stayed in office and was re-elected in 1974 in a contested election.  Violent deaths rose, and more than 60 political opponents of his died violently during the next three years.  In June 1975 in what has been called the Pine Ridge shootout, two FBI agents were killed near Jumping Bull Ranch, and found to have been shot execution style. Three AIM members were eventually indicted for the murders: Darryl, Robert Robideau and Peltier, who had escaped to Canada.  Darryl and Robideau were tried in 1975 and acquitted. After extradition, Peltier was tried separately and convicted in 1976. He is serving two concurrent life sentences and has become a symbol of political injustice.Informants true and falseIn late 1974 AIM leaders discovered that Douglas Durham, a prominent member who was by then head of security, was an FBI informant. They confronted him and expelled him from AIM at a press conference in March 1975. With some members in fugitive status after the Pine Ridge shootout, suspicions about FBI infiltration remained high.  For various reasons, Mae Aquash, the highest-ranking woman in AIM, was mistakenly suspected of being an informant. According to testimony at trials in 2004 and 2010 of men convicted of her murder, she was interrogated in the fall of 1975. In mid-December she was taken from Denver, Colorado to Rapid City, interrogated again, then taken to Reservation and finally to a far corner Pine Ridge Reservation, where she was killed by gunshot to the back of her head. Her body was not found until February 1976. Low-level AIM members Arlo Looking Cloud and John Graham were convicted of her murder, but many people believed that higher ranking leaders had ordered it. Dissension over this issue contributed to the 1993 split in the AIM organization. 1980s support of Nicaraguan Miskito Indians During the Sandinista/Indian conflict in Nicaragua of the mid-1980s, Means sided with Indians opposing the Sandinista government. The Miskito charged the government with forcing relocations of as many as 8,500 Miskito. This position lost AIM some support from certain US left-wing organizations in the U.S. who opposed Contra activities and supported the Sandinista movement.  The complex situation included Contra insurgents recruiting among Nicaraguan Indian groups, including some Miskitos.  Means recognized the difference between opposition to the Sandinista government by the Miskito, Sumo, and Rama on one hand, and the Reagan administrations support of the Contras, dedicated to the overthrow of the Sandinista regime.(STEPHEN KINZER, U.S. Indians Enlist in the Miskito Cause, New York Times, 10 November 1985, bottom of page at http://www.aimovement.org/moipr/onrussellmeans.html) AIM protests and contentions Many AIM chapters remain committed to confronting government and corporate forces that they allege seek to marginalize Indigenous peoples.(Westword, 15 December 2005)  They have challenged the ideological foundations of US national holidays, such as Day(Transform Columbus Day 2008 .Transform Columbus Day Alliance Website) and Thanksgiving. AIM argues that Thanksgiving should be a National Day of Mourning, and protests what it perceives to be the continuing theft of indigenous peoples territories and natural resources.  AIM has helped educate people about the full history of the US, and advocates for the inclusion of Indigenous American perspectives in U.S. history. Its efforts are recognized and supported by many institutional leaders in politics, education, arts, religion, and media.(Kubal, Timothy. 2008. Cultural Movements and Collective Memory: Christopher Columbus and the Rewriting of the National Origin Myth. (New York: Palgrave Macmillan) ISBN 978-1-4039-7577-5) 2000s In April 2003, AIM chapters met at a conference with the founder of the Center for the SPIRIT (Support and Protection of Indian Religions and Indigenous Traditions) to discuss plans to protect and maintain Native American religious rights.(Meyer, John M., ed. American Indians and U.S. Politics, Westport, CT: Greenwood Publishing, 2002. ) In June of that year, United States and Canadian tribes joined together internationally to pass the Declaration of War Against Exploiters of Lakota Spirituality. SPIRIT teamed up with the AIM to declare war against all plastic Indians. They felt they were being exploited by those marketing the sales of replicated Native American spiritual objects and impersonating sacred religious ceremonies as a tourist attraction.  AIM delegates are working on a policy to require tribal identification for anyone claiming to represent Native Americans in any public forum or venue.In February 2004, AIM gained more media attention by marching from Washington D.C. to Alcatraz Island.  This was one of many occasions when Indian activists used the island as the location of an event since the of Alcatraz in 1969, led by the Indians of All Tribes, a student group from San Francisco.  The 2004 march was in support of Peltier, whom many believed had not had a fair trial; he has become a symbol of spiritual and political resistance for Native Americans.(In December 2008, a delegation of Sioux, including Talon Becenti, delivered a declaration of separation from the United States to the State Department.  Citing many broken treaties by the U.S. government in the past, and the loss of vast amounts of territory originally awarded in those treaties, the group announced its intentions to form a separate nation within the U.S. known as the of Lakotah.()AIM Timeline 1968- MINNEAPOLIS AIM PATROL: created to monitor police treatment of urban American Indians and their treatment in the justice system.1969- INDIAN HEALTH BOARD of Minneapolis founded. This was the first American Indian, urban-based health care provider in the nation. The San Francisco-based Indians of All Tribes and the Power Movement occupied ALCATRAZ ISLAND, a former federal prison site, for 19 months.  They reclaimed federal land in the name of Native Nations.  The first American Indian radio broadcastsRadio Free Alcatrazwere heard in the Area. |Some AIM activists joined them.1970- LEGAL RIGHTS CENTER: created in Minneapolis to assist American Indians. (As of 1994, over 19,000 clients have had legal representation, thanks to AIMs work.)  AIM takeover of abandoned property at the naval air station near Minneapolis focuses attention on Indian education and leads to early grants for Indian education.1971- CITIZENS ARREST OF JOHN OLD CROW: Takeover of the of Indian Affairs headquarters in Washington, D.C. to publicize improper BIA policies. Twenty-four protesters arrested for trespassing and released. BIA Commissioner Bruce shows his AIM membership card at the meeting held after the release of protesters. FIRST NATIONAL AIM CONFERENCE: 18 chapters of AIM convened to develop long-range strategy for the movement.  TAKEOVER OF WINTER DAM: AIM assists the Court Oreilles (LCO) Ojibwe in Wisconsin in taking over a dam controlled by Northern States Power, which had flooded much of their reservation land. This action gained support by government officials and an eventual settlement with the LCO.  The federal government returned more than  of land to the LCO tribe for their reservation, and the Power company provided significant monies and business opportunities to the tribe.1972- RED SCHOOL HOUSE: the second survival school to open, offering culturally based education services to K-12 students in Paul, Minnesota.  HEART OF THE EARTH SURVIVAL SCHOOL (HOTESS): a K-12 school established to address the extremely high drop-out rate among American Indian students and lack of curricula that reflected American Indian culture. HOTESS serves as the first model of community-based, student-centered education with culturally correct curriculum operating under parental control. TRAIL OF BROKEN TREATIES: a pan-Indian march across country to Washington, DC, to dramatize failures in federal policy.  Protesters occupied the BIA national headquarters and did millions of dollars in damages, as well as irrevocable losses of Indian land deeds.  The protesters presented a 20-point demand paper to the administration, many associated with treaty rights and renewed negotiations of treaties.1973- LEGAL ACTION FOR SCHOOL FUNDS: In reaction to the Trail of Broken Treaties, the government  canceled education grants to three AIM-sponsored schools in St. Paul and Milwaukee. AIM files legal challenges, and the US District Court orders the grants restored and government payment of costs and attorney fees. WOUNDED KNEE 73: AIM was contacted by Oglala Lakota elders of the Ridge Indian Reservation for assistance in dealing with failures in justice in border towns, the authoritarian tribal president, and financial corruption within the BIA and executive committee. Together with Oglala Lakota, armed activists occupied the town of Wounded Knee for 71-days against US armed forces.1974- INTERNATIONAL INDIAN TREATY COUNCIL (IITC): an organization representing Indian peoples throughout the western hemisphere was recognized at the United Nations in Geneva, Switzerland. WOUNDED KNEE TRIALS: Eight months of federal trials of participants in Wounded Knee took place in Minneapolis. It was the longest Federal trial in the history of the United States. As many instances of government misconduct were revealed, the US District judge Fred Nichol dismissed all charges due to government misconduct which formed a pattern throughout the course of the trial so that the waters of justice have been polluted.1975- FEDERATION OF SURVIVAL SCHOOLS: created to provide advocacy and networking skills to 16 survival schools throughout the US and Canada.  HUD chose AIM to be the primary sponsor of the first American Indian-run housing project, LITTLE EARTH OF UNITED TRIBES.1977- MIGIZI Communications founded in Minneapolis. The organization is dedicated to produce Indian news and information, and educate students of all ages as tomorrows technical work force. INTERNATIONAL INDIAN TREATY COUNCIL: establishes Non-government organization status at United Nations offices in Geneva; attends the International NGO conference and presents testimony to the United Nations. AMERICAN INDIAN LANGUAGE AND CULTURE LEGISLATION: AIM proposes legislative language which is passed in Minnesota, recognizing State responsibility for Indian education and culture. This legislation was recognized as a model throughout the country.1978- FIRST EDUCATION PROGRAMS FOR AMERICAN INDIAN OFFENDERS:  AIM establishes the first adult education program for American Indian offenders at Prison in Minnesota. Programs later established at other state correctional facilities modeled after the Minnesota program. CIRCLE OF LIFE SURVIVAL SCHOOL established on the Earth Indian Reservation in Minnesota. The school receives funding for three years of operation from the U.S. Department of Education. RUN FOR SURVIVAL: AIM youth organize and conduct  run from Minneapolis to Kansas to support The Longest Walk.  THE LONGEST WALK: Indian Nations walk across the US from California to DC to protest proposed legislation calling for the abrogation of treaties with Indian nations. They set up and maintained a tipi near the White House. The proposed legislation is defeated.1979- LITTLE EARTH HOUSING PROTECTED: an attempt by the US HUD to foreclose on the Little Earth of United Tribes housing project is halted by legal action; the US District Court issues an injunction against HUD. AMERICAN INDIAN OPPORTUNITIES INDUSTRIALIZATION CENTER (AIOIC): creates job training schools to alleviate the unemployment issues of Indian people. More than 17,000 Native Americans have been trained for jobs since AIM created the AIOIC in 1979. ANISHINABE AKEENG Organization is created to regain stolen and tax forfeited land on the White Earth Reservation in Minnesota.1984- FEDERATION of NATIVE CONTROLLED SURVIVAL SCHOOLS: presents legal education seminars at colleges and law schools in Minnesota, Wisconsin, California, South Dakota, Nebraska and Oklahoma for educators of Indian students.  National conference held in San Jose, California, concurrent with the National Indian Education Association Convention.1986- SCHOOLS LAWSUIT: Heart of the Earth and Red School House successfully sue the U.S. Department of Education, Indian Education Programs for ranking the schools programs below funding recommendation levels. The suit proved discriminatory bias in the system of ranking by the Department staff.1987- AIM PATROL: Minneapolis AIM Patrol restarts to protect American Indian women in Minneapolis after serial killings committed against them.1988- ELAINE STATELY INDIAN YOUTH SERVICES (ESIYS): developed to create alternatives for youth in Minneapolis as a direct diversion to gang-involvement of Indian youth. FORT SNELLING AIM ANNUAL POW WOW: AIM establishes an annual pow wow to recognize its 20th Anniversary, at Snelling in Minnesota. The event becomes the largest Labor Day Weekend event in any Minnesota state park.1989- SPEARFISHING: AIM is requested to provide expertise in dealing with protesters at boat landings. American Indian spearfishing continues despite violence, arrests, and threats from whites. Senator Inouye calls for a study on the effects of Indian spearfishing. The study shows only 6% of fish taken are by Indians. Sports fishing accounts for the rest.1991 PEACEMAKER CENTER: AIM houses its AIM Patrol and ESIYS in a center in the heart of the Indian community, based on Indian spirituality.  SUNDANCE RETURNED TO MINNESOTA. With the support of the Dakota communities, AIM revived the Sundance at Minnesota. Ojibwe nations have helped make the Minnesota Sundance possible. The Pipestone Sundance has become an annual event. In 1991, some self-appointed leaders of the Oglala Lakota, Cheyenne and other nations declared independence from the United States. The group established a provisional government and to develop a separate national government. Elected leaders and council members of the nations did not support this action. NATIONAL COALITION ON RACISM IN SPORTS AND MEDIA: AIM organized this group to address the issue of using Indian figures and names as sports team mascots. AIM led a walk in Minneapolis to the 1992 Super Bowl. In 1994, the Minneapolis Star-Tribune agreed to stop using professional sports team names that refer to Indian people unless these have been approved by the tribes.1992- THE FOOD CONNECTION: organized summer youth jobs program with an organic garden and spiritual camp (Common Ground) at Tonkawood Farm in Minnesota.1993- EXPANSION OF AMERICAN INDIAN OIC JOB TRAINING PROGRAM: the Grand Metropolitan, Inc. of Great Britain, a parent of the Pillsbury Corporation, merges its job training program with that of AIOIC and pledges future monies and support in Minnesota.  LITTLE EARTH: after AIMs 18-year struggle, the HUD secretary Cisneros rules that Little Earth of United Tribes housing project shall retain the right to preference for American Indian residents when considering applicants for the project. WOUNDED KNEE ANNIVERSARY: At the 20th anniversary of the Knee Incident at Ridge Reservation, the elected Sioux Tribe president, Yellow Bird Steele, thanked AIM for its 1973 actions.Due to continuing dissension, AIM splits: AIM Grand Governing Council (AIMGGC) is based in Minneapolis and still led by founders. AIM-    is based in Denver, Colorado.1996- April 38, 1996 - As a representative of the AIM Grand Governing Council and special representative of the International Indian Treaty Council, Vernon Bellecourt, along with William A. Means, President of IITC, attended the preparatory meeting for the Intercontinental Encounter for Humanity and Against Neo-Liberalism (IEHN), hosted by the Emiliano Zapata Liberation Movement (EZLN), held in LaRealidad, Eastern Chiapas, Mexico, July 27 - August 3, 1996. The second meeting for the IEHN in 1997 was hosted by the EZLN and was attended by delegates of the IITC and AIM.1998- February 12, 1998 - AIM is charged with Security at the Valley Occupation in Southern California. The occupation lasted for 113 days and resulted in a victory for the River Indian Tribes (CRIT) against the plan to use the area for the disposal of nuclear wastes. February 27, 1998 - 25th Anniversary of Wounded Knee, an Oglala Lakota Nation resolution established February 27 as a National Day of Liberation. July 1619, 1998 - 25th Annual Courte Oreilles Honor the Earth Homecoming Celebration to honor the people who participated in the July 31, 1971 takeover of the Winter Dam and the beginning of the Honor the Earth observance. August 211, 1998 - 30th Anniversary of the AIM Grand Governing Council; Sacred Pipestone Quarries in Pipestone, Minnesota. Conference commemorating AIMs 30th Anniversary.1999- February 1999 - Three United States activists working with a group of Uwa Indians in Colombia were kidnapped by rebels. Ingrid Washinawatok, 41 (Menominee), a humanitarian; Terence Freitas, 24, an environmental scientist from Santa Cruz, California; and Laheenae Gay, 39 of Hawaii, were seized near the village of Royota, in Arauca province in northeastern Colombia on February 25 while preparing to leave after a two week on-site visit. On March 5, their bullet-riddled bodies were discovered across the border in Venezuela.2000 - July 2000 - AIM 32nd Anniversary Conference on the Courte Oreilles Ojibwe Nation Reservation in northern Wisconsin. October 2000  AIM founded commission to seek justice for Ingrid Washinawatok and companions.2001 - March 2001  Reps of the AIM GGC attend the Zapatista Army of National Liberation March for Peace, Justice and Dignity, Zocolo Plaza, Mexico City.  July 2001  11th Annual Youth & Elders International Cultural Gathering and Sundance, Pipestone, Minnesota.  August 2001  Five anti-wahoo demonstrators with AIM bring civil lawsuit for false arrest against the city of Ohio. November 2001  The American Indian Forum on Racism in Sports and Media is held at Black Bear Crossing, St. Paul, Minnesota.2002 - August 2002, 12th Annual International Youth & Elders Cultural Gathering and Sundance, Pipestone, Minnesota.2003 - May 2003- Quarterly Meeting of the AIM National Board of Directors, Thunderbird House, Winnipeg, Manitoba. August 2003  13th Annual International Youth & Elders Cultural Gathering and Sundance, Pipestone, Minnesota.2004 - August 2004 - 14th Annual International Youth & Elders Cultural Gathering and Sundance,  Pipestone, Minnesota.2005 - May 2005  First Annual Clyde H. Bellecourt Endowment Scholarship Fund and Awards Banquet, Minneapolis, Minnesota. July 2005  15th Annual International Youth & Elders Cultural Gathering and Sundance, Pipestone, Minnesota.2006 -May 2006  Second Annual Clyde H. Bellecourt Endowment Scholarship Fund and Awards Banquet, Minneapolis. July 2006 - 16th Annual International Youth & Elders Cultural Gathering and Sundance, Pipestone, Minnesota (Visions and Voices: American Indian Activism and the Civil Rights Movement, Part I, page 54) Other Native American organizationsOther Native American rights activists have created groups such as WARN (Women of All Red Nations), NATIVE (Native American Traditions, Ideals, Values Educational Society), LISN (League of Indigenous Sovereign Nations), Mexica Movement, EZLN (Zapatista Army of National Liberation), and the IPC (Indigenous Peoples Caucus).( Although each group may have its own specific goals or focus, they are all fighting for the same principles of respect and equality for Native Americans.International Indian Treaty CouncilAIM established the International Indian Treaty Council (IITC) in June 1974.  It invited representatives from numerous indigenous nations, and delegates from 98 international groups attended the meeting.  The sacred pipe serves as a symbol of the Nations common bonds of spirituality, ties to the land and respect for traditional cultures.  The IITC focuses on issues such as treaty and land rights, rights and protection of indigenous children, protection of sacred sites, and religious freedom.The International Indian Treaty Council (IITC) uses networking, technical assistance, and coalition building.  In 1977, the IITC became a Non-Governmental Organization with Consultative Status to the United Nations Economic and Social Council. The organization concentrates on involving Indigenous Peoples in U.N. forums.  In addition, the IITC strives to bring awareness about the issues concerning Indigenous Peoples to non-Indigenous organizations.(International Indian Treaty Council) The United Nations Adoption of Indigenous Peoples Rights On September 13, 2007 the United Nations General Assembly adopted the Declaration on the Rights of Indigenous Peoples.  A total of 144 states or countries voted in favor.  Four voted against it while 11 abstained.  The four voting against it were the United States, Canada, Australia, and New Zealand, whose representatives said they believed the declaration goes too far.(The Declaration announces rights of Indigenous Peoples, such as rights to self-determination, traditional lands and territories, traditional languages and customs, natural resources and sacred sites.()Ideological differences within AIMIn 1993, AIM split into two factions, each claiming to be the authentic inheritor of the AIM tradition.  The AIM-Grand Governing Council is based in Minnesota and associated with leadership by Bellecourt and his brother Vernon Bellecourt (who died in 2007). The GGC tends toward a more centralized, controlled political philosophy.The AIM-International Confederation of Autonomous Chapters, based in Colorado, was founded by thirteen AIM chapters in 1993 at a meeting in Denver, Colorado. The group issued its Edgewood Declaration, citing organizational grievances and complaining of authoritarian leadership by the Bellecourts.  Ideological differences were growing, with the AIM-International Confederation taking a spiritual, perhaps more mainstream, approach to activism. The autonomous chapters group argues that AIM has always been organized as a series of decentralized, autonomous chapters, with local leadership accountable to local constituencies. The autonomous chapters reject the assertions of central control by the Minneapolis group as contrary both to indigenous political traditions and to the original philosophy of AIM.(Waterman Wittstock, Laura; Salinas, Elaine. A Brief History of the American Indian Movement, Portland Independent Media Center, 28 February 2004. accessed 9 Nov 2009)Accusations of murderAt a press conference in Denver, Colorado on 3 November 1999, Russell Means accused Bellecourt of having ordered the execution of Mae Aquash in 1975. The highest-ranking woman in AIM at the time, she had been shot execution style in mid-December 1975 and left in a far corner of the Pine Ridge Indian Reservation after having been kidnapped from Colorado and interrogated in City, South Dakota as a possible FBI informant. Means implicated Clyde Bellecourt in her murder as well, and other AIM activists, including Theresa Rios. Means said that part of the dissension within AIM in the early 1990s had related to actions to expel the Bellecourt brothers for their part in the Aquash execution; the organization split apart.(Russ Means holds press conference on Annie Maes murder 11-3-99, News From Indian Country, 3 November 1999, accessed 16 July 2011)Earlier that day in a telephone interview with the journalists Paul DeMain and Harlan McKosato about the upcoming press conference, Minnie Two Shoes had said, speaking of the importance of Aquash,Part of why she was so important is because she was very symbolic, she was a hard working woman, she dedicated her life to the movement, to righting all the injustices that she could, and to pick somebody out and launch their little cointelpro program on her to bad jacket her to the point where she ends up dead, whoever did it, lets look at what the reasons are, you know, she was killed and lets look at the real reasons why it could have been any of us, it could have been me, it could have been, ya gotta look at the basically thousands of women, you gotta remember that it was mostly women in AIM, it could have been any one of us and I think thats why its been so important and she was just such a good person.(Native American Calling,  3 November 1999, Native American Public Telecommunications, accessed 16 July 2011) McKosato said, ...her Aquashs death has divided the American Indian Movement...(  On 4 November 1999, in a followup show on Native American Calling the next day, Vernon Bellecourt denied any involvement by him and his brother in the death of Aquash. (Native American Calling, Native American Public Telecommunications, 4 November 1999, at News From Indian Country, accessed 17 July 2011)At Federal grand jury hearings in 2003, the Indian men Arlo Looking Cloud and John Graham were indicted for the murder of Aquash. In 2004 Arlo Looking Cloud was convicted in federal court of the murder of Aquash, and named John Graham as the gunman; he was in Canada.  After extradition, in 2010 John Graham was convicted in South Dakota court of the murder of Aquash. In both trials, witness testimony included statements that Aquash had heard the AIM activist Peltier saying he killed two FBI agents at Pine Ridge Reservation in June 1975. (He was convicted of the murders in 1976 but was long considered a political prisoner.) Witnesses testified that they believed Aquash had been murdered because of fear that she might have been an FBI informant (which her family, supporters, and the FBI have denied.)Notes, referencesExternal links* AIM Grand Governing Council homepage* American Indian Movement of Colorado* Cleveland American Indian Movement Cleveland AIM is the oldest urban AIM organization and a member of the International Confederation of Autonomous Chapters of AIM.*International Confederation of Autonomous chapters of AIM* AIMs Background on US Government War Against AIM*Articles about A.I.M. by Churchill and others.*http://globalvoicesonline.org/2008/07/25/longest-walk-2-for-native-americans-rights-and-environmental-sustainability/*http://longestwalk.org/index.php?optioncom_content&taskblogcategory&id33&Itemid108*Jason Heppler, Framing Red Power: The American Indian Movement, the Trail of Broken Treaties, and the Politics of Media, history project.*List of incidents attributed to the American Indian Movement on the START database* The Owen Luck Photographs Collection, 1973-2001 is open for research at Princeton University. Luck was present at the incident at Wounded Knee in 1973 and the Menominee Warrior Society occupation of the Alexian Brothers Novitiate in Gresham, Wisconsin in 1975 and took a total of 66 photographs. Images include Dennis Banks, Clyde Bellecourt, and Russell Means.Indian MovementIndian MovementIndian MovementIndian MovementIndian MovementIndian Movementhr:AIMIndian Movementja:Indian MovementIndian AmerykaskichIndian Movementzh:
410813
Perranporth
Perranporth () is a small resort on the north coast of Cornwall, England, United Kingdom. It is  southwest of Newquay(Ordnance Survey: Landranger map sheet 200 Newquay & Bodmin ISBN 9780319229385) and seven miles (11.3 km) northwest of Truro. Perranporth and its  long beach face the Ocean.(Ordnance Survey: Landranger map sheet 204 Truro & Falmouth ISBN 9780319231494)Perranporth has a population of 3,066,(Cornwall County Council Statistics) and is the largest settlement in the civil parish of Perranzabuloe. The parish church is in Perranzabuloe village but there is an Anglican chapel-of-ease in Perranporth dedicated to St Michael which opened in 1872.(http://www.genuki.org.uk/big/eng/Cornwall/Perranzabuloe/ GENUKI website; Perranzabuloe; retrieved May 2010)The villages name is Cornish for Saint Pirans cove (Piran is one of the patron saints of Cornwall). It is believed that Saint Piran founded a church at Perranzabuloe near Perranporth in the seventh century. Buried under sand for many centuries, it was unearthed early in the twentieth century, but again left to the mercy of the sands in the 1970s. Plans are now afoot to make it accessible once more.GeographyPerranporth is centred on a main street, St Pirans Road, which carries the B3285 Newquay to St Agnes road. The village centre has a various shops and cafs including a co-operative store, premier convenience store, the Camelot restaurant and a Wetherspoons bar, as well as six pubs. The long-distance West Coast Path runs past the village.Until the 1960s, Perranporth was served by a railway line. Built as the and Newquay Railway, the line ran from Chacewater to Newquay and the principal intermediate stop was Perranporth station.(Reade, Lewis (1983) Branch Line Memories; Vol. 1. Redruth: Atlantic Publishers ISBN 0906899060) There is a long-distance coach service provided by Express (service 316) which runs between London and Perranporth.Perranporth is a popular family holiday destination. A wide sandy beach, Perran Beach, extends northwest from the town for nearly  to Point. The beach faces west onto Perran Bay and the Ocean and is a popular surfing location.( There are lifeguard beach patrols from May to September and the beach is generally safe for bathing although there are dangerous currents around Chapel Rock at tides.Perran Beach is backed by extensive dunes which extend nearly a mile inland. Known as Sands, the dunes are used for orienteering competitions and there is an army training camp and a golf course on the dunes. They are also a valuable resource for wildlife with many rare plants and insects including Cornwalls largest colony of the Blue a Red Data Book species.() At the south end of the beach are cliffs with arches, natural stacks and tin-mining adits. There is a youth hostel above the cliffs at Point.  Nearby is the 19th century Droskyn Castle, formerly a hotel and now divided into apartments.Southwest of Perranporth, the coast becomes more rocky with cliffs rising to approximately 232 feet (90 metres) at Head. Airfield, originally built during World War II as an RAF fighter station, is now a civil airfield located on the plateau above the cliffs.(Annual eventsPerranporth hosts an inter-Celtic festival each October, Lowender Peran, drawing people in from Cornwall and the other five nations.SportsPerranporth has an active surf life saving club and hosts a triathlon event every autumn.Surfing is very popular in Perranporth with its long sands and beach break.  The beach is also a popular destination for Surfing enthusiasts.Notable peopleThese include motor engineer and designer Healey (who opened the first garage/petrol station in the village in 1919); a nearby cider farm run by a grandson of his has a detailed graphic display about his life) and the author Graham (who lived in Perranporth for many years and whose Poldark novels are based on the area).ReferencesExternal links* * Perranporth Tourist Information Centre* Cornwall Record Office Online Catalogue for Perranporthit:Perranporthkw:Porthpyranpl:Perranporthsimple:Perranporth
412152
History_of_Colorado
File:Roxborough.jpg|thumb|300px|State ParkFile:Spanish Peaks.JPG|thumb|300px|Spanish Peak, de Cristo Mountains:This article covers Colorados historic period, when events were recorded.  For Colorados prehistoric history, go to of Colorado.This History of Colorado article begins at the point at which Colorados history is recorded. When Spanish explorers, early trappers and hunters and gold minors visited and settled in Colorado, there were a number of Native American nations that inhabited the land.  expansion was an early American dream for freedom, opportunity and, with the gold rush, perhaps riches.  Colorados history began with treaties and wars with Mexico and Native American nations to gain territorial lands to support the transcontinental migration.  In the early days of the Colorado gold rush, Colorado was a of Kansas, of Jefferson and of Kansas.  On August 1, 1876, Colorado was admitted as a state, maintaining its  territorial borders.Much of Colorados history and prosperity is based upon the mining of natural resources, including gold, silver and coal.  Colorados mountain air, abundance of sunny days and mineral springs drew people who wished to improve their health.Historic Native American peoplesFile:Chief Ouray - Brady-Handy.jpg|thumb|250px|Ouray and Chipeta*Pueblo Peoples &mdash; A diverse group of tribes that lived in the valleys and mesas of the Plateau*Nation &mdash; An Athabaskan-speaking tribe that inhabited the Plains in the 18th century, then migrated southward to Texas, Mexico, and Arizona, leaving a void on the plains that was filled by the Arapaho and Cheyenne from the east.*Nation &mdash; An Algonquian-speaking tribe that migrated westward to the base of the Mountains in the late 19th century and settled on the piedmont and the eastern plains. They were relocated entirely out of Colorado in 1865 following the War.*Nation &mdash; An Algonquian-speaking tribe very closely related to the Arapaho. Like the Arapaho, they migrated westward in the 18th century to the base of the Rockies. They often lived in bands interspersed among the Arapaho, and were also relocated out of Colorado in the 1860s.*Nation &mdash; A Numic-speaking tribe that lived on the High Plains of southeastern Colorado. Closely related to the Shoshone, they acquired the horse from the Spaniards and roamed the southern Plains. The Comanche were removed to territory.*Nation &mdash; A Numic-speaking tribe that inhabited intermountain valleys along the north edge of the state, especially in the River valley, up through the late 19th century. Areas included North Park and Park.*Nation &mdash; A Numic-speaking tribe that has lived in the Southern and the Western Mountains for many centuries.Their leaders were Chief Ouray and his wife Chipeta. They often clashed with the Arapaho and Cheyenne, and resisted the encroachment of these tribes into the mountains. Until the 1880s, the Ute controlled nearly all of Colorado west of the divide, a situation that eroded after the silver boom of 1879. After clashing with white settlers in the 1880s in the Meeker Massacre, they were nearly entirely relocated out of the state into Utah, except for two small reservations in southwestern Colorado.European settlementThe first Europeans to visit the region were Spanish conquistadors. de Oate founded what would become the Spanish province of F de Nuevo Mjico among the pueblos of the Grande on July 11, 1598. In 1706 Juan de Ulibarri claimed the territory of Colorado. In 1787 Juan Bautista de Anza established the settlement of San Carlos near present-day Pueblo, Colorado, but it quickly failed.(Carl Ubbelohde, Duane A. Smith, Maxine Benson: A Colorado History, Pruett Publishing, 2006, p. 17) This was the only Spanish attempt to create a settlement north of the Arkansas River. Although the Spaniards did not establish permanent settlements in Colorado, they traded with Native Americans who lived there.In 1803 the United States acquired a territorial claim to the eastern flank of the Mountains by the Purchase from France. However, the claim conflicted with Spains claim to sovereign. Pike led a Army reconnaissance expedition into the disputed region in 1806. Pike and his men were arrested by Spanish cavalry in the Luis Valley, taken to Chihuahua, and then expelled from Mxico.Hidalgo y Costilla declared Mexicos independence from Spain on September 16, 1810. In 1819, the United States ceded its claim to the land south and west of the River to Spain with the Treaty, at the same time purchasing Florida. Mexico finally won its independence with the of Crdoba signed on August 24, 1821, and assumed the territorial claims of Spain. Although Mexican traders ventured north, settlers stayed south of the parallel north until the United States signed a peace treaty with the Nation in 1850.File:BentsFort.jpg|thumb|right|Trading posts such as Old Fort served fur traders in the early 19th century.During the period 1832 to 1856, traders, trappers, and settlers established trading posts and small settlements along the River, and on the South Platte near the Range. Prominent among these were Fort and Fort Pueblo on the Arkansas and Saint Vrain on the South Platte. The main item of trade offered by the Indians was buffalo robes,(Janet Lecompte, Pueblo, Hardscrabble, Greenhorn: The Upper Arkansas, 1832-1856, University of Oklahoma Press, 1977, hardcover, 354 pages, ISBN 0-8061-1462-2) see history of the Arkansas Valley in Colorado.In 1846 the United States went to war with Mexico, and the defeated nation was forced to relinquish its northern territories by the of Guadalupe Hidalgo in 1848. This opened the Rocky Mountains to American settlement, including what is now the lower portion of Colorado.  The newly gained land was divided into the of New Mexico and the of Utah, both organized in 1850, and the of Kansas and the of Nebraska, organized in 1854. Most settlers avoided the rugged Mountains and those headed for the Oregon, the Deseret, or California, usually following the Platte River and the Sweetwater River to Pass in what is now Wyoming.On April 9, 1851, Hispanic settlers from New Mexico, settled the village of San Luis, then in the Mexico Territory, but now Colorados first permanent European settlement.Pikes Peak Gold RushFile:Bierstadt Albert Pikes Peak.jpg|thumb|250px|left|Pikes Peak, Bierstadt In 1849 and 1850, several parties of gold seekers bound for the Gold Rush panned small amounts of gold from various streams in the South Platte River Valley at the foot of the Mountains in then western Territory, now northeast Colorado. The gold nuggets initially failed to impress the gold seekers, but rumors of gold in the Rocky Mountains persisted, and several small parties explored the region. In the summer of 1857, a party of Spanish-speaking gold seekers from the Mexico Territory worked a placer deposit along the Platte River about  above Cherry Creek (in what is today the Overland Park neighborhood of Denver.)()The following year, William Greeneberry Green Russell led a party of Cherokee gold seekers from the State of Georgia to search for gold along the South Platte River. In the first week of July 1858, Green Russell and Sam Bates found a small placer deposit near the mouth of Little Dry Creek (in present day Englewood) that yielded about 20 troy ounces (622 grams) of gold, the first significant gold discovery in the Rocky Mountain region.News of this discovery soon spread and precipitated the Peak Gold Rush.()  An estimated 100,000 gold seekers flocked to the region over the next three years. The placer gold deposits along the rivers and streams of the region rapidly played out, but miners soon discovered far more valuable seams of hard rock gold, silver, and other minerals in the nearby mountains.Territory of JeffersonThe Provisional Government of the Territory of Jefferson was organized on October 24, 1859, but the new territory failed to secure federal sanction. The Provisional Government freely administered the region despite its lack of official status until the U.S. of Colorado was organized in 1861.Territory of Coloradogilpin.jpg|thumb|upright|William Gilpin, first Governor of Colorado TerritoryThe of Colorado was a historic, territory of the United States that existed between 1861 and 1876. Its boundaries were identical to the current State of Colorado. The territory ceased to exist when Colorado was admitted to the Union as a state on August 1, 1876. The territory was organized in the wake of the 1859 Peak Gold Rush, which had brought the first large concentration of white settlement to the region. The organic act() creating the territory was passed by Congress and signed by President Buchanan on February 28, 1861, during the secessions by Southern states that precipitated the Civil War. The organization of the territory helped solidify Union control over a mineral rich area of the Mountains. Statehood was regarded as fairly imminent, but territorial ambitions for statehood were thwarted at the end of 1865 by a veto by President Johnson. Statehood for the territory was a recurring issue during the Grant administration, with Grant advocating statehood against a less willing Congress during Reconstruction.Colorado WarThe War (1863&ndash;1865) was an armed conflict between the United States and a loose alliance among the Kiowa, Comanche, Arapaho, and Cheyenne tribes of Native Americans (the last two were particularly closely allied). The war was centered on the Eastern Plains of the Territory and resulted in the removal of these four Native American peoples from present-day Colorado to present-day Oklahoma. The war included a particularly notorious episode in November 1864 known as the Creek Massacre. The battle, initially hailed by the U.S. press as a great victory, was later learned to be one of genocidal brutality. The resulting hearings in the States Congress regarding the malfeasance of the U.S. Army commander, Chivington, were a watershed in the white views of the Wars at the close of the Civil War. In 1868 the U.S. Army, led by Armstrong Custer, renewed the conflict against the Arapaho and Cheyenne at the of Washita River.Colorado becomes a stateThe States Congress passed an enabling act on March 3, 1875, specifying the requirements for the of Colorado to become a state.()  On August 1, 1876 (28 days after the of the United States), President S. Grant signed a proclamation admitting the state of Colorado to the Union as the 38th state and earning it the moniker State.()  The borders of the new state coincided with the borders established for the Colorado Territory. Women won the right to vote in Colorado in 1893. Colorado was the first state in the union to grant this right to women through a popular election. (Wyoming approved the right of women to vote in 1869 through a vote of the territorial legislature.) Governor Davis H. Waite campaigned for the Constitutional amendment granting women the right to vote in Colorado. Governor Waite is also noted as one of the few elected officials ever to call out the state militia to protect miners from a force raised by mine owners. Governor Waite belonged to the Populist Party!Mining in Colorado Participants in the Peak Gold Rush from 1858 to 1861 were called Fifty-Niners, and many of the new arrivals settled in the Denver area. Gold in paying quantities was also discovered in the Central City area. In 1879, silver was discovered in Leadville, resulting in the Silver Boom.Many early mining efforts were cooperative ventures. However, as easy-to-reach surface deposits played out, miners increasingly turned to hard rock mining. Such industrial operations required greater capital, and the economic concept of rights resulted in periodic conflicts between the mine owners, and the miners who increasingly sold their labor to work in the mines.As the mines were dug deeper, they became more dangerous, and the work more arduous, creating the conditions for conflict. In 1880, Colorado Governor Pitkin, a Republican, declared law to suppress a violent mining strike at Leadville. In the 1890s many Colorado miners began to form unions in order to protect themselves. The mine operators often formed mine owners associations in response, setting up the conditions for a conflict. Notable labor disputes between hard rock miners and the mine operators included the Cripple Creek strike of 1894 and the Labor Wars of 1903-04.mining in Colorado began soon after the first settlers arrived. Although the discovery of coal did not cause boom cycles as did the precious metals, the early coal mining industry also established the conditions for violent confrontations between miners and mine owners. The usual issues were wages, hours, and working conditions, but miners were also concerned about issues of fairness, and company control over their personal lives. Early coal mining in Colorado was extremely dangerous, and the state had one of the highest death rates in the nation. During the three decades from 1884 to 1914, more than 1700 men died in Colorados coal mines.(James Whiteside, Regulating danger: the struggle for mine safety in the Rocky Mountain coal industry, U of Nebraska Press, 1990, page xii (preface)) Coal miners also resented having to pay for safety work such as timbering the mines, and they were sometimes paid in scrip that had value only in the company store, with the cost of goods set by the company.A strike in 1913 resulted in the 1914 massacre. Another coal strike in 1927 is best known for Colorados first Columbine massacre. In 1933, federal legislation for the first time allowed all Colorado coal miners to join unions without fear of retaliation.Like all resource extraction, mining is a boom or bust industry, and over the years many small towns were established, then abandoned when the ore ran out, the market collapsed, or another resource became available. There were once more than a hundred coal mines in the area north of Denver and east of Boulder. The mines began to close when natural gas lines arrived. Coal and precious metals are still mined in Colorado, but the mining industries have changed dramatically in recent decades.Reports of the revival of molybdenum mining in 2007 resulted in ambivalent responses(Colorado mining divided over molybdenum article by Jason Blevins in Denver Post Last Updated: 12/09/2007 08:06:50 AM MST) with Leadville welcoming the opening of the mine at Climax,(Freeport-McMoRan Copper & Gold Inc. Announces Plans to Restart Climax Molybdenum Mine release by Copper & Gold Inc. December 4, 2007)(Many ready to again embrace old path to prosperity article by Jason Blevins in Denver Post Last Updated: 12/09/2007 02:07:37 AM MST) but strong opposition in Crested Butte over proposed operations at Mount Emmons.(Coalitions build to again keep mining off beloved peak article by Jason Blevins in Denver Post Last Updated: 12/09/2007 02:09:08 AM MST) Opinion in Rico, site of the Creek stockwork Molybdenum deposit(Hydrothermal alteration and mass exchange in the hornblende latite porphyry, Rico, Colorado Contributions to Mineralogy and Petrology, Springer Berlin/Heidelberg, ISSN: 0010-7999 (Print) 1432-0967 (Online), Volume 116, Numbers 1-2 / March, 1994, DOI 10.1007/BF00310700, Pages 199-215, Wednesday, December 1, 2004) is more divided. There, land slated for development is being bought up by a mining company.(Divided town weighs promise of jobs vs. peace and quiet article by Nancy Lofholm in Denver Post Last Updated: 12/09/2007 02:07:13 AM MST)The Worlds SanitariumStarting in the 1860s, when tuberculosis (TB) was a world-wide problem, physicians in the eastern United States recommended that their patients travel to sunny Colorado for their health.   As a result, the number of people with tuberculosis, called lungers, in the state grew alarmingly and without the services or facilities to support their needs.  Not knowing how to manage a population of homeless, ill people, many were taken to jail. Because of the number of people with TB flocking to Denver, by the 1880s it was nicknamed the Worlds Sanitarium.  Cynthia Stout, a history scholar, asserted that by 1900 one-third of Colorados population were residents of the state because of tuberculosis. (http://www.denverpost.com/news/ci_6024584#ixzz1PW2pv3En Tuberculosis in Colorado history, The Denver Post, 05/31/2007. Retrieved 2011-06-16 )(Varnell, pp. 39-40.)(Davis, p. 23.)(A Legacy of Caring: Jewish Women in Early Colorado. Center for Judaic Studies, University of Denver, 2007, Retrieved 6/16/2011.)  Twentieth century- Branding Calves c. 1900.jpg|thumb|Branding cattle on a Colorado ranch, c. 1900|300pxThe 19th century ended with a difficult law-and-order situation in Colorado, most notably, Colorado, where gunmen like Robert Ford (the assassin of James) and con men like Smith reigned. In the 1920s, the Klux Klan was an important political force in Colorado. In the 1940s, the Republican governor of Colorado, Carr, spoke out against racial discrimination and against the federal internment of Japanese-Americans during War II. In 1964, the Colorado legislature passed the nations first liberalized abortion law, written by Lamm, then a state legislator, later governor. The late 1960s saw violence in Denver, in the form of race riots, and college buildings being burned by radicals.In 1972, Colorado became the only state to reject the award of hosting the Games after they had been granted. When Representative Lamm led a successful movement to reject a bond issue for expenses related to hosting the event, the Olympic Committee relocated the Winter Olympics to Innsbruck, Austria. No venue had rejected the award before nor has any venue since.In 1999, the High School massacre became the most devastating high school massacre in United States history, when Klebold and Eric Harris killed 12 students and 1 teacher before taking their own lives as well.See also*counties*municipalities*Silver Boom*of the State of Colorado*Colorado (aka the Historical Society)*of Denver, Colorado*of Colorado-related articles*of counties in Colorado*of ghost towns in Colorado*of Governors of Colorado*of Lieutenant Governors of Colorado*of Colorado*Peak Gold Rush*of Colorado**Santa Fe de Nuevo Mjico**Louisiane**Luisiana**of Louisiana**of Missouri**of Deseret**of New Mexico**of Utah**of Kansas**of Nebraska**of Jefferson**of Colorado*evolution of Colorado*evolution of the United States*congressional delegations from Colorado*History of Colorado**of ColoradoReferencesFurther reading*Abbott, Carl, et al., Colorado: A History of the Centennial State, 2005, softcover, 553 pages, ISBN 0-87081-800-7* Athearn, Robert G. The Coloradans.  1976. popular history* Athearn, Robert G. Rebel of the Rockies: A History of the Denver and Rio Grande Western Railroad. 1962.* Baker, James H., and Leroy R. Hafen, eds. History of Colorado. 5 vol State Historical Society of Colorado, 1927, with many short biographical sketches* Bancroft, Hubert Howe, History of Nevada, Colorado, and Wyoming, 1540-1888 (1890) 828 pages; famous classic; online edition* Eugene H. Berwanger. The Rise of the Centennial State: Colorado Territory, 186176, (2007) 208 pages* Cassels, E. Steve. The Archeology of Colorado. Boulder: Johnson Books, 1983* Cronin, Thomas E. and Robert D. Loevy. Colorado Politics & Government: Governing the Centennial State, (1993) online edition* Davis, Richard. The Intangibles of Leadership, John Wiley & Sons, Mississauga, Ontario. (2010) ISBN 978-0-470-67915-9* Ellis, Elmer. Henry Moore Teller: Defender of the West. 1941.* Ellis, Richard N., and Duane A. Smith. Colorado: A History in Photographs. 1991.* Gulliford, Andrew. Boomtown Blues: Colorado Oil Shale, 1885-1985. 1989.* Hafen, Le Roy R. Colorado: The Story of a Western Commonwealth.  1933.* Hogan, Richard. Class and Community in Frontier Colorado. 1990.* Lamm, Richard D., and Duane A. Smith. Pioneers and Politicians: 10 Colorado Governors in Profile. 1981. popular* Lecompte, Janet. Pueblo, Hardscrabble, Greenhorn: The Upper Arkansas, 1832-1856, University of Oklahoma Press, 1977, hardcover, 354 pages, ISBN 0-8061-1462-2* Lorch, Robert S. Colorados Government. 5th ed. 1991. textbook* Ormes, Robert M. Guide to the Colorado Mountains. 7th ed. 1979.* Parsons, Eugene. The Making of Colorado: A Historical Sketch (1908) 324 pages online edition* Rohrbough, Malcolm J. Aspen: The History of a Silver Mining Town, 1879-1893. 1986. scholarly study* Scamehorn, Lee. High Altitude Energy: A History of Fossil Fuels in Colorado (2002) online edition* Scamehorn, Lee. Mill & Mine: The Cf&I in the Twentieth Century (1992)  online edition* Schulte, Steven C.  Wayne Aspinall and the Shaping of the American West (2002) online edition* Smith, Duane A. The Trail of Gold and Silver: Mining in Colorado, 18592009 (Boulder: University Press of Colorado, 2009. xiv, 282 pp.) isbn 978-0-87081-957-5* Smith, Duane A.  Henry M. Teller: Colorados Grand Old Man, 2002 online edition* Sprague, Marshall. Money Mountain: The Story of Cripple Creek Gold (1979) online edition* Ubbelohde, Carl, Maxine Benson, and Duane Smith. A Colorado History. 6th ed. 1988. textbook* Wiatrowski, Claude. Railroads of Colorado: Your Guide to Colorados Historic Trains and Railway Sites, Voyageur Press, 2002, hardcover, 160 pages, ISBN 0-89658-591-3* Varnell, Jeanne. Women of Consequence: The Colorado Womens Hall of Fame, Johnson Press, Boulder, 1999, ISBN 1-55566-214-5.* Wright, James Edward. The Politics of Populism: Dissent in Colorado. 1974. on 1890sPrimary sources* Ubbelohde, Carl, ed. A Colorado Reader (2nd ed 1964)* Fossett, Frank.  Colorado: A Historical, Descriptive and Statistical Work on the Rocky Mountain Gold and Silver Mining Region (1878) 470 pages online edition* Fossett, Frank.  Colorado, Its Gold and Silver Mines: Farms and Stock Ranges, and Health and Pleasure Resorts (1880), 1184 pages online edition* Parsons, Eugene. A Guidebook to Colorado (1911) 390 pages online editionExternal links*Colorado Historical Society*Colorado only state ever to turn down Olympics from Denver Rocky Mountain News Capitol Bureauja:
413823
Journey_to_Babel
__NOTOC__Journey to Babel is an episode of Trek: The Original Series. It is episode #39, production #44 and was first broadcast on November 17, 1967 during the second season. It was repeated on July 5, 1968. It was written by C. Fontana and directed by Pevney.It features the first appearance of Sarek and Amanda, the parents of Mr. Spock.Overview: The Enterprise must transport dignitaries to a peace conference, with an assassin on the loose.PlotOn stardate 3842.3, the starship USS Enterprise, under the command of Captain T. Kirk is transporting Federation ambassadors to the Babel Conference to discuss the admission to the Federation of the Coridan system. The system is a prime source of dilithium crystals but is also underpopulated and unprotected. Mining rights are disputed by many warring species who have strong reasons for keeping Coridan out of the Federation.Ambassador Sarek from Vulcan boards with his human wife Amanda who Captain Kirk learns, to his surprise, are Mr. Spocks parents. Kirk is also taken aback by how coldly Sarek views his own son, apparently because Spock chose to devote his life to Starfleet instead of Vulcan science, against Sareks wishes.Formal negotiations are to take place on a neutral planetoid called Babel, but preliminary diplomacy begins aboard the Enterprise. The issue is a controversial one and the Tellarite ambassador, Gav, demands to know Sareks position. Pushed for a response, Sarek transparently implies that the Tellarites want to keep Coridan out of the Federation so they can continue to plunder the dilithium. Gav takes offense at this allegation and the confrontation briefly becomes physical before Kirk breaks it up, warning all parties to keep order on his ship.Meanwhile, Uhura has detected an encoded transmission beamed from the Enterprise to a fast-moving vessel at the extreme edge of sensor range. Shortly after, the Tellarite ambassador Gav is found murdered (presumably by the Vulcan method of Tal-Shaya), making Sarek a suspect.  During questioning, Sarek suffers a cardiovascular malfunction, and is rushed to bay, where McCoy determines that he will require immediate surgery.  Since there is a shortage of his blood type, which is relatively rare among Vulcans, Spock volunteers to donate his own blood for the operation, using an experimental stimulant to increase blood production.Meanwhile, a member of the Andorian delegation, Thelev, attacks and stabs Captain Kirk.  Kirk is seriously wounded and taken to sickbay and Thelev is imprisoned in the brig.  In accordance with regulations, despite the objections of McCoy and Amanda, Spock halts his participation in Sareks procedure and assumes command of the Enterprise, as the situation is too critical to leave in the command of a less experienced officer.Kirk recovers long enough to pretend that he is well, and with the grudging support of McCoy, returns to the bridge to relieve Spock and order him to return to sickbay.  As Uhura picks up another encoded transmission from the Enterprise and traces the source to the brig, Kirk decides to stay in command in his weakened state.  When Thelev is searched, it is discovered that his antennae are fake and conceal a small transceiver: Thelev is not an Andorian at all but had been surgically altered to look like one.The unidentified vessel now closes in to attack the Enterprise, moving at extreme speed; far faster than the Enterprise can lock weapons on it. Kirk orders Thelev to the bridge and questions him about his and the attacking ships motives, though Thelev is evasive. The ongoing attack damages the Enterprise and Kirk decides to try a ruse, shutting down internal power to make the Enterprise appear crippled. This lures the attacker to slowly approach and the Enterprise damages it with a surprise phaser counterattack.  The disabled ship self-destructs, and Thelev reveals that both he and the ship were on suicide missions; he then collapses and dies from a delayed-action poison.Kirk returns to sickbay for further care and finds Spock and Sarek both alert, the surgery having been an apparent success. Spock speculates that Thelev and the attacking ship were of Orion origin and the speed and power of the latter were consistent with a suicide mission, with all energy dedicated to attack and none for defense. Thelevs mission aboard the Enterprise, Kirk and Spock presume, was to sow distrust among the Federation members and weaken the Enterprise (by killing Kirk) prior to the attack. In support of the Orion origin theory (the issue is unproven by the end of the episode, though it is suggested that an autopsy of Thelev will confirm it) is the knowledge that Orion has been raiding Coridan for dilithium and would profit greatly selling the valuable mineral to both sides in a Federation civil war. Amanda asks Sarek to thank Spock for saving his life, but Sarek simply shrugs, saying that it was only logical. Amanda becomes angered at the Vulcan ways, Spock noting her temper and asks Sarek why he married her. When Sarek replies it seemed the logical thing to do, Amanda realizes they were actually joking with her. McCoy loses patience with the discussion and takes advantage of his medical authority over his patients to order everyone to be silent, then beams at finally getting the last word.40th Anniversary RemasteringThis episode was remastered and first aired February 3, 2007 as part of the 40th anniversary remastering of the Original Series. It was preceded a week earlier by the World Is Hollow and I Have Touched the Sky and followed a week later by The Doomsday Machine. Aside from remastered video and audio, and the all-CGI animation of the USS Enterprise that is standard among the revisions, specific changes to this episode also include:*Vulcan has been reworked with more realistic features, and more closely resembles its appearance in Enterprise.*There is a new sequence for the arrival of the shuttlecraft bringing Sarek aboard, particularly of the arrival in the hangar deck. Crew are visible in observation galleries.*The Orion ship is better detailed but retains the spinning effect; upon its destruction, there is a more realistic dispersal pattern for the debris. There is an action shot of the phaser aim changing to try to hit the Orion ship as it moves away.Series continuityIt is revealed that as a child Spock had a pet sehlat, a Vulcan animal described here as a large bear with six-inch fangs. The creature in question (named I-Chaya) is seen in the animated series episode Yesteryear.  A sehlat is also seen in the Enterprise episode The Forge.Amanda discloses that Spock and Sarek have a Vulcan last name. She says that most humans find it unpronouncable. When pressed by Kirk, she admits she can say it only after a fashion, and with much practice.See also*One, an episode of Trek: Enterprise.External links* ***Remastered comparison screenshotsk Babylonua Babel (Star Trek: La serie original)to Babel
415162
National_Union_of_Mineworkers_(Great_Britain)
The National Union of Mineworkers is a union for miners in the Kingdom. It was formed in 1945 as a reorganisation of the Miners Federation of Great Britain (MFGB). For much of the 20th century the NUM was a powerful force not only in the British union movement, but also in British politics. The NUM took part in three national miners strikes in 1972, 1974 and 1984-85.  Its influence was destroyed by the failure of the 1984-85 strike and by the closing of most of Britains coal mines, and it is now a small union with little political power. Origins The Miners Federation of Great Britain was established in Newport, Monmouthshire in 1888 but did not function as a unified, centralised trade union. Instead the federation represented and co-ordinated the affairs of the existing local and regional miners unions whose associations remained largely autonomous. The Wales Miners Federation was founded in 1898, joining the MFGB in 1899, while the Miners Federation joined in 1907, followed by the Miners Federation in 1908. Th federations total membership in 1908 was 600,000.The MFGB was involved in many trade disputes, including the National Miners Strike of 1912 and the General Strike in 1926. Post 1945 In January 1945 the MFGB was superseded by the National Union of Mineworkers. Within that organisation, each coalfield continued to exercise a degree of autonomy, having its own District Association, President, General Secretary, and headquarters. Originally, a national strike required a two-thirds majority in a ballot of members. This proved near impossible to achieve and the majority was reduced to 55% in 1970 and then to 50% in 1984. Additionally, regions of the union could call their own strikes. Different areas varied greatly as to how militant they were and it was not uncommon for animosity to exist between areas.The miners unions were the largest and most powerful industrial combinations in Britain for decades, and exercised a great influence on the rest of the British labour movement. The first working class Members of Parliament, Burt and Alexander Macdonald, elected in 1874, represented mining constituencies and were funded by miners associations. Miners unions continued to enlarge labour representation in the House of Commons in the years which followed, although they took little part in the founding of the Labour Party. Many miners MPs sat with the Liberals and the MFGB did not affiliate to the Labour Party until 1909. Landmark events *National Miners Strike, 1912*Formation of the Triple Alliance, 1914*Strikes in South Wales, 1915*Black Friday, 1921*The General Strike, 1926*Depression in the United Kingdom 1930s*World War*Coal miners strike, 197273*The Miners strike, 198485 The Miners Strike, 1984-85 In 1984, under the leadership of Scargill the NUM went on strike in response to the decision by the Coal Board to close twenty uneconomic pits. The strike lasted a full year, and was marked by violent clashes between police and miners.  The strike was unsuccessful and its failure was an era-defining moment in politics. After the strike large numbers of mines were closed.The effectiveness of the strike was reduced because the miners leaders refused to ballot members on strike action. This was illegal under a new law, designed to outlaw decisions based on a show of hands, and replace them by secret ballot. The leadership presented this as an attack on its right to conduct its own internal affairs. This reduced public support for the strike and made it possible for the government to use legal and police powers against the union without political consequences.Officers Presidents *1889: Pickard*1904: Edwards*1912: Smillie*1922: Herbert Smith*1929: Thomas Richards*1931: Edwards*1932: Peter Lee*1934: Joseph Jones*1939: Lawther*1954: Ernest Jones*1960: Machen*1960: Ford*1971: Gormley*1982: Scargill (Honorary President from 2002)*2002: Lavery Vice Presidents *1889: Woods*1909: Smillie*1912: W. E. Harvey*1914: William House*1917: Herbert Smith*1922: Walsh*1924: Thomas Richards*1929: Edwards*1931: Peter Lee*1932: Joseph Jones*1933: O. Davies*1934: Lawther*1939: Bowman*1950: Ernest Jones*1950: Edward Jones*1960: Collindridge*1962: Schofield*1972: McGahey*1987: Thompson*1989: Vacant*1992: Cave*2002: Stanley*2010: Wilson General Secretaries *1889: Thomas Ashton*1919: Frank Hodges*1924: A. J. Cook*1932: Edwards*1946: Arthur Horner*1959: Paynter*1968: Daly*1984: Heathfield*1992: Scargill*1992:*2002: Steve Kemp*2007: Kitchen Treasurers *1889: Edwards*1904: William Abraham*1918: James Robson*1924: Pallister Richardson*1930:References Further reading *Page Arnot The Miners: a History of the Miners Federation of Great Britain, 1889-1910. London: Allen and Unwin, 1949.*Robert Page Arnot South Wales Miners, Glowyr de Cymru: a History of the South Wales Miners Federation (19141926). Cardiff : Cymric Federation Press, 1975.*Robert Page Arnot The Miners; One Union, One Industry: a History of the National Union of Mineworkers, 1939-46. London: Allen and Unwin, 1979.*BBC: Miners strike 1984*Spartacus.Schoolnet.co.ukExternal links* NUM official site.Cenedlaethol y GlowyrUnion of MineworkersNazionale dei Minatori (Gran Bretagna)Union of MineworkersUnion of Mineworkers
416486
Business_magnate
A business magnate, sometimes referred to as a capitalist, czar, mogul, tycoon, baron, oligarch, or industrialist, is an informal term used to refer to a businessman, investor, or entrepreneur who has reached a prominent place in a particular industry (or set of industries) and whose wealth has been derived primarily therefrom.DescriptionSuch people are savvy businessman and entrepreneurs that usually amass substantial fortunes in the process of running their business. Some are widely known in connection with their business(es) or through other pursuits such as philanthropy. The terms mogul, tycoon and baron were often attributed to late 19th and early 20th century American business magnates in extractive industries such as mining, logging and petroleum, transportation fields such as shipping and railroads, manufacturing, including steelmaking, banking, and newspaper publishing. This era was known as the Industrial Revolution or the Age.File:Bill Gates in WEF ,2007.jpg|thumb|left|150px|Microsoft co-founder & software magnate Gates is consistently ranked in the top five of the most wealthy people in the world.Examples of well-known business magnates include Sir Branson of Group, utility and transportation magnate Insull, newspaper magnate Randolph Hearst of the Corporation, oil magnate D. Rockefeller of Oil, steel magnate Carnegie, Mittal of Mittal, sustainable/renewable energy magnate Barrett, poultry magnate Perdue of Farms, automobile magnate Piech of Group, and telecommunications magnate Slim.In Russia and some other countries, the term oligarch has become popular.Etymologyship TycoonThe word magnate itself derives from the Latin word magnates (plural of magnas), meaning great person or great nobleman.The word tycoon is derived from the Japanese word , which means great lord, and it was used as a title for the shogun.()(Merriam-Webster) The word entered the English language in 1857( with the return of Commodore Perry to the United States.  U.S. President Lincoln was humorously referred to as the Tycoon by his aides Nicolay and Hay.()  The term spread to the business community, where it has been used ever since.The word mogul refers to the Empire (mughal being Persian or Arabic for Mongol) of Subcontinent that existed between 1526 and 1857: the early Mughal emperors claimed a heritage dating back to Mongol ruler Khan. The modern meaning of the word is supposedly derived from the storied riches of the Mughal emperors, which for example produced the Mahal.As the term industrialist (from Latin industria, diligence, industriousness) was more widely used in the context of old world physical industries such as steel, oil, newspapers, shipping and rail transport, it has largely been superseded by the other, more modern terms that encompass a wider range of virtual business and commercial activity. See also ;Articles*Entrepreneur*Investor*oligarch*Businessperson*of industry*Financier*proprietor*baron (industrialist);Lists*of billionaires (2010)*Times Rich List;Categories*American railroad executives of the 20th century*Businesspeople in metals*Businesspeople in mining*Businesspeople in shipping*Businesspeople in timberReferencesca:Tycooncs:Prmyslnkde:Tycoones:Magnatehr:Tajkunhe:nl:Magnaatja:no:Forretningsmagnatru:sl:Tajkunsr:sh:Tajkunsv:Industrialistzh:
417699
Annfield_Plain
:Annfield redirects here. for the former Scottish football ground, see Stadium.Annfield Plain is a village in Durham, in England. It is situated on a plateau between the towns of Stanley,  to the north-east, and Consett,  to the west.  According to the 2001 census, Annfield Plain has a population of 3,569http://www.durham.gov.uk/durhamcc/usp.nsf/Lookup/Derwentside%20Settlement%20Summary%20Sheets%20Numbers/$file/Derwentside+Settlement+Summary+Sheets+Numbers.pdf.  Along with much of the surrounding area, Annfield Plains history lies in mining. While the industry collapsed in the 1980s and 90s, its effects are still apparent both in the landscape and in memory.Much of the surrounding landscape is rough moorland, dominated by the nearby Pontop Pike television mast. Not far from semi-rural Derwentside, however, is the Tyneside&ndash;Wearside conurbation, with Newcastle  away, and Sunderland a similar distance. The cathedral city of Durham is  away and offers quite a contrast to the former villages in the area of Annfield Plain.Pike.jpg|thumb|275px|Pontop Pike transmission mastNameAnfield, as the name was originally appears to derive from the fields of An, referring to a man who lived before the Conquest. The Plain part of the name was originally Plane and appears to refer originally not to the plateau on which the village stands but to the plane on the and Tyne Railway of 1834. The engine used by the plane was known as the Anfield Engine because of its proximity to Anfield House, built in the 18th century on nearby Loud Hill. The spelling changed to Annfield Plain around 1856, when houses were built for miners on the nearby plateau.HistoryThe earliest hard evidence of habitation in the area comes from the 16th century, when the main economic activity was sheep farming. The villages association with mining begins in the late 17th century when many shallow mines were dug. The Stanhope and Tyne Railway, laid in 1834, assisted the transportation of coal. Several limekilns were built at this time and were fuelled by local coal, with limestone being brought in by rail. Demand for coal increased with the advent of the Revolution, and a number of deep pits were sunk over the course of the 19th century. The village grew substantially and light industry increased, including the construction of a brewery, mill, and candle factory; as well as various services for the population, including a school, church, at least two nonconformist chapels, and a variety of shops.In the 19th century Annfield Plain was the scene of a murder, when a man named William Thompson killed his wife. He was hanged at prison on 5 January 1874.Present dayWhile there is some light industry, most of Annfield Plain is made up of housing, a few run down shops and several pubs. The local Co-op supermarket was commonly known as the Disco, an allusion to its former name: the Annfield Plain Co-op and Discount Electricals. The supermarket was converted to a Tesco store in October 2007. The original Annfield Plain co-operative store was dismantled and rebuilt at the nearby Beamish Open Air Museum in the late 1980s. The site of the villages main pit, the Busty, is now a privately owned coach garage.Its proximity to the major centres of the North East of England has in recent years attracted residents from Newcastle and Gateshead to move out to escape the city. This has had the consequence of pushing up house prices, long among the cheapest in Britain, which had been both a boon and burden to locals.GeographyAdministrationAnnfield Plain is located in the County Durham unitary authority area. As of 2005 it is represented on the County Council by Michele Hodgson (Labour). The village is part of the North Durham parliamentary constituency, which as of 2005 is represented in parliament by Jones (Labour). It is in the East England region, which serves as a constituency for the Parliament.The local police force is Constabulary. Annfield Plain is in the Derwentside division and its nearest police station is in CatchgateLocation* Elevation: 250 m (850 ft)* Road access: A693 between Stanley and Consett, and numerous minor roads* Rail access: Chester-le-Street,  by roadNearby placesImage:Annfield Plain Intermediate School.jpg|thumb|Annfield Plain Intermediate School in Kyo, 1994Surrounding Annfield Plain and effectively joined to it are several other villages:* Greencroft to the west* Kyo to the east* Kyo and Catchgate to the northNotable people*Alun Armstrong - original cast member of Les Misrables, playing Monsieur Thnardier. Also in New Tricks and The Mummy Returns.*McCrory - former Cruiserweight World Champion boxer.References# Hatcher, Jane. Annfield Plain&mdash;a short history. Durham Miner Project. Retrieved 11 January 2005.# Durham County Council & Northumberland County Council.  Local History: Annfield Plain (County Durham). Keys to the Past. Retrieved 11 January 2005.# Mills, Alistair (2004). Executions at Durham, 1732&ndash;1909. GENUKI. Retrieved 11 January 2005.External linksPlain
419232
RTLinux
RTLinux or RTCore is a realtime RTOS microkernel that runs the entire Linux system as a fully preemptive process.It was developed by Victor Yodaiken (Yodaiken 1999), Michael Barabanov (Barabanov 1996), Cort Dougan and others at the Mexico Institute of Mining and Technology and then as a commercial product at FSMLabs. River Systems acquired FSMLabs embedded technology in February 2007 and now makes a version available as Wind River Real-Time Core for Wind River Linux.RTLinux was based on a lightweight virtual machine where the Linux guest was given a virtualized interruptcontroller and timer - and all other hardware access was direct. From the point of view of the real-time host, the Linux kernel is a thread. Interrupts needed for deterministic processing are processed by the real-time core, while other interrupts are forwarded to Linux, which runs at a lower priority than realtime threads.  Linux drivers handle almost all I/O.  First-In-First-Out pipes (FIFOs) or shared memory can be used to share data between the operating system and RTCore.See also*RTAI - alternative real-time extension for Linux kernel*iRMX for Windows - Real-time extension for Windows, somewhat similar architecturally.*Xenomai - another alternative real-time extension for Linux kernelReferences*Yodaiken, Victor (1999). http://www.yodaiken.com/papers/rtlmanifesto.pdf The RTLinux Manifesto. Published in the 5th Linux Conference Proceedings.* Barabanov, Michael (1996). http://www.yodaiken.com/papers/BarabanovThesis.pdf A Linux Based Real-Time Operating System.*Yodaiken, Victor (1996). http://citeseerx.ist.psu.edu/viewdoc/summary?doi10.1.1.39.9505 Cheap Operating systems Research Published in the Proceedings of the First Conference on Freely Redistributable Systems, Cambridge MA, 1996.*Dougan, Cort (2004) http://www.ddj.com/cpp/184401758 Precision and predictability for Linux and RTLinuxPro, Dr. Dobbs Journal, February 1, 2004.*Yodaiken,Victor (1997),   US Patent 5,995,745External links*FSMLabs, the original supplier of RTLinux*Yodaikens web page*Article about RTLinux synchronization*RTLinux Manifesto*Real-time Linux Wiki*http://www.soe.ucsc.edu/~sbrandt/courses/Winter00/290S/rtlinux.pdf*Article about RT concept*RTLinuxFree, open source (GPL with licensed patent) version offered by Wind River Systems*Wind River Systems, supplier of RTLinuxPro / Wind River Real-Time Core - commercial versions of RTLinuxca:RTLinuxde:RTLinuxes:RTLinuxfr:RTLinuxru:RTLinuxzh:RTLinux
421373
mile_Basly
mile Basly (March 29, 1854 in Valenciennes, France  February 11, 1928 in Lens, France) is one of the great figures of unionism in mining in the mineral field of Nord-Pas-de-Calais, along with Arthur Lamendin. He is primarily known for his participation in the strike of 1884, when he became known as the untameable miner and the tsar of Lens. He was the inspiration for the character Etienne Lantier in Zolas novel Germinal.Basly entered mining as a galibot (minor) at the age of twelve. After the creation of the Union of the minors of Anzin in 1882, Basly became its secretary, and subsequently its president in 1891. He became mayor of Lens in 1900, and devoted the last ten years of his life to rebuilding the city, which had been completely destroyed during First World War. He continued to serve as mayor until his death in 1928.Rue mile Basly is a street, named in his honor, in Avion.Basly
422638
Austhorpe
Austhorpe is a civil parish in east Leeds, Yorkshire, England that is situated between Fields to the north, Whitkirk to the west, Cross Gates to the north-west and Colton to the south-west.(Office for National Statistics : Census 2001 : Parish Headcounts : Leeds Retrieved 2009-09-08)Austhorpe is home to a large business park, Thorpe Park, and this includes a large hotel. The  housing is largely detached or semi-detached. The area is 5 miles to the east of city centre, and is close to the  A463 carriageway and motorway.Officially judging by the old boundaries of the former township of Austhorpe, Austhorpe also includes the areas of Cross Gates, Colton Common and Barrowby. Colton Common became officially part of Colton when the Ingram family who resided in Newsam, bought the whole Austhorpe Lodge estate, selling it off and keeping Colton Common as their own.HistoryAfter the Township dissolved, Austhorpe stopped developing as quickly as it was doing, possibly due to the once abundant coal fields close to the surface which had been a major source of commerce for the area since Roman times becoming empty with deep shaft mining proving to be unsuccessful compared to the close by coal source at Garforth. Whereas Cross Gates and Colton quickly developed and Barrowby, if anything, un-developed.Pioneering Civil Engineer Smeaton, designer of the longest standing Lighthouse, was born in Austhorpe. Leeds band the Chiefs make a positive reference to him in their hit song Predict a Riot.Hall is a grade II* listed building dated from 1694.ComparisonAusthorpe lies in the LS15 postcode area. Here is a population breakdown of the postcode area in comparison with the UK population.Location gridSee also*HallReferencesExternal links* fr:Austhorpenl:Austhorpe
424409
Henry_Huttleston_Rogers
 footnotes  Henry Huttleston Rogers (January 29, 1840 &ndash; May 19, 1909) was a States capitalist, businessman, industrialist, financier, and philanthropist.() He made his fortune in the oil refinery business, becoming a leader at Oil.Youth and educationHenry Huttleston Rogers was born in Mattapoisett, Massachusetts, on January 29, 1840. He was the son of Rowland Rogers, a former ship captain, bookkeeper, and grocer, and Mary Eldredge Huttleston Rogers. Both parents were descended from the Pilgrims who arrived in the 17th century aboard the Mayflower. His mothers family had earlier used the spelling Huddleston rather than Huttleston.  (Consequently, Henry Rogers name is often misspelled.)The family moved to nearby Massachusetts, a fishing village across the River from the great whaling port, New Bedford. Fairhaven is a small seaside town on the south coast of Massachusetts. It borders the Acushnet River to the west and Bay to the south. Fairhaven was incorporated in 1812 and was already steeped in history when Hen Rogers was just a boy. Phoenix is in Fairhaven. There, during the Revolution, British troops once stormed the area. Also within sight of the fort, the first naval battle of the American Revolution took place on May 14, 1775.In the mid 1850s, whaling was already an industry in decline in England. The emergence of petroleum and later gas as a replacement fuel for lighting in the second half of the 19th century caused a much further decline.Henry Rogers father was one of the many men of New England who changed from a life on the sea to other work to provide for their families. As a teenager, Hen Rogers carried newspapers and he worked in his fathers grocery store, making deliveries by wagon. He was only an average student, and was in the first graduating class of the local high school in 1857. Continuing to live with his parents, he hired on with the Branch Railroad, an early precursor of the Colony Railroad, as an expressman and brakeman, working for 34 years while carefully saving his earnings.Seeking his fortuneIn 1861, 21-year-old Henry pooled his savings of approximately US$600 with a friend, P. Ellis. They set out to western Pennsylvania and its newly discovered oil fields. Borrowing another US$600, the young partners began a small refinery at McClintocksville near Oil City. They named their new enterprise Oil Refinery.The old Native American name Wamsutta was apparently selected in honor of their hometown area of New England, where Company in nearby New Bedford had opened in 1846, and was a major employer. The Wamsutta Company was the first of many textile mills that gradually came to supplant whaling as the principal employer in New Bedford.Rogers and Ellis and their refinery made US$30,000 their first year. This amount was more than the earnings of three whaling ship trips during an average voyage of more than a years duration. When Rogers returned home to Fairhaven for a short vacation the next year, he was greeted as a success. Marriage and family While vacationing in Fairhaven in 1862, Rogers married his childhood sweetheart, Abbie Palmer Gifford, who was also of Mayflower lineage. She returned with him to the oil fields where they lived in a one-room shack along Oil Creek where her young husband and Ellis worked the Wamsutta Oil Refinery. While they lived in Pennsylvania, their first daughter, Anne Engle, was born in 1865.  They had five surviving children together, four girls and a boy. Another son died at birth.After the young family moved to New York in 1866, Cara Leland Rogers was born in Fairhaven in 1867, Millicent was born in 1873, followed by Mary (a.k.a. Mai) in 1875. Their son, Henry Huttleston Rogers Jr., was born in 1879, and was known as Harry.Abbie Palmer Gifford Rogers died unexpectedly on May 21, 1894. Her childhood home, a two-story, gable-end frame house built in the Revival style, has been preserved. It is made available for tours of Fairhaven, Massachusetts, where she and her husband grew up.  For more detailed information about Abbie and Henry Rogers children, marriages and their descendants, see article G. RogersIn 1896, the widower Rogers remarried, to Emelie Augusta Randel Hart, a divorce and New York socialite. They had no children.CareerIn Pennsylvania, Rogers was introduced to Pratt (1830&ndash;91). Born in Massachusetts, Pratt had been one of eleven children. His father, Asa Pratt, was a carpenter. Of modest means, he spent three winters as a student at Wesleyan Academy, and is said to have lived on a dollar a week at times. In nearby Massachusetts, Pratt joined a company specializing in paints and whale oil products. In 1850 or 1851, he came to York City, where he worked for a similar company handling paint and oil.Pratt was a pioneer of the natural oil industry, and established his kerosene refinery Oil Works in the Greenpoint section of New York. Pratts product later gave rise to the slogan, The holy lamps of Tibet are primed with Astral Oil. He also later founded the Institute.When Pratt met Rogers at McClintocksville on a business trip, he already knew Charles Ellis, having earlier bought whale oil from him back east in Fairhaven. Although Ellis and Rogers had no wells and were dependent upon purchasing oil to refine and sell to Pratt, the two young men agreed to sell the entire output of their small Wamsutta refinery to Pratts company at a fixed price. This worked well at first. Then, a few months later, crude oil prices suddenly increased due to manipulation by speculators. The young entrepreneurs struggled to try to live up to their contract with Pratt, but soon their surplus was wiped out. Before long, they were heavily in debt to Pratt.Charles Ellis gave up, but in 1866, Henry Rogers went to Pratt in New York and told him he would take personal responsibility for the entire debt. This so impressed Pratt that he immediately hired him for his own organization.New York, oil refining Pratt made Rogers foreman of his Brooklyn refinery, with a promise of a partnership if sales ran over $50,000 a year. The Rogers family moved to Brooklyn. Rogers moved steadily from foreman to manager, and then superintendent of Pratts Astral Oil Refinery. He accomplished and exceeded the substantial sales increase goal which Pratt had set when recruiting him.  As promised, Pratt gave Rogers an interest in the business. In 1867, with Henry Rogers as a partner, he established the firm of Pratt and Company. In the next few years, Rogers became, in the words of Hubbard, Pratts hands and feet and eyes and ears (Little Journeys to the Homes, 1909). As their family grew, Henry and Abbie continued to live in New York City, but vacationed frequently at Fairhaven.While working with Pratt, Rogers invented an improved way of separating naphtha, a light oil similar to kerosene, from crude oil. He was granted U.S. Patent # 120,539 on October 31, 1871.Fighting RockefellerIn the early 1871-72, Pratt and Company and other refiners became involved in a  conflict with D. Rockefeller, Samuel Andrews, and M. Flagler (of Andrews & Flagler, a Cleveland-based refining company) and the Improvement Company. In developing what would become Oil, Rockefeller, a manager of extraordinary abilities, and Flagler, an exceptional marketer, recognized that the costs and control of the shipment of crude oil would be key elements in competition with other refiners. With its combination of clever market manipulation, and hard-nosed dealings with the powerful Railroad (PRR), the South Improvement scheme was an example of the type of business tactics which Rockefeller and his associates used to become successful. Although Rockefeller became the target of many who decried Standard Oils ruthlessness in subsequent years, the South Improvement rebate scheme was Flaglers idea.South Improvement was basically a mechanism to obtain secret favorable net rates from Tom Scott of the Railroad (PRR) and other railroads through secret rebates from the carrier. A common carrier is somewhat like a utility, inasmuch as it often has certain rights, powers and monopolies on its services beyond those normally afforded regular business enterprises. A common carrier was expected to serve the public good and treat its customers uniformly. Rates in that era were promulgated and published in what was called tariffs and were public information. The rebate scheme was done outside of that process.Newspapers were quick to publicize the issue. The injustice of the South Improvement scheme outraged many independent oil producers and owners of refineries. Rogers led the opposition among the New York refiners. The New York interests formed an association, and about the middle of March 1872 sent a committee of three, with Rogers as head, to Oil City to consult with the Oil Producers Union. Working with the Pennsylvania independents, Rogers and the New York delegation managed to forge an agreement with the railroads, whose leaders eventually agreed to open their rates to all and promised to end their shady dealings with South Improvement.Rockefeller and his associates quickly started another approach, which frequently included buying-up opposing interests. Their dominance of the growing industry and the squeezing out of smaller competitors continued and expanded. But, the South Improvement incident prompted growing public sentiment to support governmental oversight and regulation of large businesses, including the railroads. Congress passed new antitrust laws, the administration created the Commerce Commission (ICC), and the courts eventually ordered the breakup of the Standard Oil Trust in the early 20th century.Combining forces: joining Standard OilIn 1874, Rockefeller approached Pratt with a plan to cooperate and consolidate their businesses. Pratt discussed it with Rogers, and they decided that the combination would benefit them. Rogers formulated terms, which guaranteed financial security and jobs for Pratt and himself. Rockefeller had apparently learned a lot about Rogers talents and negotiating skills during the South Improvement conflict. He quietly accepted the offer on the exact terms Rogers had laid out. In this manner, Charles Pratt and Company (including Astral Oil) became one of the important independent refiners to join the Standard Oil Trust.By this date, Charles Pratt was reaching an age to consider retirement, and he subsequently devoted much of his time and interests to activities such as founding the Pratt Institute. However, Pratts son, Millard Pratt (1858 to 1913), became Corporate Secretary of Standard Oil. As a part owner of Pratt and Company, Rogers, who was about 35 years old, now owned a share of Standard Oil himself. In the deal, Rockefeller had also added Henry Rogers to his team. He undoubtedly placed a high value on Rogers potential. History does not tell us if he foresaw that the promising young man was destined to become one of his major partners.Building Standard Oil with John D. RockefellerStandard Oil was an oil refining conglomerate. Its successors continued to be among the worlds biggest corporations over 140 years later. D. Rockefeller, long regarded as the principal founder, was of a modest background and education. Born in New York in 1839, his family moved to Cleveland in 1855. His first job was as an assistant bookkeeper for a produce company. He delighted, as he later recalled, in all the methods and systems of the office.() He became particularly well-skilled at calculating transportation costs, a skill which would later serve him particularly well. He worked in variety of small business enterprises during the next few years, owning interests in several.During this time, Rockefeller became friends with Henry Morrison Flagler. The two men had much in common, as they were each conservative, hard-working and energetic, and driven to make money. Their backgrounds included working separately for a number of years in various retail enterprises, including the grain business. Although teetotalers personally, distilled spirits were a byproduct of the handling of corn, and each embraced the business opportunity that presented; making money was clearly paramount.Of their various separate forays into business, financial results for each had been mixed. Flagler, 9 years senior to Rockefeller, had been completely wiped out financially in a venture into salt. Only a loan from a relative, V. Harkness, allowed him to keep creditors at bay and stay out of total ruin.In the second half of the 19th century, the United States began a transition from use of whale oil to petroleum for heating and lighting. Discovery of oil fields in western Pennsylvania in the late 1850s and the promise of increased industrial activity and economic growth after the end of the Civil War combined to make the refining of crude oil seem an attractive business to Rockefeller. He and Flagler enlisted chemist Samuel Andrews and with his brother, Rockefeller, Jabez Bostwick, and Flaglers relative and partner, V. Harkness, went into the refining business in Cleveland as Andrews & Flagler.By all accounts, Rockefeller was an extraordinarily talented manager and financial planner, Flagler was an exceptional marketer, and Andrews had the know-how to oversee refining aspects. It was to be a very successful combination. As the demand for kerosene and a new byproduct, gasoline, grew in the United States, by 1868, what was to become Standard Oil was the worlds largest oil refinery.In 1870, Rockefeller formed Standard Oil Company of Ohio and started his strategy of buying up the competition and consolidating all oil refining under one company. It was during this period that the Pratt interests and Henry Rogers were brought into the fold. By 1878 Standard Oil held about 90% of the refining capacity in the United States.Flaglers wife was in failing health due to what was later determined to be tuberculosis.  On advice of her physician, he took her to Florida for the winter months beginning in 1877, and she did seem to improve with the gentle winter and cool ocean breezes there. While in Florida, Flagler was struck with the lack of good rail transportation south of Jacksonville, the equally poor availability of good lodging, and the potential the impoverished state held as a vacation destination for northerners. Sensing a major business opportunity, he began to invest and become a major developer of Floridas east coast in what many regard as his second career. However, his ventures in Florida marked the beginning of his gradual reduction in management participation at Standard Oil.In 1881 the company was reorganized as the Standard Oil Trust. In 1885, the headquarters were relocated from Cleveland to York City. By this time, the three main men of Standard Oil Trust had become John D. Rockefeller, his brother William, and Henry Rogers, who had emerged as a key financial strategist. By 1890, Rogers was a vice president of Standard Oil and chairman of the organizations operating committee.Oil and gas pipelinesPetroleum pipelines were first developed in Pennsylvania in the 1860s to replace transport in wooden barrels loaded on wagons drawn by mules and driven by teamsters. This mule-drawn transportation was expensive and fraught with difficulties: leaking barrels, muddy trails, wagon breakdowns and mule/driver problems.The first successful metal pipeline was completed in 1865, when Van Syckel built a four-mile (6 km) pipeline from Pennsylvania, to the nearest railroad. This initial success led to the construction of pipelines to connect crude oil production, increasingly moving west as new fields were discovered and Pennsylvania fields declined, to refineries located near major demand centers in the Northeast. Biographer Z. James Varanini writes, the completion of these pipelines represented a move towards a new type of interconnectivity of previously isolated states.When Rockefeller observed this, he began to acquire many of the new pipelines. Soon, his Standard Oil companies owned a majority of the lines, which provided cheap, efficient transportation for oil. Ohio, became a center of the refining industry principally because of its transportation systems.Rogers conceived the idea of long pipelines for transporting oil and gas. In 1881, the Transit Company was formed by Standard Oil to own and operate Standards pipelines. The National Transit Company remained one of Rogers favorite projects throughout the rest of his life.(HHR- Dictionary of American Biography)Ohio Gas Company (EOG) was incorporated on September 8, 1898, as a marketing company for the National Transit Company, the natural gas arm of Standard Oil Company of New Jersey. The company launched its business by selling to consumers in northeast Ohio gas produced by another National Transit subsidiary, Natural Gas Company.Rubber-manufacturing city Ohio, was the first to take advantage of the lower prices for natural gas. It granted the East Ohio Gas Company a franchise in September 1898, the same month that the company was founded. During the winter of 1898&ndash;99, the National Transit Company built a 10-inch iron pipeline that stretched from the Pipe Creek on the River to Akron, with branches to Canton, Massillon, Dover, New Philadelphia, Uhrichsville, and Dennison. The first gas from the pipeline burned in Akron on May 10, 1899.SteelCarnegie, long the leading steel magnate of Pittsburgh, retired at the turn of the 20th century, and refocused his interests on philanthropy. His steel holdings were consolidated into the new States Steel Corporation. Standard Oils interest in steel properties led to Rogers becoming one of the directors when it was organized in 1901.(Regulating Standard Oil: Ida M. TarbellIn 1890 the U.S. Congress passed Antitrust Act. This act is the source of all American anti-monopoly laws. The law forbids every contract, scheme, deal, conspiracy to restrain trade. It also forbids inspirations to secure monopoly of a given industry. The Standard Oil Trust attracted attention from antitrust authorities. The Ohio General filed and won an antitrust suit in 1892.M. Tarbell, an American author and journalist, who was known as one of the leading muckrakers, criticized Standard Oil practices.Born in County, Pennsylvania, Tarbell saw her own family affected by unorthodox business practices, as her father was forced out of business around 1872 by the Improvement Company scheme. In 1894, she was hired by McClures magazine. She soon turned to journalism, and redefined the in-depth technique of writing.  She used documentation concerning Standard Oil, as well as interviews of employees, competitors, lawyers and experts on the topic. Tarbell and her fellow staff members Stannard Baker and Steffens became a celebrated muckraking trio.Tarbell met Rogers, by then the most senior and powerful director of Standard Oil, through his friend, Twain. They began to meet in January 1902 and continued for the next two years. As Tarbell brought up case histories, Rogers provided an explanation, documents and figures concerning the case. Rogers may have believed Tarbell intended a complimentary work, as he was apparently candid.  Her interviews with him were the basis of her negative expos of Standard Oils questionable business practices. Tarbells investigations of Standard Oil for McClures, ran in 19 parts from November 1902 to October 1904. They were collected and published as History of the Standard Oil Company in 1904. The book placed fifth in a 1999 list of the top 100 works of journalism in the 20th century.Although public opposition to Rockefeller and Standard Oil existed prior to Tarbells investigation, there had been general opposition to Standard Oil and trusts. Her book is widely credited with hastening the 1911 breakup of Standard Oil. They had never played fair, and that ruined their greatness for me, Tarbell wrote about the company.The United States Supreme Court declared the company to be an unreasonable monopoly under the Antitrust Act on May 15, 1911 in  v. . The owners remained in charge of the smaller companies which made up four of the Seven Sisters.Standard Oil developed a reputation for dubious business practices, including subduing competitors and engaging in illegal transportation deals with the railroad companies to undercut competitors prices. With the growing demand for oil other than for heat and light, Standard Oil, formed many years before the discovery of Spindletop in Texas, was well-placed to control the growth of the oil business in the United States. Observers thought it owned and controlled all aspects of the trade.Natural gasRogers joined in the organization of holding companies aimed at controlling natural gas production and distribution. In 1884, with associates, Rogers formed the Gas Company, and thereafter for several years he was instrumental in gaining control of great city plants, fighting terrific battles with rivals for some of them, as in the case of Boston. Almost the whole story of his gas interests was one of business warfare.CopperDuring the 1890s, Rogers became interested in Anaconda and other copper properties in the western United States. In 1899, with William Rockefeller, and Thomas W. Lawson, he formed the first $75,000,000 section of the gigantic trust, Copper Mining Company, which was the subject of much acrid criticism then and for years afterward. In the building of this great trust, some of the most ruthless strokes in modern business history were dealt: the $38,000,000 watering of the stock of the first corporation, its subsequent manipulation, the seizure of the copper property of the & Boston Consolidated Mining Company, the using of the latter as a weapon against the & Montana Consolidated Copper and Silver Mining Company, the warfare against certain private interests, and the wrecking of the Bank of Boston.A holding company aimed at controlling copper production and distribution,  Amalgamated Copper controlled the copper mines of Montana and later became Copper Company.Transit: Staten Island On July 1, 1892, Island, New Yorks first trolley line opened, running between Port Richmond and Meiers Corners. Trolleys, which cost only a nickel a ride through most of their existence, help facilitate mass transit across the Island by reaching communities not serviced by trains. Henry H. Rogers was long-known as the Staten Island transit magnate, and was also involved with the Staten Island-Manhattan Ferry Service and the Richmond Power and Light Company.(RailroadsRogers was also close associate of H. Harriman in the latters extensive railroad operations. He was a director of the Santa Fe, St. Paul, Erie, Lackawanna, Union Pacific, and several other large railroads. However, he also involved himself in at least three West Virginia railroad projects, one of which would grow much larger than he probably anticipated.Ohio River RailroadIn mid-1890s, Rogers became president of the River Railroad, founded by Newlon Camden, a States Senator from Virginia who was also secretly involved with Oil. Charles M. Pratt and Rogers were two of the largest owners and the Ohio River Railroads General Manager was C.M. Burt. Its General Solicitor was former West Virginia governor A. MacCorkle. The owners wished to sell the railroad, which was losing money.Under Rogers leadership, they formed a subsidiary, Virginia Short Line Railroad, to build a new line between New Martinsville and Clarksburg to reach new coal mining areas, into territory already planned for expansion by the and Ohio Railroad (B&O). The expansion plans had the desired effect of essentially forcing B&O to purchase the Ohio River Railroad to block the competition in the new coal areas. The Ohio River Railroad was sold to B&O in 1898.Kanawha and Pocahontas Railroad CompanyThe and Pocahontas Railroad Company was incorporated in Virginia in 1898 by either a son of Charles Pratt or the estate of Charles Pratt. Its line ran  from the River up a tributary called Paint Creek. Once again, new coal mining territory was involved. Rogers, acting on behalf of Pratt and Company negotiated its lease to the and Ohio Railway (C&O) in 1901 and its sale to a newly formed C&O subsidiary, and Paint Creek Railway Company, in 1902.Virginian RailwayHis final achievement, working with partner Nelson Page, was the building of the Railway (VGN), which eventually extended  from the coal fields of southern Virginia to port near Norfolk at Point, Virginia in the harbor of Roads. 125px|left|Initially, Rogers involvement in the project began in 1902 with Pages Railway, planned as an  short line to reach untapped coal reserves in a very rugged portion of southern West Virginia, and interchange its traffic with the C&O and/or the N&W. The Deepwater Railway was probably intended for resale in the manner of the earlier two West Virginia short lines. However, if so, the ploy was foiled by collusion of the bigger railroads, who agreed with each other to neither purchase it or grant favorable interchange rates.Page was the front man for the Deepwater project, and it is likely the leaders of the big railroads were unaware that their foe was backed by the wealthy Rogers, who did not give up a good fight easily. Instead of abandoning the project, Page and Rogers secretly developed a plan to extend their new railroad all the way across West Virginia and Virginia to port at Hampton Roads. They modified the Deepwater Railway charter to reach the Virginia-state line. A Rogers coal property attorney in Virginia formed another intrastate railroad in Virginia, the Railway.The battle for the Tidewater Railways rights-of-way displayed Rogers at his most crafty and ingenious. He was able to persuade the leading citizens of Roanoke and Norfolk, both strongholds of the rival and Western, that his new railroad would be a boon to both communities, secretly securing crucial rights-of-way in the process. In 1907, the name of the Tidewater Railway was changed to The Virginia Railway Company, and it acquired the Deepwater Railway to form the needed West Virginia-Virginia link.Financed almost entirely from Rogers own resources, and completed in 1909, instead of interchanging, the new Virginian Railway competed with the much larger and Ohio Railway and and Western Railway for coal traffic. Built following his policy of investing in the best route and equipment on initial selection and purchase to save operating expenses, the VGN enjoyed a more modern pathway built to the highest standards, and provided major competition to its larger neighboring railroads, each of whom tried several times unsuccessfully to acquire it after they realized it could not be blocked from completion.However, the time and enormous effort Rogers expended on the project continued to undermine his already declining health, not only because of his Herculean work but also because of the uncertain economy of the period, exacerbated by the financial of 1907 which began in March of that year. To obtain the needed financing, he was forced to pour many of his own assets into the railroad. Management of the funding Rogers was providing was handled by Boston financier M. Hyams, with whom he had also worked on the Company, and many other natural resource projects.On July 22, 1907, he suffered a debilitating stroke. Over a period of about five months, he gradually recovered. In 1908, he put the remaining financing in place needed to see his railroad to completion. When completed the following year, the Virginian Railway was called by the newspapers the biggest little railway in the world and proved both viable and profitable.Many historians consider the Virginian Railway to be one of Henry Rogers  greatest legacies. The  Virginian Railway (VGN) followed his philosophy regarding investing in the best equipment and paying its employees and vendors well throughout its profitable history. It operated some of the largest and most powerful steam, electric, and diesel locomotives throughout its 50-year history. Chronicled by rail historian and rail photographer Reid in The Virginian Railway (Kalmbach, 1961), the VGN gained a following of railway enthusiasts which continues to the present day.The VGN was merged into the Norfolk & Western in 1959. However, almost all of the former VGN mainline trackage in Virginia and about 50% of that in Virginia is still in use in 2006 as the preferred route for eastbound coal trains for Southern Corporation due to the more favorable gradients while crossing the Mountains continental divide and the Ridge Mountains east of Roanoke, while most westbound traffic of empty coal cars uses the original Norfolk and Western main line. Business summary: Hell Hound Rogers was an energetic man, and exhibited ruthlessness, and iron determination. In the financial and business world he could be grasping and greedy, and operated under a flexible moral code that often stretched the rules of both honesty and fair play. On Wall Street in New York City,  he became known as Hell Hound Rogers and The Brains of the Standard Oil Trust. He was considered one of the last and great robber barons of his day, as times were changing. Nevertheless, Rogers amassed a great fortune, estimated at over $100 million. He invested heavily in various industries, including copper, steel, mining, and railways.Much of what we know about Rogers and his style in business dealings were recorded by others. His behavior in public Court Proceedings provide some of the better examples and some insight. Rogers business style extended to his testimony in many court settings. Before the Commission of 1878, investigating the railroads of New York, he fine-tuned his circumlocutory, ambiguous, and haughty responses. His most intractable performance was later in a 1906 lawsuit by the state of Missouri, which claimed that two companies in that state registered as independents were actually subsidiaries of Standard Oil, a secret ownership Rogers finally acknowledged.In Marquis Whos Who for 1908, Rogers listed more than twenty corporations of which he was either president and director or vice president and director.Henry H. Rogers is in the top 25 wealthiest men in America of all time. According to The Wealthy 100: From Benjamin Franklin to Bill Gates - A Ranking of the Richest Americans, Past and Present published by two business professors in 1996, Rogers is #22, ranking ahead of Morgan, #23, Gates #31, Rockefeller  #35, Buffett #39, Paul Getty #67, and W. Woolworth #82. Philanthropy in FairhavenRogers was a modest man, and some of his generosity became known only after his death. Examples are found in writings by Keller, Twain, and T. Washington.  Beginning in 1885, he began to donate buildings to his hometown of Fairhaven, Massachusetts. These included a grammar school, Rogers School, built in 1885. The Library was completed in 1893 and was a gift to the Town by the Rogers children in memory of their sister Millicent, who had died in 1890 at the age of 17.Abbie Palmer (ne Gifford) Rogers presented the new Town Hall in 1894. The George H. Taber Masonic Lodge building, named for Rogers boyhood mentor and former Sunday-school teacher, was completed in 1901. The Unitarian Memorial Church was dedicated in 1904 to the memory of Rogers mother, Mary Huttleston (ne Eldredge) Rogers. He had the Tabitha Inn built in 1905, and a new High School, called Castle on the Hill, was completed in 1906.  Rogers funded the draining of the mill pond to create a park, installed the towns public water and sewer systems, and served as superintendent of streets for his hometown.  Years later, Henry H. Rogers daughter, Cara Leland Rogers Broughton (Lady Fairhaven), purchased the site of Phoenix, and donated it to the Town of Fairhaven in her fathers memory.DeathOn May 19, 1909, Rogers died suddenly of a stroke.() It was less than six weeks before full operations were scheduled to begin on his Virginian Railway. After a funeral at the First Unitarian Church in Manhattan, his body was transported to Fairhaven by a York, New Haven and Hartford Railroad train. He was interred beside Abbie in Fairhavens Riverside Cemetery. Later life After Abbies death, Rogers developed close friendships with two other notable Americans: Twain and T. Washington.  He was instrumental in the education of Keller. Urged on by Twain, Rogers and his second wife financed her  college education.In 1899, Rogers had a luxury steam yacht built by a shipyard in the Bronx. The Kanawha, at 471-tons, was  long and manned by a crew of 39. For the final ten years of his life, Rogers entertained friends as they sailed on cruises mostly along the East Coast of the United States, north to Maine and Canada, and south to Virginia. With Twain among his frequent guests, the movements of the Kanawha attracted great attention from the newspapers, the major public media of the era.  Mark Twain right|thumb|Mark Twain and Henry Huttleston Rogers in 1908In 1893, a mutual friend introduced Rogers to humorist Twain. Rogers reorganized Twains tangled finances, and the two became close friends for the rest of Rogers life.  By the 1890s, Twains fortunes began to decline; in his later life, Twain suffered from depression. He lost three of his four children, and his wife, Olivia Langdon, before his death in 1910.Twain had some very bad times with his businesses. His publishing company ended up going bankrupt, and he lost thousands of dollars on a typesetting machine that was never finished. He also lost a great deal of revenue on royalties from his books being plagiarized before he had a chance to publish them himself. Rogers and Twain enjoyed a more than 16-year friendship. Rogers family became Twains surrogate family, and he was a frequent guest at the Rogers townhouse in New York City. Earl J. Dias described the relationship in these words: Rogers and Twain were kindred spirits - fond of poker, billiards, the theater, practical jokes, mild profanity, the good-natured spoof. Their friendship, in short, was based on a community of interests and on the fact that each, in some way, needed the other.(millicentlibrary.org)  Their letters were published as Mark Twains Correspondence with Henry Huttleston Rogers, 1893-1909,(ucpress.edu, University of California Press.)  They had a standing joke that Twain was inclined to pilfer items from the Rogers household whenever he spent the night there as a guest. Two letters provide an illustration.  Twain wrote to Anne Rogers that he had packed::some articles that was laying around....two books, Mr. Rogers brown slippers, and a ham. I thought it was one of ourn. It looked like one we used to have, but it shant occur again, and dont you worry. He will temper the wind to the shorn lamb, and I will send some of the things back if there is some that wont keep. Yores in Jesus, S.L.C.Rogers responded on October 31, 1906 with the following::Before I forget it, let me remind you that I shall want the trunk and the things you took away from my house as soon as possible. I learn that instead of taking old things, you took my best. Mrs. Rogers is at the White Mountains. I am going to Fairhaven this afternoon. I hope you will not be there. By the way, I have been using a pair of your gloves in the Mountains, and they dont seem to be much of an attraction.In April 1907, they traveled together on the Kanawha to the Exposition in celebration of the 300th anniversary of the founding of the Colony. Twain returned to Virginia with Rogers in April 1909, and was the guest speaker at the dedication dinner held for the newly completed Railway, a Mountains to Sea engineering marvel of the day. The construction of the new railroad had been solely financed by industrialist Rogers. Helen Kellers education In May 1896, at the home in New York City of editor-essayist Hutton, Rogers and Mark Twain first saw Keller, then sixteen years old. Although she had been made blind and mute by illness as a young child, she had been reached by her  teacher-companion, Sullivan.  When she was 20, Keller passed with distinction the entrance examination to College. Twain praised this marvelous child and hoped that Helen would not be forced to retire from her studies because of poverty. He urged the Rogers to aid Keller and to solicit other Standard Oil chiefs to help her. The Rogers paid for her education at Radcliffe and arranged a monthly stipend. It was reduced after her marriage to John Macy.Keller dedicated her book, The World I Live In, To Henry H. Rogers, my Dear Friend of Many Years. On the fly leaf of Rogers copy, she wrote, To Mrs Rogers  The best of the world I live in is the kindness of friends like you and Mr Rogers. Booker T. Washington Around 1894, Rogers attended one of T. Washingtons speeches at Square Garden in York City. The next day, Rogers contacted the educator and invited him to his offices. They had common ground in relatively humble beginnings and became strong friends. Washington became a frequent visitor to Rogers office, his 85-room mansion in Fairhaven, and the yacht. left|250px|thumb|Handbill from 1909 tour of southern Virginia and West VirginiaImage:HHR and WNP Initials.png|250px|left|thumb|In 2004, initials of VGN founders Henry Huttleston Rogers and William Nelson Page were engraved by volunteers in newly laid rail at Virginia, where fully equipped and restored former VGN Class 10-A caboose #342 is now displayed. photo by Tom Salmon of Virginian Railway Enthusiasts on YahooAlthough Rogers had died suddenly a few weeks earlier, in June 1909 Dr. Washington went on a previously arranged speaking tour along the newly completed Railway. He rode in Rogers personal rail car, Dixie, making speeches at many locations over a seven-day period.  Washington said Rogers had urged the trip to explore how to improve race relations and economic conditions for Americans along the route of the new railway.  It connected many previously isolated rural communities in the southern portions of Virginia and Virginia. Washington told about Rogers philanthropy: funding the operation of at least 65 small country schools for the education and betterment of African Americans in Virginia and other portions of the South, all unknown to the recipients. Rogers had also generously provided support to Institute and Institute.  Rogers supported projects with at least partial funds, in order to achieve more work, and to ensure recipients were also stakeholders.LegacyIn Fairhaven, the Rogers family gifts are located throughout the town.  These include Rogers School, Town Hall, Library, Memorial Church, and Fairhaven High School. A granite shaft on the High School lawn is dedicated to Rogers. In Riverside Cemetery, the Henry Huttleston Rogers Mausoleum is patterned after the Temple of Minerva in Athens, Greece. Henry, his first wife Abbie, and several family members are interred there.In 1916, News Shipbuilding and Dry Dock Company launched the SS H.H. Rogers, a Pratt-class tanker of 8,807 tons with a capacity of  of oil. It was operated by Panama Transport Co., a subsidiary of Oil of New Jersey. During War II, on February 21, 1943, it was torpedoed and sunk by a German U-boat in the North Ocean  off the coast of Ireland while en route from Liverpool, England to the United States. All 73 persons aboard were saved.In Virginia and West Virginia, former employees, area residents, and enthusiasts of the Virginian Railway consider the entire railroad to have been a memorial to him. Almost 50 years after it was merged into a competitor, Rogers railroad has a remarkable following.  One of the most active Yahoo! railway enthusiasts groups has more than 800 members. A passenger station has been restored in Virginia, a replica built and museum established in West Virginia, and work is underway on a larger former VGN station in Roanoke.In 2004, volunteers engraved Rogers initials (and those of VGN co-founder William Nelson Page) into new rail laid in Virginia. It carries a VGN Class 10-A caboose, built by the company and restored by members of the Railway Historical Society (NRHS) chapter in Roanoke. Fully equipped, it offers an interpretive display of the business conducted in a caboose along the historic right-of-way.CommentariesEarl J. Dias has written a commentary about Henry Huttleston Rogers:::What is the final verdict on Rogers?::First of all, he was a child of his times  an era that historian Howard Mumford Jones has dubbed the Age of Energy. It was a time during which Americans of vast wealth, the Rockefellers, the Goulds, the Pratts, the Harrimans, the Archbolds, exploited and experimented with ideas, styles, fads, and each other. And, surprisingly, they also made invaluable contributions to libraries, schools, universities, charities, and the like. In fact, these rip roaring capitalists were striking examples of the gleeful swashbuckling, the innocence and guilt of what Mark Twain and Charles Dudley Warner called The Gilded Age.::Perhaps the central truth about Rogers was that he was a role player, a born actor. From his experiences on the Phoenix Hall stage in Fairhaven in his youth, he learned the art of being theatrical in the dramatic situations that cropped up in his life.::In the business world he was the man of steel: hard, shrewd, ruthless, giving no quarter.::In his social life, he was amicable, popular, charismatic, a boon companion, a genial host.See also*N. Page*Rosenwald*Improvement CompanyFurther reading*Elbert Hubbard, 1909, Little Journeys to the Homes*Tarbell, Ida M. The History of Standard Oil*Borden Alanson 1899, Our County and Its People: A Descriptive and Biographical Record of Bristol County, Massachusetts. New Bedford, Mass: The Boston History Company.ReferencesExternal links*Earl Dias on Mark Twain and Henry Huttleston Rogers*Millicent Library, Fairhaven MA, Henry Rogers homepage*Mark Twain and Henry Huttleston Rogers in Virginia. Excerpts from their trips together to the 1907 Jamestown Exposition and the 1909 Dedication of the Virginian Railway*Mark Twains Correspondence with Henry Huttleston Rogers, 1893-1909*Dr. Booker T. Washington papers - comments about Henry Rogers *Virginian Railway (VGN) Enthusiasts Group of preservationists, authors, photographers, historians, modelers, and rail fans*Standard Oil History*Some Memories of Cara Leland Rogers Broughton the first Lady Fairhaven material researched and integrated by Mabel Hoyle Knipe Fairhaven, Massachusetts, March 1984*The Story of Fairhaven compiled by Thomas Tripp in 1929*Planting Fields website, Mai Rogers Coe and family history*Huttleston Rogersja:HHuttleston Rogerszh:
426485
North_Warwickshire
R|latd |latm |lats |latNS|longd |longm |longs |longEW|population_as_of   |population_total   R|population_rank    Ranked |population_density_km2  auto|timezone           Mean Time|utc_offset         +0|timezone_DST       Summer Time|utc_offset_DST     +1|postal_code_type   Postcode|postal_code        B46 ,B78, CV7, CV9, CV10|area_code         |blank_name         ISO 3166-2|blank_info         |blank1_name        ONS code|blank1_info        44UB|blank2_name        OS grid reference|blank2_info        |blank3_name        NUTS 3|blank3_info        |blank4_name        Ethnicity|blank4_info        98.6% White|website            northwarks.gov.uk}}North Warwickshire is a local government district and borough in Warwickshire, England. The main town in the district is Atherstone where the council is based. Other significant places include Coleshill, Polesworth and Kingsbury.The North Warwickshire district was created on 1 April 1974 by a merger of the Rural District and parts of the Rural District (the rest of which was merged into the West Midlands county).North Warwickshire is a mostly rural area with several small towns. The area historically had a large mining industry, but this has almost died out. The district is relatively remote from the rest of Warwickshire, as the county is almost split in two by the West Midlands.The boundaries of North Warwickshire are almost the same as the North Warwickshire parliamentary constituency.  However the constituency also includes the town of Bedworth. The local MP is Dan Byles.In 2007 the Conservatives took overall control of the Borough Council for the first time since the creation of the council within its current boundaries. The Council was retaken by Labour in 2011.It borders the Warwickshire district of and Bedworth to the east, the county of Leicestershire to the north-east, Staffordshire to the north-west, and the West Midlands to the south and south-west.Parishes and settlementsSettlements in North Warwickshire include:*Ansley, Arley, Astley, Atherstone, Austrey *Ensor, Baxterley, Bentley, Birchmoor, End *Caldecote, Coleshill, Corley, Curdworth *Dordon *Fillongley, End *Gilson, Packington, Warwickshire, Atherstone*Hartshill, Whitacre, Hurley, Common*Kingsbury*Marston, Packington *Mancetter, Maxstoke, Merevale, Middleton, Moxhull *Whitacre, Regis *Whitacre *Polesworth *Seckington, Shustoke, Shuttington, *Warton, Orton, Heath, Hill, Wishaw, Wood End (near Kingsbury), Wood End (Near Fillongley)For a list of wards in North Warwickshire by population see hereLocal Election Results 1973 - 2011As of March 2011, it was as follows(http://www.northwarks.gov.uk/site/index.php)-1973: Labour 19, Conservatives 8, Independents 4, Ratepayers 2 1995: Labour 28, Conservatives 4, Independents 1 1999: Labour 22, Conservatives 9, Liberal Democrats 2, Independents 1 2003: Labour 16, Conservatives 15, Liberal Democrats 4 (Boundary Changes in effect) 2007: Conservatives 21, Labour 14 2011: Labour 18, Conservative 17PartiesThe Borough is a very Marginal seat between the Conservatives and Labour. Inside the Borough Polesworth, Dordon, Kingsbury, Wood End and Ensor are considered Labour Safe Seats and Fillongley, Orton, Regis and Curdworth considered Safe Conservative seats.See also* and Wood End References  WarwickshireWarwickshireWarwickshireWarwickshireWarwickshireWarwickshireWarwickshire
430013
Hymettus
 easiest_route  climb, roadHymettus, also Hymettos (pronounced  in English, , transliterated Ymtts, pronounced ) is a mountain range in the Athens area, East Central Greece. It is also colloquially known as Trellos or Trellovouno (crazy mountain), a name of uncertain origin.  In antiquity there was a sanctuary to Zeus Ombrios (Zeus the Rain God) on the summit with numerous offerings dating especially to the 8th-7th centuries BC; they are on the site of a military base and not currently accessibe.  There is also an ancient quarrymans hut on the western slopes of the mountain, one of two buildings in ancient Attika which preserves its roof.The height is 1,026 m at Evzonas and the length is  between Athens and the Gulf and 6 to 7 km from east to west. In the ancient times, the highest point was known as Mega Ymittos and the southern Elattona () and Anydro Ymitto ( ) (today Mavrovouni ( meaning black mountain) and Kontra ()). It was noted for its thyme honey. Marble has been quarried since antiquity. The neighboring communities that surround the mountain are Athens, Zografou, Kaisariani, Vyronas, Ilissia (a region of Zografou), Ymittos, Helioupolis, Argyroupoli, Elliniko, Glyfada, Voula and Vouliagmeni in the west, Varkiza, Vri, Markopoulo and Paeania to its east, and Papagou, Holargos, Paraskevi, Gerakas and Nera. Most of the forest is in the north, and much of the mountain is rocky, deforested, grassy and made out of limestone.Major campuses of the of Athens and the Technical University of Athens (collectively called University Town) are located on the west-facing slope, between the Hymettus Ring, a ring road connected with the Odos freeway with five interchanges beginning with Y and filled with tunnels, and the Athens urban sprawl. A transmitter park for all major TV and radio stations is located at the top of the mountain. Built up urban areas almost surround the entire mountain range. Access to the top of the mountain is restricted to authorized vehicles for maintenance of the towers.Almost all of Athens, its eastern suburbs and the new airport can be seen from the mountain top along with the mountains of Parnitha to its northwest, Penteli to its north and Aegaleo to its west. The valley areas that create the lowest passes are to the south and one further south.The mountain ranges features about six to seven landfills in the western part and another in the eastern part.HistoryIts landfills were added in the 1950s and Alimou - Karea Avenue later on. The western part of the mountain range were planted with trees in the 1950s. Housing developments were built after War II and the Civil War which founded the city of Papagou by its slopes and expanded to the south as late as the 1980s by its edges. Marble was mined in the western half between the 1960s and the 1990s and more smaller mines were mined. Mining is now rare since most of its resources are not allowed to be mined.Hymettus was struck by a forest fire around 3 PM (15:00) local time on July 16, 2007. Municipal fire trucks, choppers, nearby residents and six planes were racing to stop the fire from the nearby Saronic Gulf area. It took around two hours to stop the blaze. The blaze was at critical level after it started and flames were burning as far as Ilioupoli but it didnt reach south. Firefighters were fighing the blaze at a hilltop near the avenue and several fire trucks were parked on the avenue with most of the fire occurring at the most forested part of the mountain. Near the late-afternoon, the fire declined and by sunset the fire was out, burning forest in the vicinity of the urban area and south of Katechaki Avenue.Its affected level was in east Kaisariani and Vyronas along with Kareas where the smoke blanketed over its residential area, shutting down Avenue for several hours in its entire length south of the Ring and parts of Avenue blocking the bypass traffic of Athens.The suspected cause of the fire is arson.External links* Map and aerial photos:**Street map: Street map from Mapquest, MapPoint or Google**Satellite images: Google - image not yet available* Projects:**Automatic acoustic Monitoring and Inventorying of BIOdiversityHimetde:Hymettoset:Ymittsel:es:Himetofr:Hymetteit:Imettola:Hymettusnl:Imittosno:Ymittosnn:Ymittspl:Hymetru:Dauk:
432397
John_Deere
US$ 26.005 billion (2010)()| operating_income   US$ 3.025 billion (2010)(| net_income         US$ 1.874 billion (2010)(| assets             US$ 43.267 billion (2010)(| equity             US$ 6.303 billion (2010)(| num_employees     55,700 (2010)(| homepage          Deere.com}}Deere & Company, usually known by its brand name John Deere (), is an American corporation based in Illinois, and the leading manufacturer of agricultural machinery in the world. In 2010, it was listed as 107th in the 500 ranking. Deere and Company agricultural products, sold under the John Deere name, include tractors, harvesters, cotton harvesters, balers, planters/seeders, sprayers, and ATVs. The company is also a leading manufacturer of equipment and forestry equipment, as well as a supplier of engines and drivetrains (axles, transmissions, gearboxes) used in heavy equipment. Additionally, John Deere manufactures equipment used in lawn, grounds, and turf care, such as walk-behind mowers, zero-turn lawn mowers, tractors, and snowthrowers.  To support the core businesses, John Deere also provides financial services and other related activities. The companys slogan is Nothing Runs Like a Deere and has a picture of a leaping deer as a logo(History of the John Deere Trademark Trademarks), a play pun on nothing runs like a deer. Carl Westby is known as the person who coined the phrase Nothing Runs Like a Deere for a marketing campaign to sell snowmobiles. The companys products are also easily identifiable by its distinct shade of green paint, usually augmented by yellow trim.HistoryFile:Deere & Company World Headquarters.jpg|right|thumb|& Company World Headquarters in IllinoisDeere & Company began when John Deere, born in Rutland, Vermont, USA on February 7, 1804 moved to Detour, Illinois in 1836 in order to escape bankruptcy in Vermont. Already an established blacksmith, Deere opened a  shop in Grand Detour in 1837 which allowed him to serve as a general repairman in the village, as well as a manufacturer of small tools such as pitchforks and shovels.What was more successful than these small tools was Deeres cast-steel plow, which was pioneered in 1836. Prior to Deeres introduction of the steel plow, most farmers used iron or wooden plows which stuck to the rich Midwestern soil and had to be cleaned very frequently. The smooth sided steel plow solved this problem, and would greatly aid migration into the American Plains in the 19th and early 20th century. Deeres production of plows began slowly, but increased greatly when he departed from the traditional business model of making equipment as it was ordered and instead began to manufacture plows before they were ordered and then put them up for sale. This allowed customers to see what they were buying beforehand, and word of the product began to spread quickly.In 1842, Deere entered a business partnership with Andrus and purchased land for the construction of a new two-story factory along the Rock River in Illinois. This factory, named the L. Andrus Plough Manufacturer, produced about 100 plows in 1842 and approximately 400 plows during the next year. Despite the success, Deeres partnership with Andrus ended in 1848, when Deere relocated to  Illinois in order to have access to the railroad and the River. In Moline, Deere formed a partnership with Robert Tate and John Gould and quickly built a new  factory in 1848. Production at the plant rose quickly and, by 1849, the Deere, Tate & Gould Company was producing over 200 plows a month, and a two story addition to the plant was built to allow for further production.John Deere bought out Tate and Goulds interests in the company in 1853, the same year that he was joined in the business by his son Deere. The business continued to expand until 1857, when the companys production totals reached almost 1,120 implements per month. Then, in 1858 a nationwide financial recession took a toll on the company. In order to prevent bankruptcy, the company was reorganized and Deere sold his interests in the business to his son in law, Webber, and his son, Charles Deere, who would take on most of his fathers managerial roles. The company was reorganized one final time in 1868, when it was incorporated as Deere & Company. The companys original stockholders were Charles Deere, Velie, Vinton, and John Deere, who would serve as president of the company until 1886. Despite this, it was Charles who effectively ran the company. In 1869, Charles began to introduce marketing centers and independent retail dealers to advance the companys sales nationwide.John Deere died in 1886, and the presidency of Deere & Company passed to Charles Deere. By now the company was manufacturing a variety of farm equipment products in addition to plows, including wagons, corn planters, cultivators. The company even expanded into the bicycle business briefly during the 1890s, but the core focus of the company remained on agricultural implements. Increased competition during the early 1900s from the new Harvester Company led the company to expand its offerings in the implement business, but it was the production of gasoline tractors which would come to define Deere & Companys operations during the twentieth century.In 1912, Deere & Company president William Butterworth, who had replaced Charles Deere after his death in 1907, began the companys expansion into the tractor business. Deere & Company briefly experimented with its own tractor models, the most successful of which was the Dain All-Wheel-Drive, but in the end decided to continue its foray into the tractor business by purchasing the Gasoline Engine Company in 1918, which  manufactured the popular Boy tractor at its facilities in Iowa. Deere & Company continued to sell tractors under the Waterloo Boy name until 1923, when the Deere Model D was introduced. The company still manufactures most of its tractors in Waterloo, Iowa.According to Ratzenberger, host of the Channel series Made in America, Deere & Company never repossessed any equipment from American farmers during the Depression. This was revealed during the shows profile of Deere & Company.(Pure genius: the inventors hall of fame. Independent.co.uk (2008-02-22). Retrieved on 2011-01-03.)In 1956, Deere & Company bought-out the German tractor manufacturer, Lanz AG. (See Bulldog).Deere & Company today, Deere & Company employs approximately 47,000 people in 27 countries worldwide, including the United States, Australia, Turkey, Canada, United Kingdom, China, France, Germany, Spain, Italy, India, Poland, Mexico, Morocco and South Africa, among many others. Inside the United States, the companys primary locations are its administrative center in Illinois, as well as various locations in the Midwest and southeastern United States. Most manufacturing sites are in Iowa or Illinois, as well as locations in Europe. Major North American factories include:* Waterloo Works (foundry, engines, large agricultural tractors, drive trains, service parts, product engineering center) Iowa* Harvester Works(large combine harvesters) Moline, IL* Cylinder Division (hydraulic cylinders) Illinois* Seeding Group (planting equipment) Illinois and City, North Dakota* Davenport Works (loaders, graders, articulated dump trucks, forestry equipment) Iowa* Dubuque Works (backhoes, crawlers, skid-steer loaders, forestry equipment) Iowa* Des Moines Works (tillage equipment, cotton harvesters, sprayers)  Iowa* Ottumwa Works (hay and forage equipment) Iowa* Thibodaux Works (cane harvesting equipment, scrapers) Louisiana* Horicon Works (lawn & garden and turf care) Wisconsin* Augusta Works (small commercial and agricultural tractors) Georgia* Welland Works (agricultural and commercial front loaders, rotary cutters, Gators) Ontario.  However, this plant is scheduled to close in 2009, with production moving to its existing factories in Horicon, Wisconsin and Mexico.  Source* Motores John Deere (Power Systems; 6- and 4-cylinder engines) Mexico.Other Important Factories:* John Deere Usine Saran (Power Systems) Fleury-les-Aubrais, France* John Deere Equipment Pvt Ltd (5000-series tractors) India* John Deere Werke Mannheim (6000-series tractors) Germany* John Deere Werke Zweibrcken (harvesting equipment) Germany* John Deere Fabriek Horst, The Netherlands, Pulled & self-propelled agricultural sprayers for European Market* John Deere Forestry Oy (forwarders, wheeled harvesters) Joensuu, Finland* John Deere Reman (John Deere Reman Homepage. Deere.com (2009-03-20). Retrieved on 2011-01-03.) remanufacturing components for off-highway vehicles.  Facilities in Edmonton, Alberta, Canada (cylinders, axles, transmissions, pumps, hydraulic and powertrain components) and Springfield, Missouri, USA (engines, fuel systems, turbochargers).* Sabo, Gummersbach, Germany (consumer and commercial lawn equipment)Subsidiaries and affiliatesImage:JDPavilionMar06.jpg|thumbnail|right|375px|The John Deere Pavilion in Illinois.*AGRIS Corporation (John Deere Agri Services).*John Deere Ag Management Solutions (intelligent mobile equipment technologies) IA.*John Deere Capital Corporation.*John Deere Credit (John Deere Credit is your source for equipment financing solutions - John Deere Credit, U.S.A. Deere.com. Retrieved on 2011-01-03.) (John Deere Credit and Finance) Iowa.*John Deere Landscapes (landscaping plants, materials, and irrigation equipment).*Kemper (row tolerant headers for forage harvesters and combines) Stadtlohn, Germany.*Waratah Forestry Attachments (forestry harvesting heads) Tokoroa, New Zealand.*Agreentech*NavCom Technology, Inc. (precision positioning systems) CA.*Phoenix International Corporation (ruggedized Off-Road electronics) ND.*Ningbo Benye Tractor & Automobile Manufacture Co. Ltd. (low HP tractors) Ningbo, China.John Deere Renewables, LLC, a energy plant manufacturing arm which represented John Deeres extension into the renewable energy industry - under which it had successfully completed 36 projects in eight US states - was sold to Energy in August 2010.(Deere Reaches Agreement for Sale of Wind Energy Business. Deere.com (2010-08-31). Retrieved on 2011-01-03.)Collaborations and partnerships* Hitachi Mining Division is the Deere company that sells and services Hitachi Mining Equipment in the Americas.* Deere-Hitachi Construction Machinery, located in NC, is jointly owned by Deere & Company and Construction Machinery Co., and manufactures hydraulic excavators for the North and South American markets.* Deere-Hitachi Specialty Products, located in British Columbia, Canada, is a joint venture between Deere and HCM that manufactures hydraulic excavator based forestry swing machines for worldwide distribution.* Partnership with Bell Equipment of South Africa provides Deere with articulated dump truck technology. In exchange, Bell Equipment manufactures Deere backhoe loaders in South Africa for distribution internationally. Additionally, Bell distributes Deere wheel loaders, crawler dozers, motor graders, and skidders in the South African market.(Bell Equipment Alliances Bell Equipment alliances with John Deere.)* Partnership with Construction Equipment Company, a subsidiary of group in India, to provide backhoe loader technology.* Nortrax, Inc. is subsidiary of Deere & Co. and also the largest distributor of John Deere heavy construction equipment in US and Canada.* Ashok Leyland John Deere Construction Equipment Private Ltd. is an India-based joint venture with Leyland to manufacture backhoe loaders for the Indian market.(Ashok Leyland and John Deere Sign JV. Ashok Leyland Press Release (2009-07-13).)* Xuzhou XCG John Deere Machinery Manufacturing Company Limited {Deere-XCG} is a China-based joint venture with Xuzhou Bohui Science and Technology Development Co. Ltd. to manufacture hydraulic excavators for the Chinese market.NASCAR SponsorshipWhile involved in NASCAR, John Deere sponsored the #23 & #97 for former driver Little.Product imagesUseful images galleries:* Modern John Deere equipment pictures including combines, tractors and sprayers*  Vintage John Deere Tractors* NetImages Image:JDTractorDUBIA7800.jpg|A John Deere 7800 tractor attached to a corn planter.   Image:9410JDCombineJuly2004.JPG|A JD 9410 combineImage:Deere330C.jpg|A John Deere 330C ExcavatorImage:John_Deere_4010_Diesel.jpg|A John Deere 4010 Diesel (1960-1963)Image:John Deere 9420 and chisel plow.jpg| A John Deere 9420 tractor.Image:Johndeere9600.JPG|A John Deere 9600 combine with Honeybee header.Image:Deere_410G.jpg| A John Deere 410G BackhoeSee also*Deere World Headquarters*of John Deere tractors*Deere BuckReferencesExternal links**John Deere Augusta, GA Factory Tour and Testing Facility*John Deere Lawn Mower Reviews*John Deere Lawn Tractor Reviews& Companyand Company& Company& CompanyDeere& CompanyDeere (entreprise)& Company & CompanyDeere (merk)ja:& Company& CompanyDeere& Company& Company& Company& CompanyDeere
433414
Tremors_(film)
Tremors is a 1990 American science fiction horror comedy film directed by Underwood, based on a screenplay by Maddock and S. Wilson, and starring Bacon, Ward, Carter, Michael Gross and McEntire. It was distributed by Studios.()The film was received well by critics and holds an 88% favorable rating at the review aggregation website Tomatoes.The film emerged as a cult classic and was followed by a 1996 sequel, 2: Aftershocks and the 2001 Direct-to-Video sequel 3: Back to Perfection and one prequel, 4: The Legend Begins (2004) and the television show The Series (2003).(Tremors: The Series DVD Art Rumbles Your Home Video Collection)PlotValentine Val McKee (Bacon) and Earl Basset (Ward) work as  handymen in Perfection, Nevada, an isolated ex-mining settlement that contains only fourteen residents, among them survivalist couple Burt (Michael Gross) and Heather (McEntire) Gummer, and Walter Chang (Wong), owner of the general store. A new arrival is Rhonda LeBeck (Carter), a graduate student conducting seismology tests. Val and Earl tire of their hand-to-mouth existence and leave for Bixby, the nearest town. They discover a man dead at the top of an electrical tower, though still holding on to the beams. Jim Wallace, the town doctor, announces that he died of dehydration. Somewhere else, a shepherd Old Fred and his flock get attacked by an unseen force. Val and Earl arrive only to find the sheep cut to pieces and Freds severed head lying in the sand. Val and Earl return to Perfection, thinking that a murderer is on the loose. They warn two road-construction workers they encounter, but to no avail. After Val and Earl leave, one of the construction workers drills stabs something from under the ground and it spews blood. With a hose around his ankle, it pulls that worker away, while the other rushes to help only to be crushed by a rock slide stirred up by it.Val and Earl discover the towns phones dead and head for the police in Bixby, but are thwarted by the rock slide. They return to Walters store, where they find something wrapped around their trucks back axle: the severed body of a large snakelike creature. As the townsfolk hunker down for the night, the snakes attack the doctor and his wife, killing them both and pulling their car underground.The next morning, Val and Earl leave to get help, this time on horseback. They discover the doctors buried car. Suddenly one of the attackers erupts out of the ground. Each snake is one of three tongues employed by an enormous burrowing worm-creature that Walter later names Graboids. Thrown from their horses, the two men run for their lives.  When they jump a concrete aqueduct their pursuer rams into its wall, killing itself. Rhonda determines from her readings that there are three more creatures in the area. They realize the creatures have extremely acute hearing, and find them due to their vibrations, but cannot tunnel through rock. One of the creatures traps the trio overnight at a cluster of boulders. Rhonda has the idea of vaulting from boulder to boulder. They reach her truck and return to town.They are met with disbelief from the towns-people until a Graboid appears, disabling Val and Earls truck. Everyone retreats into their homes or the store, but a Graboid bursts through the stores floor and drags away Walter. The Gummers return to their home after unsuccessfully hunting the snake-things and contact the others via radio, but the noise of the couples tumbler leads a Graboid to smash into their basement. The Gummers kill it with firearms, but another of the monsters disables their vehicle. In town, the Graboids attack the foundations of the buildings, knocking over Nestors trailer and dragging him down underground. Realizing the town is being dug out from under them, Val and Earl plan to escape on a trailer pulled by a bulldozer, which is too heavy for the Graboids to move. Val reaches the vehicle while the others distract the Graboids. Everyone is collected, including the Gummers, and they set out for the safety of a nearby mountain range.The Graboids dig a pit-trap in the bulldozers path, wrecking it. The townsfolk use Burts home-made explosives to drive the creatures away long enough to reach the safety of a boulder, where Earl has another idea: tricking the Graboids into swallowing Burts bombs. This works once, but on the second try the last Graboid spits the explosive onto Burts pile of bombs, sending everyone scattering. Val, Earl and Rhonda are stranded yards from the boulder, with the Graboid blocking their path to safety. Val has one more bomb and one last idea: he lets the Graboid chase him to the edge of a cliff and stampedes it with the bomb, then jumps out of its way, sending it through the cliff-face to its death. The group returns to town, and Earl pushes Val into approaching the clearly interested Rhonda romantically.Cast*Bacon as Valentine McKee*Ward  as Earl Basset*Carter as Rhonda LeBeck*Michael Gross as Gummer*McEntire as Heather Gummer*Wong as Walter Chang*Jayne as Melvin Plug*Richards as Mindy Sterngood*Stewart as Nancy Sterngood*Genaro as Miguel*Marcus as Nestor Cunningham*Parker as Edgar Deems*Bachmann as Jim Wallace*Besch as Megan WallaceReceptionThe film was hailed by critics for its diverse cast and humor. Berardinelli of Reelviews.net gave it 3 out of 4 stars.As of September 2011, Tremors holds a fresh rating of 88% at Tomatoes based on 23 critic scores.() Box officeThe film grossed $16,667,084 domestic and $48,572,000 worldwide at the box office. AwardsKevin Bacon received his first Golden Globe Nomination, Best Supporting actor.Home MediaAlthough a financial disappointment during its theatrical run (in which it barely broke even), the film became a runaway hit in the home video market, and ultimately tripled its original box office gross with VHS sales and rentals. ReferencesExternal links*Stampede Entertainment  Official website** Im Land der Raketen-Wrmeres:Tremorsfr:Tremorsid:Tremorsit:Tremors lt:Virpesiai Ahov lpek, szrny terem(film)ja:no:Marksommerpl:Wstrzsypt:Tremors(movie)frn underjordenzh:
435308
Toluca_Lake,_Los_Angeles
Toluca Lake is a district,  north of Los Angeles, in the Fernando Valley region of the city of Angeles, California, and a community within two communities, North Hollywood and Burbank.(Toluca Lake started out as Forman Toluca Ranch, a ranch known for its crops of peaches, apples and walnuts,( but after development is currently home to affluent residents, many of whom work as part of nearby Hollywoods industry.GeographyToluca Lake is situated in the southeastern Fernando Valley straddling the city of Burbank, the Los Angeles district of North Hollywood, and near the unincorporated county area of Universal City, at the northern base of the Hills section of the Monica Mountains.The areas historic boundaries were Cahuenga Boulevard, Camarillo Street, Clybourn Avenue, and the Angeles River,((Yahoo Maps: Toluca Lake (District) - Satellite view) but have been widened to Vineland between the 170 freeway and the Los Angeles River (Greater Toluca Lake Neighborhood Council Map) and it is located between two major film and television production studios, Studios to the south and Bros. to the east. The Monica Mountains surround the area.The geologic Toluca Lake is a  body of water located near the districts southeastern boundaries. The historic lake was fed by springs of upwelling groundwater from the substantial Los Angeles River and San Fernando Valley subterranean aquifers. Late 19th and 20th century L. A. DWP well extraction and 1930s concrete river channelization lowered the water table, and currently community wells at the lakes edges maintain the water level.((Yahoo Maps: Toluca Lake (Body of water) - Satellite view) The bottom of the lake is surfaced with four inches (102 mm) of concrete to prevent seepage.( Owned by the surrounding homeowners, the lake has been maintained by the Toluca Lake Property Owners Association, a non-profit corporation established in 1934.( The lake, surrounded by private residences and the Lakeside Golf Club, is inaccessible to the public.DemographicsIn 2009, the Angeles Timess Mapping L.A. project supplied these Toluca Lake neighborhood statistics: population: 7,782; median household income: $73,111.(Toluca Lake entry on the Los Angeles Times Mapping L.A. website)CommunityHistoryThe people lived in the locale, and the Fernando Valley and Angeles basin, for 8,000 years.(USA Today article USA Today Accessed 5/22/2010) The Tongva settlements Cahuenga used the springs and marsh for water, fishing, hunting, harvesting, and building supplies (tule plants).(SSPSHP ethnohistory from State Parks)After the Spanish conquest in the 1790s of Californias the Fernando Valley, including the Toluca Lake locale became the extended property of the San Fernando Rey de Espaa. After the 1823 Independence of Mexico, the secularization of missions in California included the issuing of a Mexican land grant for Ex-Mission San Fernando.(Ogden Hoffman, 1862, Reports of Land Cases Determined in the United States District Court for the Northern District of California, Numa Hubert, San Francisco) The extreme eastern end of the lake was within the 1843 Providencia grant to Vincente de la Osa.(Brief History of Vicente de la Ossa and Family) In 1862. Pico sold his share of the Ex-San Fernando Mission land, the entire southern half of the Valley below Roscoe Boulevard, to Isaac Lankershim (operating as the San Fernando Farm Homestead Association) in 1869. In 1873, Isaac Lankershims son James Boon (J. B.) Lankershim, and future son-in-law, Newton Van Nuys, took over management of the property, including the lake at Toluca. During the 1880s, the San Fernando Farm Homestead Association was succeeded by the Los Angeles Farm & Milling Company.In 1893, a petition was filed with the U.S. Postal Service for the areas first office, to be named Toluca Post Office. General Charles Forman, a wealthy local landowner and one of the proponents of the petition, later stated that he had chosen the name Toluca from a Paiute Indian word meaning fertile or beautiful valley. Though part of a larger area traditionally called Lankershim after a Colonel of the same name &mdash; and with a Pacific Railroad train station named Lankershim also opened in 1893 across from the post office &mdash; Forman called his own ranch and the surrounding land Toluca.()One of the wealthiest men in Nevada, Forman had made his fortune from nothing, starting in mining, then cattle ranching, and then lumber. Falling in love with and marrying Los Angeles native Mary Agnes Gray, he soon moved to the area in the late 1880s and started the Kern River Company, a power company which delivered electricity from generators at the River to Los Angeles. He also bought a large parcel of rich farm land, which included much of modern day Toluca Lake and at least the western portion of the ancient and historical marshy pond now called Toluca Lake.( By 1923, the Forman Toluca Lake Ranch was a flourishing producer of peaches, apples and walnuts.(() That year, investors bought and developed the land as Toluca Lake Park. This initial venture failed, but a new group soon took over, renaming the development company The Toluca Lake Company. With a vision of creating a first community for Los Angeles in the San Fernando Valley, the company formally changed the name of the community to simply Toluca Lake, and adopted as their logo the swan on rippled water image still associated with the community today.(The name Lankershim also was considered for the town. Colonel J. B. Lankershim established the town site of Toluca at the eastern edge of the familys vast holdings in 1888. During the late 1890s, the town name Lankershim had replaced Toluca.( ) By 1927, the lure of Hollywood inspired local merchants to launch a campaign to change the communitys name to North Hollywood.(http://www.gtlnc.org/toluca_lake_history.php) The original town site of Toluca is now part of Toluca Lake.Aviator Earhart lived in Toluca Lake on Valley Spring Lane after marrying flamboyant publishing magnate P. Putnam in 1931. The Spanish colonial-style home, which still exists today, features a front-yard tree under which she signed her round-the-world flight plan. She made her home in Toluca Lake because the best aircraft in the world were being designed and built nearby at the Lockheed plant in Burbank. Entertainer Hope moved to Toluca Lake in the late 1930s and lived there until his death in 2003 at the age of 100.() In the 1938 Rascals film Men in a Tub, the kids hold a regatta on the lake, which is shown to be still largely surrounded by open country at that time.(http://ourgang.wikia.com/wiki/Three_Men_In_A_Tub) In 1945, Sinatra and his family moved into a house in Toluca Lake and spent weekends at their Lone Palm Hotel in Palm Springs. The house was located down the street from where Earhart had lived.( Former actor and 40th President of the States Reagan had his wedding reception with second wife Reagan at the Toluca Lake home of actor (and best man) Holden on March 4, 1952.()PoliticsToluca Lake is represented by City Councilman LaBonge in the Angeles City Council and Gatto in the State Assembly. NBC-4 weatherman Coleman is the honorary mayor of Toluca Lake.Toluca Lake homeowner groups have recently begun mobilizing against a proposed development in North Hollywood by NBC-Universal and Thomas Properties Group. The Metro Studio Project involves upwards of  of space and would house employees leaving NBCs Burbank facility. The project also proposes a Square-style supergraphics and digital illuminated billboards. It would be built partly on land for which NBC Universal has a lease agreement from the Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority. Given the current recession, there have been signs the project may be delayed indefinitely. The Angeles County Board of Supervisors has yet to act on the proposal, and Environmental Impact Reports are not finalized.EducationToluca Lake is a part of the Angeles Unified School District, and Toluca Lake Elementary School(Toluca Lake Elementary School) is within its borders.Nearby points of interestToluca Lake is known for a point of interest located in Burbank: a Big Boy. The Burbank restaurant, a Point of Historical Interest, is the oldest in America;(BOBS BIG BOY RESTAURANT AND SIGN from Californias Office of Historic Preservation) it is just beyond the boundary of Toluca Lake and is often misidentified as being located there.(RoadsidePeek.com - Bobs Big Boy)(LAOkay.com - Bobs Big Boy)(YouAreHere.com - Bobs Big Boy)St. Charles Borromeo Church of North Hollywood, is attended by various well-known Toluca Lake residents and has played host to several celebrity weddings and funerals, including the funerals of Bob Hope and Lamour.(St. Charles Catholic Church - SeeingStars.com Retrieved on January 6, 2009.) Choir director Salamunovich was the former director of the Angeles Master Chorale.(See also* of the San Fernando Valley to 1915* Angeles RiverReferencesExternal links*Yahoo Maps: Toluca Lake (District) - Satellite view*Yahoo Maps: Toluca Lake (Body of water) - Satellite viewLakeLakeLakeLakeLake
435997
Julia_Morgan
awardsJulia Morgan (January 20, 1872  February 2, 1957) was an American architect. The architect of over 700 buildings in California,( ) she is best known for her work on Castle in Simeon, California. Throughout her long career, she also designed multiple buildings for institutions serving women and girls.Early life and educationBorn in Francisco, California, she was raised in Oakland and graduated from Oakland High School in 1890. She graduated from the of California, Berkeley, in 1894 with a degree in engineering. At the urging of her friend and mentor Maybeck, whom she met in her final year in undergraduate school, she headed to Paris to apply to the famous des Beaux-Arts. Denied at first because the school was not accepting women, and a second time because she failed the entrance exam (she claimed in a letter that she had been failed deliberately because she was a woman(Reichers, M. (2006).  Beyond San Simeon.  Humanities, September/October 2006, Volume 27/Number 5)), after two years she finally passed the entrance exams in the architecture program, placing 13th out of 376 applicants,(Julia Morgan: Early Architect.  California State Capitol website, Retrieved 2009-05-26 from Internet Archive) and was duly admitted. She was the first woman to graduate with a degree in architecture from the school in Paris. American architect Kellogg (1871-1918) was studying in Paris around the same time, advocating for the admittance of women to the school, but acceptance came too late for her to attend.(New Yorks Real Lure for Women -- Opportunity, The New York Times, November 12, 1911, accessed May 7, 2011)CareerUpon her return from Paris she took employment with the San Francisco architect Galen Howard who was at that time supervising the of California Master Plan. Morgan worked on several buildings on the Berkeley campus, most notably providing the decorative elements for the Mining Building, and designs for the Greek Theatre.In 1904, she opened her own office in San Francisco. One of her earliest works from this period was North Star House in Valley, California, commissioned in 1906 by mining engineer De Wint Foote and his wife, the author and illustrator, Hallock Foote. Naturally, many commissions followed the San Francisco earthquake, ensuring her financial success.Hearst projectsImage:Hearst Castle facade.jpg|right|thumb|The Castle facade.The most famous of Morgans patrons was the newspaper magnate and antiquities collector Randolph Hearst, who had been introduced to Morgan by his mother Apperson Hearst, the chief patroness of the University of California at Berkeley. It is believed that this introduction led to Morgans first downstate commission by Hearst, circa 1914, for the design of the Los Angeles Examiner Building, a  Mission revival style project that included contributions by Los Angeles architects J. Dodd and J. Martyn Haenkel.Its closed but still located at the southwest corner of Broadway and 11th Streets on a city block in Los Angeles, awaiting adaptive reuse. In 1919 Hearst selected Morgan as the architect for La Cuesta Encantada, better known as Castle, which was built atop the family campsite overlooking Simeon harbor. The project proved to be her largest and most complex, as Hearsts vision for his estate grew ever grander during planning and construction over the decades. It later included The Hacienda, a residence  private guest house complex built in  hybrid Mission Revival, Spanish Colonial Revival, and Revival styles. It was located a days horseback ride inland from Hearst Castle next to the San Antonio de Padua near California. Her work on the Castle and San Simeon Ranch continued until 1937, ending only due to Hearsts declining health.Morgan became William Randolph Hearsts principal architect, producing the designs for dozens of buildings, such as Phoebe Apperson Hearsts Wyntoon which he inherited. It is also a castle, with a Bavarian village of four villas all on  of forest reserve which includes the River near Shasta in Northern California. She also did studio and site work for the uncompleted Babicora, Hearsts  Mexico cattle rancho and retreat.(www.time.com Babicora, Mexico: End of An Empire, accessed May 11, 2010)YWCA projectsJulia Morgans affiliation with the YWCA began when Phoebe Apperson Hearst recommended her for the organizations Asilomar summer conference center. The Asilomar Conference Center, no longer YWCA but State-run, is still in Pacific Grove near California. Morgan also designed YWCAs in California, Utah, Arizona, and Hawaii. Five of the Southern California YWCA buildings were designed by Morgan.(http://bigorangelandmarks.blogspot.com/2008/10/no-186-morgan-house-harbor-area-ywca.html bigorangelandmarks.blogspot. morgan-house-harbor-area-ywca access date: 5/11/2010.)The 1918 Harbor Area YWCA in a Craftsman building is still standing, as is the 1926 Hollywood Studio Club YWCA. Morgans Riverside YWCA from 1929 still stands, but as the Art Museum. Her 1925 Long Beach Italian Renaissance branch has been demolished. The gorgeous Pasadena YWCA is being acquired by the city for restoration and public use in 2010, after several decades of abandonment, closure, and slowly falling apart.(http://bigorangelandmarks.blogspot.com/2008/10/no-186-morgan-house-harbor-area-ywca.html Ibid: bigorangelandmarks. ywca.  access date: 5/11/2010.)  She also designed YWCAs in California, including those in San Franciscos Chinatown and Oakland.Mills College and other projectsThe following are her contributions to the all-girls College in the East Bay foothills of California, which, like her work for the YWCA, were done in the hopes of advancing opportunities for women: *The El Campanil, which is believed to be the first tower on a United States college campus() and the first reinforced concrete structure on the west coast.() Morgans reputation grew when the tower was unscathed by the 1906 Francisco earthquake.( The bells in the tower were cast for the Columbian Exposition (Chicago-1893) and given to Mills by a trustee.( It is not to be confused with The Campanile, a nickname for Tower, the clock/bell tower of nearby UC Berkeley. Morgan helped draft parts of the UC Berkeley campus under John Galen Howard, but the Sather Tower was not her design. *The Margaret Carnegie Library (1906), named after Andrew Carnegies daughter.(*The Ming Quong Home for Chinese girls, built in 1924 and purchased by Mills in 1936, which was renamed Alderwood Hall( and now houses the Julia Morgan School for Girls.((http://www.juliamorganschool.org/ Julia Morgan School for Girls)()*The Student Union (1916)(*Kapiolani Cottage, which has served as an infirmary, faculty housing, and administration offices.((*Millss original gymnasium and pool, which have been replaced by the Tea Shop and Suzanne Adams Plaza.(Her other projects include the redesign of the landmark Fairmont Hotel in San Francisco after it was damaged by the earthquake of 1906. She was chosen because of her then-rare knowledge of earthquake-resistant, concrete construction.      The former St. Johns Presbyterian Church is now the Julia Morgan Center for the Arts, on College Avenue in California.(St. Johns history page at BerkeleyHeritage.com) Others are the Chapel of the Chimes in Oakland, the sanctuary of Ocean Avenue Presbyterian Church at 32 Ocean Avenue, San Francisco, where Bay Community Church also meets, and the large City Club, adjacent to University of California.  Her work also included a War I YWCA Hostess House in Palo Alto which was later the site of the MacArthur Park Restaurant(MacArthur Park  Fine Dining, Events and Catering in Palo Alto, CA: Home Page)Some of her residential projects, most of them located in the Francisco Bay Area, may be categorized as bungalows, a term often associated with the work of and Greene and some of Morgans other contemporaries and teachers, express the and Crafts Movement in the American Craftsman style of architecture. Several houses are on San Franciscos Hill, as was her own residence.LegacyJulia Morgan is buried in the Mountain View Cemetery in the hills of California.(findagrave.com. Julia Morgan. access date: 5/11/2010.)California Governor Schwarzenegger and First Lady Shriver announced on May 28, 2008 that Julia Morgan would be inducted into the Hall of Fame, located at California Museum for History, Women and the Arts. The induction ceremony took place on December 15 and her great-niece accepted the honor in her place.The Julia Morgan Ballroom at the Merchants Exchange Building in San Francisco was named in her honor. Books*Boutelle, Sara Holmes (1988). Julia Morgan, Architect. New York: Abbeville Press.*Morgan, J. (1976). Architectural drawings by Julia Morgan: beau-arts assignments and other buildings. Oakland, Calif: Oakland Museum, Art Dept.*Steilberg, W. T., & Morgan, J. (1983). Some examples of the work of Julia Morgan. San Francisco: Architect and Engineer of California.*Morgan, J., Hearst, W. R., & Loe, N. E. (1987). San Simeon revisited: the correspondence between architect Julia Morgan and William Randolph Hearst. San Luis Obispo, Calif: Library Associates, California Polytechnic State University.*Morgan, J. (1987). Berkeley houses by Julia Morgan. Berkeley, Calif.: The Association.Further reading*Longstreth, R. W. (1977). Julia Morgan, architect. Berkeley Architectural Heritage publication series, no. 1. Berkeley, Calif.: Berkeley Architectural Heritage Association.*University of California, Berkeley. (1986). Julia Morgan, architectural drawings: inventory of holdings, College of Environmental Design. Berkeley: The College.*Pasadena Cultural Heritage Commission. (1988). Report on reuse of the Julia Morgan YWCA building: YWCA & YMCA Pasadena, California. New York: Halsband.*Quacchia, R. L. (2005). Julia Morgan, architect, and the creation of the Asilomar Conference Grounds: including a comparison with Hearst Castle. Virginia Beach, Va.: Q Pub.*McNeill, Karen (May 2007). Julia Morgan: Gender, Architecture, and Professional Style. Pacific Historical Review, pp. 229267.ReferencesExternal links*The Julia Morgan Collection at Cal Poly San Luis Obispo*Julia Morgan  An Online Exhibition*Julia Morgan at Hearst Castle*Index of Buildings by Julia Morgan*Julia Morgan Architectural Drawings, 19071929, Bancroft Library*North Star Historic Conservancy*Wyntoon at Great Buildings Online*Women in Architecture*Carrillo Rec Center in Santa Barbara*William J. Dodd: American Architect & Designer - Los Angeles*Julia Morgan Center for the Arts - Berkeley, CA*UC Berkeley Environmental Design ArchivesMorganMorgan
437720
Memcached
 website  www.memcached.orgIn computing, memcached is a general-purpose distributed caching system that was originally developed by Interactive for LiveJournal, but is now used by many other sites. It is often used to speed up dynamic database-driven websites by caching data and objects in RAM to reduce the number of times an external data source (such as a database or API) must be read. Memcached runs on Unix, Windows and MacOS and is distributed under a free software license.()Memcacheds APIs provide a giant table distributed across multiple machines. When the table is full, subsequent inserts cause older data to be purged in least recently used (LRU) order. Applications using Memcached typically layer requests and additions into RAM before falling back on a slower backing store, such as a database.The system is used by sites including YouTube,() Reddit,(Steve Huffman on Lessons Learned at Reddit) Zynga,(How Zynga Survived FarmVille) Facebook(Facebook Developers Resources) Orange (Orange Developers ),(Scaling memcached at Facebook) and Twitter.(Its Not Rocket Science, But Its Our Work) Heroku (now part of Salesforce) offers a Couchbase-managed memcached add-on service(Heroku memcached add-on) as part of their as a service. App Engine and Web Services also offer a memcached service through an API.(Using Memcache - Google App Engine - Google Code)(http://aws.amazon.com/elasticache/) Memcached is also supported by some popular CMSs such as Drupal,(http://drupal.org/project/memcache) Joomla, and WordPress.(http://dougal.gunters.org/blog/2009/08/26/w3-total-cache-plugin) History Memcached was first developed by Fitzpatrick for his website LiveJournal, on May 22, 2003.(http://community.livejournal.com/changelog/637455.html)(http://brad.livejournal.com/1893677.html)(http://community.livejournal.com/lj_dev/539656.html) Architecture The system uses a clientserver architecture. The servers maintain a keyvalue array; the clients populate this array and query it. Keys are up to 250 bytes long and values can be at most 1 megabyte in size.Clients use client side libraries to contact the servers which, by default, expose their service at port 11211. Each client knows all servers; the servers do not communicate with each other. If a client wishes to set or read the value corresponding to a certain key, the clients library first computes a hash of the key to determine the server that will be used. Then it contacts that server. The server will compute a second hash of the key to determine where to store or read the corresponding value.The servers keep the values in RAM; if a server runs out of RAM, it discards the oldest values. Therefore, clients must treat Memcached as a transitory cache; they cannot assume that data stored in Memcached is still there when they need it. A Memcached-protocol compatible product known as MemcacheDB provides persistent storage.If all client libraries use the same hashing algorithm to determine servers, then clients can read each others cached data; this is obviously desirable.A typical deployment will have several servers and many clients. However, it is possible to use Memcached on a single computer, acting simultaneously as client and server. Security Most deployments of Memcached exist within trusted networks where clients may freely connect to any server. There are cases, however, where Memcached is deployed in untrusted networks or where administrators would like to exercise control over the clients that are connecting. For this purpose Memcached can be compiled with optional SASL authentication support. The SASL support requires the binary protocol.A presentation at BlackHat USA 2010 revealed that a number of large public websites had left memcached open to inspection, analysis, retrieval, and modification of data.(BlackHat Write-up: go-derper and mining memcaches) Example code Note that all functions described on this page are pseudocode only. Memcached calls and programming languages may vary based on the API used.Converting database or object creation queries to use Memcached is simple. Typically, when using straight database queries, example code would be as follows: function get_foo(int userid) {    result  db_select(SELECT * FROM users WHERE userid  ?, userid);    return result; }After conversion to Memcached, the same call might look like the following function get_foo(int userid) {    /* first try the cache */    data  memcached_fetch(userrow: + userid);    if (!data) {       /* not found : request database */       data  db_select(SELECT * FROM users WHERE userid  ?, userid);       /* then store in cache until next get */       memcached_add(userrow: + userid, data);    }    return data; }The server would first check whether a Memcached value with the unique key userrow:userid exists, where userid is some number. If the result does not exist, it would select from the database as usual, and set the unique key using the Memcached API add function call.However, if only this API call were modified, the server would end up fetching incorrect data following any database update actions: the Memcached view of the data would become out of date. Therefore, in addition to creating an add call, an update call would be also needed, using the Memcached set function. function update_foo(int userid, string dbUpdateString) {   /* first update database */    result  db_execute(dbUpdateString);    if (result) {       /* database update successful : fetch data to be stored in cache */       data  db_select(SELECT * FROM users WHERE userid  ?, userid);       /* last line could also look like data  createDataFromDBString(dbUpdateString); */       /* then store in cache until next get */       memcached_set(userrow: + userid, data);    } }This call would update the currently cached data to match the new data in the database, assuming the database query succeeds. An alternative approach would be to invalidate the cache with the Memcached delete function, so that subsequent fetches result in a cache miss. Similar action would need to be taken when database records were deleted, to maintain either a correct or incomplete cache. See also * Membase* Redis References  External links * Official memcached site* memcached wiki and faq* PHP Memcached Manager with Tag Support* membase* Memcached and Ruby* QuickCached - memcached server implementation in Java Commercially Supported Distributions * Couchbase Server (formerly Membase) offers a memcached bucket type (free for use, subscription support available)* GigaSpaces Java based Memcached (free community edition, fault tolerance)* Hazelcast Memcached clustered, elastic, fault-tolerant, Java based memcached (free for use, subscription support available)ca:Memcachedde:Memcachedes:Memcachedfr:Memcachedmn:Memcachedja:Memcachedpl:Memcachedru:Memcacheduk:Memcachedvi:Memcachedzh:Memcached
440359
Salton_Sea
 reference          thumb|Map of the Salton Sea drainage areaThe Salton Sea is a shallow, saline, endorheic lake located directly on the Andreas Fault, predominantly in Californias Imperial Valley. The lake occupies the lowest elevations of the Sink in the Desert of Imperial and Riverside counties in California. Like Valley, it is below level. Currently, its surface is  below sea level. The deepest area of the sea is  higher than the lowest point of Death Valley. The sea is fed by the New, Whitewater, and Alamo rivers, as well as agricultural runoff drainage systems and creeks.While it varies in dimensions and area with fluctuations in agricultural runoff and rainfall, the Salton Sea averages  by . With an average area of roughly , the Salton Sea is the largest lake in California. Average annual inflow is , which is enough to maintain a maximum depth of  and a total volume of about .The lakes salinity, about 44 g/L, is greater than the waters of the Ocean (35 g/L), but less than that of the Salt Lake (which ranges from 50270 g/L); the concentration is increasing by about 1 percent annually.()HistoryIt is estimated that for 3 million years, at least through all the years of the Pleistocene glacial age, the River worked to build its delta in the southern region of the Valley. Eventually, the delta had reached the western shore of the of California (the Sea of Cortez/Corts) creating a massive dam which excluded the Salton Sea from the northern reaches of the Gulf. Were it not for this dam, the entire Salton Sink along with the Imperial Valley, including most of the area occupied by Anza-Borrego State park, would all be submerged, as the Gulf would extend as far north as Indio.()As a result, the Salton Sink or Salton Basin has long been alternately a fresh water lake and a dry desert basin, depending on random river flows and the balance between inflow and evaporative loss. A lake would exist only when it was replenished by the river and rainfall, a cycle that repeated itself countless times over hundreds of thousands of years - most recently when the lake was recreated in 1905.()There is evidence that the basin was occupied periodically by multiple lakes. Wave-cut shorelines at various elevations are still preserved on the hillsides of the east and west margins of the present lake, the Salton Sea, showing that the basin was occupied intermittently as recently as a few hundred years ago. The last of the Pleistocene lakes to occupy the basin was Cahuilla, also periodically identified on older maps as Lake LeConte, and the Blake Sea, after American professor and geologist Phipps Blake.Once part of a vast inland sea that covered a large area of Southern California, the endorheic Salton Sink was the site of a major salt mining operation.(The Salton Sea  Its Beginnings. Accessed 2010-06-14) Throughout the Spanish period of Californias history the area was referred to as the Desert after the Rio Colorado (River). In the 1853/55 railroad survey, it was called The Valley of the Ancient Lake. On several old maps from the of Congress, it has been found labeled Cahuilla Valley (after the local Indian tribe) and Cabazon Valley (after a local Indian chief - Chief Cabazon). Salt Creek first appeared on a map in 1867 and Salton Station is on a railroad map from 1900, although this place had been there as a rail stop since the late 1870s.(History of the Salton Sea, Accessed 2010-06-14)Creation of the current Salton SeaFile:Colorado River below Imperial Canal intake.jpg|thumb|left|Original caption: Dry Bed of Colorado River Below Imperial Intake ... River Diverted Into Imperial Canal The creation of the Salton Sea of today started in 1905, when heavy rainfall and snowmelt caused the Colorado River to swell, overrunning a set of headgates for the Canal. The resulting flood poured down the canal and breached an Imperial Valley dike, eroding two watercourses, the New River in the west, and the River in the east, each about  long.(Detailed maps, and a film of the breach (and subsequent re-damming) are in & Pleasures on the Salton Sea, a 2006 documentary) Over a period of approximately two years these two newly created rivers sporadically carried the entire volume of the Colorado River into the Salton Sink.()The Pacific Railroad attempted to stop the flooding by dumping earth into the canals headgates area, but the effort was not fast enough, and as the river eroded deeper and deeper into the dry desert sand of the Imperial Valley, a massive waterfall was created that started to cut rapidly upstream along the path of the Alamo Canal that now was occupied by the Colorado. This waterfall was initially  high but grew to a height of  before the flow through the breach was finally stopped. It was originally feared that the waterfall would recede upstream to the true main path of the Colorado, attaining a height of up to , from where it would be practically impossible to fix the problem. As the basin filled, the town of Salton, a Southern Pacific Railroad siding and Torres-Martinez Indian land were submerged. The sudden influx of water and the lack of any drainage from the basin resulted in the formation of the Salton Sea.()()The continuing intermittent flooding of the Imperial Valley from the Colorado River led to the idea of the need for a dam on the Colorado River for flood control. Eventually, the federal government sponsored survey parties in 1922 that explored the Colorado River for a dam site, ultimately leading to the construction of Dam in Black Canyon, which was constructed beginning in 1929 and completed in 1935. The dam effectively put an end to the flooding episodes in the Imperial Valley.Subsequent evolution of the SeaImage:Mud volcano Salton Sea.jpg|thumb|A gaseous volcanoIn the 1920s, the Salton Sea developed into a tourist attraction, because of its water recreation, and waterfowl attracted to the area.The Salton Sea has had some success as a resort area, with City, Salton Sea Beach, and Desert Shores on the western shore and Desert Beach, North Shore, and Bombay Beach built on the eastern shore in the 1950s. The town of Niland is located 2 miles (3 km) southeast of the Sea as well. The evidence of geothermal activity is also visible. There are pots and volcanoes on the eastern side of the Salton Sea.()Avian populationThe Salton Sea has been termed a crown jewel of avian biodiversity (Dr. Milt Friend, Salton Sea Science Office). Over 400 species have been documented at the Salton Sea. The Salton Sea supports 30% of the remaining population of the white pelican.(http://ca.audubon.org/Salton_Sea_Avifauna.pdf) The Salton Sea is also a major resting stop on the Flyway. On 18 November 2006, a gull, a high Arctic bird, was sighted and photographed there.(http://www.southwestbirders.com/rogu_ss111806.htm)Environmental declineImage:Dead Fishes on the shores of Salton City.jpg|thumb|Dead fish on the western shore of CityImage:Newriverwatershed-1-.jpg|thumb|Map of New River and River coursesImage:Nrborderborderentrythreecolorsmay05-1-.JPG|thumb|The New River passes from Mexicali, Baja California to the Valley, and on to the Salton SeaThe lack of an outflow means that the Salton Sea is a system of accelerated change. Variations in agricultural runoff cause fluctuations in water level (and flooding of surrounding communities in the 1950s and 1960s), and the relatively high salinity of the inflow feeding the Sea has resulted in ever increasing salinity. By the 1960s it was apparent that the salinity of the Salton Sea was rising, jeopardizing some of the species in it. The Salton Sea currently has a salinity exceeding 4.0% w/v (saltier than seawater) and many species of fish are no longer able to survive. It is believed that once the salinity surpasses 4.4% w/v, only the tilapia will survive. Fertilizer runoffs combined with the increasing salinity have resulted in large blooms and elevated bacteria levels.(NASA page: Algal bloom in the Salton Sea, California.)Remediation effortsPast efforts and proposals for a sea level canalAlternatives for saving the Salton Sea have been evaluated since 1955. Early concepts included costly pipe in/pipe out options, which would import lower salinity seawater from the of California or Ocean and export higher salinity Salton Sea water; evaporation ponds that would serve as a salt sink, and large dam structures that would partition the sea into a marine lake portion and a brine salt sink portion. Others advocate building a sea-level canal to the Salton Sea from the Gulf of California. Given that the Sea is over 200 feet (60m) below sea level, a sea level canal would allow thousands of tons of lower-salinity sea water to flow into the Sea without costly pumping or pipelines. Such a canal could be built large enough for recreational use and ocean-going vessels. A sea-level canal would promote dual purposes, as both an inland port for Southern California and a recreational/environmental asset along its course for humans and wildlife in Mexico and the U.S. A sea-level canal would also likely provide a way to regulate the shoreline of the Sea in a predictable manner. However, without a means to export salt, even this approach would eventually leave the sea with ever-increasing salinity levels.Much of the current interest in the sea was sparked in the 1990s by the late Congressman Bono.(CNN article: Salton Sea rescue to be named for Sonny Bono.) His widow, Bono Mack, was elected to fill his seat and has continued interest in the Salton Sea, as has Representative Jerry Lewis of Redlands.( In 1998, the Sonny Bono Salton Sea Restoration Project was named for the politician.(In the late 1990s, the Sea Authority, a local joint powers agency, and the U.S. of Reclamation began efforts to evaluate and develop an alternative to save the Salton Sea. A draft Impact Report/Impact Statement, which did not specify a preferred alternative, was released for public review in 2000.Since that time, the Salton Sea Authority has developed a preferred concept(State of California) that involves the construction of a large dam that would impound water to create a marine sea in the northern and southern parts of the sea and along the western edge. The plan has been subject to some criticism for failing to address ecosystem needs, and for engineering practicality concerns such as local faulting, potentially devastating to such a plan.Criticisms of the preferred plan issued by the Salton Sea Authority include:*Massive alkali storms blowing across the area destroying crops from the south basin.(http://www.saltonsea.ca.gov/Concept7-20-2005SouthDetail8x11.pdf)Many other concepts have been proposed,(http://www.usbr.gov/lc/region/saltnsea/ssbro.html#steps) including piping water from the Sea to a wetland in Mexico, Laguna Salada, as a means of salt export, and one by Aqua Genesis Ltd to bring in sea water from the Gulf of California, desalinate it at the Sea using available geothermal heat, and selling the water to pay for the plan. This concept would involve the construction of over 20 miles (30 km) of pipes and tunneling, and, with the increasing demand for water at the coastline, would provide an additional  of water to Southern California coastal cities each year.(http://www.sandiegoreader.com/news/2004/feb/26/inventor-tackles-salton-sea-disaster/ San Diego Union Times: Ronald Newcombs Salton Sea proposal)Current state restoration processImage:Salton Sea homes.JPG|thumb|Abandoned, salt encrusted structures on the Salton Sea shore at BeachThe State Legislature, by legislation enacted in 2003 and 2004, directed the Secretary of the Resources Agency to prepare a restoration plan for the Salton Sea ecosystem, and an accompanying Environmental Impact Report.(Salton Sea Ecosystem Restoration Program) As part of this effort the Secretary for Resources has established an Advisory Committee to provide recommendations to assist in the preparation of the Ecosystem Restoration Plan, including consultation throughout all stages of the alternative selection process. The Department of Water Resources and Department of Fish and Game are leading the effort to develop a preferred alternative for the restoration of the Salton Sea ecosystem and the protection of wildlife dependent on that ecosystem.On January 24, 2008, the California Legislative Analysts Office released a report entitled Restoring the Salton Sea.( The preferred alternative outlined within this draft plan calls for spending a total of almost $9 billion over 25 years and proposes a smaller but more manageable Salton Sea. The amount of water available for use by humans and wildlife would be reduced by 60 percent from 365 square miles (945 square kilometers) to about 147 square miles (381 square kilometers). Fifty-two miles (84 km) of barrier and perimeter dikes - constructed most likely out of boulders, gravel and stone columns - would be erected along with earthen berms to corral the water into a horseshoe shape along northern shoreline of the sea from San Felipe Creek on the west shore to Bombay Beach on the east shore. The central portion of the sea would be allowed to almost completely evaporate and would serve as a brine sink, while the southern portion of the sea would be constructed into a saline habitat complex. If approved, construction on this project is slated to begin in 2011 and would be completed by 2035.Media attentionleft|thumb|An abandoned boat stuck in the ground, close to the west coast Marina of the Salton SeaThe documentary, & Pleasures on the Salton Sea, narrated by John Waters, covers the first 100 years of the Salton Sea along with the environmental issues and offbeat residents of the region.A 6-minute short film, The Accidental Sea, filmed and narrated by Riggs, briefly discusses the history and depicts the desolation since the areas abandonment.The episode Future Conditional (#302) from the series to Planet Earth (narrated by Damon) talks about the plight of the sea, and if nothing is done, a repeat of the fate of the Sea will occur.(Future Conditional (#302) - to Planet Earth)The episode Holiday Hell (#206) from the series After People uses the Salton Sea as an example of how a resort town like Palm Springs would decay if no humans were there to maintain it.(Life after people (#206) - after people)On March 24, 2009, a Angeles Times article reported a series of earthquakes in the Salton Sea. The article also quoted prominent geophysicists and seismologists who discuss the potential for these small quakes to spawn a massive earthquake on the Andreas Fault.()Earthquake geologyThe Salton Sea and surrounding basin sits over the Andreas Fault, Jacinto Fault, Fault Zone and a stepover fault zone system. American researchers determined that previous flooding episodes from the River have been linked to earthquakes along the San Andreas Fault. Sonar and other instruments were used to map the Salton Seas underwater faults during the study. During the period when the basin was filled by Cahuilla, a much larger inland sea, earthquakes higher than magnitude 7 occurred roughly every 180 years, the last one occurring within decades of the year 1700. Computer models suggest that the faults in the area are most vulnerable to stress loading by the in-filling of water. Currently, a risk still exists for an earthquake of magnitude 7 or 8. Simulations also showed that in the Angeles area, shaking and thus damage would be more severe for a San Andreas earthquake that propagated along the fault from the south, rather than from the north. Such an earthquake also raises the risk for liquefaction in the Valley region.()The effective divide that separates the Salton Sea from the of California is approximately  in elevation and is located near Delta, northeastern California State, Mexico, south-southeast of Mexicali.() Past level rise may partially be responsible for the salinity of the lake, while potential future changes in sea levels could occur. However, other factors such as vents, diffusion of salt from minerals and sediment, including concentrated brine and evaporites are another contributor to salinity, as is the recent lowering of lake levels raising the salinity, though sedimentary records show that the lake surface elevation reached levels 1012 metres above sea level in the 1500s.()See also* Sea* Development Company* Sea* basin* Andreas Fault Observatory at DepthNotesReferences* Metzler, Chris and Springer, Jeff - Plagues & Pleasures on the Salton Sea Tilapia Film, 2006 - Thorough history of the first 100 years at the Salton Sea and the prospects for the future* Stevens, Joseph E. Hoover Dam. of Oklahoma Press, 1988. (Extensive details on the Salton Sea disaster.)Further reading* Setmire, James G., et al. (1993). Detailed study of water quality, bottom sediment, and biota associated with irrigation drainage in the Salton Sea area, California, 198890 Investigations Report 93-4014. Sacramento, Calif.: Department of the Interior, Geological Survey.* Setmire, James G., Wolfe, John C., and Stroud, Richard K. (1990). Reconnaissance investigation of water quality, bottom sediment, and biota associated with irrigation drainage in the Salton Sea area, California, 198687 Investigations Report 89-4102. Sacramento, Calif.: U.S. Department of the Interior, U.S. Geological Survey.**External links* Plagues & Pleasures on the Salton Sea a documentary on the Salton Sea* Salton Sea Authority* Salton Basin overview* Salton Sea data and other resources* From the Colorado River to the Salton Sea: The story of Imperial Valleys Water (slideshow)* US Bureau of Reclamations Salton Sea Restoration Project Office* The Salton Sea - A Photo Essay by Scott London* National Geographic photos of the Salton Sea* Calexico New River Committee, New River Tributary* The Salton Sea: an account of Harrimans fight with the Colorado River* The Accidental Seamoede:SaltonseeSaltnfo:SaltonvatnSeaSaltonSaltonSeaja:SeaSaltonru:-SeaSeaSalton
441676
Languages_of_France
There are a number of languages of France. French is the sole language and is by far the most widely spoken, but several languages are also spoken to varying degrees. Owing to immigration, a number of non-indigenous tongues are now also spoken in parts of the country. The map to the right displays the historical areas in which regional languages have been spoken. Some of these languages have also been spoken in neighboring countries; this is true in the case of Dutch (Vlamsch) and Walloon (wallon), a majority of whose speakers reside in Belgium.StatusThe official language of the French Republic is French (art. 2 of the French Constitution), and the French government is, by law, compelled to communicate primarily in French. The government, furthermore, mandates that commercial advertising be available in French (though it can also use other languages); see Law. The French government, however, does not mandate the usage of French in non-commercial publications by private individuals or corporations or in any other media.A revision of the French constitution creating official recognition of languages was implemented by the Parliament in Congress at Versailles in July 2008.(Article 75-1: (a new article): Les langues rgionales appartiennent au patrimoine de la France (Regional languages belong to the patrimony of France). See Loi constitutionnelle du 23 juillet 2008.)The 1999 Report written for the government by Cerquiglini identified 75 languages that would qualify for recognition under the governments proposed ratification of the Charter for Regional or Minority Languages. 24 of those languages are indigenous to the European territory of the state while all the others are from overseas areas of the French Republic (in the Caribbean, Indian Ocean, Pacific Ocean and South America).Although ratification was blocked by the Constitutional Council as contradicting the Fifth Republics constitutional provision enshrining French as the language of the Republic, the government continues to recognise regional and minority languages to a limited extent (i.e. without granting them official status) and the Dlgation gnrale  la langue franaise has acquired the additional function of observing and studying the languages of France and has had et aux langues de France added to its title. The category of languages of France (in French: langues de France) is thus administratively recognised even if this does not go as far as providing any official status.The regional languages of France are sometimes called patois, but this term (roughly meaning dialect) is often considered derogatory. Patois is used to refer to supposedly purely oral languages, but this does not, for instance, take into account that Occitan was already being written at a time when French was not and its literature has continued to thrive, with a Nobel Prize for Mistral in 1904.Language educationThe topic of the teaching of regional languages in public primary and secondary schools is controversial. Proponents of the measure state that it would be necessary for the preservation of those languages and to show respect to the local culture. Opponents contend that local languages are often non-standardised (thus making curricula difficult), of dubious practical usefulness (since most are spoken by a small number of people, without any sizable corpus of publications) and that the curriculum and funding of public schools are already too strained. The topic also leads to wider controversial questions of autonomy of the rgions. Regarding other languages, English, Spanish, Italian and German are the most commonly studied foreign languages in French schools.In April 2001, the Minister of Education, Jack Lang http://prouvenco.presso.free.fr/archi.educ.html#lang, admitted formally that for more than two centuries, the political powers of the French government had repressed regional languages, and announced that bilingual education would, for the first time, be recognised, and bilingual teachers recruited in French public schools. Cross-border languages Some of the languages of France are also cross-border languages (for example, Basque, Catalan, Picard, Norman, Franco-Provenal, Dutch, Occitan and others), some of which enjoy a recognised or official status in the respective neighbouring state or territory (including French itself in Belgium, Luxembourg, Switzerland and in the Val-dAoste).List of languagesThe languages of Metropolitan France include:* languages** languages:*** Ol language family:**** Bourguignon-Morvandiau**** Champenois or Campanois.**** Franc-Comtois.**** French.**** Gallo.**** Lorrain.**** Norman.**** Picard.**** Poitevin and Saintongeais.**** Walloon.**** Angevin.**** Manceau.**** Mayennais.**** Romande.*** language (also Lenga dc, Langue doc):**** Vivaroalpenc.**** Auvergnat.**** Gascon.***** Barnese (Barnais).***** Landese (Landais).**** Languedocien.**** Limousin.**** Nissart (Niois or Niart).**** Provenal.*** Franco-Provenal also named Arpitan:**** Bressan.**** Dauphinois.**** Forzien.**** Jurassien.**** Lyonnais.**** Savoyard.*** languages**** Corsican (Corsu).**** Ligurian language.*** Catalan (Northern Catalan).** languages:*** Alsatian (Elssserdeutsch).*** Flemish: Flemish dialect of Dutch.*** Franconian aka Lothringen.**language:*** Breton aka Brita or Brezhoneg.*isolate:** Basque aka Euskara.There are also several languages spoken in Frances overseas areas (see divisions of France for details)* Amerindian languages in Guiana,** language spoken by a small transplanted Cherokee community in French-speaking America. .* creole languages in the West Indies, Guiana and Runion (see:Creole, Creole, Guiana Creole and Creole).* Dutch and English in Martin* Many Austronesian languages:** in Caledonia (see: Caledonian languages, Island languages).**2 in & Futuna (see:language, language).** in Polynesia (Tahitian and other Polynesian languages).* shiMaore and shiBushi in Mayotte.* Kabyles spoken in New Caledonia. (Mehdi Lallaoui, Kabyles du Pacifique, 1994, ditions Au nom de la mmoire.)Sign Language is also recognised as a language of France.There are immigrant languages spoken in some parts of France.* Arabic (dialectal, mainly darija).* Armenian (Western Armenian mostly, due to immigration from former French mandates in the Middle East, Lebanon and Syria; but there is an increasing minority of Eastern Armenian speakers due to recent immigrants arriving from Armenia, Azerbaijan and Iran).* Bambara.* Berber.* Cambodian.* Chinese.* Danish.* Dutch** Dutch.* English (Martin), with significant minorities of British communities in Aquitaine (historic), Brittany, and in Nord-Pas-de-Calais (commuters working in UK but living in France), and from many countries dispersed in Paris and on dAzur (French Riviera); also the most widely taught foreign language in French schools, colleges and universities (before Spanish and German), but not widely used and understood after that, except in specific job positions (technical and tourism).* Finnish.* Albanian by refugees from Albania, Kosovo in former Yugoslavia and of Macedonia.* Standard German, also represented by regional dialects such as German.* Greek.* Hebrew.* Hindustani.* Hungarian.* Italian and dialects (spoken by Italian immigrant communities in many major French cities, as well as French regions of former Italian state possession, such as Nice, Savoie, Haute-Savoie and Corsica).* Japanese.* Kabyles from Algeria.* Korean.* Lao.* Lithuanian.* Mandarin.* Persian.* Polish* Portuguese from Portugal and Brazil.* Romanian.* Romany - spoken by the Roma people.* Russian.* Croatian - Brought over by workers and refugees from former Yugoslavia, the area made up of republics of Croatia and and Herzegovina.* Serbian.* Spanish; the second foreign language taught in French schools, also a major language of Latin American immigrants in France.* Tamil.* Thai.* Turkish.* Ukrainian.* Vietnamese.* Welsh - Introduced by small late 19th century  migration from Wales and miniscule community based in the mining basin of Nord-Pas-de-Calais. * Wolof, a West African language of the Gambia, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Mali, Mauritania, Senegal, and Western Sahara.* Yiddish.StatisticsAt the 1999 census, INSEE sampled 380,000 adult people all across France, and asked them questions about their family situation. One of the questions was about the languages that their parents spoke with them before the age of 5. This is the first time serious statistics were computed about the proportion of mother tongues in France. The results were published in Enqute familiale, Insee, 1999.Here is a list of the nine most prominent mother tongues in France based on Enqute familiale. If we add up people with mother tongue and people with some exposure to the language before the age of 5 (see note #3 below), then the five most important languages in metropolitan France are (note that the percentages add up to more than 100, because many people are now counted twice):* French: 42,100,000 (92%)* Occitan: 1,670,000 (3.65%)* German and German dialects: 1,440,000 (3.15%)* Ol languages (excl. French): 1,420,000 (3.10%)* Arabic: 1,170,000 (2.55%)Notes on the table1- The data in the table are about tongues, and not about actual language practice. It states that 14% of the adult people living in France in 1999 were born and raised up to the age of 5 in families that spoke only (or predominantly) some other languages than French. It does not mean that 14% of adult people in France spoke some other languages than French in 1999.2- Only adults (i.e. 18 years and older) were surveyed. This means that French people born between 1981 and 1999 are not included in the survey. The mother tongue of the younger generations is more predominantly French than is the case with the older generations, because as the Enqute familiale survey explains, regional and immigrant language transmission decreases dramatically with each new generation, as French replaces the regional and immigrant languages. In the Enqute familiale survey, only 35% of parents whose mother tongue was a regional or immigrant language reported they spoke that language to their children. Thus, the 86% figure of people with French as their mother tongue is an underestimate because the younger generations whose predominant mother tongue is French are not counted.3- The concept of mother tongue may not give a complete idea of the phenomenon of minority languages in France. This is because there are many people who were born and raised in families in which parents spoke to them only (or predominantly) French, but in which some regional or immigration languages were also occasionally used. One example:  while the data tell us that 610,000 adults in 1999 had one of the Occitan dialects as their mother tongue, the survey also found out that another 1,060,000 adults were born and raised in families in which one of the Occitan dialects was occasionally spoken. Some of these 1,060,000 people may speak Occitan as fluently as the 610,000 people who have it as a mother tongue, while some other (the majority, probably) have only a limited knowledge of Occitan. We cannot infer from this that 1,670,000 adults are speakers of Occitan, but it may be the case that the total number of people with some form of exposure to Occitan is higher than the 610,000 figure, though some of this number may have abandoned the language since then.See also* of France* Flibrige* of France* Gaulish* Frankish* French* Occitan* Anglo-Norman* of Villers-Cotterts* of the European Union* Vergonha* Wallonia* of French* language in Canada References External links*map of languages of France(clickable map)*Ethnologue report for France*Dlgation gnrale  la langue franaise et aux langues de France*Langues de France*Ikastola Elkartea association of bilingual Basque-French schools*Diwan Breizh association for promotion of Breton*Calandreta association of bilingual Occitan-French schools*La Bressola Catalan schools*http://www.tlfq.ulaval.ca/axl/europe/france.htmin Frankreichrgionles de Francede Franain Frankreichde Franciahizkuntzakrgionales ou minoritaires de Francede Franciadella Franciain Frankrijkin Frankriekregionalne Francjida Franai Frankrikeregionai dea Fransa
443343
Blantyre,_South_Lanarkshire
Blantyre ( or ; ) is a parish in Lanarkshire, Scotland with a population of 17,505.() The name is probably originally Cumbric blaen tir top of the land(Watson, W. (1926) A History of Celtic Place-names of Scotland. Edinburgh) which has been Gaelicised. It is bounded by the Clyde to the north, the Calder to the west, the Park Burn to the east and the Rotten Burn to the south. It is best known as the birthplace of Livingstone, the well-known explorer and missionary who was the first European to see (and name) the Falls. His former house is now a museum which is at the end of Station Road, on the banks of the Clyde. Also nearby is Castle, dating from the thirteenth century.(The history of Blantyre)Blantyre has a number of small hamlets. High Blantyre is the area to the east and south of Burnbrae Road and continues to High Blantyre cross at the north. It is thought to be the area of earliest settlement, with a Bronze Age village near Auchintibber  south of Blantyre Parish Church (High Blantyre). Also to the west is Greenhall Park, where the Calder flows to eventually join the Clyde near Flemington.Blantyre is loosely divided in half by Main Street, High Blantyre. At the west-end is Priory Bridge - named after the former Priory to the north which was home to monks from around 1235. There is also Coatshill and the village, the oldest industrially developed part of Blantyre. Glasgow Road continues south via Springwell and eventually joins to Burnbank. Next to the David Livingstone museum, at the end of Station Road, is an iron suspension footbridge which crosses the Clyde giving pedestrian access to Bothwell.Mine disasterOn 22 October 1877, Blantyre was the site of the mining disaster, where 207 miners (men and boys) were killed when a coal mine exploded due to methane gas. There is little doubt that safety regulations were not adhered to. Moore and Kelly along with local Blantyre singer/songwriter Semple recorded  well-known versions of the traditional song about this disaster. A monument to the disaster of which the youngest victim was a boy of 11 is at High Blantyre cross. The site of the mine now lies under the Kilbride expressway.(Information re. Mining disasters in Blantyre)Nearby towns and cities*Hamilton (borders the Burnbank, Hillhouse and Whitehill areas)*Glasgow (City Centre) *Bothwell *Cambuslang *Rutherglen *Kilbride *Motherwell SportFootballBlantyre presently has a football club competing in Junior Football Association competitions, Victoria F.C..  Known as the Vics, they won the Junior Cup (the highest achievement in junior football) in 1950, 1970 and 1982; their home ground is called Castle Park.() There was previously another junior club in the town, Celtic F.C., but they went out of existence in the early 1990s.SpeedwayThe town of Blantyre has long had links with speedway racing. In the pioneer days a group of riders who appeared at White City in Glasgow were known as The Blantyre Crowd. The operated their own track at Airbles Road in Motherwell in 1930 and this was known as Paragon Speedway. The greatest ever Scottish rider, Ken McKinlay came from Blantyre as did Tommy Miller who had a somewhat meteoric rise to stardom in 1950. Speedway was staged at the Greyhound Stadium as the home of the Glasgow Tigers in the late 1970s / early 1980s before the new road forced a move to Craighead Park which closed down at the end of the 1986 season.SkateboardingRecently, Blantyre Skate Park has received a lot of business as the youth company Radworx has been operating within it as well as some other skate parks. The skate park contains a 4 ft spine section as well as an 8 ft halfpipe, alongside a 6 ft counterpart. There is a 2 ft mini-bowl and a credible street section which contains two fun boxes as well as a 5-set.Schools*Primary Schools**St. Blanes**St. Josephs**Blantyre Primary**Livingstone Primary**Auchinraith Primary* High School**Academy*InstitutionsBlantyre contains many amenities, including:*Blantyre Leisure Centre - sports centre with swimming pool*Blantyre Asda*Stonefield Park - with a purpose-built skate-park*Victoria Nursing Home (for the elderly)*Livingstone Centre - museum built in the birthplace and former home of Livingstone*Five churches**Josephs (R.C.)**David Livingstone Memorial Church (C.o.S.)**Andrews (C.o.S.)**John Ogilvie  (R.C.)**Blantyre Old Parish Church (C.o.S.)*Dale House - Lanarkshire Council facility named after another famous Lanarkshire dweller, famous for his connection with Lanark*Blantyre Union*Terminal One - Fully equipped Youth Centre with state of the Art Multimedia equipment, Recording Studio and Rehearsal Room, Community Internet Cafe, Mobile youth facilities including 3 x DIGIBUSs and mobile climbing wall and lots more.(*Priory ParksYouthIn August 1983, a democratic non party political pressure group was formed in Blantyre called Blantyre Youth Council, which aimed to represent young peoples views in the town and actively engage young people in campaigning for better facilities. The Youth Council contributed over the next few years to developing youth invovement in the local Volunteer Centre and Community Council. BYC set up a Youth Enquiry Service for young people and a Claimants Union which advised young people and adults. The Youth Council conducted a series of public meetings for youth throughout the town and conducted a survey amongst the towns youth which demonstrated a need for more and cheaper facilities for young people. The full-time Youth Enquiry Service Base was in The Elizabeth Scott Centre (now Terminal One). In 1984, as part of their Working with young People(SRC 1984) policy, Strathclyde Regional Council created Blantyre Youth Development team against initial opposition from Blantyre Youth Council who saw no need for an Officer/Adult led organisation in a town with an active and successful Youth Council. Blantyre Youth Council eventually agreed to disband however and support the Youth Development Team on the principle that it was to be youth led. At an early meeting, the Youth Development Team unanimously agreed to support a motion calling for the organisation to concentrate its energies on creating a Youth Centre in the town. The YDT gained charity status in 1997 and created the Terminal One youth centre.() provides services to the young people of Blantyre and North Hamilton including music tuition, multimedia artistic tuition, recording studios, youth clubs, excursions, and self-development programmes. It is funded by Lanarkshire Council, the Scottish Arts Council and the Blantyre/North Hamilton SIP.David LivingstoneBlantyres most famous son is the 19th century missionary and explorer Livingstone; there is a museum, the Livingstone Centre, at the bottom of Station Road. This centre includes a museum, a playpark, a cafe, a shop, an African Garden and several workshop studios. An adventure assault course also existed here until a young man died in 1995.The largest city and commercial centre of Malawi, one of the countries which Livingstone explored, is still called Blantyre, having been named for Livingstones birthplace during the colonial era.Other famous peopleOther famous people from Blantyre include:* Murray, American Trade Union Leader, One of the most important American labor leaders of the 20th century* Fletcher, actor, musician.* Christie, an anarchist, who at the age of 18 was to stand trial in Spain for plotting to blow up General Franco.* Bulloch, drummer of the Scottish group Mogwai.* Miller, speedway rider - Scottish Champion.* McKinlay, speedway rider - multi world finalist.ReferencesExternal links* Google Map of Blantyre and surrounds*More historical info.See also*of places in South LanarkshireDe Swydd Lanark(South Lanarkshire)(cosse)an t-Saoir(Scozia)South LanarkshireSkottland()
445110
Eastern_Oregon
right|thumb|Eastern Oregon population according to the 8 county definition.Eastern Oregon is the eastern part of the state of Oregon. It is not an officially recognized geographic entity, thus the boundaries of the region vary according to context. It is sometimes understood to include only the eight easternmost counties in the state; in other contexts, it includes the entire area east of the Range. Cities in the broadest definition include Baker City, Bend, Burns, Klamath Falls, La Grande, Ontario, Pendleton, and The Dalles. Major industries include timber, agriculture, and tourism, with the main transportation corridors consisting of I-84, U.S. Route 395, U.S. Route 97, U.S. Route 26, U.S. Route 30, and U.S. Route 20. Compared to the climate of Oregon, the climate of Eastern Oregon is a drier continental climate, with much greater seasonal variations in temperature. Unlike the Valley, Eastern Oregon receives a significant amount of snow in the winter. Some parts of Eastern Oregon receive fewer than  of rain yearly, classifying them as deserts. This desert climate is in part due to a shadow effect caused by the Range. Pine and juniper forests cover 35% of Eastern Oregon, much in the mountains that include the Blue Mountains, Mountains, Mountains, Creek Mountains, Mountains, and Mountain. Volcanic flows from the River Basalt Group covered large sections of Eastern Oregon 6 to 17 million years ago. Other landforms include the Desert, Desert, Warner Valley, Deschutes River, River, Ronde River, Canyon, The Honeycombs, and Butte. Geography mts lake.jpg|right|thumb|Mountains and glacial lake in Wallowa County attract tourists to the area.Image:Oregon Trail IC Baker City OR.jpg|right|thumb|Baker City is home to the Historic Oregon Trail Interpretive Center.thumb|Downtown BurnsAccording to the Eastern Oregon Visitors Association, Eastern Oregon includes only the following counties: Morrow, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Grant, Baker, Harney, and Malheur.() Other definitions of the region are sometimes more restrictive,() others include the base eight counties listed above plus several adjacent counties,(Explore Eastern Oregon. Oregon Parks and Recreation Department. Retrieved on October 26, 2007.)(Eastern Oregon. Guide to Oregon. Retrieved on October 26, 2007.) while some definitions include the entire area east of the Cascade Range;(Are Introduced Plants Common in Eastern Oregon Forests? United States Forest Service. Retrieved on October 26, 2007.) this meaning would also include Sherman, Crook, Deschutes, Gilliam, Jefferson, Klamath, Lake, Wasco, and Wheeler counties.The extreme eastern section of Oregon in the River Valley, including Ontario, is part of the Valley, which extends east to Idaho; unlike the rest of the state, that section lies within the Time Zone.  Mount Heaton is the regions highest mountain. Image:JosephCanyonPanorama.jpg|thumb|Canyon Cities Top 15 most populated Eastern Oregon Cities (according to the 8 county definition)By extending the boundary outside to include neighboring counties, Eastern Oregon would include four of the largest population centers east of the Range  Bend, Redmond, Falls, and Dalles. However, these lie outside the stricter boundary. Climate and ecology Compared to the maritime rainforest climate of Oregon, which is adjacent to the Ocean, the climate of Eastern Oregon is a drier continental climate, with much greater seasonal variations in temperature. Unlike the Willamette Valley, Eastern Oregon gets a significant amount of snow in the winter. Some parts of Eastern Oregon receive fewer than  of rain yearly, classifying them as deserts. The driest parts are the southeast and the area near Redmond. This desert climate is in part due to a shadow effect caused by the Range. Pine and juniper forests cover 35% of Eastern Oregon, especially in the mountains east of Klamath Falls and in the Blue Mountains.Image:8milewheat.jpg|thumb|right|Freshly tilled wheat fields on western edge of wheat growing area in central County Economy The regions economy is primarily agricultural. Timber and mining, while formerly key industries, have decreased in importance in recent years. Historical tourism is on the rise.  The wheat growing region of Eastern Oregon includes the Plateau portion of northeastern Oregon, which begins with very marginal wheat fields in central Wasco County and extends east through Umatilla County. South of the wheat lands of northeast Oregon, agricultural activity is generally limited to livestock grazing except where irrigation is available. Irrigated areas are often used to produce alfalfa hay. Transportation Image:Joda sheeprock.jpg|thumb|The John Day River passing by Sheep Rock in the Day Fossil Beds National MonumentHistorically, the region has been relatively isolated from Oregon, due to the difficulty of crossing the Cascades. Early settlers floated down the River from Dalles to reach Western Oregon.  In 1845, Barlow built a road around the south side of Hood, which served as the final leg of the Trail. The Trail and Wagon Road were constructed soon after, connecting eastern and western Oregon in the southern and central parts of the state. In the early 20th century, Hill built the Columbia River Highway, allowing automobiles to pass through the River Gorge.Railroads began to be important as early as 1858 with the construction of the Portage Railroad which built a  bypass around the rapids at Cascade Locks.  This was followed by the 1862 incorporation of the Oregon Steam Navigation Company whose operations included building a rail bypass from The Dalles to Falls.  In 1880 these two short sections of rail were incorporated into the Railway and Navigation Company (OR&N). Shortly thereafter Villard, who then controlled OR&N, moved aggressively to block entry of the then under construction Pacific Railway into the Columbia Gorge.() In an agreement first made in March 1880 and formalized in the fall of 1880, the Northern Pacific Railway, then controlled by Billings, and the OR&N, at that time controlled by Henry Villard, agreed to divide the Plateau at the River, with the Northern Pacific staying to the north and the OR&N staying to the south. Northern Pacific was not to build down the gorge into Portland, but would receive trackage rights on the tracks that OR&N was building on the south bank into Portland.( The first St. Paul-Portland Northern Pacific train arrived in Portland on September 12, 1883, via OR&N trackage down the Oregon side of the Columbia River from Washington forever ending the isolation of at least the northern portion of Eastern Oregon.(  A year later in November 1884, the Short Line was completed across southern Idaho, and met the OR&N at the border station of Huntington( providing rail service that essentially paralleled the Oregon Trail all the way from Omaha, Nebraska.  Later the OR&N became part of the Pacific Railway.  The only other railroad ever built east over the Cascade Mountains was trackage that was to become part of the Pacific Transportation Company which was opened in 1926 over Pass to Klamath Falls(from trainweb.org)  to bypass the difficult line south of Oregon to Oregon.All-weather highways over the Cascade Mountains were not completed until the 1930s and 1940s.(Engeman, Richard H. Subtopic : Revival Styles, Highway Alignment: 1890-1940: One Big City, Many Small Towns. The Oregon History Project. Retrieved on October 29, 2007.)(Tonsfeldt, Ward and Paul G. Claeyssens. Subtopic : Post-Industrial Years: 1970-Present: Tourism and Recreation. The Oregon History Project. Retrieved on October 29, 2007.)Major road routes through eastern Oregon include I-84 from Ontario to the River Gorge. The only other interstate freeway in the region is an eleven mile (18 km) stretch of Interstate 82 that ends at the River in Umatilla. U.S. Route 395 is a major North-South route, passing through Pendleton, Burns, John Day, and Lakeview. Further west, U.S. Route 97 runs North and South from the California border through Klamath Falls, Bend, and Redmond to Biggs Junction on the River. Other major east-west routes include U.S. Route 26, U.S. Route 30, U.S. Route 20 and Route 730.Secessionist movementSome residents of Eastern Oregon feel that the state of Oregon, with the majority of its population and political control based in the western part of the state, has neglected the eastern part of the state, preventing it from developing along with the western part. A movement to have Eastern Oregon secede and join the States as a state was underway in 2008.() This movement is similar to other Northwest secession proposals such as Jefferson, Lincoln, and Cascadia.See also*Regions of OregonReferencesOregon
446953
Kasai-Oriental
 website              kasaiest.cdKasai-Oriental (East Kasai in English) is one of the ten provinces of the Republic of Congo. It borders the provinces of Kasai-Occidental to the west, quateur to the northwest, Orientale to the northeast, Maniema to the east, and Katanga to the south. Kasai-Oriental is one of the richest diamond producing regions in the world. The provincial capital is Mbuji-Mayi.Following the 2005 Constitution (effective 18 February 2006), Kasai-Oriental was to be divided into the three new provinces within 36 months (18 February 2009): Kasai-Oriental, Lomami, and Sankuru. As of October 2010, this had not taken place.()HistoryKasai-Oriental is inhabited by members of the Luba tribe.Congo obtained independence from Belgium in 1960. Friction with Congos other ethnic groups and encouragement by Belgian corporations hoping to keep their mining concessions led to the secession of the province of Kasai as a separate state headed by Kalonji.After being repulsed, the Congo occupied the province in September 1961. Several thousand people were killed during the pacification of South Kasai, which lasted through the spring of 1962.The population of Mbuji-Mayi grew rapidly with the immigration of Luba people from other parts of the country.Diamond miningThe region in which Mbuji-Mayi is situated annually produces one-tenth in weight of the worlds industrial diamonds, with mining managed by the Socit Minire de Bakwanga. This is the largest accumulation of diamonds in the world, more concentrated than those at Kimberley, Africa. Mbuji-Mayi handles most of the industrial diamonds produced in the Congo.Political divisionsThe province consists of the following five territories:* Kabeya-Kamwanga* Katanda* Lupatapata* Miabi* TshilengeCities and townsLanguagesFrench is the official language. Tshiluba is one of the four national languages of the Democratic Republic of the Congo. Tshiluba is spoken by about 6.3 million people in the Kasai-Oriental, Kasai and Lulua provinces.References(Orientalde:Kasai-Orientalfr:Kasa-Oriental (1966-2005)id:Kasai-Orientaldel Kasai Orientaleya Monyltartomnyms:Kasai-Orientalnl:Oost-KasaWschodnie (1966-2005)(1966-2006)()
447925
Masvingo_Province
Masvingo is a Province in Zimbabwe found in the south-eastern section of the landlocked country. It borders Mozambique on its eastern border and the provinces of South to the south, Midlands to the north and west and Manicaland to the north east.(High Resolution Map of Masvingo Province) It was called Province before 1982.HistoryThe town was founded in 1890 and was the first large settlement to be established by the Column of the BSAC which makes it the oldest town in Zimbabwe. It was named Fort Victoria after Victoria.The province is largely populated by members of the Karanga tribe, who are the most populous tribe in Zimbabwe,and are a sub-group of the Shona speaking tribes that also include the Zezuru, Manyika and Ndau. Masvingo province, known before 1980 as Victoria province, is in the drier lowveldt area in the south of Zimbabwe. The boundaries were changed slightly in the 1980s. From white settlement until 2000 most of the area was devoted to cattle ranching, with mining and cane growing (irrigated from Mutirikwi), and communal areas where subsistence farming is carried out. With the land reforms of the early 21st century large scale cattle and mixed farms are being redistributed to small farmers.GeographyImage:Kopje A1 Highway Masvingo.jpg|260px|thumb|right|Beautiful scenery along the A1 highway between Beitbridge & Masvingo, 2006Masvingo (formerly Fort Victoria) is the capital of the province. Chiredzi and Triangle are other major towns in the province.PopulationDespite the aridness, the residents of the province are proud tillers of the earth and like most Nguni tribes in Africa they practise animal husbandry to supplement their diets. In fact, like the rest of the country, their most prized possessions are cattle, which patriarchs demand as lobola, bride-price (dowry), in return for the hand of their daughters in marriage. The status of men in the villages in the province is assessed according to the number of cattle they possess - those with no cattle are not considered men. Cattle owners were dismayed during the drought of 1992 when then 90 percent of the cattle in the province died of famine.(Cattle Ruslting http://allafrica.com/stories/200305230001.html(accessed 17 February 2008))The province has an area of 56,566 km and a population of approximately 1.3 million (2002). The Karanga form a majority in the province. In District, there are communities of Shangani people while those of the Ndebele are found on the western edge of the province. To the north-east, are found the Ndau. The white population has declined continuously since independence, heightened during the invasions of white commercial farms in 2000. In fact, the first farm invasion occurred in Masvingo Province and the rest of the country followed suit.ClimateMasvingo province is located in the low veld of the country where rainfall is minimal and uncertain. a large of the southern part of the province is drought prone, set as region 5 in the countrys climatic regions. Most parts of the province, therefore, are generally unfit for agriculture, apart from cattle ranching. Masvingo have most of the educated population in Zimbabwe.(Millions in need of food aid http://allafrica.com/stories/200308200129.html(accessed 17 February 2008))(Experiment success http://allafrica.com/stories/200209160239.html(accessed 17 February 2008))(Harsh Times http://query.nytimes.com/gst/fullpage.html?res9B0DE7DD1630F93BA15755C0A961948260 (accessed 17 February 2008)) Valley estates in Chiredzi and Triangle use the water from Kyle for irrigation.TopographyThe province is dominated by the Save, Runde, Mwenezi and Limpopo river systems which all either join or drain directly into the Ocean. The only notable mountain range is the Chimanimani Mountain Range in the east. Kopjes, grey and bald in the hot sun, dot the countryside. Mopane trees, drought tolerant and sturdy, are found throughout the province.The busy A1 highway connects the major centers of Masvingo and Beitbridge.GovernmentThe provinces leader is a governor appointed by the countrys president for a five year term of office. The province also sends six elected members to the Senate plus a number of chiefs. In addition, twenty six members of parliament, selected from the provinces seven districts, are sent to the House of Assembly.thumb|leftt|150px|Districts of MasvingoDistrictsThe districts are run by the rural district councils, which are composed of members elected from the wards in the district.Masvingo is divided into 7 administrative districts, although these can be further divided by the delimitation committee during elections depending on population figures. The districts are Bikita, Chivi, Zaka and Masvingo in the center of the province, Gutu in the north, and Mwenezi, and Chiredzi in the south and east respectively. All these seven districts have business centres known as growth points and they are as follows with estimation of distance from Masvingo city centre: Masvingo- Nemanwa (30 km), Bikita- Nyika (82 km), Zaka- Jerera (96 km), Gutu- Mpandawana (94 km).ElectionsMasvingo was generally regarded as a stronghold of ZANU-PF, the ruling party. In the last parliamentary elections of 2005, ZANU-PF won all but one district of the fourteen seats up for grabs.(Zimbabwe Election Commission) In the upcoming election of March, 2008 the seven districts have been cut to produce 26 constituencies.(Mbeki In Zimbabwe)150px|thumb|left|Typical bus station scene in districts scattered across the province. At every bus station along the highway is found a retail shop.AttractionsThe province has a number of attractions. In the east of the province along the Mozambique border is National Park, part of the Gaza, Kruger and Gonarezhou Transfrontier Park concept. Less than an hour away to the east lies the world famous stone ruins of Zimbabwe National Monument, from which Zimbabwe draws its name. A little closer to the stone ruins is Kyle, a huge body of water where people spend time engaged in recreational actives in Recreational Park. Tourism is a major contributor to the provinces GDP, as is agriculture.PersonalitiesThe province has produced a number of illustrious figures in the history of the country. Famous sons of the province include :- Zimbabwes first vice-president, nationalist and founding father of Zimbabwe, Muzenda;(Obituary: Muzendahttp://www.highbeam.com/doc/1G1-107989854.html(accessed 17 February 2008))Harvard trained lawyer ,nationalist and politician Zvobgo, Nationalist Mandizvidza, ambassador Mudenge and Chidoda; Member Of Parliament Mahova; Chief Air-Marshall Tungamirai; Governor Hungwe.(ZANU-PF Mukonoweshuro. http://allafrica.com/stories/200310020132.html(accessed 17 February 2008))  The popular singer, Matavire, aka Dr. Love was from Mwenezi, while Gen. Zvinavashe, the second supreme commander of the Defence Forces, is from Gutu, Emmerson Dambudzo Mnangagwa who was raised in Chivi.Image galleryImage:Homestead Magomana.jpgImage:Flame Lily.jpgImage:Nyala Tree Manyuchi.jpgImage:Cattle Manyuchi.jpgImage:Maranda Mwenezi Villagers.jpgImage:Kopje A1 Highway Masvingo.jpgImage:Motorist Beitbridge Highway.jpgImage:Rutenga Scene.jpgSee also* of Zimbabwe* of ZimbabweReferencesExternal links* Lake Kyle Recreational Park http://www.zimparks.com/html/kyle.html* Zimbabwean Online Community(provinsie)bg:(provins)(Provinz)provintsde Masvingoprobintziade Masvingodi Masvingo()(provincie)ja:(provins)(prowincja)pt:MasvingoMasvingo()sr:fi:Masvingosv:Masvingotr:Masvingozh:
449056
Derwentside
PopulationLastYear2001()      Derwentside was, from 1974 to 2009,  a local government district in Durham, England.The district took its name from the River Derwent, which made up part of the northern border of the district. Its main towns were Consett and Stanley, with the district council offices on Consetts Medomsley Road. The rest of the district was semi-rural, with numerous former pit villages running into one another.FormationThe district was formed on 1 April 1974 under the Government Act 1972, which reorganised local administration throughout England and Wales. The district was a merger of three abolished districts:(*Consett Urban District*Stanley Urban District*Rural District.Derwentside was one of eight districts into which County Durham was divided in 1974. It was bounded on the east by Chester-le-Street District, to the south-east by the City of Durham and to the south and west by Valley District. To the north the district was bounded by the Metropolitan County of and Wear and to the north west by Northumberland.(EconomyDerwentsides economy was traditionally based on the steel industry and coal mining. With the loss of these industries, the district struggled with unemployment, although Union funding provided a boost to local businesses and visitor attractions.Elections and political controlThe first election to Derwentside District Council took place on 7 June 1973, with the 55 councillors elected forming a shadow authority until 1 April 1974.(() Elections of the whole council were next held in 1976, and every four years thereafter.() Throughout the councils existence it was controlled by the Labour Party, initially with very large majorities.  The main opposition group were the Independents. At the final election prior to abolition, held in 2007, Labours majority was reduced to only three seats.()Coat of armsDerwentside District Council were granted armorial bearings by the of Arms in 1975. The patent were dated 8 May 1975, and the arms were blazoned as follows:(The Armorial Bearings of the Derwentside District Council, information sheet published by the council, undated.)Barry wavy of eight Argent and Azure an Eagle displayed wings inverted Or gorged with a Mural Crown proper pendent therefrom by a ring a Cross of St. Cuthbert and charged on each wing with a like Cross Azure. Crest: On a wreath of the colours In front of Flames a Miners Pick head upwards in pale and two Swords points upwards in Saltire proper hilts and pomels Or pendent from the Pick by a Chain Argent a Roman Shield Sable charged with a Thunderbolt and on a Bordure Or ten Pellets.Badge:A Fountain charged with an Eagle as in the Arms.The shield had a field of silver and blue waves, representing the Rivers Derwent, Deerness and Browney. On top of this was placed a Roman eagle, for the Roman settlements at Ebchester, Lanchester, Street and Stanley. About the eagles neck was a crown representing a city wall, and thus local government. On the eagles breast and wings were three crosses of Cuthbert, patron saint of Durham: these suggested the union of three County Durham councils in one.( Upon a helm with torse and mantling was the crest. The swords and flames stood for the steel industry and the pickaxe for coalmining. Hanging from the axe was a Roman shield bearing a thunderbolt for the broadcasting station at Pike.(The Latin motto was Donec Defluet Amnis or Until the river ceases to flow. It was adapted from the writings of the Roman poet Horace.( Town Twinning Derwentside district was twinned with Werdohl in Germany. Abolition The district was abolished as part of the structural changes to local government in England. On 1 April 2009 the two-tier system of administration in County Durham was replaced, with a unitary County Council replacing both the existing county council and district councils.()In 2009, County Council unveiled plans for the regeneration of Consett. These plans involved the demolition of the former headquarters of Derwentside District Council at Consett Civic Centre and the relocation of AFC to Crookhall. The site was to be redeveloped and the new Consett Academy built there. ()On 5th July 2010, the of State for Education announced plans for the overhaul of Englands school building programme. The announcement stated that it would be irresponsible to carry on regardless with an inflexible, and needlessly complex programme. () Many building programmes that had not commenced were cancelled but the plans for Consett Academy and an academy at nearby Stanley were for discussion.Local opponents to the building of an academy on the Belle Vue site in Consett launched an application to have the land registered as a green. This would prohibit the development of the land. A public inquiry was held at Consett Civic Centre during the week commencing 12th July 2010. () Electoral wards ReferencesExternal links*Derwentside District Council*Derwentside Partnership*Discussion Forum for People of Derwentside de:Derwentsideit:Derwentsidenl:Derwentsideno:Derwentsidero:Derwentside
450913
Coatbridge
area_total_sq_mi6.818 Coatbridge is a town in Lanarkshire, Scotland, about  east of Glasgow city centre, set in the Lowlands. The town, with neighbouring Airdrie, is part of the Glasgow  urban area. The first settlement of the area stretches back to the Age era. Foundations of the town can be traced back to the 12th century when a Charter was granted to the Monks of Abbey by King Malcolm IV. Coatbridge, along with its neighbour Airdrie, forms the area known as the Monklands. It was during the last years of the 18th century that the area developed from a loose collection of hamlets into the town of Coatbridge. The towns development and growth have been intimately connected with the technological advances of the revolution, and in particular with the blast process. Coatbridge was a major Scottish centre for iron works and coal mining during the 19th century and in this period Coatbridge was described as the industrial heartland of Scotland(Coatbridge (Images of Scotland) By Helen Moir. The History Press (2001). ISBN 0-7524-2132-8) and the Iron Burgh. Coatbridge also had a notorious reputation for air pollution and the worst excesses of industry. By the time of the 1920s however coal seams were exhausted and the iron industry in Coatbridge was in rapid terminal decline. After the Depression the Gartsherrie ironwork was the last remaining iron works in the town. One publication has commented that in modern day Coatbridge coal, iron and steel have all been consigned to the heritage scrap heap.(Collins Encyclopaedia of Scotland (1994) Eds. J & J Keay, HarperCollins Publishers, p.175)Coatbridge today is best described as a class town anchored to Glasgow, the largest city in Scotland. Coatbridge has also been described as uniquely populated largely by people of Irish descent.(Sport and the Contestation of Ethnic Identity: Football and Irishness in Scotland in Journal of Ethnic and Migration Studies - Joseph M. Bradley (2006) p.15)HistoryThere are various explanations for the origin of the towns name. The place name Coatbridge first appears on a number of 19th century maps, although Roys 1750 map notes Cottbrig as a hamlet in the Old Monkland area. One source states Coatbridge is either derived from the Middle English cote (cottage) or from the Welsh coed meaning wood.() An alternate explanation is that from around the 13th century the local area was owned by the Colt family, sometimes known as Coats, and their estate generated place-names such as Coatbridge, Coatdyke, Coathill and Coatbank.()  Drummond and Smith suggest the name derives from the granting of land to Ranulphus le Colt around the time of the 12th century.(Coatbridge: Three Centuries of Change  Peter Drummond and James Smith, Monkland Library Services, 1982. pg. 11) Early history: from Bronze Age to Middle Ages Settlement of the Coatbridge area dates back 3000 years to the Age.()  A circle of Age stone coffins was found on the Drumpellier estate in 1852.(The Raddle  Journal of Monklands Historical Society. Volume 10, September 2005.) A number of other Bronze Age urns and relics have been found in Coatbridge.(Lanarkshire - An Inventory Of The Prehistoric And Roman Monuments - Royal Commission On The Ancient And Historical Monuments Of Scotland. HMSO - RCHMS, Edinburgh. 1978. pp. 40, 71, 75) An Age wood and thatch cranng dwelling was sited in the Loch at the present day Drumpellier Country Park. Dependant upon the water level in the loch, the remains can still be seen today.(Coatbridge (Images of Scotland) Helen Moir. The History Press (2001). ISBN 0-7524-2132-8; pg. 7)Roman coins have been unearthed in Coatbridge,() and there are the remains of a Roman road on the fringes of the town near the M8 motorway.() Middle Ages to late 18th century Nether Warde of Clyds-dail map c.1654 which depicts the hamlets of Kirkwood, Dunpelder, Wheatflet, Dunbath, Gartshary in the modern day Coatbridge areaThe Monklands area inherited its name after the area was granted to the Cistercian monks of Abbey(Scottish Burgh and County Heraldry  RM Urqhuart. Heraldry Today (1973); pg. 188) by King Malcolm IV in 1162. 1n 1323 the Monklands name appeared for the first time on charter.(Coatbridge (Images of Scotland) By Helen Moir. The History Press (2001). ISBN 0-7524-2132-8; pg. 7) The Monks mined coal and farmed the land until the time of the reformation when the land was taken from them and given to private landowners. In 1641 the parish of Monklands was divided between New Monkland (present day Airdrie) and Old Monkland (present day Coatbridge).(Collins Encyclopaedia of Scotland (1994) Eds. J & J Keay, HarperCollinsPublishers, pg. 175) In 1745 Prince Charlies Jacobite army seized Coatbridge from government troops on their march to Edinburgh in an action described as the Canter of Coatbridge.( Coatbridge was described in the 1799 Statistical Account as an immense garden with extensive orchards, luxurious crops where rivers abound with salmon.()19th centuryThe Canal was constructed at the end of the 18th century initially to transport coal to Glasgow from the rich local deposits. The invention of the blast furnace process in 1828 meant that Coatbridges ironstone deposits could be exploited to the maximum by the canal link and hot blast process.(Drummond, Peter and James Smith (1982). Coatbridge: Three Centuries of Change. Monkland Library Services; pg. 15) The new advances meant that iron could be produced with two thirds less fuel.(Miller, Thomas Roland (1958). The Monkland Tradition. Thomas Nelson and Sons, pg. 26) By the mid 19th century there were numerous hot blast furnaces in operation in Coatbridge.The prosperous industry which had sprung up around the new iron industry required vast numbers of largely unskilled workers to mine ironstone and work in the furnace plants. Coatbridge therefore became a popular destination for vast numbers of Irish (especially from Donegal in Ulster) arriving in Scotland. The iron bars and plates produced in Coatbridge iron works were the raw materials needed throughout the Empire for railways, construction, bridge building and shipbuilding. One example of uses Coatbridge iron was put to included armour plating for British ships fighting in the War.(Miller, Thomas Roland (1958). The Monkland Tradition. Thomas Nelson and Sons, pg. 36)Over the course of the following forty years the population of Coatbridge grew by 600%.(Collins Encyclopaedia of Scotland (1994) Eds. J & J Keay, HarperCollinsPublishers, pg. 175) The character of the Coatbridge area changed from a rural, Presbyterian landscape of small hamlets and farmhouses into a crowded, polluted, Catholic industrial town. In 1840, The Rev. William Park wrote that:(Historical, biographical and literary sketches of Glasgow and Lanarkshire, part 1&2. Hamilton herald printing and publishing. 1904, pg. 26)One contemporary observer at this time noted that Coatbridge is not famous for its sylvan beauties of its charming scenery and offers the visitor no inducements to loiter long. However, a visit to the large Gartsherrie works is one of the sights of a lifetime.(Historical, Biographical and Literary Sketches of Glasgow and Lanarkshire, Part 1&2. Hamilton Herald Printing and Publishing. 1904. p26) Most of the towns population lived in tight rows of houses built under the shadow of the iron works. These homes were often owned by their employers. Living conditions for most were appalling, tuberculosis was rife.(Peden, Allan (1992). The Monklands: Illustrated Architectural Guide. Edinburgh: RIAS; pg. 38) For a fortunate few though fortunes could be won with a rapidity only equalled by the princely gains of some of the adventurers who accompanied Pizarro to Peru, noted one observer.( Among the most notable success stories were the six sons of Coatbridge farmer Alexander Baird. The Baird family had become involved in coal mining but opened an iron foundry in order to exploit the new hot blast process of iron smelting invented by Beaumont Neilson. The Bairds subsequently constructed numerous iron foundries in Coatbridge including the famous Gartsherrie iron works.(Coatbridge: Three Centuries of Change  Peter Drummond and James Smith, Monkland Library Services, 1982) The waste heap or bing from the Bairds Gartsherrie works was said to be as large as the great pyramid in Egypt. One son, James Baird, was responsible for erecting sixteen blast-furnaces in Coatbridge between 1830 and 1842.() Each of the six sons of Alexander Baird was reputed to have become a millionaire.( The town was vividly described by Robert Baird in 1845:((Quoted in The County of Lanark by George Thomson (Collins, 1960), pg. 32)File:Summerlee1.jpg|200px|thumb|left|Summerlee blast furnaces in turn of the century Coatbridge. The present day Heritage Park is sited here. In the 19th century the Baird family wielded a pervasive influence over Coatbridge. They were responsible for the design of the lay out of present day Coatbridge town centre. The land for the Town Hall and the land which later came to form Dunbeth Park was gifted to the town by the Bairds. Gartsherrie church was built by the Baird family. The Bairds donated the site on the Main Street for the erection of St. Patricks Catholic Church. However, they also used patronage of the Order to try and undermine the local union movement.(The Social History of Religion in Scotland since 1730 (Routledge, 1987); Callum Brown, pg. 164)20th/21st centuriesBy the end of the 19th century the once plentiful Monklands ironstone deposits had been largely exhausted by 1885.( It became increasing expensive to produce iron in Coatbridge as raw materials had to be imported from as far afield as Spain. The growth of the steel industry (in nearby Motherwell) had also led to a start of a decline in demand for the pig iron Coatbridge produced. Living conditions remained grim. In the 1920s Lloyd Georges Coal and Power report described the living conditions in the Rosehall area of Coatbridge: ()Orwells book Road to Wigan Pier was illustrated by a photograph of homes in the Rosehall area of Coatbridge.(Coatbridge: Three Centuries of Change  Peter Drummond and James Smith, Monkland Library Services, 1982. P.39) In 1934 there was an exodus to Corby in England when the local Union Plant relocated. This had the effect of a hammer blow impact on the towns iron industry and ushered in the end of serious iron production. The decline of the Clydeside shipbuilding industry in the 1950s meant the demand for iron finally collapsed.() A legacy of devastating(The Oxford Companion to Scottish History. Michael Lynch (ed.) OUP Oxford (2007); pg. 394) unemployment, appalling housing conditions and some of the worst overcrowding in Scotland left its stamp on the Coatbridge of the early 1930s.(The Monklands: Illustrated Architectural Guide by Peden, Allan (pg. 38), RIAS, Edinburgh. 1992) As late as 1936 Coatbridge was the most overcrowded place in Scotland.  In the 1930s and 1950s however massive programmes of state-sponsored house building saw thousands of new homes built in Coatbridge and some of the worst examples of slum housing were cleared away. By the early 1980s 85% of homes in Coatbridge were part of local authority housing stock.(Coatbridge: Three Centuries of Change  Peter Drummond and James Smith, Monkland Library Services, 1982; pg. 42) The last of the blast furnaces, William Bairds famous Gartsherrie works, closed in 1967.(Since the 1970s there have been various initiatives to attempt to regenerate Coatbridge. Urban Aid grants, Union grants and, more recently, Social Inclusion Partnerships have attempted to breathe new life into Coatbridge. Despite these efforts the towns population has continued to fall and in recent years the town has been dubbed the most dismal in Scotland.( )GeographyAt  (55.861, -4.047), Coatbridge is situated in Scotlands Lowlands. The town lies  above level,  east of Glasgow,  south of Cumbernauld and  west of Airdrie. Although Coatbridge has no major river running through it, the Calder Water runs east-west to the south and the now defunct Canal used to run straight through the centre of the town toward Glasgow. The canal route through Coatbridge can still be seen today. There are also several smaller burns which run through Coatbridge, most of which drain to the Calder Water. Coatbridge has four significant public parks. Dunbeth park, West End park, Whifflet park and Drumpellier Country park. Woodend and Witchwood Loch are situated on the north-west edge of Coatbridge.TopographyThe topography of Coatbridge was an important feature in the towns development during the revolution. Coatbridge rests 60 metres below the Slamannan plateau which neighbouring Airdrie sits on the edge of. The low lying flat ground of Coatbridge was a vital factor in the siting of the towns blast furnaces and the Canal route. Although Airdrie was an already established town and had local supplies of ironstone, the Monkland Canal link did not extend into Airdrie because of its higher elevation.(Coatbridge: Three Centuries of Change  Peter Drummond and James Smith, Monkland Library Services, 1982. P.7) The Valley plan of 1949 described Coatbridge as situated over a flooded coalfield.(Coatbridge: Three Centuries of Change  Peter Drummond and James Smith (Monkland Library Services, 1982) p.25) Tenement buildings in Coatbridge were not built to the same level as Glasgow tenements due to danger of local subsidence from centuries of local mining.(Drummond, Peter and James Smith (1982). Coatbridge: Three Centuries of Change. Monkland Library Services, p.40) Geology Dunbeth hill where the present local authority municipal buildings stand is a wedge of rock which was probably squeezed upwards by the force of two (now-extinct) fault lines. There are the remains of spreads of glacial sands along the crest of Drumpellier, the west bank of Gartsherrie Burn and along modern day Bank Street. Kirkwood, Kirkshaws and Shawhead sit on a sandstone capped ridge looking south over the Clyde Valley. The vital Coatbridge black band coal field extended from Langloan to beyond the eastern edge of the town.( thumb|centre|780px| View of Coatbridge from the east. Landmarks from left to right are: Gartsherrie Academy, Gartsherrie Church, Coatbridge Library, Canal Bridge, High Coats & Dunbeth Court flats. Whitelaw Fountain can just be glimpsed under the Canal Bridge. It was noted in the early 20th century that The cross at Coatbridge ranks among the most unique...one may pass through it in any form of locomotion. One can not only walk, ride or drive past it, but may train over it or sail under it by means of the canal(Historical, Biographical and Literary Sketches of Glasgow and Lanarkshire, Parts 1 & 2. Hamilton Herald Printing and Publishing. 1904. pg. 101) Climate Like much of the Isles, Coatbridge experiences a temperate maritime climate with relatively cool summers and mild winters. The prevailing wind is from the west. Regular but generally light precipitation occurs throughout the year. Culture Coatbridge is the home of Scotlands Noisiest Museum, Heritage Park, which contains an insight into the life in industrial Coatbridge. A row of 1900-1960s cottages, a working tram line and a real coal mine can all be experienced on site. The park is situated on the remains of one of Coatbridges historic blast furnaces. In recent years there has been something of a cultural renaissance in the town, largely rooted in the St. Patricks Day Festival. Literature, theatre and film Hamilton, the nineteenth century poet and essayist, died in Langloan in 1873. Present-day writers Anne Donovan (Orange prize winner),  Brian Conaghan, whose first novel The Boy Who Made it Rain was published in June 2011, and award-winning author Dillon() are all from Coatbridge. Coatbridge has regularly featured in Des Dillons work. Two of his books about Coatbridge have been turned into plays.() Millar is a Coatbridge comic book writer whose Wanted comic book series has been translated into a feature film starring Jolie and Freeman. Coatbridge born Dame Laurentia McLachlan was the Benedictine abbess of the Community whose correspondence with Bernard Shaw and Cockerell was the subject of the film The Best of Friends.() Coatbridge is also home to the annual Deep Fried Film Festival. Local filmmakers Duncan and Wilma Finnigan have been described by The List as the John Cassavetes and Gena Rowlands of Coatbridge.()MusicMcAleese (alias Ford) was the lead singer of Marmalade who had a U.K. number one single in 1969 with a cover of Beatles Ob-La-Da. Coatbridge brothers Kane and Kane are the band and Cry. Coatbridge born Frew is the ex-pat lead singer of Canadian group Tiger. Burns (deceased), ONeill and Gilmour of The Silencers are from Coatbridge. Coatbridge sisters and Anna were a famous duo on the traditional music scene.Coatbridge and IrelandCoatbridge has been noted for its historical links with Ireland due to large scale emigration from Ulster (especially from Donegal) in the 19th century and throughout most of the 20th century. Indeed, the town has been called little Ireland.(The population of Monklands by Peter Drummond. Monkland District Library Services. 1985, pg. 7)(Burrell, Kathy and Panikos Panayi (2003). Histories and Memories: Migrants and Their History in Britain. I.B. Tauris & Co., pg. 238)(Bradley, Joseph M. (2008), Celtic Football Club, Irish Ethnicity, and Scottish Society In: New Hibernia Review, vol. 12, #1, Earrach/Spring 2008, pp. 96-110.) Within the town there are a number of dance schools, language classes, a football team (McSwiney), Gaelic Football Summer School, a branch of Ceoltir ireann (Music and Musicians of Ireland) and an Irish genealogy project.  The most obvious manifestation of these links can be seen in the annual St. Patricks Day Festival. The festival is sponsored by the Government and Guinness. The festival currently runs for over a fortnight and includes lectures, film shows, dance/Gaelic football competitions and music performances. The festival is the largest Irish celebration in Scotland.()()()Coatbridge accentThe Coatbridge accent has been categorised as making less use of the Scots tongue and exhibiting a tendency to stress the a vowel differently from general Scots usage. Examples of this are seen the pronunciation of the words stair (sterr), hair (herr), fair (ferr) and chair (cherr). This different enunciation has been attributed to the impact of successive influxes of Ulster Catholic immigrants into Coatbridge.(Celtic Minded - Joeseph M. Bradley (Ed.))(The Population of Monklands in the 1980s. Monkland Library Services Dept. (1985), pg. 7)SportsImage:CliftonhillCoatbridge.JPG|thumb|right|Cliftonhill, home of Albion RoversImage:DrumpellierParkFunRun.JPG|thumb|right|Childrens run in Drumpellier Country ParkCoatbridges local football team are Rovers. Rovers play in the Scottish second division, and Cliftonhill is where they play their home games. The wee rovers were founded in 1882 when two local Coatbridge clubs, Rovers and Albion, amalgamated to form the club bearing the current name.() The clubs greatest success came in 1920 when they reached the final of the Cup at Park. Noted Rovers players from the past have included Stein, Slaven and Tony Green. Former Celtic players John Hughes, McNamee, Creaney and Peter Grant are all from Coatbridge. Current Scottish internationalist Iwelumo was born in Coatbridge.  Drumpellier Cricket Club has been in continuous existence for around 150 years and the club have a ground in the Drumpellier area.  Speedway racing also took part in the town, using the Albion Rovers FC ground. The Edinburgh Monarchs rode there in 1968-69 (as the Coatbridge Monarchs) after losing their track at Stadium to the developers for the 1970 Games.() Glasgow Tigers moved from Hampden Park to Coatbridge in 1973, and stayed there until June 1977, when they were forced out for the introduction of greyhound racing.()Coatbridge was the home of former boxer Gilroy, Scotlands longest-reigning champion. He was inducted into the Boxing Hall of Fame in Angeles, California, in 2006. Coatbridge is also home to the current WBO World Super-Featherweight Champion Burns. Walter Donaldson, former World Snooker champion, also hailed from Coatbridge.()There are 2 golf courses: the municipal course bordering Drumpellier Country Park and the nearby private members club Drumpellier Golf Course. Clare Queen, Scotlands number one female golfer on the womens European tour, is from Coatbridge.()Governancethumb|left|Coatbridge Municipal BuildingHeraldryCoatbridge was given burgh status in 1885. The arms have a black field and on it a flaming tower to represent a blast furnace and Coatbridges industrial tradition. The crest of the demi-monk holds a stone in his left hand. The stone relates to the parish of Monklands being split into its two parts (Old and New Monkland) and to legend of the aul Kirk stane.(Scottish Burgh and County Heraldry  RM Urqhuart. Heraldry Today (1973), pg. 188) The legend of the aul Kirk stane is that a pilgrim undertaking a penance from Glasgow carried a stone in the direction of Monklands. When he could carry the stone no further (or in another version of the legend, when an angel spoke to him) he laid the stone down. It was where the stone came to rest that he was to build a church. The church is the present day Old Monkland Kirk. To this day the stone can still be seen.(The Latin motto Laborare est orare translates as to work is to pray, which originates in the writings of Benedict and is commonly associated with the Order whose monks came to Monklands in the 12th century.(Local governmentCoatbridge is represented by three tiers of elected government. Lanarkshire Council, the unitary authority for Coatbridge, is based at Motherwell, and is the executive, deliberative and legislative body responsible for local governance. The Parliament is responsible for devolved matters such as education, health and justice,() while matters are dealt with by the of the United Kingdom.Up until 1975, Coatbridge had its own Burgh Council. Between 1975 and 1996, Coatbridge was part of Monklands District Council and Regional Council. During the by-election campaign in Monklands East of 1994, there were accusations( ) of sectarianism and nepotism in favour of Coatbridge over neighbouring Airdrie by Monklands District Council. See Monklandsgate and East by-election, 1994. The fact that all 17 Labour councillors were Catholic led to Coatbridge being seen as a Catholic town. Subsequent inquiries showed no evidence of sectarianism, but allegations of nepotism were shown to be true.(Bruce, et al. Sectarianism in Scotland. University Press: 2004) Coatbridge is presently part of the burgh constituency of Coatbridge, Chryston and Bellshill, electing one of Parliament (MP) to the House of Commons of the Parliament of the United Kingdom. Before the constituencys creation in 2005, Coatbridge lay in the Coatbridge and Chryston constituency. Tom Clarke() of the Labour Party has been the MP since 1982 and currently holds the record for the largest UK parliamentary majority with 19,519.() For the purposes of the Parliament, Coatbridge forms part of the Coatbridge and Cryston constituency, which is represented by Smith MSP,() also Labour. Coatbridge is further represented by seven regional MSPs from the Central Scotland electoral region.() A small part of the eastern fringes of the town forms part of the Airdrie and Shotts constituency.Notable modern politicians from Coatbridge are The Rt. Hon. The Baroness Liddell, a former M.P. who was formerly both of State for Scotland and Britains Commissioner in Australia, and The Rt. Hon. The Lord Reid, also a former M.P. who was the former of State for Northern Ireland and Home Secretary. Lord Reid is currently the Chairman of F.C..DemographyAccording to the Kingdom Census 2001, the census locality of Coatbridge had a total resident population of 41,170, or 13% of the total of North Lanarkshire. This figure, combined with an area of ,(of census localities in Scotland#North Lanarkshire) provides Coatbridge with a density figure of .The median age of males and females living in Coatbridge was 35 and 38 years respectively, compared to 37 and 39 years for those in the whole of Scotland.( Thirty four percent were married, 6.1% were cohabiting couples, 14.7% were lone parent families and 32.5% of households were made up of individuals.()The place of birth of the towns residents was as follows: 98.7% United Kingdom (including 96% from Scotland), 0.32% of Ireland, 0.30% from other Union countries, and 0.72% from elsewhere in the world.( The economic activity of residents aged 1674 was 39.3% in full-time employment, 9.4% in part-time employment, 3.6% self-employed, 5.3% unemployed, 2.5% students with jobs, 3.2% students without jobs, 13.4% retired, 5.7% looking after home or family, 12.0% permanently sick or disabled, and 5.7% economically inactive for other reasons.( Compared with the average of Scotland, Coatbridge has low proportions of people born outside the United Kingdom, and people over 75 years of age.(During the 19th century, people began to arrive in large numbers in Coatbridge. The 1851 census recorded that the Irish constituted 35.8% of the local population. Although while a significant proportion of these emigrants were Protestant, the majority were Catholic. By 1901, the percentage of Irish-born people in Coatbridge had fallen to around 15%, but remained the highest of all the major towns in Scotland.(The Irish in Scotland by James Handley, 1962) In the 2001 census ethnicity was recorded at just over 1%, although just over half the population claimed their religious denomination as Catholicism. In 1985, 56% of the population of Coatbridge were Catholic.( In 2006, Coatbridge (along with Glasgow and Clydebank) was voted the least Scottish town in Scotland due to having the highest percentage of Irish names in the country. Reportedly more than 28% of adults in Coatbridge had names with Irish origins.()() Other immigrants to Coatbridge have included in 1880s a small number Lithuanians.(The Raddler - The Journal of Monklands Historical Society. Vol. 4, September 1999 (pg. 21)) In 1905, part of a wave of immigrants from Cassino in Italy settled in Coatbridge. A small number of people had stayed in Coatbridge after a Polish tank regiment was stationed in the town during WWII. The 1960 Coatbridge town plan forecast the population to reach 76,000 by 1990.(The population of Monklands by Peter Drummond. Monkland District Library Services, 1985 (pg. 21))One local author argued that despite the population apparently remaining relatively static during the 1970s, Coatbridges population has declined by around 15,000 due to emigration. Economy Present day Coatbridge is the site of Scotlands inland container base. Coatbridge was chosen as the site in part due to the proximity of various rail and motorway networks.( Makers of PA systems and loudspeakers Tannoy Ltd. are headquartered in Coatbridge. Lees Foods Plc is a local confectionery and bakery products company and are the manufacturers of the Lees macaroon bar. William Lawsons Whisky distillery has been located in Coatbridge since 1967.() Coatbridge was home to one of the first B&Q Depots, which was closed in 2006 and moved to the new retail park.In terms of housing, property prices in Coatbridge have undergone rapid growth in recent years. In 2005, house prices rose by 35%, reportedly the largest such increase in Scotland.() Landmarksthumb|right|175px|St. Augustines Church, Dundyvan. Detail.File:Summerlee3.JPG|thumb|right|175px|New extension at Heritage ParkImage:CoatbridgeWarMemorial.JPG|thumb|right|Coatbridge MemorialThe environment around Coatbridges town centre is characterised by its mixture of late nineteenth- and early twentieth-century sandstone buildings and late twentieth-century concrete shops. The leafy Blairhill and Dunbeth conservation areas to the west and north of the town centre comprise detached, semi-detached and terraced sandstone residential buildings. The bulk of the remaining surrounding areas consist of various twentieth-century local authority housing buildings. Several high rise flats dominate the skyline. Due to the decline of industries, several private housing estates have been built on reclaimed land.In 2007 Coatbridge was awarded Prospect architecture magazines carbuncle award for being the most dismal town in Scotland.( ) The town was also recently described by Scottish comedian Boyle as like Bladerunner... without the special effects.()Drumpellier Country Park is set around Woodend Loch. There are extensive woodlands, a visitor centre and a butterfly house.  Canal runs through a section of the park. The Time Capsule is a multi-purpose leisure centre containing a swimming pool, an adventure pool set in a prehistoric environment, an ice skating facility, suana/steam room and a sports complex with gym halls and other facilities. The Showcase Leisure Park contains a 12-screen cinema, a 10-pin bowling complex and numerous restaurants.Architecturally noteworthy landmarks in Coatbridge include:* Coatbridge Leisure Centre  Peter Womersley 1970s brutalist, modernist cantilevered building sited on the main road into Coatbridge.* Library  An Carnegie-sponsored 1905 pink sandstone structure. Imposing B-listed structure sited on Academy Street.* St. Augustines Church and buildings - Built in 1873 and located in the Dundyvan area. A red sandstone B listed Rowand Anderson() Gothic church.* The Quadrant Shopping Centre - Has been described in one article; ...from the set of Green. A new clock tower, which looks as if it was designed on the back of a beer mat, marks the town centre, a throwaway gesture compounded by the addition of some appalling public art-cum street furniture.()* St Andrews Church - 1839 early Victorian Gothic church by Scott Stephen & Gale in the Whitelaw hill area. Its steeple towers over the town centre.* Coatbridge railway bridges - The B-listed 1898 bridges span Bank Street, West Canal Street and the former Canal. The bridges are currently undergoing specialist restoration.()* St Marys Church - B listed Gothic church in Whifflet designed by and Pugin in 1896. Contains an elaborate and ornate interior ceiling.* the former Cattle Market Building - Erected in 1896, B listed faade of the sandstone cattle market building within the Blairhill and Dunbeth conservation area. Now part of a modern housing development.* Summerlee Heritage Park 2008 Extension - Spaceship style glass and metal addition to existing building by North Lanarkshire Councils in-house Design Services Team.()  Part of a two year 5 million renovation project.TransportationThe Canal (completed 1791()) was used in the 19th and 20th century to transport coal and iron to Glasgow. The town centre section of the canal was interred in pipe between Sikeside and Blair Road in the mid 1970s.( Some sections of the Monkland Canal can still be seen today between Townhead and Drumpellier. Coatbridge is adjacent to the M8 and M73 motorways. The motorway is also a short drive away. The major cities of Edinburgh, Stirling and Glasgow are all within commuting distance. Due to the number of rail lines running through Coatbridge it was once dubbed the Crewe of the North.()  There are six railway stations on the four railway lines that bisect the town: Motherwell-Cumbernauld Line; Line; Line; and Clyde Line. The six stations within Coatbridge and on these lines are: ; ; ; ; ; and . Coatbridge has had additional passenger stations, such as  and Calder Station (Greenend). However these stations have however been closed for many years. A bus transit terminus is situated along both sides of the South Circular Road.NeighbourhoodsThe earliest map showing Coatbridge is by Pont published in Blaeus Nether warde of clyds-dail (1654). The districts of Dunpelder, Gartshary, Kangloan, Kirkwood, Kirkshawes, Wheatflet are all evident.(Coatbridge: Three Centuries of Change  Peter Drummond and James Smith, Monkland Library Services, 1982 p8)The present day neighbourhoods of Coatbridge are Barrowfield, Blairhill, Brownshill, Carnbroe, Cliftonville, Cliftonhill, Coatbank, Coatdyke, Cuparhead, Drumpellier, Dunbeth, Dundyvan, Espieside, Gartsherrie, Greenhill, Greenend, Kirkshaws, Kirkwood, Langloan, Old Monkland, Rosehall, Shawhead, Sikeside, Summerlee, Sunnyside, Townhead and Whifflet. Victoria Park is a relatively new area close the town centre which was built on a brownfield site once occupied by heavy industry. The Blairhill and Dunbeth neighbourhoods are part of the Blairhill and Dunbeth conservation area.()Whitelaw is the area which the town centre is in but is a term which has not been used for many years. The fountain which is situated at the town centre on the corner of main street/south circular road is officially called the Whitelaw Fountain.* Click here to access, an interactive map of the neighbourhoods and landmarks of Coatbridge.Educationthumb|right|Coatbridge CollegeCoatbridge College was built as Scotlands first college in the late 19th century. As Coatbridge has moved away from the traditional heavy industries the teaching focus has shifted from traditional industry courses towards commerce, care and the arts. St. Ambrose, St. Andrews and Coatbridge High are the three mainstream secondary schools serving Coatbridge. St. Ambrose was the subject of an HMI follow-up assessment visit in January 2009.() The sports journalist, broadcaster and erstwhile of Britain Crampsey was formerly headmaster of St Ambrose High School. Singer and television presenter McManus and musician Tony Donaldson are former pupils of the school.Coatbridge has several special needs schools including Pentland School (Primary school), Portland High School and Willowbank School (High School).Public servicesCoatbridge forms part of the Western water and sewerage regions of Scotland. management is provided by the North Lanarkshire local authority. Water supplies are provided by Water, a corporation of the Government. Coatbridges Network Operator for electricity is Power.() Coatbridge is served by Hospital, sited on the Airdrie side of the Coatbridge/Airdrie border. The board is Lanarkshire. Fire and Rescue is the statutory fire and rescue service which operates in Coatbridge. Policing in Coatbridge is provided by the Strathclyde Police force, N-Division. The Partnership for Transport, a public body in Scotland, has direct operational responsibilities, such as supporting (and in some cases running) local bus services, and managing integrated ticketing in Coatbridge and other areas from the former Strathclyde region.() Scotland manages the local rail network.(The local authority responsible for community based service in Coatbridge is Lanarkshire Council. The council provides local services related to education, work, the environment, housing, road maintenance and leisure.()Notable people from Coatbridge* Admiral Sir James Stirling, first of Western Australia.* Cunningham, miner, mutineer and Republican Brigade commander during the Civil War* Skinnider, Coatbridge teacher; IRA operative who later became paymaster general of the Republican Army.()* Neil Smith, Air Chief Marshal of the Air Force (DBS squadron; the hero of Pipe Ridge (DFC and bar)* Charlie Doyle, Coatbridge-born union organiser and Communist in the States who was imprisoned and deported as an undesirable alien; in 1953 he led strike action at power station and was tagged the most hated man in Britain.()* Anti-sexual abuse and bullying activist, Sandra Brown, attended Coatbridge High School* The Reverend Dr Peter Marshall (27 May 1902  26 January 1949) of the United States Senate, whose biography was the basis of the Oscar-nominated film Man Called Peter, was born in Coatbridge.* and Cry a successful band from the 1980s; brothers Greg and Kane are from the Blairhill area of Coatbridge* Bill Carroll, radio host* Weisfield, Founder of now closed chain of What Every Woman Wants stores* Suttie, DJ and radio presenter* Mark Kerr, Scottish footballer, currently playing for F.C* Hugh Murray, union player* Russell (footballer), Scottish footballer, currently playing for Utd, attended coatbridge high school* Kissock, former New Zealand international footballer* Burns (boxer), World Super Featherweight Champion* Edward Reid (comedy singer), reached the live semi-finals of Got Talent in 2011. Finished 2nd in public vote to reach the final, but lost on judges vote 3-1.* Ghahfarokhi & Davoud Ghahfarokhi (brah)Twin towns*  Denis, France()*  Bisenzio, Italy(*  Gatchina, Russia(See alsoReferencesFurther reading* Dillon, Des (2007). Monks. Luath Press Ltd.* Drummond, Peter and James Smith (1982). Coatbridge: Three Centuries of Change. Monkland Library Services* Drummond, Peter (1985). The Population of Monklands in the 1980s. Monkland Library Services Dept.* Miller, Andrew (1864). The Rise of Coatbridge and the Surrounding Neighbourhood. Glasgow.* Miller, Thomas Roland (1958). The Monkland Tradition. Thomas Nelson and Sons.* Moir, Helen (2001). Coatbridge (Images of Scotland). The History Press. ISBN 0-7524-2132-8.* Van Helden, Oliver (2000). Old Coatbridge. Stenlake PublishingExternal links* Coatbridge Museum* North Lanarkshire Council* Albion Rovers FC website* Coatbridge Film Festival* St. Patricks day festival website* Evening Times Article on Coatbridges industrial past* RTE documentary about the Coatbridge Irish* Coatbridge Irish Genealogy Project website* Sands McSwiney Gaelic Football Club* Drumpellier Cricket Club* Best Small Cityda:Coatbridgede:Coatbridgefr:Coatbridgean Chta, Albaina Chtalt:Koutbridaspl:Coatbridgesco:Coatbridgesimple:Coatbridgeuk:
452112
Condor_Legion
The Condor Legion () was a unit composed of volunteers from the German Air Force (Luftwaffe) and from the German Army (Heer) which served with the Nationalists during the Civil War of July 1936 to March 1939. The Condor Legion developed methods of bombing which were used widely in the World War shortly afterwards. The of Guernica was the most infamous operation carried out by the Condor Legion during this period.  Sperrle commanded the aircraft units of the Condor Legion and Ritter von Thoma commanded the ground units. History of military aid to Spain File:Bundesarchiv Bild 101I-026-0122-32A, Griechenland, Kreta, Ju 52.jpg|thumb|right|A 52 plane in Crete in 1943Following the military coup in Spain at the start of the Spanish Civil War, the Spanish Second Republic turned to the Soviet Union and France for support, and the nationalists requested the support of Hitlers Germany and fascist Italy.(Westwell (2004). p. 10.) The first attempt was made to secure German aviation held on 22 July, with a request for 10 transport aircraft. Hitler decided to support the nationalists on 25 or 26 July, but was wary of provoking a Europe-wide war.(Westwell (2004). p. 12.)(Thomas (1961). pp. 231&ndash;232.) The Reich Air Travel Ministry concluded that nationalist forces would need at least 20 52s, flown by Luft Hansa pilots, to carry the Army of Africa from Spanish Morocco to Spain.( This mission became known as Magic Fire ().((Thomas (1961). p. 230.) The joint Spanish-German Spanish-Moroccan Transport Company (, HISMA) and an entirely German company, the Raw Materials and Good Purchasing Company (, ROWAK) were established.( This involvement was kept covert, hidden from both foreign and economic ministries, and funded with three million Reichmarks.((The organisation and recruitment of German volunteers was also kept secret.(Westwell (2004). p. 13.) The first contingent of 86 men left on 1 August, unaware of where they were going. They were accompanied with six biplane fighters, anti-aircraft guns and about 100 tons of other supplies.( They were placed at Tablada airfield near Seville, and accompanied by German Air transport began the airlift of Francos troops to Spain. Germanys involvement grew in September to encompass the Wehrmachts other branches; Operation Magic Fire was renamed Operation Guido in November.( A wide belief was that the soldiers would train Spanish nationalists, and not engage.(Westwell (2004). p. 14.)  The head of the Kriegsmarine provided submarines from 24 October. The German navy also provided various surface ships and coordinated movement of German supplies to Spain.(Westwell (2004). p. 15.) German U-Boats were dispatched to Spanish waters under the codename Ursula.(In the two weeks following 27 July, German transport moved nearly 2,500 troops of the Army of Africa to Spain.(Westwell (2004). p. 16.)  By 11 October, the missions official end, 13,500 troops, 127 machine guns and 36 guns had been carried into Spain from Morocco.(Westwell (2004). p. 18.) Over this period there was a movement from training and supply missions of overt combat. The operation leader, Alexander von Scheele, was replaced by Warlimont.(Westwell (2004). p. 19.) In September, 86 tons of bombs, 40 Panzer I tanks and 122 personnel had been landed in Spain; they were accompanied with 108 aircraft in the July&ndash;October period, split between aircraft for the Nationalist faction itself and planes for German volunteers in Spain.(German air crews supported the Nationalist advance on Madrid,( and the successful relief of the of the Alczar.(Westwell (2004). p. 21.) Ultimately, this phase of the Siege of Madrid would be unsuccessful.( Soviet air support for the Republican was growing, particularly through the supply of Polikarpov aircraft.(Westwell (2004). pp. 21&ndash;22.) Warlimont appealed to Nazi Germany to step up support. Following German recognition of Francos government on 30 September, German efforts in Spain were reorganised and expanded.(Westwell (2004). pp. 22&ndash;23.) The existing command structure was replaced with the Rgen, and the military units already in Spain were formed into a new legion, which was briefly called the Iron Rations () and the Iron Legion () before Gring renamed it the Condor Legion ().(Westwell (2004). p. 23.) The first German charg to Francos government, General von Faupel(See also: Faupel ), arrived in November, but was told not to interfere in military matters.(Thomas (1961). p. 333.)MotivationIn the years following the Spanish Civil War, Hitler gave several possible motives for German involvement. Among these were the distraction it provided from German re-militarisation; the prevention of the spread of communism to Western Europe; the creation of a state friendly to Germany to disrupt Britain and France; and the possibilities for economic expansion.( Although the offensive on Madrid was abandoned in March 1937, a series of attacks on weaker Republican-controlled areas was supported by Germany; despite prolonging the Civil War, it would help to distract the other western powers from Hitlers ambitions in central Europe.(Westwell (2004). p. 29.) The offensive on Vizcaya, a mining and industrial centre, would help fuel German industry.(Westwell (2004). p. 30.) On 27 June 1937, Hitler (in a speech at Wurzburg) declared he supported Franco to gain control of Spanish ore.(Thomas (1961). p. 459.)Discussions over German objectives for intervention occurred in January 1937. Germany was keen to avoid prompting a Europe-wide war, which at the time they felt committing further resources to Spain would do.(Thomas (1961). p. 341.) Contradictory views were held by German officials: von Weizscker suggested it was merely a matter of graceful withdrawal; Gring stated that Germany would never recognise a red Spain. A joint Italian&ndash;German decision, that the last shipments would be made by the start of February, was agreed.(It has been speculated that Hitler used the Spanish Civil War issue to distract Mussolini from Hitlers own designs on and plans for union (Anschluss) with Austria. The authoritarian Catholic, anti-Nazi Vaterlndische Front government of autonomous Austria had been in alliance with Mussolini, and in 1934 the assassination of Austrias authoritarian president Dollfuss had already successfully invoked Italian military assistance in case of a German invasion.A communique in December 1936, from German ambassador in Rome von Hassell illustrates another point:The role played by the Spanish conflict as regards Italys relations with France and England could be similar to that of the Abyssinian conflict, bringing out clearly the actual, opposing interests of the powers and thus preventing Italy from being drawn into the net of the Western powers and used for their machinations. ... All the more clearly will Italy recognize the advisability of confronting the Western powers shoulder to shoulder with Germany.Operational recordThe Condor Legion, upon establishment, consisted of the 88, with three squadrons of 52 bombers and the 88 with three squadrons of He 51 fighters, the reconnaissance 88 (supplemented by the Aufklrungsgruppe See 88), an anti-aircraft group, the Flakbteilung 88, and a signals group, the Nachrichtenabteilung 88.( Overall command was given to Sperrle, with Holle as chief of staff. Scheele was transferred to become a military attach in Salamanca.( Two armoured units under the command of Ritter von Thoma, with four tanks each, were also operational.(Thomas (1961). pp. 316&ndash;317.)The Nationalists were supported by German and Italian units and materials at the of Madrid.(Thomas (1961). p. 322.) However, the military situation in Madrid remained poor for the nationalists, and both German and Italian aircraft (under Francos direction) began bombing raids on the city as a whole.(Westwell (2004). p. 24.) The Germans were keen to observe the effects of civilian bombings and deliberate burning of the city.(Thomas (1961). p. 329.) Offensives involving German aircraft, as well as the bombings, were unsuccessful. Increasing Republican air superiority became apparent, particularly the strength of the Soviet I-15 and I-16 aircraft.( Historian Hugh Thomas describes their armaments as primitive.(Thomas (1961). p. 317.) Faupel, in November&ndash;December, urged the creation of a single German unit of 15,000&ndash;30,000, believing it would be enough to turn the tide of the war to the Nationalists. Dieckhoff argued this would insufficient, and that larger measures could provoke the wrath of the Spanish.(Thomas (1961). p. 334.) Between late 1936 and early 1937, new aircraft were sent to the Condor Legion, including Hs 123 dive bombers, and prototypes of the He 112 and Bf 109, with the last proving the most successful.( The He 111 was added to the bomber fleet,(See also: He 111 operational history#Spanish Civil War) along with the Do 17 (E and F types). Older aircraft were passed onto the Nationalists.(Westwell (2004). p. 25.) By the end of 1936, 7,000 Germans were in Spain.(Thomas (1961). p. 337.)(By comparison, there were now 14,000 Italians supporting Francos forces. (Thomas (1961). p. 337.).)German forces also operated in the of Jarama, which began with a Nationalist offensive on 6 February 1937. It included German-supplied ground forces, including two batteries of machine guns, a tank division, and the Condor Legions anti-aircraft guns.( Bombing by both Republican and Nationalist aircraft, including Ju 52s from the Legion, helped ensure a stalemate.(Westwell (2004). pp. 25&ndash;26.) It showed up the inadequacy of the Legions aircraft, faced with superior Soviet-made fighters.(Westwell (2004). p. 26.)(Thomas (1961). p. 376.) Von Thorma requested Irish nationalist support for a tank advance at one point, never to be replicated.( Use of He 51 and Ju 52s, and the Legions anti-aircraft guns used in ground roles, only partly mitigated what was a significant defeat for the Nationalists at the of Guadalajara during March.(Westwell (2004). p. 27.) A joint Italian-German general had been set up in January 1937 to advise Franco on war planning. The defeat of a significant Italian force and the growing Soviet superiority in tanks and aircraft led the Germans to support a plan to abandon the offensive on Madrid and instead concentrate a series of attacks on weaker Republican-controlled areas.( Whilst many countries believed motorised troops to have been proven less effective than first thought, it was the inadequacy of the Italians as a fighting force that dominated German thought.(Thomas (1961). p. 388.)The Vizcaya CampaignThe isolated area of Vizcaya, a predominantly Basque part of northern Spain, was the most immediate target, in what was called the in the North.( It was largely a Nationalist and Italian offensive, but was supported by a consistently re-equipping Condor Legion.(Thomas (1961). pp. 401&ndash;402.) The terrain was favourable, with the planes coming over a range of mountains to the south, masking their entrance.( Sperrle remained in Salamanca; von Richthofen replaced Holle in January as deputy and in actual command.( Since the Basque air force was very limited, even fighters were used in ground-attack roles. The Legions air force initially attacked the towns of Ochandiano and Durango.(Thomas (1961). p. 403.) Durango had no anti-aircraft defence, and only minor other defences. According to the Basques, 250 civilians died on the 31 March, including the priest, nuns and congregation of a church ceremony.((Westwell (2004). p. 31.)  The Germans, with their air raids, were hated.(Thomas (1961). pp. 403&ndash;404.) The Basque ground forces were in full retreat towards Bilbao, through the town of Guernica, which was attacked on 26 April in one of the most controversial attacks of the Spanish Civil War.(Guernicathumb|300px|Ruins of Guernica (1937)In Rgen, waves of Ju 52 and He 51 planes bombed and strafed targets in Guernica. The number of casualties is a matter of controversy, with perhaps 200&ndash;300 people killed;(http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/europe/6583639.stm The legacy of Guernica) the number reported dead by the Basques was 1,654 dead and 889 wounded.(Westwell (2004). p. 31.)(Thomas (1961). p. 419.) Several explanations were put forward by the Nationalists, including blaming the attack on the Republicans,(Thomas (1961). p. 420.) that the attack on the town had been a prolonged offensive, or that the Rentaria bridge, outside Guernica, was the true target. However, the nature of the operation itself, including the formation and armaments used, makes this seem unlikely. Guernica was a clear target of the Condor Legion, rather than the Nationalists as a whole.(Westwell (2004). pp. 32&ndash;33.)(Thomas (1961). p. 420&ndash;421.) The offensive on Bilbao, when it eventually came on 11 July, was supported by ground units of the Condor Legion, and extensive air operations. It proved the worth of the Condor Legion to the Nationalist cause.(Westwell (2004). p. 33.)Further campaignsFile:Bundesarchiv Bild 183-C0214-0007-013, Spanien, Flugzeug der Legion Condor.jpg|thumb|right|A German  He 111E plane of the Condor LegionThe Condor Legion also took part in the of Brunete, designed as a Republican offensive to take the pressure off northern Spain, where fighting was ongoing.( The Legion was sent from the north to reinforce the broken line.(Thomas (1961). p. 462.) There were repeated raids on Republican armoured vehicles and later defensive positions by both bombers and fighters based at Salamanca.(Westwell (2004). pp. 33&ndash;34.) Republican aircraft were ineffective, despite Nationalist fears, compared with German aircraft; the Messerschmitt Bf 109 was shown to be superior to the I-15 and I-16 models used by Republican forces.(Westwell (2004). p. 35.) The Legion lost 8 aircraft, but claimed 18 victories. German tactics were also improved with the experience of Brunete, particularly the en masse use of tanks by the Nationalists.(Westwell (2004). p. 36.)The Nationalists returned to focus on the capture of northern Spain. German test aircraft, with latest models, faced an outdated Basque air force, although it did have some Russian planes.(Thomas (1961). pp. 468&ndash;469.) Heavy aerial bombardment from 200 Nationalist, German and Italian planes was used far behind Basque lines in August 1937, leading to the fall of Santander after the of Santander on 1 September.( The formal battle in Asturias ended with the fall of Gijn on 21 October. A large amount of ammunitions had been used by the Legion, including a million machine gun rounds and 2,500 tonnes of bombs.(  Germany immediately began to ship industrial production back to Germany.(Westwell (2004). p. 38.) Sperrle argued repeatedly with Faupel, and against HISMAs monopoly. Faupel was replaced by Franco, through Sperrle.(Thomas (1961). p. 471.) Sperrle also returned to Germany and was replaced by Volkmann;( following disagreements with Volkmann, Von Richthofen would be replaced with Plocher in early 1938.(Whilst the next major campaign &ndash; Madrid or Barcelona &ndash; was discussed, the Condor Legion was moved to Soria and began a week of strikes against Republican airfields, halted by the Republican advance on Teruel and the ensuing of Teruel.(Westwell (2004). pp. 38&ndash;39.) Both the Legions land and air forces were used, and the Legion moved to Bronchales. Poor weather resulted in few flights, and the town fell to Republican forces on 6 January.(Westwell (2004). p. 39.) Up to 100 sorties a day were launched during the Nationalists counter-offensive through the Alfambra valley. The Ju 87A was used for the first time on the advance on Teruel, which was retaken on 22 February.( The continued Nationalist offensive on Aragon in AprilJune 1937, including  the Battle of Belchite, involved bombing raids and the use of the Legions ground forces.( The Legion was switched to focus in the north, towards the river, before moving south again following Nationalist successes.(Westwell (2004). p. 40.) The Legion moved its main headquarters to Benicarlo; single-engined planes operated from airfields nearby, and twin-engined planes from Zaragoza.( Hitlers words to his colleagues belied a change in attitude about the war in Germany &ndash; that a quick victory in the war was not desirable, a mere continuation of the war would be preferable.(Thomas (1961). p. 502.) German policy would be to prevent a Republican defeat.(Thomas (1961). p. 510.) However, casualties were beginning to mount for the Legion and, combined with a resurgence in Republican air activity, the Nationalist advance stalled. This was, perhaps, because of the reluctance of commanders in Germany to supply reinforcements, with the Czechoslovakia crisis mounting.( Arguments over the bill to the Germans &ndash; now rising at 10 million Reichmarks a month &ndash; continued, unresolved.(Thomas (1961). p. 487.) The Legions materiel had been exhausted.(Thomas (1961). p. 541.)On 2425 July, Republican forces launched the last major offensive of the war, the of the Ebro. Reconnaissance units of the Condor Legion had noticed a troop build-up, and warned Nationalists forces. The warning went unheeded.(Westwell (2004). p. 41.) Although the Republic gained ground, Republican forces failed to gain control of Ganesa, with 422 sorties by the Legion (with around 70 aircraft operational) having considerable effect. The rest of the battle saw a series of attacks using artillery or air strikes, followed by a Nationalist ground advance.( However, tensions in Czechoslovakia and a shortage of pilots in Germany led to the return of 250 pilots from the Legion, around half of them being bomber crews. Although trained Spaniards made up some of the shortfall, Volkmann complained to central command in Berlin, which would lead to his recall in September.(Westwell (2004). p. 44.) During the battle, which saw 113 days of fighting, only 10 aircraft were lost (some by accident) and 14 were badly damaged; the Legion claimed around 100 Republican aircraft, a third of those lost. Only 5 aircrew had been killed, and 6 captured.( Aid from Germany temporarily halted in mid-September.(Thomas (1961). p. 553.) Germany and Nationalist Spain settled the issue of German interests in Spanish mines.(Thomas (1961). p. 566.)The Legion took a short break from active duty to receive new aircraft, including Bf 109Es, He 111Es and Js, and Hs 126As, bringing its strength to 96 aircraft, around a fifth of the Nationalists force as a whole. Von Richthofen returned to Spain in overall command, with Seidemann as chief of staff.(Westwell (2004). pp. 44&ndash;45.) This reinforcement may have been the single most important intervention by a foreign side in the war, enabling a counterattack after the Battle of the Ebro.( It mainly took part in operations against the remaining Republican air force during JanuaryFebruary 1939, with considerable success.(Westwell (2004). p. 45.) After it took part in parades in Barcelona and elsewhere, and minor duties over Madrid, it was rapidly dissolved.(Westwell (2004). p. 46.) The men returned on 26 May; the best aircraft were returned to Germany and the rest of the equipment bought by the new Spanish regime.(Westwell (2004). p. 47.)The Condor Legion claimed to have destroyed 320 Republican planes using aircraft (either shot down or bombed on the ground), and shot down another 52 using anti-aircraft guns.(Westwell (2004). pp. 47&ndash;48.) They also claimed to have destroyed 60 ships. They lost 72 aircraft due to hostile action, and another 160 to accidents.(Westwell (2004). p. 48.)Maritime operationsThe Maritime Reconnaissance Staffel 88 () was the Condor Legions maritime unit under the command of Heinz Wolff. Operating independently of the land-based division, it acted against enemy shipping, ports, coastal communications and occasionally inland targets such as bridges.( It used floatplanes, starting with the Heinkel He 60, which began operating at Cadiz in October 1936.( Missions started as reconnaissance but, following the move from Cadiz to Mellila in Spanish Morocco in December 1936, the focus shifted to attacks on shipping.(Westwell (2004). p. 49.) It was again moved in February 1937 to Mlaga, newly captured, and then to Majorca when Mlaga proved unsuitable.( Beginning in June, operations were expanded to allow attacks on all Republican ports, so long as no British ships were present. 10 ships were attacked in the second half of 1937; however, the Norwegian torpedoes being used proved ineffective, and strafing or bombing targets was used instead.(The arrival of Harlinghausen (known as Iron Gustav) saw operations expand, and operations targeted Alicante, Almeria, Barcelona and Cartegena. As naval activity declined, inland targets became more numerous, and night missions began.( Activities in support of ground forces became the main focus of the unit until the end of hostilities. Both Wolff and Harlinghausen received the Spanish Cross in Gold with Swords and Diamonds.(Westwell (2004). p. 51.) In total, eleven men were killed in action, and five others died due to accident or illness.(Other operationsOvertly, the Kriegsmarine was part of force enforcing the Agreement from interfering in the Civil War. However, this agreement was clearly broken by Germany.(Westwell (2004). p. 56.) As a result, the German battleship Deutschland stood guard over Ceuta to prevent interference from Republican ships while Franco transported troops to the Spanish mainland.(Gannes, Harry and Repard, Theodore. Spain in Revolt. Victor Gollancz Ltd. London 1936) By mid-October, the German Sea Group around Spain consisted of the pocket battleships Deutschland and Admiral Scheer, the cruiser Kln and four boats. After the Germans claimed that Leipzig had been attacked by an unidentified submarine, it did formally withdraw from international patrols.(Westwell (2004). p. 57.)Operation Ursula (named after the daughter of Dnitz) saw a group of German U-boats active around Spain.(Westwell (2004). p. 58.) It began on 20 November 1936, with the movement of the U-33 and U-34 from Wilhelmshaven. Any identification marks were obscured, and the whole mission was kept secret.( Difficulties in identifying legitimate targets and concerns about discovery limited their operations.(Westwell (2004). p. 60.) During their return to Wilhelmshaven in December, the Republican submarine C-3 was sunk; the Germans claimed this was due to a torpedo fired from U-34, although the Republicans enquiry claimed its loss was due to an internal explosion. Their return marked the official end of Operation Ursula.( However, it does seem that further submarines were sent in mid-1937, but details of the operation are not known; six are believed to have been involved.(AbwehrThe German Intelligence service, the Abwehr, working independently of the Legion Condor was secretly involved in Bodden. This was to later play a part in the detection of the Torch invasion fleet.(Bodden is a reference to the strait separating the Baltic island of Rgen from the German mainland and the Abwehr operation represented a network of coastal listening stations overseeing a seabed detection system across the Gibraltar straits. Boddens aim was to gather SIGINT via the underwater detection system and via fourteen infra-red ship surveillance stations (nine in Spain, five in Morocco) which later relayed shipping information to U boats in the Mediterranean and threatening convoys.)Military advantages gainedTrainingImage:Bundesarchiv Bild 183-E20569-21, Spanien, Ausbildung durch Legion Condor.jpg|thumb|Condor Legion infantry training school in Spain.It is known that the leaders of the Army were hesitant about becoming involved in the conflict, and resisted a call made by the Italian government for a dual transfer of ground troops to fight in Spain. The involvement of the Luftwaffe, however, was not entirely restricted and a commonly held viewpoint is that the involvement of the Luftwaffe in the Civil War constituted a proving ground for troops employed later during War II. This view is supported by the testimony of Gring, later Reichsmarschall of the Luftwaffe, when on trial at the International Military Tribunal in Nrnberg. When asked about the decision to use the Luftwaffe, Gring states:When the Civil War broke out in Spain, Franco sent a call for help to Germany and asked for support, particularly in the air. One should not forget that Franco with his troops was stationed in Africa and that he could not get the troops across, as the fleet was in the hands of the Communists, or, as they called themselves at the time, the competent Revolutionary Government in Spain. The decisive factor was, first of all, to get his troops over to Spain. The Fuehrer thought the matter over. I urged him to give support Franco under all circumstances, firstly, in order to prevent the further spread of communism in that theater and, secondly, to test my young Luftwaffe at this opportunity in this or that technical respect.(Testimony of Gring, Trial of the Major War Criminals, International Military Tribunal, Nuremberg, 14 November  1 October 1946, Volume IX. Available via Avalon Project. )(Frequently misquoted along the lines of: The Spanish Civil War gave me an opportunity to put my young air force to the test, and a means for my men to gain experience. or other permutations.)This was also a view put forth in western media following the disengagement of German forces from Spain.(Farewell TIME Magazine Monday, May. 22, 1939.)Dozens of Bf 109 fighters and He 111 medium bombers, and from December 1937, at least three Ju 87 Stuka dive-bombers, first saw active service in the Condor Legion against Soviet-supplied aircraft. The Stukas first mission flown in Spain was February 1938. Each of these aircraft played a major role during the early years of the Second World War. The Germans also quickly realized that the days of the biplane fighter were finished. The He 51 fighter, after suffering many losses during the first 12 months of the conflict, was switched to a ground attack role and later saw service as a trainer.Other unitsThe Condor Legion also included non-aircraft units. Panzer crews operating Panzerkampfwagen I light tanks were commanded by Ritter von Thoma. The Germans also tested their 88 mm heavy anti-aircraft artillery which they used to destroy Republican tanks and fortifications using direct fire, as well as enemy aircraft in their designed role. German involvement in Spain also saw the development of the first ambulance service for evacuation of wounded combatants.(Details on the 1936-39 operation can be found in The history of Anesthesia Contributions of the Legion Condor to the Wehrmachts surgical care during World War II. (R.J. Defalque, A.J. Wright).)Technical advancesthumb|400px|Bf 109 C-1, Jagdgruppe 88, Legion CondorOne important factor in World War II which is thought to have directly resulted from the conflict is the technical development of the Bf 109. The V3 &ndash; V6 types entered service in Spain directly from operational trials around January 1937. In the spring of 1938 these were joined by type C aircraft with type Es being first fielded in December 1938. As a result of combat in Spain improvements were also made to the mm gun.TacticsAlongside the potential for gains in combat experience it is also thought that various strategic initiatives were first trialed as part of Luftwaffe involvement in the conflict. Theories on bombing were first developed by the Luftwaffe with the first exhibition of bombing in the September 1937 Asturias campaign. As the fighting progressed into March 1938 Italian pilots under Fieldmarshal Sperrle were involved in thirteen raids against Barcelona involving fire and gas bombs. These particular raids resulted in the deaths of thousands of civilians. It is worth noting that a subsequent commander of the Legion in Spain, Freiherr von Richthofen was to become heavily involved in the operation of the Luftwaffe as part of Barbarossa.Tactics of combined or joint operations were a particular focus. Close air support for Nationalist troops, attack bombing of Republican troop concentrations, and strafing became features of the war. The Legion worked closely in missions which maximized the fighting ability of the Nationalist air force and troops, the Italian CTV, and pilots from the Legionaria (Legionary Air Force). German Air ace Galland was to claim after World War II that although there was a focus on taking lessons from the conflict in Spain, he believed the wrong conclusions were drawn by the German High Command with particular respect to the Luftwaffe:Whatever may have been the importance of the tests of German arms in the Spanish Civil War from tactical, technical and operational points of view, they did not provide the experience that was needed nor lead to the formulation of sound strategic concepts.Reaction to German involvementVarious sympathetic writers participated in condemning the scarcely concealed interference by Germany and Italy. An example was Mann, who appealed from exile in France with the slogan German soldiers! A rogue sends you to Spain! in response to the Legions involvement. Other states tacitly approved the fight of the German Legion against the Soviet-supplied Spanish Republican side.Treatment in Nazi GermanyAs part of his longterm Blumenkrieg strategy Hitler drew parallels between the conflict in Spain and the peaceful methods he used to gain control in Germany.(Evidenced in a January 1937 speech (prior to the outcry over Operation Rgen). Hitler speech to Reichstag 30 January 1937 available via the German Propaganda Archive.) The regime also made use of the conflict as an opportunity for political education and aggrandizement.(For example, political education of Youth by way of the conflict is apparent in the Worldview Education for Winter 1938/39 available at the German Propaganda Archive.) Highlighting of the military aspects and success story for German arms is also evident with the publication of various pulp semi-autobiographical works in 1939, most notably:*Wir funken fr Franco (literally We transmit for Franco)  by Fhring,*Als Jagdflieger in Spanien (As a fighter pilot in Spain) by Trautloft,*Das Buch der Spanienflieger (The Spanish Pilots Book) by Hauptmann Bley.Each book had a high circulation; in the case of Bley the circulation was estimated at over 1 million books sold. Although accurate in part these works are now accepted by scholars on the period and conflict as laced with propaganda which emphasizes daring escapades and fails to address the realities of military combat in general.Since reunificationRecrimination for the activities of the Condor Legion and shame at the involvement of German citizens in the bombing of Guernica surfaced following German reunification in the 1990s. In 1997, the 60th anniversary of Operation Rgen, then German President Herzog wrote to survivors of the raid apologizing on behalf of the German people and state. Herzog said he wished to extend a hand of friendship and reconciliation on behalf of all German citizens.(Exhibit recalls German destruction of Spanish town of Guernica CNN.com April 25, 2000.) This sentiment was later ratified by members of the German Parliament who went on to legislate in 1998 for the removal of all former Legion members names from associated German military bases. This process was then carried out but the issue surfaced again in 2005 following media revelations about the role of pilot Mlders who had volunteered to serve in Spain. Although not involved in the bombing of Guernica it was decided by then German Defense Minister Struck that in keeping with the law Mlders name should be removed from the barracks at Visselhoevede and from association with Luftwaffe wing 74 (74) based in an der Donau. Up until 2005 it had not been established that Mlders flew as a Condor Legion volunteer before his death in 1941.(Germany Army Drops Name of Nazi Pilot dewelle.de January 28, 2005.)Awardsthumb|170px|right|Condor legionnaires celebrated on cover of the Nazi air ministrys magazine, June 1939The Spanienkreuz (Spanish Cross) campaign medal was awarded by the German authorities in seven classes from April 14, 1939.(This campaign medal is not to be confused with the Spanish War Cross which began being awarded in 1942 for acts of gallantry on the Eastern Front. The Spanish War Cross was awarded to Spanish volunteers of the Division.) Due to the clandestine nature of German activities in Spain, no awards were instituted up to April 1939 and the end of German involvement in the conflict. The Spanish Cross complemented cuff titles issued to those who served. Legionnaires could also expect a Campaign Medal struck by the Spanish authorities to thank German volunteers for their service. See the two websites listed below for examples of each medal and others issued to Legion veterans.Other notable incidents on the return of the Legion included an assembly for a personal address by Hitler on 6 June 1939, and a parade as part of the celebrations organized for Hitlers 50th birthday 20 April 1939.(Color images of this address were taken by Jger and are available via Getty images. The formal return to Germany and parade by of the Legion was captured by Ufa studios.) Also by way of commemoration the activities of the Legion were memorialized in a special edition of Adler, the Luftwaffes magazine for service members which at the time was also circulated in both Spain and the United States.Notable participants(in alphabetical order)*Aldinger*Dirlewanger*Demme (Head Trainer)*Galland*Herrmann*Mlders*Sperrle (Commander)*Schweikard See Also: W*Trautloft*Trettner*Freiherr von Richthofen (Commander)*Ritter von Thoma (Drohne)*Volkmann (Commander)*Wei-kuo (As an Observer)See also* Aeronautica & Legionaria* Area Nacional (Arma de Aviacin) - Nationalist Air forces* del Tercio - Spanish Foreign Legion* Area de la Repblica Espaola (FARE) - Second Republic Air Force, supported mainly by the Soviet Union*re-armament* 53, the World War II Luftwaffe bomber wing named for the expeditionary force* bombing of cities* ace* Hs 129NotesReferencesCitationsSources** External links Militaria* Spanienkreuz in its different classes via wehrmacht-awards.com* Cuft titles of Legion Kondor and wound badge via wehrmacht-awards.com* Francoist issued Campaign Medal via Rene Chavezs Axis101 website.Essays* Aerial Warfare and the Spanish Civil War by Pamela Feltus at CentennialOfFlight.gov* Spanish Civil War: German Condor Legions Tactical Air Power by Walter A. Musciano at TheHistoryNet.com* Portugal, Spain and Nazi Gold Some details on German reliance on Iberian mineral wealth.Related Sites* David Nashs Exhaustively accurate listing of aircraft which served in the conflict.* Axis History - Legion Condor& Eagles of the Third Reich - Men of the LuftwaffeLegionuCndorCondorCondorCondorCondorCndorCondorLegioaCondorCndorCondorlgiCondorja:CondorCndorCondorLegionKondorKondorCondorsv:KondorlegionenLejyonuzh:
453651
East_Kalimantan
 footnotes                East Kalimantan () is the second largest Indonesian province, located on the Kalimantan region on the east of Borneo island. The resource-rich province has two major cities, Samarinda (the capital and a center for timber product) and Balikpapan (a petroleum center with oil refinery). Ever since Indonesia opened its mineral and natural resources for foreign investment in 1970s, East Kalimantan province has experienced major boost of timber, petroleum and other exotic forest products. The state-owned petroleum company Pertamina has been operating in the area since it took control oil refinery from the Dutch Shell company in 1965.The population is a mixture of people from the Indonesian archipelago with Dayaks and Kutai as indigenous ethnic groups living in rural areas. Other prominent migrant ethnic groups include Javanese, Chinese, Banjarese, Bugis and Malays, who mostly live in coastal areas. History This province is the location of the oldest Hindu kingdom in Indonesia, Kutai, the existence of which is attested to by a stone manuscript, or Prasasti, which is now kept in the National Museum in Jakarta. The manuscript is written in the Pallava alphabet and the Sanskrit language. The replica of this manuscript can be seen in the Governors Office in Samarinda.Inscriptions on seven stone pillars (yupa posts) erected in the fifth century BCE on the command of a local ruler, King Mulavarman, records his victories, his generosity to brahmins, his princely genealogy.() Administration East Kalimantan is divided into 10 regencies and 4 cities.According to the Jakarta Post of 22 July 2004, there is a proposal to create a new province of North Kalimantan (Kalimantan Utara). It would be split from East Kalimantan (Kalimantan Timur) by taking the regencies (kabupaten) of Bulungan, Malinau and Nunukan, and the city (kotamadya) of Tarakan. Since that date, a new regency (Tana Tidung Regency) has been created in 2007 out of part of Bulungan Regency, so this would also fall within a putative North Kalimantan Province. Ecology Illegal logging has destroyed a great part of the rainforest. Less than half the original rainforest still remains, in places such as the Mentarang National Park in the northern part of the province and the National Park. Economy East Kalimantans economy heavily depends on earth resources such as oilfield exploration, natural gas, as well as coal and gold mining. Balikpapan has an oil refinery plant that was built by Dutch governance before World War II, destroyed during World War II, and rebuilt by Indonesia Governance.Other developing economic sectors includes agriculture and tourism. East Kalimantan has several tourist destination such as Islands in Berau Regency, Kayan Mentarang National Park ini Nunukan, Crocodile Husbandry in Balikpapan, deer husbandry in Penajam, Dayaks (native Kalimantan people) Pampang Village in Samarinda and many others.Among the many obstacles to developing economic growth is lack of transportation infrastructure. Transportation depends on traditional boats connecting coastal cities and areas along main river, River.Tourist sitesBesides unique Islands, East Kalimantan has another unique site, Labuan Cermin Lake at Biduk-biduk district which has fresh water on top of the lake with about 2 meters thickness and sea water below the fresh water up to the bottom of the lake. In the fresh water there are fresh water fish and also in the sea water there are sea water fish. Cermin means Mirror due to the water is very clear, so we can mirror on it. The site is very natural without any facilities there.(http://www.mediaindonesia.com/mediatravelista/index.php/read/2011/06/28/2818/2/Air-Laut-dan-Tawar-Menyatu-di-Danau-Labuan-Cermin)ReferencesExternal links*WWF Heart of Borneo conservation initiative - Information about the Heart of Borneo - 220,000 km of upland montane tropical rainforest, where endangered species such as the orang-utan, rhinoceros and pygmy elephant cling for survival.*http://www.sambojalodge.com/ website Lestari lodge, one of Orangutan Survival Foundations reforestation and orangutan rehabilitation projects.*East-Borneo.Co.Cc - The art, culture and knowledge of east Borneo.TimuTimur KalimantanTimurOrientalorientalK-l-man-tn-snTimurOrientaleWtanKalimantanasTimurnl:Oost-Kalimantanja: WschodnieOrientalde EstWtanfi:It-KalimantanTimurth:Kalimantannga Kalimantanzh:
454586
Mechanical_Animals
 Misc         Mechanical Animals is the third full-length album by American band Marilyn Manson. It was released on September 14, 1998, in Australia and on September 15, 1998, in the US, Germany and France through Nothing and Records and marked the beginning of the bands brief foray into rock, a sharp contrast to the harsh and abrasive Industrial rock and metal sound of their earlier and succeeding efforts.It is a opera album and the second instalment in a trilogy that includes Superstar and Wood (In the Shadow of the Valley of Death). After the release of Holy Wood, Manson revealed that the over-arching story within the trilogy is divulged in reverse chronological order. Holy Wood, therefore, begins the story, followed by Mechanical Animals, and concluding with Antichrist Superstar.() It debuted at  1 in its first week of sale, making it the first Marilyn Manson album to do so. It spawned four singles (Dope Show, Is Dead, Dont Like the Drugs (But the Drugs Like Me) and White).Recording and productionAborted sessions with the Dust BrothersFollowing the conclusion of their year-long to the World Tour in September 1997, the band relocated from Fort Lauderdale, Florida to Hollywood, California.( Work on Mechanical Animals initiated soon after. By early December of that year, the singer began opening up on the then new and unnamed records development, sitting down with MTVs Year In Rock special on December 12.( Early on, there were also reports that the new album would be produced by the Los Angeles-based production team, the Brothers. According to News, They have completed work on a few tracks on the next effort from Marilyn Manson...() However, nothing came of this reported collaboration and none of the reported completed tracks have surfaced.Mansons friend, Smashing Pumpkins frontman Corgan, also served as an unofficial music consultant to the band during these early development stages.( After playing a few of the early songs for Corgan, he advised the band that This is definitely the right direction, but if youre gonna do this, go all the way with it. Dont just hint at it.(Sessions with Michael Beinhorn and Sean BeavanThe band subsequently employed Beinhorn as principal producer, co-producing the record with Manson. Beavan was also brought in to supply additional production work.() By May of that year, having just completed his obligations for Holes then-new album, Skin, Beinhorns camp confirmed that the nascent Manson project was halfway complete and on course for a late summer or early fall release.( Manson, for his part, spent the early part of the year on break from the studio to promote his autobiography, Long Hard Road Out Of Hell.(() During his February 24, 1998 interview on Public Radios Air talk show to promote the book he divulged that, having exhausted the topic of organized religion in the previous album, the upcoming release will see a major shift in thematic focus: After going through what I just did in the past two years, its almost like Scissorhands or E.T.&mdash;someone who feels like theyre in a place where theyre not accepted or dont belong ... Its more from that perspective. Its much more vulnerable music that Im making on this new album. Both sonically and lyrically its about the depression of alienation, rather than the aggressiveness of it. Its about the emptiness.() Guitarist Zum divulged that in one instance the band recorded a song a day for two weeks straight during a particular spree of creativity.()Final mixing and post-production took place in a studio in Burbank, California.() In July 1998, after having contributed guitar work to 12 of the albums 14 tracks, Zim Zum left the band under amicable terms to pursue his own solo project.( He was replaced by the former guitarist of English industrial metal band 2wo, John Lowery (rechristened by the band as John 5).()Conceptstylepadding:8px;In the album, Manson takes on two roles, being a substance addicted glam rocker and a gender ambiguous Alien called Omga (pronounced oh-mee-gah) who, much like Bowies Ziggy Stardust, falls down to earth, is captured, placed with a band called The Mechanical Animals and turned into a rock star product. He has become numb to the world, either lost or high in space or the Hills, through excessive drug use as a coping mechanism with his life as a product of his corporate masters. Mansons other role is that of Alpha who is based on himself and his experiences around the conclusion of the Antichrist Superstar tour/era. Acting as Omgas foil, Alphas emotions have only begun seeping back. Vulnerable and trying to relearn how to use them properly, he despairs about how little emotion other people feel, observing them to be mechanical animals. Both are looking to come back into the world - looking among the mechanical animals for the thing they need to make themselves whole. They call it White, unsure if she is real or simply a drug induced hallucination.( Subsequently, seven of the fourteen songs are from the perspective, lyrically and musically, of Omga and his fictional band The Mechanical Animals, while the other seven are by Alpha (Marilyn Manson). The Omga songs are typically those most nihilistic and superficial lyrically, such as Dope Show, User Friendly and New Model No. 15. The album artwork features a dual liner note book, in which one half has lyrics for the Omga songs, and when flipped over, has those for the Alpha songs.Marilyn Manson later noted in an interview with Stone magazine that Mechanical Animals was to represent the point where the revolution got sold out, a hollow shell of what the essence of Marilyn Manson was. It was a satire, and a lot of people interpreted it as This is what he really is. I was making a mockery of what I was, taking a shot at myself.()() After the release of Wood (In the Shadow of the Valley of Death), Manson revealed that his concept album trilogy is an autobiographical story told in a reverse timeline (chronologically reverse from their actual release dates). That means Holy Wood opens the storyline followed by Mechanical Animals and concluded with Antichrist Superstar.() Furthermore, though Antichrist Superstar and Mechanical Animals made sense as individual concept albums on their own, there was a hidden over-arching story running through the three releases.CompositionUnlike Marilyn Mansons previous work, Superstar, Mechanical Animals is, on an aesthetic level, far less dark. In both image and music, Mechanical Animals is inspired by 1970s style, Bowie-esque glam rock (Manson has often cited Bowie as his biggest influence). Most songs contain lighter melodies, however, this lightness does not necessarily extend to the lyrics. The music is also far more complicated than most of his work.The song Great Big White World raised concerns, among some groups, of possibly being a racially-motivated reference until Manson himself cleared up the rumors by stating that it was about cocaine.Rolling Stone described Mansons crooning on the title track, Mechanical Animals, as evocative of the sultry vibe of T. Rexs Bolan.(Dont Like the Drugs (But the Drugs Like Me) features guitar work by Navarro.(PromotionFive days before the albums release, the band performed The Dope Show at the MTV Video Music Awards.() The Ziggy-in-Vegas performance saw Manson strut into the stage in a blue vinyl coat with a faux-fur collar before stripping down, mid-way into the song, to a blue skin-tight costume with cut-outs that revealed the prosthetic breasts and androgynous genitalia of his Omga character.( The performance also included a trio of besequined back-up singers that harmonized with the frontman as he sang along.( Rolling Stone remarked that incontrovertibly, Marilyn Manson stole the show.()ReleaseAt a time before the ubiquity of file sharing, the first singles from both Beinhorn-produced albums were leaked three weeks before their intended release dates and played nearly a dozen times on New York radio station WXRK (92.3 FM) and its Los Angeles-based sister station, KROQ-FM (106.7 FM), on the weekend of July 31 to August 2, 1998.() Interscope neither confirmed nor denied that the leak originated from them but joined Holes label, Records, in issuing a cease and desist order to WXRK on August 3.(In spite of this the Manson single, The Dope Show, was subsequently recorded and converted by a fan into a near CD-quality MP3 and made available on an unofficial fan site for download soon after.( The following weekend, San Francisco radio station Live 105 (105.3 FM) played both singles again.()SinglesArguably, this albums most successful song is Dope Show, which fared extremely well on both video and single charts in the United States and abroad. The Dope Show was written by Manson (lyrics) and Twiggy Ramirez (music). It continues to reign as the bands most commercially successful song. The music video debuted the bands controversial new, androgynous rock sound and image to the world. It is inspired by Jodorowskys controversial art film The Holy Mountain as well as the Bowie film, The Man Who Fell to Earth. Again, Bowies influence has been enormous on this album, with both influences noted publicly by Manson himself.The third single, is Dead, was featured in Matrix: Music from the Motion Picture, soundtrack album for the film Matrix&mdash;the song is played during the end credits.()Cover and packagingThe controversial art has won critical acclaim and numerous awards.() The infamous photo depicts Manson as an androgynous naked figure with breasts, six fingers and airbrushed genitalia.( It is the brainchild of New York City-based long-time Manson photographer Cultice. Designer Paul Brown has said of the cover, Im extremely proud of it. I said more in one of his covers than any novel could. It made people think and cringe.( Contrary to popular internet rumors, the band leader, Manson, did not undergo any plastic surgery for this androgynous, alien look. The breasts are prosthetic, manufactured specially by Lucas Light and Magic.( Manson is in reality, naked, and covered head to toe in latex paint, provided by the same movie make-up company. His genitalia are covered by a thin cup of plastic to create the androgynous appearance of the alien figure he calls Omga, which the singer explained, represent sexlessness and vulnerability, in addition to his own affection for prosthetic limbs.( Manson has stated in interviews that his friend, actor Depp, is the current owner of these prosthetic breasts which Manson traded for Depps strawberry-blonde wig worn in the film Blow. In 2003 VH1, declared that Mechanical Animals had the twenty-ninth greatest album cover of all time.() It is also featured in Grant Scotts book The Greatest Album Covers of All Time.thumb|210px|right|Alternate cover for the fictitious band Omga and the Mechanical AnimalsThe cover art text is an anagram which, when rearranged, reads Marilyn Manson Is An Alchemical Man.() The album also features an alternate, less obscene cover which is contained on the reverse side of the album liner notes. It is incidentally the cover for an album of the same name by Omga and the Mechanical Animals, a fictitious band composed of characters played by the members of Marilyn Manson. The photo featured on this alternative cover art includes more of the symbolism surrounding the numeral 15.()The liner notes contain hidden messages in yellow text, which are viewable through the blue CD packaging or the transparent blue LP; these messages (now green) include: www.comawhite.com (website no longer available), I no longer knew if Coma White was real or just a side effect, sic Now children its time for recess, please roll up your sleeves, A sun with no planets, burning in circles, Even machines can see that we are dead, and In the end I became them and I led them/ After all none of us really qualified as humans/ We were hardworn, atomatic and as hollow as the o in God/ I reattatched my emotions cellular and narcotic/ From the top of Holywood it looked like space/ Millions of capsules and Mechanical Animals/ A city filled with dead stars and a girl I called Comawhite/ This is my Omga. The reader of the liner notes is shown how to read these messages in the booklet: there is a diagram showing a CD case over the booklet, and a message which reads: Yellow and blue  green.A limited tour edition of Mechanical Animals was released in the UK (including other locations like Australia and Mexico, where only 100 copies of this edition arrived) with an illustrated hardcover sleeve by Marcus Wild. Though limited edition, the album is easily attainable in certain regions. The packaging is identical to the original version except for the bonus eight-page comic book by Wild, illustrating scenes from the Dont Like the Drugs (But the Drugs Like Me) music video.ControversyAs early as August 14, 1998, a month before the release, the three largest retailers in the United States&mdash;K-Mart, Wal-Mart and the Corporation&mdash;refused to stock the album citing the obscene cover and the expectation that it will carry a Parental Advisory sticker for violating their policy of not selling material with explicit lyrics or content.() In an attempt to appease some of the retailers Nothing and Interscope discussed plans to cover the breasts with a sticker and enclose the entire package in blue cellophane&mdash;similar to the brown paper bag tactic employed exactly 30 years before by distributors on the explicitly nude cover of Lennon and Onos Music No.1: Two Virgins.(() Wal-Mart still refused to sell the album, and consequently pulled all previous albums by Manson in light of the High School massacre on April 20, 1999. To this day, Wal-Marts corporate website states that Mansons work, among the work of other artists, will not be sold in their stores, but 2003 saw the mass sale of Mansons fifth LP, Golden Age of Grotesque in nearly all Wal-Marts; representatives claimed they chose to sell the album because it was commercially viable and was on the Top Ten charts.ReceptionCritical receptionaccessdate2010-11-17)| rev2  NME | rev2Score   link| rev3  Christgau| rev3Score  (| rev4  Stone | rev4Score   link| rev5  Weekly| rev5Score  (A-) link| rev6  Salon.com| rev6Score  (favorable) link| rev7  Angeles Times | rev7Score   link| rev8  Sputnikmusic | rev8Score   link}}The album received general acclaim. Analyzing the albums intentions, Barry Walters of Village Voice commented, Mechanical Animals celebrates sexy celebrity in a typically Mansonian bacchanalia of contradictions. Hes said all along that dirty media dominance is the cleanest and closest thing to divinity in a world that crucified the god in itself and replaced it with blind faith. Now he understands first-hand that stardom sucks, yet while he lifts a platform boot against its phony fat ass he still cant help reveling in the excess. Superstar critiqued fame in order to make him famous. Having been there/done that, Manson wants more because more is the American way hes hell-bent on subverting&mdash;even as hes soaking in it.() Of the records musical direction Walters noted Flexing far more range than rage, Mansons feminization shifts his vocal power center from a diseased gut to a broken heart.() Youd think the puppet couldnt dance without Daddy NIN pulling the strings, yet Mechanical Animals is melodic, catchy, even soulful in a flagrantly soulless way ... Guitars roar and whine, bass booms, drums race, and synths twitter with a tweeness thats gonna turn Durannie grannie Rhodess gray roots green.( USAToday praised that Manson and producer Beinhorn have rediscovered the adrenalin in 70s glam-rock, sprinkling Glitter and Ziggy Stardust over Gothic theatrics.() Jon Wiederhorn of Amazon observed that Mechanical Animals is a brash, decadent, and glittery display of self-indulgent hooks and melodramatic vocals that sounds like Sane-era Bowie and T. Rex at their most boisterous crossed with the more modern sounds of todays industrial nation.( Ann Powers of Stone commented Mechanical Animals gets its cavelike spaciousness from goth influences and tweaks them with an industrial crunch ... He and his band approach its terrain the way a 1960s rocker like Clapton approaches the blues, with respect and a sense of entitlement.( Annalee Newitz of Salon commented With Mechanical Animals Manson is softening up, turning away from his dour preoccupation with religious fascism and toward space-age genderfuck chic. The creamy synth sound and drugged-out lyrics that dominate Mansons latest CD prove that two antithetical 80s musical genres&mdash;heavy metal and new wave&mdash;can indeed be fruitfully combined ... Mechanical Animals is a far better album than the recent Antichrist Superstar, taking Manson in new directions without turning the volume down on his magnetic weirdness.() David Browne of Weekly commented Looking back in mascarad anger, Manson and Michael Beinhorn have fashioned music steeped in glam rock and concept-album bombast but updated with a crunching intensity ... He layers the songs with cooing backup singers, electronica burbles, skulking guitars, and synths at their most decadently new wavy. The effect is often spectacular.( Lorraine Ali of Angeles Times commented songs swagger with lipstick-wearing attitude, have fun with sleazy subject matter and actually convey some (gasp) human emotion ... This album is the first time we actually experience Manson as a band, not a phenomenon filtered through Reznors mixing board wizardry or a freak show accompanied by a soundtrack. An album thats powerful from start to finish is far more surprising than any controversial Manson high jinks ... this record ensures his further infiltration of teenage America and earns him a new spot in the annals of great, big, pompous pop albums.() According to Musical Express ... Mechanical Animals, MM album number four, marks a total shift in Mansons assault. Where the Antichrist Superstar game plan was about gaining notoriety through outrage, rather than winning souls over on musical grounds, Mechanical Animals aims straight for the singalong heart of stadium-land. And rips it out, and holds it aloft in triumph ... Of the 14 tracks here, ten could be singles. On this evidence alone, Mechanical Animals is an unashamedly crass bid for total world domination ... they already have the goth kids. Now, their sights have turned on everyone else.()Not everyone gave the album a glowing review. Music critic Christgau commented If only the absurd aura of artistic respectability surrounding this arrant self-promoter would teach us that not every icon deserves a think piece, that its no big deal to have a higher IQ than Osbourne, that the Road of Excess leads to the Palace Theater ... Its strategy is to camouflage the feebleness of La Mansons vocal affect by pretending its deliberate&mdash;one more depersonalizing production device with which to flatten willing cerebella whilst confronting humankinds alienation, amorality, and failure to have a good time on Saturday night.() Spin magazine commented Manson may appeal to mopey eighth graders, but hes essentially mining the same agitprop territory and premillenial confusion that hipster, highbrow heroes such as Empire and Tricky take for granted. Manson shares with Empire a preference for destroying the masters house with the masters tools. Like Tricky, Manson uses gender confusion as a mechanism, less politics than identity evasion.( Joshua Klein of A.V. Club commented Really, who is supposed to buy this sudden transformation from self-proclaimed Antichrist Superstar into Ziggy Stardust? Surely not his fans ... Surprisingly, those most likely to appreciate Mansons change in spirit may be honest-to-goodness rock n roll fans. Mechanical Animals is first and foremost more musical than anything Manson has done ... His music packs both industrial muscle and anthemic conviction, even as it playfully steals from the Bowie songbook. What it lacks, sadly, is any sense of wit, as songs doggedly hammer at safe taboos like drugs, sex, drugs, stardom, drugs, and death. And drugs ... But even Manson must realize that with this release, people actually have a reason to line up in the first place.() Thomas Erlewine of allmusic commented With pal Corgan as an unofficial consultant and Soundgarden producer Michael Beinhorn manning the boards, Manson turns Mechanical Animals into a big, clean rock record ... It can make for a welcome change of pace, since his glammed-up goth is more tuneful than his clattering industrial cacophony, but it lacks the cartoonish menace that distinguished his prior music. And without that, Marilyn Manson seems a little ordinary ... Manson should have remembered&mdash;demons are never that scary in the light.( Despite this, Greg Burk of Weekly would go on to call Mechanical Animals one of the greatest albums of its decade.()Commercial performanceIn the United States, Mechanical Animals debuted with a Soundscan-confirmed first week sales of 223,000 units.() Propelled by both the first singles heavy rotation on the radio and on MTV as well as the bands attention-grabbing main show performance at the 1998 MTV Video Music Awards, the record briefly displaced Miseducation of Lauryn Hill for the  1 position on the Billboard 200.(()() By the second week, sales had dropped to 98,200 units and the album slid to the  5 spot.((Although critically acclaimed, Mechanical Animals was initially not too well received by long time fans who complained about the willfully radio-friendly sound of the album and surmised that Marilyn Manson had sold out.() The album was the lowest-selling  1 album of 1998.() Regardless, the album would go on to attain platinum certification. Worldwide, the album went on to sell over 8 million copies.() Despite its later success, the album was marred by controversy. It was virtually blacklisted when Manson became the main scapegoat for the Columbine shootings of 1999 (despite the lack of evidence that the shooters were fans of the band or even that music causes violence), with unit sales halting very close behind the figure for its predecessor, Superstar.AccoladesAccording to Acclaimedmusic.net Mechanical Animals is the 44th best album of 1998,() the 426th greatest record released during the 1990s() and the 2209th greatest of all-time.( SPIN Magazine ranked Mechanical Animals the 7th Best Album in their 1998 End Of Year List.() Online music magazine to Noise ranked Mechanical Animals 25th in their 1998 list of Albums of the Year.( Village Voice ranked Mechanical Animals 40th in their 1998 list of Albums of the Year.( Kerrang! ranks Mechanical Animals 2nd in their 1998 list of Albums of the Year.(() Q Magazine listed Mechanical Animals among their picks for their 1998 Recordings Of The Year.(() Dutch magazine OOR ranked Mechanical Animals 18th in their 1998 Albums of the Year list.(() The record ranked 2nd in the Critics Top 50() and 10th in the Popular Poll() of German magazine Musik Express/Sounds in their 1998 Albums of the Year.( In 1999, American music journalist Raggett listed Mechanical Animals 78th in his The Top 136 Albums of the Nineties.()() Also in 1999, Australian magazine JUICE ranked Mechanical Animals 84th in their 100 Greatest Albums of the 90s.(() In 2006, sister British magazines Classic Rock & Hammer included Mechanical Animals in The 200 Greatest Albums of the 90s.(() Also in 2006, Dutch public radio broadcaster VPRO included Mechanical Animals in their 299 Nominations of the Best Album of All Time.(() The French edition of the British magazine Sound ranked Mechanical Animals 56th in their Top 150 Albums of Our Lifetime (1992-2006)() and 2nd in their 1998 Albums of the Year.(()Mechanical Animals and Rock Is Dead TourFollowing the release of Mechanical Animals, Marilyn Manson staged two worldwide stadium tours, titled the Mechanical Animals Tour and Rock Is Dead Tour. A concert film was recorded depicting both tours, titled Is in the TV.(( It was released on November 2, 1999 in VHS format by Interscope Records and features live concert footage of 13 songs culled from various concerts across the world as well as backstage and behind-the-scenes clips.()()Mechanical Animals TourAfter declining a headlining slot at the failing Lollapalooza summer music festival (along with numerous other bands) in early 1998 due to delays in Mechanical Animals release, the band launched the first of their own headlining tours in support of the album.() It was originally intended to start on June 25, 1998, with a series of 6 festival dates in Europe lasting until July 12, 1998.() However the planned summer European leg was scrapped and the tours launch date was rescheduled to October 25, 1998 after drummer Ginger Fish became ill with mononucleosis.(Beginning on October 25, 1998 and lasting until January 31, 1999, the Mechanical Animals Tour included two legs spanning a Fall to Winter World Tour in Europe, Japan, and North America and a 6 show headlining stint at the Day Out tour in Australia.() In total, the band completed 46 shows out of the 52 originally planned.Beautiful Monsters/Rock Is Dead TourBeginning on February 28, 1999 and lasting until August 8, 1999, the tour included three legs spanning Europe, Japan and North America with a total of 9 completed shows for the Beautiful Monsters Tour and 43 completed shows (out of 46 planned) for the Rock Is Dead Tour. The tour is particularly notable for a number of incidences that plagued its progress. Following the conclusion of the Mechanical Animals Tour in January 1999, the band was once again offered a headlining slot by the organizers of the Lollapalooza festival for the 1999 summer season (as part of an attempt to resurrect the by-then-defunct festival) which they declined.() Instead, the band struck a deal with Hole to co-headline the latters Monsters Tour.( Immediately, the joint venture began experiencing problems due to dispute between both groups leaders.(( After only 9 shows (spanning a total of two weeks) the tour imploded,()(() resulting in Holes departure on March 14, 1999 and the tour being renamed Rock Is Dead.()()() Magnet, who were already opening for Manson,( assumed Holes place on the tours playbill.()() A minor dispute erupted surrounding the tours revised nomenclature as Korn and Zombie were already in the middle of another tour with the same name.() The first two performances of the Is Dead Tour were canceled after Manson suffered a hairline fracture on one of his ankles during the final show with Hole at The Forum in Los Angeles. The tour was resumed on March 17, 1999.( The tour, however, would stagger yet again following the High School massacre on April 20, 1999. In the ensuing aftermath, the band was pointed out as a cause of the tragedy in Littleton,()() prompting the group to cancel their remaining North American engagements out of respect for the victims, explaining, Its not a great atmosphere to be out playing rock n roll shows, for us or the fans.()()()Track listingCD version length15         1:22;notes*Australian and Korean releases of the album come with an additional DVD that contains the videos for The Beautiful People, The Dope Show and Sweet Dreams.*This album features a hidden, fifteenth track, playable only on a computer; it is untitled and experimental, further playing on the albums theme of the character Omga and conformity. Upon entering the album into a computer, an autorun file starts a program that displays two of Mansons paintings while the song plays in the background. It is thought to be an experiment in synesthesia.(Vinyl versionWhen released on vinyl, the record was split into two separately sleeved albums; the first credited to the character of Alpha (portrayed by Marilyn Manson himself), pressed on opaque white vinyl, and the latter to Omga and the Mechanical Animals on transparent blue vinyl. The Manson album dealt with songs of love and alienation, while the Mechanical Animals disc contained anthems of sex and drug use.() B-sides* Panorama of the Endtimes* Get My Rocks Off (Hook Cover)* A Rose and a Baby Ruth (Hamilton IV cover)* Coma White (acoustic version)Charts and certificationsAlbum{|classwikitable sortable|-!  styletext-align:left; width:210px;|Charts (1998)!alignleft|Peakposition|-|alignleft|Australia (ARIA)(()(accessdate2010-11-17)| styletext-align:center;|1|-|alignleft|Austria (3)(| styletext-align:center;|6|-|alignleft|Belgium (Flanders) (50)(| styletext-align:center;|22|-|alignleft|Belgium (Wallonia) (Ultratop)(| styletext-align:center;|45|-|alignleft|Canada (CANOE)((| styletext-align:center;|1|-|alignleft|Finland (Mit Hitti)(| styletext-align:center;|6|-|alignleft|France (SNEP)(| styletext-align:center;|14|-|alignleft|Germany (Media Control)()| styletext-align:center;|7|-|alignleft|Netherlands (MegaCharts)(| styletext-align:center;|42|-|alignleft|Norway (VG-Lista)(| styletext-align:center;|3|-|alignleft|Zealand (RIANZ)(| styletext-align:center;|3|-|alignleft|Sweden (Sverigetopplistan)(| styletext-align:center;|6|-|alignleft|Switzerland (Hitparade)(| styletext-align:center;|44|-|alignleft|Kingdom (OCC)()| styletext-align:center;|8|-|alignleft|States (200)((| styletext-align:center;|1|}CertificationsChart precession and successionSingles{| classwikitable|-!  styletext-align:left; width:130px;|Single!  styletext-align:left; width:320px;|Chart (1998)!  styletext-align:center; width:50px;|Peakposition|-|rowspan7|The Dope Show|Australia (ARIA)()| styletext-align:center;|20|-|Rock Tracks(accessdate2010-11-17)| styletext-align:center;|12|-|Rock Tracks(| styletext-align:center;|15|-|Netherlands (MegaCharts)(| styletext-align:center;|63|-|Zealand (RIANZ)(| styletext-align:center;|28|-|Sweden (Sverigetopplistan)(| styletext-align:center;|53|-|alignleft|Kingdom (OCC)(| styletext-align:center;|12|}Credits and personnel;Marilyn Manson(accessdate2010-11-17)* Manson  vocals, producer, vocoder, photography, guitar on The Last Day on Earth, electronic drums on The Dope Show* Ramirez  acoustic, lead and rhythm guitars, bass, synth bass, noise* Wayne Gacy  piano, keyboards, synthesizer, electronic drums, sampling, mellotron, shaker* Fish  drums, percussion* Zum  lead, rhythm and acoustic guitars, keyboards, guitar synthesizer* John 5  live guitar, guitar on Mechanical Animals; Production and personnel(* McGowan  background vocals on Posthuman* Beinhorn  producer* Navarro  guitar solo on I Dont Like the Drugs (But the Drugs Like Me)* Corgan  consultant, backing vocals on The Speed of Pain (uncredited, however name was mentioned in the thank you section of the album booklet)* Lord-Alge  mixing* Beavan  programming, producer, engineer, editing* Barry Goldberg  engineer* Rob Brill  assistant engineer* Jensen  mastering* Saber  keyboards* John West  vocals (bckgr)* Alexandra Brown  vocals (bckgr)* Lynn Davis  vocals (bckgr)* Nikki Harris  vocals (bckgr)* Tai  vocals (bckgr)* Lauren  background vocals (or, as the liner notes state, pornography) on User Friendly* Cultice  photography* Devra Kinery  makeup* Angela Garcia  makeup* Alex Dizon  hair stylist References ;Notes;FootnotesExternal links*Mechanical Animals at RecordsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsja:AnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimalsAnimals
456367
Cobalt,_Ontario
footnotes              Cobalt is a town in the district of Timiskaming, province of Ontario, Canada, with a population of 1,223 (as per the 2006 Census.)In 2001 Cobalt was named Ontarios Most Historic Town by a panel of judges on the Ontario program 2, and in 2002 the area was designated a National Historic Site.HistorySilver was discovered in the area in the summer of 1903, during the construction of the & Northern Ontario Railway from North Bay to the communities of Haileybury and New Liskeard, north of Cobalt. Within a few years the area was one of the largest silver producing areas in the world.  Speculation over mining stocks led to riots on Street in York City. The town was incorporated in 1906. Its population swelled and peaked at 7,000. In 1911, silver production exceeded 30,000,000 ounces (937.5 tons).  Mining continued until the 1930s, then slowed to a trickle. Activity renewed in the 1950s then slowly dropped off, and there are no longer any operating mines in the area. However, one mill still operates in the area, and there continues to be exploration, including exploration for diamonds.thumb|left|225px|Historic mine in Cobalt.The silver mines of Cobalt, and the prospectors and miners that discovered them and worked the mines, have left an indelible mark on Canadian history, and the town is known as the birthplace of hard rock mining in Canada.  The ore in Cobalt was close to surface, which meant that men with limited experience could prospect and begin mining, and then hone their skills as the mines went deeper. Those who learned their trade in Cobalt moved north, discovering gold in Lake and Timmins and further afield in Canada and around the world. The mining in Cobalt was done with the use of wheelbarrows, pickaxes, steel and dynamite. The Silver Kings played in the inaugural NHA season.Cobalt, Haileybury, and New Liskeard were formerly known as the Tri-Towns. When Haileybury and New Liskeard were amalgamated into the city of Shores in 2004, Cobalt decided to remain a separate town. However, the two municipalities continue to have a close relationship, including the operation of a shared transit system.Also noteworthy is that in 2001 the town voted overwhelmingly to stop adding fluoride to the drinking water.DemographicsPrivate dwellings occupied by usual residents: 532 (total dwellings: 569)Mother tongue:(* English as first language: 76.0 %* French as first language: 19.5 %* English and French as first language: 2.0%* Other as first language: 2.4 %Environmental issuesThe mining activities in Cobalt have left a significant environmental legacy. Millions of tons of mine waste rock and mill tailings were dumped on the land and in local lakes. In Cobalt ores, silver was associated with arsenic minerals. Little of this arsenic was ever recovered - most of it ended up in the tailings and waste rock. Today this arsenic contaminates surface water in the area and poses risks to the environment.The Cobalt area is also laced with many miles of underground mine workings, as well as surface trenches, pits and shaft openings. As a result, there are risks of collapse, or subsidence of underground mine workings, and many areas that have been fenced off to prevent entry.Tourism and attractionsthumb|right|225px|North Cobalt.Visitors to Cobalt can visit the Cobalt Mining Museum, which boasts the worlds largest display of silver, as well as The Bunker which is a military museum, and a firefighters museum.  The Heritage Silver Trail is a self-guided driving tour of several mine and mill sites in the area. The trail is well marked, guiding visitors around the backroads of Cobalt. At each site, signs are posted, identifying the site, and providing a brief description of the site.  The trail guides visitors to many of the remaining mine headframes in the Cobalt area, some of which are quite picturesque, and stand as an important reminder of Cobalts past.Visitors can also take a tour of an old underground mine.  Tours start at the Mining Museum, and are guided by museum staff. The narrow damp tunnels of the mine give a real appreciation for the conditions under which miners worked, and tour guides sprinkle the tour with many stories to help bring the past to life.On February 14, 2008, plans were announced to convert the vacant Fraser Hotel building into a complex which will include The Bunker museum, housing units, tourist accommodations, and a proposed culinary school.(The Temiskaming Speaker)Passenger rail service is provided from the railway station on the Northlander.Notable people*Angus, federal Member of Parliament for Bay*Bolan, former provincial MPP*Douglas, hockey player, winner of the Trophy in 1963.*James Gibson Holland, awarded the Cross for service in the War died in Cobalt in 1948.*Frederick Light, President of Northern Telecom 1974-1979, CEO and chairman of Northern Telecom 1979-1984.*Lonsdale, former mayor of Cobalt and federal Member of Parliament for Timiskaming*Sopha, former provincial MPPReferencesExternal links* Town of Cobalt* Historic Cobalt(Ontario)it:Cobalt(Ontario)(Ontrio)
458531
CairoHaifa_train_bombings_1948
During the 1948 war, on February 29 and again on March 31, the military coaches of the Cairo-Haifa train were mined by the Jewish underground group Lehi. On February 29, the Lehi mined the train north of Rehovot, killing 28 British soldiers and wounding 35. No civilians were hurt. One or more bombs laid on the track were detonated from a nearby orange grove. Lehi took credit for the bombing of the British train as revenge for the Yehuda Street Bombing in Jerusalem. The train was the normal daily passenger express to which four military coaches had been attached.(The Times, 1 March 1948.)On March 31, the train was mined again near Binyamina, a Jewish settlement in the neighborhood of Caesarea, killing 40 persons and wounding 60. The casualties were all civilians, mostly Arabs. Although there were some soldiers on the train, none were injured. The Palestine Post and the New York Times attributed the attack to Lehi.(The Palestine Post, 1 April 1948)(New York Times, 1 April 1948)Notes(References* Cairo-To-Haifa Train Mined 28 British Soldiers Killed And 35 Wounded, Stern Gang Claims Responsibility For Attack, The Times, Monday, March 1, 1948; pg. 4; Issue 51008; col A.* Cairo-Haifa Train Mined Again 40 Killed And 60 Wounded, Problem Of Preserving Sanctity Of Jerusalem, The Times, Thursday, April 1, 1948; pg. 4; Issue 51034; col A.*Dana Adams Schmidt, 40 Arabs Are Slain In Mining of Train: 60 More Are Injured In Blast Near Haifa - Derailment is Laid to Stern Group, New York Times, 1 April 1948.* 40 Arabs Killed, 60 Injured, In Train Blast, Palestine Post, April 1, 1948; page 1.* Unknown Soldiers The Operation Book of Lehi, Yaakov Banai, 1987.
460885
John_Nunn
peakrating  2630 (January 1995)John Denis Martin Nunn (born 25 April 1955 in London) is one of Englands strongest chess players and once belonged to the worlds top ten. He is also a three times world champion in problem solving, a chess writer and publisher, and a mathematician.CareerAs a junior, he showed a prodigious talent for the game and in 1967, at twelve years of age, he won the British under-14 Championship. At fourteen, he was London Under-18 Champion for the 1969/70 season(Chess Magazine - March 1970, p. 66. London Championships 1969/70, held at Islington Green Secondary School (29 December 1969 - 3 January 1970)) and less than a year later, at just fifteen years of age, he proceeded to College, Oxford, to study mathematics. At the time, it was said that he was Oxfords youngest undergraduate since Wolsey. Graduating in 1973, he went on to gain his doctorate in 1978 with a thesis on finite H-spaces, and remained at University as a mathematics lecturer until 1981, when he became a professional chess player. In 1975, he became the European Junior Champion. He gained the Grandmaster title in 1978 and was British champion in 1979. Nunn has twice won individual gold medals at Olympiads. In 1989, he finished sixth in the inaugural World Cup, a series of tournaments in which the top 25 players in the world competed. His best performance in the Chess Championship came in 1987, when he lost a playoff match against Portisch for a place in the Tournament. He won the prestigious Hoogovens tournament (held annually in aan Zee) in 1982, 1990 and 1991.He achieved his highest Elo rating of 2630 in January 1995. Six years earlier, in January 1989, his then rating of 2620 was high enough to elevate him into the worlds top ten, where he shared ninth place. This was close to the peak of the English chess boom and there were two English players above him on the list; Short (world number three, 2650) and Speelman (world number five, 2640). Nunn has now retired from serious tournament play and hasnt played a FIDE rated game since August 2006,(http://ratings.fide.com/id.phtml?event400017) however he has been active in the ECF rapid play.(Player profile from ECF)As well as being a strong player, Nunn is regarded as one of the best contemporary authors of chess books. He has penned many volumes, including Secrets of Grandmaster Chess which won the Chess Federation Book of the Year award in 1988 and John Nunns Best Games which took the award in 1995. He is the director of chess publishers Publications. Chess historian Edward Winter has written of him:(Edward Winter, Chess Note 4218. Retrieved on 2009-01-19.)A polymath, Nunn has written authoritative monographs on openings, endings and compositions, as well as annotated games collections and autobiographical volumes. As an annotator he is equally at home presenting lucid prose descriptions for the relative novice and analysis of extreme depth for the expert.thumb|left|175px|John NunnNunn is also involved with problems, composing several examples and solving as part of the British team on several occasions. On this subject he wrote Solving in Style (1985). He won the Chess Solving Championship in Halkidiki, Greece, in September 2004 and also made his final GM norm in problem solving; he won the World Championship again in 2007(John Nunn wins World Chess Problem Solving Championship, ChessBase News, 3 November 2007) and in 2010.(John Nunn wins World Problem Solving Championship, ChessBase News, 3 November 2010) He is the third person ever to gain both over-the-board and solving GM titles (the others being Mestel and Soffer; Vukovi has been the fourth since 2008). Since the mid-1990s, Nunn has been actively engaged in mining from chess tablebases. The products of this work include the books Secrets Of Rook Endings, Secrets of Minor-Piece Endings, and Secrets Of Pawnless Endings. These books include human-usable endgame strategies found by Nunn (and others) by extensive experimentation with tablebases, and new editions have come out and are due as more tablebases are created and tablebases are more deeply data-mined. Nunn is thus (as of 2004) the foremost data miner of endgame tablebases. This work corresponds to the endgame part of the work of Berlekamp, Conway et al. in dots-and-boxes, Hex and other games.  He is married to Petra Fink-Nunn, a German chess player with the title FIDE Master. They have a son, Michael.Notable gameThe Variation of the Game regularly provides swashbuckling play and Nunns game with Jacob st-Hansen at Teesside 1974, was no exception. The latter part of the game was played in a frantic time scramble, with Nunn sacrificing pieces to bring the enemy king into the open and deliver checkmate.*Jacob st-Hansen - John Nunn, World Student Olympiad, Teesside 1974, Vienna Game, 0-1Books* 101 Brilliant Chess Miniatures (2000), Publications. ISBN 1-901983-16-1.* Beating the Sicilian 3 (1995, with Gallagher), Henry Holt & Co. ISBN 0-8050-4227-X.* The Complete Najdorf 6. Bg5 (1997), International Chess Enterprises. ISBN 1-879479-45-1.* Complete Najdorf: Modern Lines (1999), Sterling Pub Co Inc. ISBN 0713482184.* The Complete Pirc (1989), Batsford. ISBN 0-7134-5389-3.* Endgame Challenge (2002), Gambit Publications. ISBN 1-901983-83-8.* Grandmaster Chess Move by Move (2005), Gambit Publications. ISBN 1-904600-34-4.* John Nunns Best Games (2001), Batsford. ISBN 0-7134-7726-1.* John Nunns Chess Puzzle Book (1999), Gambit Publications. ISBN 1-901983-08-0.* Learn Chess (2000), Gambit Publications. ISBN 1-901983-30-7.* Learn Chess Tactics (2004), Gambit Publications. ISBN 1-901983-98-6.* Mammoth Book of the Worlds Greatest Chess Games (2004, with Burgess and John Emms), Carroll & Graf. ISBN 0-7867-1411-5.* New Ideas in the Pirc Defence (1993), Batsford. ISBN 0-7134-7237-5.* Nunns Chess Openings (1999), with Gallagher, John Emms, and Burgess, Chess. ISBN 1-85744-221-0.* Nunns Chess Endings, volume 1 (2010), Publications, ISBN 978-1-906454-21-0.* Nunns Chess Endings, volume 2 (2010), Publications, ISBN 978-1-906454-23-4.* Secrets of Grandmaster Chess (1997), International Chess Enterprises. ISBN 1-879479-54-0.* Secrets of Practical Chess (1998), Gambit Publications. ISBN 1-901983-01-3. Second edition 2007, ISBN 978-1-904600-70-1.* Secrets of Minor-Piece Endings (2001), Rowman Littlefield. ISBN 0-7134-7727-X.* Secrets of Pawnless Endings (1994, 2002), Gambit Publications. ISBN 1-901983-65-X.* Secrets of Rook Endings (1992, 1999), Gambit Publications. ISBN 1-901983-18-8.* Solving in Style (1985 Batsford) then (2002), Gambit Publications. ISBN 1-901983-66-8.* Tactical Chess Endings (2003), Batsford. ISBN 0-7134-5937-9.* Understanding Chess Endgames (2009), Gambit, ISBN 978-1-906454-11-1* Understanding Chess Move by Move (2001), Gambit Publications. ISBN 1-901983-41-2.See also* The Nunn Convention - Nunns system of showing the evaluation of chess movesReferences( External links * Bio at chessbase.com* * * Profile at ChessmetricsNunnNunnNunnNunnNunnNunnNunnNunnNunnNunnNunn
461714
Taconite
thumb|300px|TaconiteTaconite is a variety of iron formation, an iron-bearing (>15% iron) sedimentary rock, in which the iron minerals are interlayered with quartz, chert, or carbonate. The term was coined by Minnesota State Geologist Horace Winchell during his pioneering investigations of the Precambrian Biwabik Iron Formation of northeastern Minnesota due to its superficial resemblance to iron-bearing rocks he was familiar with in the Mountains of New York. The iron content of taconite, commonly present as finely dispersed magnetite, is generally 25 to 30%. In the late 19th and early 20th centuries, available ore was of such high quality that taconite was considered an uneconomic waste product.  After War II, much of the high grade iron ore in the States had been mined out, and taconite became a new source of iron. To process taconite, the ore is ground into a fine powder, the magnetite is separated from the waste rock by strong magnets, the powdered iron concentrate is combined with a binder such as bentonite clay and limestone as a flux, and rolled into pellets about one centimeter in diameter containing approximately 65% iron. The pellets are fired at a very high temperatures to harden and make them durable. This is necessary to ensure that the furnace charge remains porous to allow heated gas to pass through and react with the pelletized ore. Firing the pellet oxidizes the magnetite (Fe3O4) to hematite (Fe2O3), an exothermic reaction which reduces the energy cost of pelletizing the concentrate. E.W. Davis of the of Minnesota Mines Experiment Station is credited with developing the pelletizing process. Since the commercial development of this process in the Superior region in the 1950s, the term taconite has been used globally to refer to iron ores amenable to upgrading by similar processes.   Major producers of iron ore pellets from taconite in North America include Natural Resources, Steel, and ArcelorMittal.  These processed taconite ore pellets are also referred to as taconite.  Because this is the form that is typically transported by rail and ship, and cargo of these is often discussed, this usage of the term is very common.  ( http://www.dnr.state.mn.us/education/geology/digging/taconite.html ) Taconite pellets as used in the steelmaking industry, with a US Quarter shown for scale.The Mesabi Iron Range region of the American state of Minnesota is a major production area.  The taconite iron ore pellets are hauled by railroad through the ports of Silver Bay, Two Harbors and the Ports of Minnesota and Wisconsin, all on Superior. The ore is generally shipped by freighters to locations on the lower Lakes. Many steelmaking centers are located near Erie. Due to increased international demand, Taconite is now shipped to Mexico and China.(http://www.iseek.org/news/fw/fw7853FutureWork.html)The cargo of the SS Fitzgerald, which sank in Lake Superior on November 10, 1975, consisted of approximately 26,116 tons of taconite pellets.Taconite and Human HealthThe Minnesota Department of Health has launched a study to determine whether fibrous minerals in taconite and taconite dust can cause or exacerbate lung conditions such as asbestosis, pleural mesothelioma and other pleural conditions which occur following asbestos exposure. Because these conditions can be triggered by industrial asbestos, which was also used in taconite mining and processing, the study will attempt to determine what, if any, influence naturally occurring fibrous minerals in taconite may have played.  This will be the second study of the issue that the MDH has conducted.  A 2003 study of taconite miners concluded that the most likely cause of 14 of the 17 cases of mesothelioma was contact with asbestos.  However, since the conclusion of that study, 35 additional cases of the disease have been diagnosed.  Mesothelioma occurs at twice the expected rate in the northeastern region of Minnesota, including the Range.  ( )References(External links*Minnesota DNR*Magnetite in taconite*Mesabi Iron Ore Range*Silver Bay, Minnesotade:Takonitja:nl:Taconiet
463954
Fort_Irwin_Military_Reservation
footnotes                 Fort Irwin & the National Training Center (NTC) is a major training area for the States Military and is a place located in the Desert in northern San Bernardino County, California. Fort Irwin sits at an elevation of .( The 2010 United States census reported Fort Irwins population was 8,845.The base is part of the Installation Management Command (IMCOM). The force at the NTC is the Armored Cavalry Regiment, the Blackhorse Cavalry, who are stationed at the base to provide an enemy force to units on a training rotation at Fort Irwin.Fort Irwin works within the Special Use Airspace Complex.HistoryThe Fort Irwin area has a history dating back almost 15,000 years, when Native Americans of the Lake Mojave Period were believed to live in the area. Native American settlements and pioneer explorations in the area were first recorded when Father Garces, a Spaniard, traveled the Mojave Indian Trail in 1796. During his travels, he noted several small bands of Indians and is believed to have been the first European to make contact with the Native Americans of this area. Smith is thought to have been the first American to explore the area in 1826. A fur trapper, Smith was soon followed by other pioneers traveling the Old Spanish Trail between Santa Fe and Los Angeles. Bitter Springs, on the eastern edge of Fort Irwin, was a favorite stop over site. In 1844, Captain C. Fremont, accompanied by Carson, was the first member of the US Army to visit the Fort Irwin area. Captain Fremont established a camp near Bitter Springs that served travelers on the Old Spanish Trail, and later the Trail, linking Salt Lake City to California. This camp was later to become an important supply center for pioneers during Californias settlement and gold rush. The Gold Rush brought prosperous trade and unexpected trouble to the area. As California grew, and more travelers used the trails to enter the territory, raids and horse stealing became a problem. In 1846, the Armys Battalion patrolled the Fort Irwin area to control the raiding and horse stealing. During the Indian Wars the Army constructed a small stone fort overlooking Bitter Springs and patrolled the Fort Irwin area. In the 1880s the area experienced an economic boom with the discovery of borax at Valley. From the late 19th century to the early 20th century, the area began to grow tremendously as mining operations of all types flourished. Soon railroads, workers, and businesses led to the establishment of the nearby town of Barstow. The years following the Indian Wars were quiet militarily. In 1940, President D. Roosevelt established the Anti-Aircraft Range, a military reservation of approximately  in the area of the present Fort Irwin. In 1942, the Mojave Anti-Aircraft Range was renamed Camp Irwin, in honor of Major General LeRoy Irwin, commander of the Field Artillery Brigade during War I, and it was subsumed into the Training Center as one of its cantonment areas and some of its ranges. Two years later, Camp Irwin was deactivated and placed on surplus status. Camp Irwin reopened its gates in 1951 as the Armored Combat Training Area and served as a training center for combat units during the Korean War. Regimental tank companies of the 43d Infantry Division from Camp Pickett, Virginia were the first to train at the new facility. The post was designated a permanent installation on 1 August 1961 and renamed Fort Irwin. During the Vietnam buildup, many units, primarily artillery and engineer, trained and deployed from Fort Irwin. In January 1971, the post was deactivated again and placed in maintenance status under the control of MacArthur (Los Angeles), California. The National Guard assumed full responsibility for the post in 1972. From 1972 to late 1980, Fort Irwin was used primarily as a training area by the National Guard and reserve components.National Training CenterOn August 9, 1979, the Department of the Army announced that Fort Irwin had been selected as the site for the National Training Center. With over 1000 square miles (2590 km) for maneuver and ranges, an uncluttered electromagnetic spectrum, airspace restricted to military use, and its isolation from densely populated areas, Fort Irwin was an ideal site for this facility. The National Training Center was officially activated October 16, 1980 and Fort Irwin returned to active status on July 1, 1981. Irwin training.jpg|thumb|left|Troops from the 3rd Infantry patrol the California desert during a training mission.Since its activation, the National Training Center has witnessed many firsts. The first unit to train against the Force at the NTC were from 1st Brigade, 1st Infantry Division in January 1982. Infantry and engineer units first augmented the Opposing Force in 1984. June 1984 saw the first use of M1 Abrams tanks and M2 Bradley fighting vehicles on the National Training Center battlefield. The first armored cavalry squadron rotation occurred in November 1984. Units from the Airborne Division participated in the first light force rotation in March 1985. The 197th Infantry Brigade participated in the first extended rotation with brigade operations in June 1985. The first combined Light/Mechanized Infantry rotation took place in February 1990; the Infantry Division (Light) from Ord, CA and the 24th Infantry Division (Mechanized) from Stewart, GA participated.  The first MOUT (Military Operations in Urban Terrain) mission was conducted at the National Training Center Pioneer Training Facility in December 1993. The National Training Center and Fort Irwin continue to serve as the Armys premier training center.  Since the 11, 2001 attacks, the National Training Center has transformed to focus on continuous counterinsurgency operations that reflect the ongoing and rapidly changing battlefield.Also, the Forces use the training facilities as well in order to prepare for its role in Afghanistan,(http://www.thestar.com/news/canada/afghanmission/article/779407--from-death-valley-to-kandahar) as part of their pre-deployment training It is a common tradition for any military unit visiting the installation to paint a design on one of the large rock formations near the main gate.  Units of all types and locations are represented.Environmental practicesIn 2009 the Army Corps of Engineers signed a contract with Irwin Energy Security Partners to build a $2 billion, 500-MW project of panels on Fort Irwin.(Baking in the Mojave Sun: US Army Awards $2B Fort Irwin Solar Farm Project, Defense Industry Daily, October 15, 2009)GeographyFort Irwin is located at  . It has a total area of 2,579.77 km (996.055 sq mi), with only 0.3277 km of this area as water, according to the States Census Bureau, however the CDP covers an area of 7.1 square miles (18.3 km), all of it land. Within its territory on its western side lies the Deep Space Communications Complex. The Code is 92310 and the reservation is inside code 760.DemographicsThe United States Census() reported that Fort Irwin had a population of 8,845. The density was 1,254.1 people per square mile (484.2/km). The racial makeup of Fort Irwin was 5,481 (62.0%) White, 1,086 (12.3%) African American, 103 (1.2%) Native American, 402 (4.5%) Asian, 120 (1.4%) Pacific Islander, 916 (10.4%) from other races, and 737 (8.3%) from two or more races.  Hispanic or Latino of any race were 2,261 persons (25.6%). The Census reported that 7,507 people (84.9% of the population) lived in households, 1,338 (15.1%) lived in non-institutionalized group quarters, and 0 (0%) were institutionalized.  There were 2,371 households, out of which 1,532 (64.6%) had children under the age of 18 living in them, 1,903 (80.3%) were opposite-sex married couples living together, 133 (5.6%) had a female householder with no husband present, 54 (2.3%) had a male householder with no wife present.  There were 13 (0.5%) unmarried opposite-sex partnerships, and 15 (0.6%) same-sex married couples or partnerships. 244 households (10.3%) were made up of individuals and 3 (0.1%) had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 3.17.  There were 2,090 families (88.1% of all households); the average family size was 3.41.The population was spread out with 2,992 people (33.8%) under the age of 18, 1,888 people (21.3%) aged 18 to 24, 3,727 people (42.1%) aged 25 to 44, 224 people (2.5%) aged 45 to 64, and 14 people (0.2%) who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 23.9 years. For every 100 females there were 132.1 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 147.9 males.There were 2,487 housing units at an average density of 352.6 per square mile (136.1/km), of which 18 (0.8%) were owner-occupied, and 2,353 (99.2%) were occupied by renters. The homeowner vacancy rate was 0%; the rental vacancy rate was 4.3%.  71 people (0.8% of the population) lived in owner-occupied housing units and 7,436 people (84.1%) lived in rental housing units.See also* Readiness Training Center (JRTC)* Multinational Readiness Center (JMRC)ReferencesExternal links*Fort Irwin Homepage*GlobalSecurity.org article*Fighting insurgents in Baghdad USA The Sunday Times. 2008-10-5. Retrieved on 2009-02-16Training CenterMilitar Fort IrwinIrwin
466566
Olympia_oyster
The Olympia oyster, Ostreola conchaphila, is the native oyster of the Pacific coast of America from Alaska to Mexico. The name is derived from the important 19th century oyster industry near Washington, in Sound. Use by Native AmericansNative American peoples consumed O. conchaphila everywhere it was found, with consumption in Francisco Bay so intense that enormous middens of oyster shells were piled over thousands of years. One of the largest such mounds, the Shellmound, near the mouth of Temescal Creek and the eastern end of the Francisco  Oakland Bay Bridge, is now buried under the Bay Street shopping center.()Decline and return in CaliforniaO. conchaphila nearly disappeared from San Francisco Bay following overharvest during the Gold Rush (1848-50s) and massive silting from mining in Californias Sierra Nevada (1850s-1880s). Californias most valuable fishery from the 1880s-1910s was based on imported Atlantic oysters, not the absent native. But in the 1990s, O. conchaphila once again appeared in San Francisco Bay, surprisingly in some of the most polluted waters of the bay near the Richmond Refinery in California.Restoration effortsSpecies restoration projects for the Olympia oyster funded by the U.S. Government are active in Sound and Francisco Bay.()() An active restoration project is taking place in Liberty Bay, Washington.() This Puget Sound location is the home of an old and new Olympia oyster population. The re-establishment of the population is currently threatened by the invasive Japanese oyster drill inorata. This species preys on the oysters by drilling a hole between the two valves and digesting the oysters tissues. O. inorata is a threat to the oyster especially in areas with low populations of the mussel Mytilis. The Nature Conservancy of Oregon also has an ongoing restoration project at Netarts Bay, Oregon.()ReferencesExternal links* Image of Olympia oyster fr:Ostreola
469488
Victorian_gold_rush
The Victorian rush was a period in the history of Victoria, Australia approximately between 1851 and the late 1860s.() In 10 years the Australian population nearly tripled.() Overview During this era Victoria dominated the worlds gold output. Ballarat for a while ranked number one in terms of gold production.() Gold discoveries in Beechworth, Ballarat and Bendigo sparked gold rushes similar to the Gold Rush.() At its peak some two tonnes of gold per week flowed into the Treasury Building in Melbourne. The gold era evolved Victoria from a sheep grazing economy based around squatters, into an emerging industrial base and small (yeoman) farming community. The social impact of gold was that Victorias population boomed and the lack of available land for small farming generated massive social tensions. Those on-going tensions around land and selection (small farming) culminated in the Kelly Outbreak of 1878.() Melbourne was a major Boomtown during the gold rush.  The city became the centre of the colony with rail networks radiating to the regional towns and ports. Politically, Victorias goldminers introduced male franchise and secret ballots, based on Chartist principles. As gold dwindled, pressures for land reform, protectionism and political reform grew and generated social struggles.()() A Land Convention in Melbourne during 1857 demanded land reform. Melbourne became one of the great cities of the Empire and the world. Following the huge gold rushes were the Chinese in 1854. Their presence on the goldfields of Bendigo, Beechworth and the Bright district resulted in riots, entry taxes, killings and segregation in the short term and became the foundations of the Australia policy.(() In short, the gold rush was a revolutionary event and reshaped Victoria, its society and politics. Background File:Ballarat 1853-54 von guerard.jpg|thumb|Ballarats tent city just a couple of years after the discovery of gold in the district.  Oil painting from an original 1853 sketch by von Guerard.By 1840 the city of Melbourne, in the south of Victoria, was nearly five years old. Population growth in Melbourne and the surrounding countryside had been steady, and the population was around 10,000.  On 1 July 1851, Melbournes 29,000 residents celebrated as they broke away from South Wales and the Colony of Victoria was born. Days later gold was found in Victoria.  The first gold discovery in Victoria was at Clunes on July 1851 by Esmond. The second discovery in Victoria by Louis Michel and William McKay Aberdeen at Creek, near Warrandyte was awarded a prize by the new Victorian Government. The third discovery was by Hiscock at Buninyong, near Ballarat, on 2 August 1851.On 20 July 1851 Peters, a hut-keeper on William Barkers Mount Alexander station, found specks of gold at what is now known as Specimen Gully.  This find was published in the Melbourne Argus on 8 September 1851, leading to a rush to the Alexander or Forest Creek diggings, centred on present-day Castlemaine, claimed as the richest shallow alluvial goldfield in the world.These discoveries were soon surpassed by Ballarat and Bendigo. Further discoveries including Beechworth in 1852, Bright, Omeo, Chiltern (185859) and Walhalla followed.The population of Melbourne grew swiftly as the gold fever took hold. The total number of people in Victoria also rose. By 1851 it was 75,000 people. Ten years later this rose to over 500,000. File:ProspectorsHut Dargo.jpg|thumb|Prospectors Hut, Upper Victoria (Gippsland), 1870First obtained was the alluvial gold found on the surface. It is reported that when miners first arrived on the Tarrengower fields, nuggets were picked up without digging. This was followed by exploitation of alluvial gold usually in creeks and rivers. The seekers used gold pans, puddling boxes and cradles to separate this gold from the dirt and water.                                   As alluvial gold ran out, underground or deep lead mining began. This was harder and dangerous. Locales such as Bendigo and Ballarat saw great concentrations of miners as teams and syndicates sank shafts. Coupled with erratic and vexatious policing and licence checks, tensions flared around Beechworth, Bendigo and Ballarat. These tensions culminated in the Rebellion of 1854. Following the rebellion, a range of reforms gave miners a greater democratic say in  resolving disputes via Mining Courts and an extended electoral franchise. A tent city, known as Canvas Town was established at South Melbourne.   The area soon became a massive slum, home to tens of thousands of migrants from around the world, particularly from Ireland and China who arrived to seek their fortunes in the goldfields.   Significant Chinatowns were established at Melbourne Chinatown as well as Bendigo and Castlemaine.  At Walhalla alone, Cohens Reef produced over 50 tonnes (1.6 million tr oz) of gold in 40 years of mining. Legacy File:Walhalla 1910 Goldmine 4000ft.jpg|thumb|Underground mining at Victoria in 1910Australias population changed dramatically as a result of the rushes.  In 1851 the Australian population was 437,655, of which 77,345, or just under 18%, were Victorians.  A decade later the Australian population had grown to 1,151,947 and the Victorian population had increased to 538,628; just under 47% of the Australian total and a seven-fold increase. In some small country towns where gold was found abundantly, the population could grow of over 1000% in a decade (e.g. Rutherglen had a population of ~2,000. Ten years later, it had ~60,000 which is a 3000% increase). The rapid growth was predominantly a result of the gold rushes.()The gold rush is reflected in the architecture of Victorian gold-boom cities like Melbourne, Castlemaine, Ballarat, Bendigo and Ararat.  Ballarat has Hilla  recreation of a gold rush townas well as the Gold Museum, while Bendigo has a large operating gold mine system which also functions as a tourist attraction.The rushes left the legacy of quaint Victorian towns in the Goldfields tourist region like Maldon, Beechworth, Clunes, Heathcote, Maryborough, Daylesford, Stawell, Beaufort, Creswick, St Arnaud, Dunolly, Inglewood, Wedderburn and Buninyong.   With the exception of Ballarat and Bendigo, many of these towns were substantially larger than they are today. Most populations moved to other districts when gold played out in a given locality.(At the other end of the spectrum ghost towns, such as Walhalla, Mafeking and Steiglitz still exist.historical area.jpg|thumb|As with many gold towns, after deposits of gold had been exploited, the town of Cassilis ceased to exist. This picture shows the remains of part of King Cassilis MineThe last major gold rush in Victoria was at Berringa, south of Ballarat, in the first decade of the 20th century. Gold mining ceased in Victoria, not because there was no more gold but in part because of the depth and cost of pumping.  The World War also drained Australia of the labour needed to work the mines. More significantly, the prohibition on the export of gold from Australia in 1915 and the abolition of the gold standard throughout the Empire saw many goldtowns in Victoria die.() The slump in gold production never recovered. However, as of 2005 the recent increase in the gold price has seen a resurgence in commercial mining activity with mining resuming in both of the major fields of Bendigo and Ballarat. Exploration also proceeds elsewhere, for example, in Glen Wills, an isolated mountain area near Mitta Mitta in north-eastern Victoria. See also *rush*Stranger*gold rushes*Gold Rush (18481855)*Victorian gold rush river diversions References Further reading******** External links *eGold - Electronic Encyclopedia of Gold in Australia*Victorian Museum*Walhalla*Sovereign Hill*Gold Museum at Ballarat*Report on resumed exploration*Photos of The Victorian Gold Rush from the State Library of Victoria at Culture Victoria  Goldrauschvers lor au Victoria    
471440
Klamath_River
 map_caption                  Map of the Klamath River watershedThe Klamath River (Karuk: Ishkesh, Klamath: Koke(McArthur, p. 542)) is an American river that flows  southwest through Oregon and northern California, cutting through the Range to empty into the Ocean. The river drains an extensive watershed of almost  that stretches from the high desert country of the Basin to the rainforest of the Pacific coast. It is known for its basins peculiar geographymost of its upper basin is developed, but the lower remains wildand has been called a river upside down by the Geographic Society.()As one of the most important rivers for migration on the west coast of North America south of the River, the Klamath River basin has been inhabited by humans for at least 7,000 years. At one time, the river supported abundant wildlife. Vast freshwater marshes in the upper basin provided habitat for thousands of migratory birds. The first Europeans to visit the region were trappers for the Bay Company who came in the 1820s and established the Trail along the Klamath and Trinity Rivers into the Valley. The latter days of the Gold Rush saw increasing numbers of miners working streams in the Klamath River region in search of gold. Steamboats operated briefly on the large lakes in the upper watershed before the establishment of agriculture in the 19th and 20th centuries. The growing industry in the upper basin led to the construction of many dams on the river, which have since caused water quality issues for the lower river. Environmentalists have raised petitions against the construction of more dams, and in support of removing the existing ones.Because the Klamath includes many of the longest free-flowing stretches of river in California as well as some of its better whitewater runs, it has become a popular recreational river. Its watershed includes large swathes of the National Forest and Rivers National Forest. For now, the lower Klamath remains undeveloped, although massive diversions were once proposed to reroute the river into the Central Valley in order to supplement the regions water supply.Courseat Terwer.JPG|thumb|left|The Klamath approaching its mouth on the Pacific, near the town KlamathKlamath Lake, filling a broad valley at the foot of the eastern slope of the southern High Cascades, is the source of the Klamath River. Its headstreams, however, begin over  awayas far as Crater Lake and the OregonNevada border. The first  stretch of the Klamath River is known as the River. Not long after, however, the river is impounded in an  long reservoir near Klamath Falls, Ewauna, where it receives the Lost River and passes the nearly dry bed of Klamath Lake.(()(Hydrology, Ecology and Fishes of the Klamath River Basin, p. 27)() Even after it flows out of this reservoir, it drops through a series of three more artificial lakes() before it crosses the OregonCalifornia state border and turns south near the town of Hornbrook towards Shasta. However, the river soon swings west to receive the River and the Scott River, cutting deep into the head of its canyon through the Mountains.()The route through the High and Western Cascades and the Klamath Mountains constitutes the majority of the rivers course and takes it from the arid high desert climate of its upper watershed into a rainforest nourished by Pacific rains. From the Scott River confluence, the river generally runs west along the south side of the Mountains until it takes a sharp southward turn near the town of Happy Camp. From there, it flows southwest over whitewater rapids into the National Forest, receiving the Salmon River, and passes the unincorporated community of Orleans. At Weitchpec, the river reaches the southernmost point in its entire course and veers sharply northwards as it receives the Trinity River. The Trinity River confluence also marks the point where the Klamaths current dramatically slows. For the remainder of its course, the Klamath flows generally northwest through the Hoopa Valley and Indian Reservations, passing the town of Klamath and flowing out to sea  south of Crescent City.((Hydrology, Ecology and Fishes of the Klamath River Basin, p. 37)  The mouth of the Klamath River is at Requa,() in an area shared by the Yurok Reservation and National Park.() The Klamath River estuary is recognized for protection by the Bays and Estuaries Policy.(State Water Resources Control Board Water Quality Control Policy for the Enclosed Bays and Estuaries of California (1974), State of California)Watershedthumb|left|Klamath River watershed boundariesExtending from arid Oregon to the cold and rainy California coast, the Klamath River watershed drains parts of three Oregon counties and five counties in California and includes a diversity of landscapes. The northernmost part of the watershed is drained by the Williamson River and the Sprague River, both which flow generally southwest into Klamath Lake. The middle basin is characterized by extensive wetland, grassland, and agricultural areas, and is partially filled by two major bodies of water: Upper and Klamath Lake. Finally, steep canyons and high ridges typify the extensive lower basin, which encompasses over one half of the  watershed.((Hydrology, Ecology and Fishes of the Klamath River Basin, p. 26)()Several other West Coast and interior drainage basins border on that of the Klamath River. On the northwest are the Rogue River and River in Oregon and the Smith River in California. On the east there is the closed Basin and a small portion of the Basin. The south side of the Klamath River watershed is bounded by the River and its upper tributaries, including the River, and on the southwest side are the Mad River and Redwood Creek.() The western boundary of the upper Klamath Basin is formed by the High Cascades and the Klamath Mountains, one of the southernmost extents of the Cascade Range, and the Coast Ranges cover the southwestern watershed. The Klamath is one of only three rivers that begins east of the Cascades and flows into the Pacific Ocean; the other two are the Columbia and the Fraser.(The Columbia River rises in the Rocky Mountain Trench of the Canadian Rockies several hundred miles east of the Cascades, while the Fraser begins in the Rocky Mountain Trench farther north. Both rivers cut through the Cascades to flow to the Pacific Ocean (in the case of the Fraser, the mountains there are called the Canadian Cascades, but geophysically they are part of the same range.) The Klamaths uppermost tributaries begin just to the northwest of the Great Basin, well to the east of the High Cascades. Rivers like the Rogue and Umpqua in Oregon that cut through the Coast Range and begin on the western slopes of the High Cascades should not be confused as cutting through the Cascades although they do flow through the parallel range.)Most human use of the watershed is limited to the upper basin. Despite the semiarid climate, dams have been built, irrigation water has been supplied from the Klamath and Lost rivers, and plentiful groundwater has been drawn to transform most of the upper Klamath basin to farmland. At least 11,000 years ago, Lower Klamath and Lakes in the rainy season would combine into one giant freshwater marsh that was nearly  large. This, combined with the over  of Upper Klamath Lake, formed a temporary habitat for millions of migratory birds.()() These lakes are all remnants of a large Age lake, Lake Modoc, that covered about . Although all of the marshlands have been developed with the exception of Upper Klamath Lake,() the region still supports, on average, 3.7 million migrating birds per year.(Balancing water: restoring the Klamath Basin, p. 1)thumb|right|Marshlands in the Upper Klamath Basin today are remnants of the vast Lake ModocDespite its plentiful flow in California, the Klamath does not supply significant amounts of water to irrigators and municipal users in central and southern portions of the state. The Reclamation Project in the Klamath Falls area supplies water to area irrigators, and the Valley Project diverts water from the Trinity River to supply irrigation water to the Valley.() Some of the rivers tributaries, including the Lost and Rivers, are also diverted for irrigation. The status of the lower Klamath as one of the last relatively free-flowing rivers in the state of California and the use of its water has been debated for years between preservationists and government agencies and its eventual fate is still unclear.Tributaries*Blue Creek*Creek*Trinity River**Fork Trinity River**New River*Copper Creek*Salmon River*River*River*Butte Creek*Lost RiverFloodingThe lower and middle sections of the Klamath River are vulnerable to flooding, and major floods have occurred in years where major flooding has taken place in Northern California, particularly in the wake of Express storms that bring large amounts of warm rain to Northern California. Significant floods on the Klamath River have occurred in 19261927, 1955, 1964, 1997, and 2005, in several cases changing the course of the river.()()()() The flood of 1964 was particularly devastating, with a high water reaching , inundating the towns of Klamath and Klamath Glen and destroying most of the Highway 101 bridge crossing the river. The highway bridge was rebuilt in a different location, though entrances to the old bridge still stand.(()The mouth of the Klamath and nearby sections of the river are susceptible to oceanic tsunami surges, and fatalities have occurred there during the 1964 and 2011 Pacific tsunamis.(The Raging Sea: The Powerful Account of the Worst Tsunami in U.S. History, M. Powers. (New York, New York: Kensington, 2005) ISBN 0806526823.)()()()GeologyThe Upper Klamath Basin, defined by the drainage area of the Klamath River above Iron Gate Dam, is a unique transitional area between the Range to the west and the and Range Province of the northern Basin to the southeast. This region extends from the southern Klamath Lake area into the Lost River and Klamath Lake basins. Crustal stretching and block faulting created a topography with characteristics similar to both regions. Almost the entire basin is a graben region, bearing basin and range characteristics, formed by uplifting and subsidence along several northsouth faults.()thumb|right|Lower Klamath Lake was formed in the basin and range area of the upper Klamath River watershedPre-Quaternary, igneous and rock compose the Yonna Formation, which crosses much of the region and rises above the surface in large outcroppings of solid rock in many of the ridges.() Underlying rocks are generally younger from east to west. The many ridges crossing the upper Klamath Basin divide it into valleys with up to  of vertical relief, and drainage patterns generally follow the topography. An extensive geothermal system occurs deep underground within the upper basin, creating springs and springs, but is not well understood.() Further south, in the River area in County, much of the underlying rock is composed of lava flows issuing from the Shasta volcanic region.()The same age pattern is true in the Cascade Range and Mountains that cover the western half of the Klamath River watershed. As the American Plate moved slowly southwestward over the past 10 million years, successive oceanic terranes dating from the Cambrian to the late Jurassic were added to the bulk of the North American continent. There are four distinct terranes from west to east. While the coastal mountains date to less than 3 million years ago, the farther inland Cascades are as old as 7.5 million years. Granite batholiths, overlying sedimentary rock, and volcanic rock were crumpled into the massif of southwestern Oregon and northwestern California.(Irwin, Snoke, and Barnes, p. 289)  Instead of being diverted southwards, however, the Klamath continued to flow westward and created a steep-walled gorge through the rising range. One of these terranes brought with it a long northsouth running band of easily eroded mica that now lies about  inland from the Pacific coast of California.(Irwin, Snoke, and Barnes, p. 16)() When the Klamath encountered this layer, it began cutting its canyon along the mica instead of continuing southwest to the Pacific, resulting in the sharp northward bend where the Trinity River joins. The lower Trinity also follows portions of the mica and its south fork as well.HistoryEarly inhabitants and settlersthumb|left|Semi-nomadic tribes inhabited the upper basin, a portion of which is seen hereHuman habitation on the Klamath dates to at least 7,000 years ago. Many of the Native American groups along the river depended on the vast runs of salmon, second only to that of the River. These tribes included the Yurok, Hupa, and Karuk along the canyons of the lower river and the Modoc, Klamath and Yahooskin in the arid valleys of the upper basin. Controlling about  of the lower Klamath River and a large section of the Northern California coast, the Yurok were probably the most powerful tribe on the Klamath River and along with the Hupa and Karuk, caught salmon from the river with weirs, basket traps and even harpoons.()()  One well-known ancient fishing ground is Ishi Pishi Falls, a set of rapids on the river near the confluence with the Salmon River. Most of the upstream groups had a nomadic hunting-gathering lifestyle and did not depend on salmon as much as downstream tribes.() The Klamath Rivers name was recorded by Europeans in the 19th century derived from the word klamet or the Klamath tribe, but prior to white contact, many names were used to refer to the river, including Ishkesh and Koke. The Klamath tribes name came from the Upper Chinookan word /ma/, literally they of the river.(Bright, p. 228)In the late 1820s, trappers of the Bay Company travelling south from Vancouver reached the Klamath River basin. The first party to see the Klamath River was led by Alexander McLeod in the winter of 18261827. In 1828 Smith reported beaver sign at the Klamath River mouth.( ) Within a matter of years, the plentiful beavers in the Klamath basin had been mostly wiped out. dams had previously been an important factor in stream habitat in the Klamath River watershed, helping to moderate the power of floods and creating extensive wetlands. The loss of the beaver dams resulted in detrimental consequences for watercourses in the basin, exacerbating the power of winter floods, and causing severe erosion. Trapping parties eventually moved southwest into the Valley and blazed an extension of the Trail, an early path between the Territory and Francisco Bay. Despite the environmental implications, extensive and fertile meadows left behind by the draining of beaver ponds attracted many settlers to the region later on.((Mackie, p. 66)salignrightThe 1850s saw discoveries of rich placer and gold deposits along the Klamath, Trinity, Shasta and other rivers in northwestern California. The gold is thought to have originated from volcanic activity in the Klamath Mountains.(Hittell, p. 141) Miners searching for gold in the Klamath Mountains and Alps in the aftermath of the Gold Rush first discovered gold along Salmon Creek in the spring of 1850, and additional deposits were found on the main stem by July. Gold was also discovered in great quantities at French Gulch and Yreka.() Several place names in the Klamath Basin originate from this era, including that of the River, which is named for pioneer Walter Scott.(Durham, p. 307) Gold deposits are still present in the Klamath River watershed even though it was mined far past the end of the gold rush.()Early industry and developmentthumb|right|The Klamath on Lower Klamath Lake, 1908Beginning in the early 20th century, steamboats began operating on Lower Klamath Lake between County, California, and Falls, Oregon. The steamboats completed a link between a railroad line following the Riverthe final part of which was called the Bartle Fast Freight Road, after California. The end of this line, Lairds Landing, was the beginning of the Lower Klamath Lake steamboat line, which began operating with an  screw steamer in 1905. By 1909, however, the railroad had circumnavigated Lower Klamath Lake directly to Klamath Falls. The steamboat line fell into disuseand much of Lower Klamath Lake was later drained and filled in.()In the early 1910s and 1920s logging was a growing industry on the west side of the upper Klamath River valley, especially around Upper Klamath Lake. The Great Northern Railway and Pacific Railroad built a joint-use line running along the eastern shore of the lake, delivering logs from the north side to a sawmill  downstream from the outlet of the lake. Many of the seasonal marshlands surrounding the lake and rivers were diked in this period to host lumber operations.(Balancing water: restoring the Klamath Basin, p. 9) In 1919, the first River Dam, a timber crib dam, was constructed at the outlet of Upper Klamath Lake, raising it by about . Steamboats continued mail, passenger and freight operations on Upper Klamath Lake until about 1928, in a period when many of the lumber companies shut down due to drought.()With lumber a declining industry in the upper Klamath Basin, the economy slowly transitioned to agriculture. The Reclamation Project, established by the of Reclamation in the early 20th century, involved the construction of two dams on the river and additional dams on many of its tributaries, as well as the final draining of Lower Klamath and Tule Lakes.() The Bureau of Reclamation was not the only user of the river during this period; in the late 1950s PacifiCorp and California-Oregon Power Company (COPCO) constructed three more dams on the river downstream.() These dams, however, sparked a great controversy over water quality in the lower section of the river and the dependence of the rivers annual salmon runs on it.()Natural historythumb|left|250px|The mouth of the Klamath River on the Pacific Ocean, Del Norte County, CaliforniaThe river is considered a prime habitat for salmon, salmon, and trout. Once the river was the third-largest producer of salmon on the West Coast,( but today, only a fraction of the rivers historic runs remain since the construction of six dams between 1908 and 1962. Coho salmon in the Klamath River are listed as threatened under the Species Act. In 1963, the upper Trinity Riverthe largest single tributary to the Klamathwas virtually removed from the Klamath drainage with the completion of the Lewiston and Dams, diverting 90 percent of the Trinitys flow to the Sacramento Valley. From 1963 to 1991, only  from the main stem above the dams was left to flow to the Klamath. In 1991, a minimum annual Trinity flow of  was established, or about .(The possible removal of the dams has been a controversial issue in the region in recent years. Despite intense lobbying by local Native American tribes, conservationists, and fishermen, the 2004 renewal application by PacifiCorp for another 50-year federal operating license for the dams did not include any provisions for allowing salmon to return to more than  of former habitat above the dams.  In January 2007, however, the federal government ruled that PacifiCorp must equip four dams with ladders, a modification which would potentially cost more than $300 million. PacifiCorp has offered $300 million to upgrade the JC Boyle fish ladder and proposed trucking fish around the Copco #1 and Iron Gate dams, after having had been denied a license to build a power generator in Utah. PacifiCorp President Fehrman defended the companys activities in the area, pointing to other benefits.()A separate controversy surrounds the use of water in the Upper Klamath Basin for irrigated agriculture, which was temporarily halted in 2001 to protect endangered salmon and lake fish during a severe drought. Vice President Cheney personally intervened to ensure water to the agriculture industry rather than to flow.() In 2002, the federal government, under Secretary Norton, provided full water deliveries to irrigators as the drought continued; despite the fact that Klamath area tribes have treaty rights that predate the settlement of the farmers. Norton argued for a free market approach by allowing farmers to sell the water to the Native Americans downstream.()() That year, the Klamath River system had the Klamath River fish kill, the largest fish die-off ever recorded.According to biologists from the State of California and the Fish and Wildlife Service,() the atypical low flow in the river along with high fish return numbers and high water temperatures allowed for a gill rot disease to kill at least 33,000 salmon in September 2002, before they could reproduce.  The die-off was downstream of the Trinity inflow, and the salmon of the Trinity were impacted to a greater degree than the Klamath as the Trinity run was at its peak. The report does mention that the official fish die-off estimate of 34,056 is probably quite low and could be only half of the actual loss. Klamath River flows as measured at the river gauge in Keno show a low flow of  in September 1908 (before irrigation began). During the 2002 fish kill, flows of  were recorded. During September of the 2001 irrigation shut-off, an average of  was recorded.()In 2011, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) approved a plan first introduced in 1992 by Californias state government. The plan called for major cleanup of the lower river in order to protect salmon from phosphorus, nitrogen, and biochemical oxygen demand.( It also expressed concern over high water temperatures, blooms, and low oxygen levels. Environmental groups, more than six government agencies, Native American tribes in the basin, and others have worked with the EPA to reduce pollution levels in the Klamath.() Salmon controversysourcePacific Coast Federation of Fishermens Associations (2008)(Historically, the Klamath River was once the third most productive salmon river system in the United States, after the Columbia and the Sacramento.() Eutrophication and raised water temperatures induced by the construction of dams have created worsening conditions for migrating salmon, especially in years of drought.(National Research Council, p. 263)()()The upper basin water, along with the almost-total diversion of the Trinity() and irrigation projects on the Shasta and Scott river tributaries, have all lowered the total river flow supporting out-migrating young salmon in spring and in-migrating adult salmon in the fall.() In the 1960s, a project was proposed to divert the entire Klamath River to Central California and Southern California, an undertaking known as the Diversion, but this project was defeated. It would have limited salmon to the last  of the entire river.(Reisner, pp. 267268) In 2005, PacifiCorp applied to the federal government to relicense its four hydroelectric dams on the Klamath for up to 50 years. Environmentalists opposed the relicensing, arguing that the dams should be removed to reopen the upper Klamath to salmon.()Image:Cataraft in Caldera, Klamath River.jpg|thumb|Cataraft on the Klamath Riverthumb|right|Flat water on the Klamath RiverAn agreement was signed February 18, 2009.()Two years of closed-door negotiations among farmers, Indian tribes, fishermen, conservation groups and government agencies have resulted in an unprecedentedand conditionalagreement to work toward a comprehensive settlement of Klamath water usage. The proposal advocates for the removal of four hydroelectric dams now operating along  of the Klamath River in southern Oregon and Northern California, as well as for restoration projects.()A nonbinding Agreement in Principle (AIP) involving PacifiCorp, the federal government, California, and Oregon was announced on November 13, 2008. It is the initial phase of a process that will see the removal of the Iron Gate Dam, Copco dams number 1 and 2, and the C. Boyle Dam, beginning by the year 2020.()() PacifiCorp ratepayers would fund part of the plan and the State of California would fund much of the remaining projected cost. The agreement requires the federal government to scientifically assess the costs and benefits of the dam removals and to make a final determination by March 31, 2012, as to whether the benefits of the project will justify the costs. Federal, Congressional, and California electorate approval is also required.(Water rights disputeIn 1864, the Klamath Tribes signed a treaty that included them ceding about  of their land, leaving much less water available to them in the basin. Then in the 1950s, Congress passed a bill that removed the tribes federal recognition, but did not remove their water rights. In the 1970s, however, Congress repealed that bill. Klamath basin farmers twice sued the U.S. Department of the Interior in 2001, seeking to achieve access to more water for irrigating farms in the basin. The farmers lost each lawsuit.()Recreationrafting and kayaking are popular recreational activities along the upper Klamath River below the Boyle Dam, and also along the lower Klamath River downstream of the town of Camp. There are long stretchesover  in one instanceof Class III rapids, while there are some Class IIIIV rapids in some of the narrower stretches. Below Weitchpec, the river slows down into a wider, deeper channel. About  of the river is designated Wild, and  Recreational.(Palmer, p. 141)Recreational mining is popular along the Klamath and some of its tributaries, including the Salmon and the Trinity. Although simple methods such as panning are still used, some methods use suction pumpsa practice involving turning over deposits of sediment and spreading them in order to find gold. Debates over the practice, which has further disturbed salmon spawning beds, continue to date.()A variety of national forests and wildlife preservesincluding the National Forest, Rivers National Forest, National Wildlife Refuges Complex, and Klamath National Wildlife Refugeare located in the Klamath River watershed. The Klamath National Forest is located in Siskiyou County with a small portion in Oregon, and Six Rivers National Forest is located in the southern Klamath watershed, mostly in the Trinity River watershed. The latter two are located in the Upper Klamath Lake-Lower Klamath Lake area. Beds National Monument, which contains a large array of lava tubes and formations, is also in the Lower Klamath Lake area, to the south of the remnants of the lake.See also*of the Klamath River*Basin*of California rivers*of rivers of Oregon*of longest streams of Oregon*of National Wild and Scenic RiversReferencesNotesWorks cited************External links*Klamath RiverKeeper*Mid Klamath Watershed Council*State of California hydrological monitoring of the Klamath and tributaries.*NASA Earth Observatory: drought and irrigation shut off in the Klamath Basin*Spot.us  The Story Behind the Worlds Biggest Dam Removal  Rough Water()RiverKlamath(fleuve)(fiume)ja:Klamath()Riverfi:Klamathjokiuk:
473317
Content_analysis
Content analysis or textual analysis is a methodology in the sciences for studying the content of communication. Babbie defines it as the study of recorded human communications, such as books, websites, paintings and laws.According to Dr. Farooq Joubish, content analysis is considered a scholarly methodology in the humanities by which texts are studied as to authorship, authenticity, or meaning. This latter subject include philology, hermeneutics, and semiotics.Lasswell formulated the core questions of content analysis: Who says what, to whom, why, to what extent and with what effect?. Holsti (1969) offers a broad definition of content analysis as any technique for making inferences by objectively and systematically identifying specified characteristics of messages. A. Neuendorf (2002, p. 10) offers a six-part definition of content analysis:Content analysis is a summarising, quantitative analysis of messages that relies on the scientific method (including attention to objectivity, intersubjectivity, a priori design, reliability, validity, generalisability, replicability, and hypothesis testing) and is not limited as to the types of variables that may be measured or the context in which the messages are created or presented.DescriptionIn 1931, Alfred R Lindesmith developed a methodology to refute existing hypotheses, which became known as a content analysis technique, and it gained popularity in the 1960s by Glaser and is referred to as The Constant Comparative Method of Qualitative Analysis in an article published in 1964-65. Glaser and Strauss (1967) referred to their adaptation of it as Grounded Theory.The method of content analysis enables the researcher to include large amounts oftextual information and systematically identify its properties, e.g. the frequencies ofmost used keywords (KWIC meaning Word in Context) by locating the more important structures of its communication content. Yet such amounts of textual information must be analysis, providing at the end a meaningful reading of content under scrutiny. Robertson (1976:73-75) for example created a frame for a comparison of modes of competition between British and American parties. It was developed further in 1979 by the Research Group aiming at a comparative approach on the policy positions of political parties.Since the 1980s, content analysis has become an increasingly important tool in the measurement of success in relations (notably relations) programs and the assessment of profiles. In these circumstances, content analysis is an element of evaluation or media analysis. In analyses of this type, data from content analysis is usually combined with media data (circulation, readership, number of viewers and listeners, frequency of publication). It has also been used by futurists to identify trends. In 1982, Naisbitt published his popular Megatrends, based on content analysis in the US media.The creation of coding frames is intrinsically related to a creative approach to variables that exert an influence over textual content. In political analysis, these variables could be political scandals, the impact of public opinion polls, sudden events in external politics, inflation etc.Convergence, created by F. Lampreia Carvalho for the comparative analysis of electoral proclamations on free-to-air television is an example of creative articulation of variables in content analysis. The methodology describes the construction of party identities during long-term party competitions on TV, from a dynamic perspective, governed by the of the contingent. This method aims to capture the contingent logic observed in electoral campaigns by focusing on the repetition and innovation of themes sustained in party broadcasts. According to such post-structuralist perspective from which electoral competition is analysed, the party identities,  the real cannot speak without mediations because there is not a natural centre fixing the meaning of a party structure, it rather depends on ad-hoc articulations. There is no empirical reality outside articulations of meaning. Reality is an outcome of power struggles that unify ideas of social structure as a result of contingent interventions. In Brazil, these contingent interventions have proven to be mimetic and convergent rather than divergent and polarised, being integral to the repetition of dichotomised worldviews.Mimetic Convergence thus aims to show the process of fixation of meaning through articulations that repeat, alter and subvert political issues that come into play. For this reason, parties are not taken as the pure expression of conflicts for the representation of interests (of different classes, religions, ethnic groups (see: Lipset & Rokkan 1967, Lijphart 1984) but attempts to recompose and re-articulate ideas of an absent totality around signifiers gaining positivity.Every content analysis should depart from a hypothesis. The hypothesis of Mimetic Convergence supports the Downsian interpretation that in general, rational voters converge in the direction of uniform positions in most thematic dimensions. The hypothesis guiding the analysis of Mimetic Convergence between political parties broadcasts is: public opinion polls on vote intention, published throughout campaigns on TV will contribute to successive revisions of candidates discourses. Candidates re-orient their arguments and thematic selections in part by the signals sent by voters. One must also consider the interference of other kinds of input on electoral propaganda such as internal and external political crises and the arbitrary interference of private interests on the dispute. Moments of internal crisis in disputes between candidates might result from the exhaustion of a certain strategy. The moments of exhaustion might consequently precipitate an inversion in the thematic flux.As an evaluation approach, content analysis is considered by some to be quasi-evaluation because content analysis judgments need not be based on value statements if the research objective is aimed at presenting subjective experiences. Thus, they can be based on knowledge of everyday lived experiences. Such content analyses are not evaluations. On the other hand, when content analysis judgments are based on values, such studies are evaluations (Frisbie, 1986).As demonstrated above, only a good scientific hypothesis can lead to the development of a methodology that will allow the empirical description, be it dynamic or static.Content analysis. This is a closely related if not overlapping kind, often included under the general rubric of qualitative analysis, and used primarily in the social sciences. It is a systematic, replicable technique for compressing many words of text into fewer content categories based on explicit rules of coding (Stemler 2001). It often involves building and applying a concept dictionary or fixed vocabulary of terms on the basis of which words are extracted from the textual data for concording or statistical computation.Uses of content analysisHolsti (1969) groups 15 uses of content analysis into three basic categories:* make inferences about the antecedents of a communication*describe and make inferences about characteristics of a communication*make inferences about the effects of a communication.He also places these uses into the context of the basic communication paradigm.The following table shows fifteen uses of content analysis in terms of their general purpose, element of the communication paradigm to which they apply, and the general question they are intended to answer. The process of a content analysis According to Dr. Krippendorff (1980 and 2004), six questions must be addressed in every content analysis:#Which data are analysed?#How are they defined?#What is the population from which they are drawn?#What is the context relative to which the data are analysed?#What are the boundaries of the analysis?#What is the target of the inferences?The assumption is that words and phrases mentioned most often are those reflecting important concerns in every communication. Therefore, quantitative content analysis starts with word frequencies, space measurements (column centimeters/inches in the case of newspapers), time counts (for radio and television time) and keyword frequencies. However, content analysis extends far beyond plain word counts, e.g. with Keyword In Context routines words can be analysed in their specific context to be disambiguated. Synonyms and homonyms can be isolated in accordance to linguistic properties of a language.Qualitatively, content analysis can involve any kind of analysis where communication content (speech, written text, interviews, images ...) is categorised and classified. In its beginnings, using the first newspapers at the end of 19th century, analysis was done manually by measuring the number of lines and amount of space given a subject. With the rise of common computing facilities like PCs, computer-based methods of analysis are growing in popularity. Answers to open ended questions, newspaper articles, political party manifestoes, medical records or systematic observations in experiments can all be subject to systematic analysis of textual data. By having contents of communication available in form of machine readable texts, the input is analysed for frequencies and coded into categories for building up inferences. Philip Weber (1990) notes: To make valid inferences from the text, it is important that the classification procedure be reliable in the sense of being consistent: Different people should code the same text in the same way (p. 12). The validity, inter-coder reliability and intra-coder reliability are subject to intense methodological research efforts over long years (see Krippendorff, 2004).One more distinction is between the manifest contents (of communication) and its latent meaning. Manifest describes what (an author or speaker) definitely has written, while latent meaning describes what an author intended to say/write. Normally, content analysis can only be applied on manifest content; that is, the words, sentences, or texts themselves, rather than their meanings.McKeone (1995) has highlighted the difference between prescriptive analysis and open analysis.  In prescriptive analysis, the context is a closely-defined set of communication parameters (e.g. specific messages, subject matter); open analysis identifies the dominant messages and subject matter within the text.A further step in analysis is the distinction between dictionary-based (quantitative) approaches and qualitative approaches. Dictionary-based approaches set up a list of categories derived from the frequency list of words and control the distribution of words and their respective categories over the texts. While methods in quantitative content analysis in this way transform observations of found categories into quantitative statistical data, the qualitative content analysis focuses more on the intentionality and its implications.Reliability in content analysis Kimberly A. Neuendorf (2002) suggests that when human coders are used in content analysis, reliability translates to intercoder reliability or the amount of agreement or correspondence among two or more coders.See also* Hermeneutics* Wayne Foster* words References* Babbie, The Practice of Social Research, 10th edition, Wadsworth, Thomson Learning Inc., ISBN 0-534-62029-9*Berelson: Content Analysis in Communication Research. Glencoe, Ill: Free Press 1971 (first edition from 1952)*Budge, Klingemann et al.: Mapping Policy Preferences. Estimates for Parties, Electors and Governments 1945-1998. Oxford 2001: Oxford University Press, ISBN 0-19-924400-6 (great example of application of content analysis methods in Political Science dealing with political parties and its impact on electoral systems)* Richard Frisbie: The use of microcomputer programs to improve the reliability and validity of content analysis in evaluation. Paper presented at the session, Qualitative research methods, at the Annual Meeting of the American Educational Research Association, San Francisco. 1986, April* Graneheim, Ulla Hllgren, & Lundman, Berit (2004). Qualitative content analysis in nursing research: concepts, procedures and measures to achieve trustworthiness. Nurse Education Today, 24(2), 105-112.*R. Holsti: Content Analysis for the Social Sciences and Humanities. Reading, MA: Addison-Wesley. 1969*Lampreia Carvalho, F. Continuity and Innovation: Conservatism and Politics of Communication in Brazil. (Continuidade e Inovacao: Conservadorismo e Politica da Comunicacao no Brasil) Journal Revista Brasileira de Ciencias Sociais, N.43, 2000. ANPOCS, Brazil.*Krippendorff: Content Analysis: An Introduction to Its Methodology. 2nd edition, Thousand Oaks, CA: Sage 2004*Krippendorff and Mary Angela Bock (editors): The Content Analysis Reader. Thousand Oaks, CA: Sage Publications. 2008*McKeone: Measuring Your Media Profile, Gower Press, 1995  A general introduction to media analysis and PR evaluation for the communications industry* Kimberly A.: The Content Analysis Guidebook Thousand Oaks, CA: Sage Publications. 2002* Kimberly A.: The Content Analysis Guidebook Online (2002): http://academic.csuohio.edu/kneuendorf/content/*W. Roberts (ed.): Text Analysis for the Social Sciences: Methods for Drawing Inferences from Texts and Transcripts. Mahwah, NJ: Lawrence Erlbaum 1997*Philip Weber: Basic Content Analysis. 2nd ed., Newbury Park, CA: Sage 1990 (recommended introductory reading)*D. Wimmer and R. Dominick Mass Media Research: An Introduction. 8th ed. (Belmont, CA: Wadsworth, 2005).* Stemler Steve: An Overview of Content Analysis (2001):http://pareonline.net/getvn.asp?v7&n17External links*http://www.yoshikoder.org/downloads.html: an open source content analysis program*http://academic.csuohio.edu/kneuendorf/content/ Web site of the Content Analysis Guidebook Online, provides some CATA software for free download, list of archives, bibliographies and other important sources* http://www.impact-media.co.uk  Contains a general introduction to media analysis and media profile measurement including an outline of the differences between open and prescriptive analysis* http://www.andersonanalytics.com/reports/AATAT.pdf: History of content analysis software in psychology and applications of content analysis, text mining and text analytics in market research.* http://courses.washington.edu/socw580/contentsoftware.shtml - Software for Content Analysis, a list of programs for analyzing text, images, video and audio; a resource used by the Advanced Research Methods & Design course in the School of Social Work at the University of Washington. de:Inhaltsanalysede contenidosde contenusadrajakk:-mn:-ja:trecide contedoru:-sv:Innehllsanalysuk:-zh:
474710
MoravianSilesian_Region
 footnotes                                 Moravian-Silesian Region (), or Moravo-Silesian Region, is one of 14 administrative of the Czech Republic, until May 2001 it was formerly called the Ostrava Region (). The region is located in the north-eastern part of its historical region of Moravia and in most of the Czech part of the historical region of Silesia. The region borders the Region (to the west) and Zln Region (to the south). It also borders two other countries  Poland to the north and Slovakia to the east. Once a highly industrialized region, it was called the Steel Heart of the Country in the communist era. There are, in addition, several mountainous areas where the landscape is relatively preserved. 			Nowadays, the economy of the region benefits from its location on the borders of two other Central European countries: Poland and Slovakia.GeographyThe geography of the region varies considerably, compromising many landforms from lowlands to high mountains whose summits lie above the tree line.In the west lie the Jesenk mountains, with the highest mountain of the region, and all Moravia), Pradd, rising 1491 meters. The mountains are heavily forested, with many spectacular places and famous spas such as Karlova Studnka and Jesenk) and are therefore very popular with tourists. There are also several ski resorts, including ervenohorsk Sedlo and Ovrna, with long-lasting snow cover. The Hrub Jesenk mountains slowly merge into the rolling hills of the Nzk Jesenks and Odersk Vrchy, rising to 800m at Slunen and 680m at Fidlv Kopec respectively.To the east, the landscape gradually descends into the Gate (Moravsk brna) valley with the Beva and Odra rivers. The former flows to the south-west, the latter to the north-east, where the terrain spreads into the flat Ostrava and Opava basins (Ostravsk a Opavsk pnev), where most of the population lives. The regions heavy industry, which has been in decline for the last decade, is located there too, benefiting from huge deposits of hard coal. The confluence of the rivers Odra and Ole is the lowest point of the region, at 195 m.To the south-east, towards the Slovakian border, the landscape sharply rises into the Beskids () (often referred to just as Beskydy), with its highest mountain Lys Hora (Bald Mountain) at 1323 m, which is considered to be the place with the highest annual rainfall in the Czech Republic,  a year. The mountains are heavily forested and serve as a holiday resort for the industrial north.Nature ConservationThere are three large Landscape Protected Areas (Chrnn krajinn oblasti, CHKO) and a number of smaller nature reserves in the region. Countryside more affected by humans, yet still scenic is protected in five Nature Parks (Prodn parky).The CHKO Jesenky (with an area of 745 km) lies in the  mountain range of the same name in the north east of the region. The terrain is very diverse, with steep slopes and deep valleys. Eighty percent of the area is forested, mostly by secondary plantations of spruce, which were seriously damaged by industrial emissions. Due to local weather conditions, the tree line in the area descends to 12001300 m. Alpine meadows can be found in particularly low elevations in the Jesenk mountains. There are also a few peat moors, which are otherwise non-existent in Moravia.The CHKO Pood (81.5 km) lies in the Moravian Gate, in close proximity to the regions capital Ostrava, on the banks of the meandering Odra. It is an area of floodplain forests (one of the last preserved in Central Europe), flooded meadows and a lot of shallow ponds, on which water birds thrive.The CHKO Beskydy (1,160 km) is the largest Czech CHKO. It lies in the south-east of the region, along the Slovakian boundary. In the north, the mountains rise steeply from the Ostrava basin, to the south their elevation and severity decreases. Most of the area is forested, mainly by spruce plantations, which are not indigenous to the area. Many of these were severely damaged by emissions from the Ostrava industrial region. There are, however, also a lot of either newly planted or preserved forests of beech, which in the past covered most of the mountains. The CHKO is typical by its mosaic of forests and highland meadows and pastures with hamlets scattered throughout all the mountains. In recent years bear and wolf sighting have become more frequent.There are altogether 125 small, protected nature areas covering an area of 52 km. The most notable of them is the lime ipka Cave (Jeskyn ipka) near tramberk, where remnants of a man were discovered in the late nineteenth century.Places of InterestThere are three towns with protected historical centers. Pbor, the birthplace of Sigmund Freud, was an important center of education for northern Moravia from the 17th century to the first half of the 20th. Jin, founded under the castle of Jin, has a well preserved central square dating back to the 14th century, with the erotnsk chteau nearby. tramberk is a unique small town nestled in a valley between lime hills, with many timber houses and the Trba Spire rising on a hill above the town.There are many castles and chteaus in the region; the most famous being nad Moravic, Radu, Kravae and Fulnek. Hukvaldy, in a village of the same name under the Beskids mountains, is one the regions many castle ruins, known for a musical festival dedicated to the composer Janek, who was born there. Another well-known castle ruin is Sovinec under the Hrub Jesenks.Due to the importance of industry in the region, there are many museums displaying products of local technical development: The Automobile Museum in Kopivnice exhibits the history Tatra, the Train Car Museum in Studnka, the Mining Museum and the former Michal Mine (Dl Michal) in Ostrava, and many others.PopulationThe total population of the region was 1,262,660 (men 48.83%, women 51.20%) in 2002, which makes it the most populous Region in the Czech Republic. 86.9% are Czechs, 3.3% Slovaks, 3.0% Poles, 2.3% Moravians,0.8% Silesians, 0.3% Germans and 0.2% Roma, though this last figure might be considerably higher as Roma often do not officially admit their nationality. 40.2% of the population are religious,  mostly Roman Catholic, while 52.3% declare themselves atheists. The population density is 227.3 inhabitants per km, which is the second highest in the country, after the capital Prague (Praha). Most of the population is urban, 62% living in towns with over 20,000 inhabitants. Administrative division There are 302 municipalities, of which there are 39 towns, 16 with population over 10,000 inhabitants and 5 towns with over 60,000. These are the capital of the region Ostrava (314,102 in 2002), Havov (85,271), Karvin (61,146), Opava (60,731) and Frdek-Mstek (60,603). Municipalities with Extended Competence Since 2003-01-01 the region has been divided into 22 Municipalities with Extended Competence which took over most of the administration of the former District Authorities. Some of these are further divided into Municipalities with Commissioned Local Authority. They are unofficially named Little Districts (). They are: *Blovec*Bohumn*Bruntl*Tn*pod Radhotm*Frdek-Mstek*nad Ostravic*Havov*Hlun*Jablunkov*Karvin*Kopivnice*Kravae*Krnov*Jin*Odry*Opava*Orlov*Ostrava*Rmaov*Tinec*Vtkov. Districts Traditionally, the region has been divided into six Districts () which still exist as regional units though most administration has been shifted to the Municipalities with Extended Competence and the Municipalities with Commissioned Local Authority. *Bruntl*Frdek-Mstek*Karvin*Nov Jin*Opava*Ostrava-City History Until 2000 the current region did not exist as such but was only a part of a larger administrative unit called the North Moravian Region (Severomoravsk kraj). 6 of its Districts (okresy), Bruntl, Frdek-Mstek, Karvin, Nov Jin, Opava and Ostrava, were in 2000 put into the newly established Moravian-Silesian Region. The old North Moravian Region still exists and jurisdiction of some administrative bodies is defined by its borders. References External links* Official website* Region statistics-Moravia-Sileziade Morvia i Silsiakrajda:Mhren-Schlesienkrajmaakondde Moravia-Silesiaregionode Moravie-Silsiefy:Moraavje-Sileezjede Moravia-SilesiakrajMoravia-Silesiadi Moravia-SlesiaLabuadkrataskerletMoravia-Silesianl:Moravi-Silezija:regione Silsia (region)morawsko-lski(regio)Moravia-Sileziakrajsv:Mhren-Schlesien(vng)(rehiyon)zh:-
477026
Kriging
Kriging is a group of geostatistical techniques to interpolate the value of a field (e.g., the elevation, z, of the landscape as a function of the geographic location) at an unobserved location from observations of its value at nearby locations.  The theory behind interpolation and extrapolation by kriging was developed by the French mathematician Matheron based on the Masters thesis of Gerhardus Krige, the pioneering plotter of distance-weighted average gold grades at the Witwatersrand reef complex in Africa. The English verb is to krige and the most common noun is kriging; both are often pronounced with a hard g, following the pronunciation of the name Krige.Interpolationthumb|300px|Figure 1. Example of one-dimensional data interpolation by kriging, with confidence intervals. Squares indicate the location of the data. The kriging interpolation is in red. The confidence intervals are in green.Kriging belongs to the family of linear squares estimation algorithms.  As illustrated in Figure 1, the aim of kriging is to estimate the value of an unknown real-valued function, f, at a point, x^*, given the values of the function at some other points, x_1,\ldots, x_n. A kriging estimator is said to be linear because the predicted value \hat f(x^*) is a combination that may be written as:\hat f(x^*)  \sum_{i1}^n \lambda_i(x^*) f(x_i) .The weights \lambda_i are solutions of a system of linear equations which is obtained by assuming that f is a sample-path of a random process F(x), and that the error of prediction:\varepsilon(x)  F(x) - \sum_{i1}^n \lambda_i(x) F(x_i) is to be minimized in some sense. For instance, the so-called simple kriging assumption is that the mean and the covariance of F(x) is known and then, the kriging predictor is the one that minimizes the variance of the prediction error.ApplicationsAlthough kriging was developed originally for applications in geostatistics, it is a general method of statistical interpolation that can be applied within any discipline to sampled data from random fields that satisfy the appropriate mathematical assumptions.To date kriging has been used in a variety of disciplines, including the following:* Black box modelling in experiments()* science(Hanefi Bayraktar and F. Sezer. Turalioglu (2005) A Kriging-based approach for locating a sampling sitein the assessment of air quality, SERRA, v.19, n.4, DOI 10.1007/s00477-005-0234-8, p. 301-305)* Hydrogeology(Chiles, J.-P. and P. Delfiner (1999) Geostatistics, Modeling Spatial uncertainty, Wiley Series in Probability and statistics.)(Zimmerman, D.A. et al. (1998) A comparison of seven geostatistically based inverse approaches to estimate transmissivies for modelling advective transport by groundwater flow, Water Resource. Res., v.34, n.6, p.1273-1413)(Tonkin M.J. Larson (2002) Kriging Water Levels with a Regional-Linear and Point Logarithmic Drift, Ground Water, v. 33, no 1., p. 338-353,)* Mining(Journel, A.G. and C.J. Huijbregts (1978) Mining Geostatistics, Academic Press London)(Andrew Richmond (2003) Financially Efficient Ore Selection Incorporating Grade Uncertainty, Mathematical Geology, v. 35, n.2, pp. 195-215)* resources(Goovaerts (1997) Geostatistics for natural resource evaluation,)(X. Emery (2005) Simple and Ordinary Kriging Multigaussian Kriging for Estimating recovevearble Reserves, Mathematical Geology, v. 37, n. 3, pp. 295-319))* sensing(A. Stein, F. van der Meer, B. Gorte (Eds.) (2002) Spatial Statistics for remote sensing)* estate appraisal(Barris, J. (2008) An expert system for appraisal by the method of comparison. PhD Thesis, UPC, Barcelona)and many others.Mathematical detailsGeneral equationsKriging interpolates the value Z(x_0) of a field Z(x) (e.g. the elevation Z of the landscape as a function of the geographic location x) at an unobserved location x_0 from observations z_iZ(x_i),\;i1,\ldots,n of the random field at nearby locations x_1,\ldots,x_n. Kriging computes the linear unbiased estimator \hat{Z}(x_0) of Z(x_0) based on a stochastic model of the dependence quantified either by the variogram \gamma(x,y) or by expectation \mu(x)EZ(x) and the function c(x,y) of the random field.  The kriging estimator is given by a linear combination :\hat{Z}(x_0)\sum_{i1}^n w_i(x_0) Z(x_i)of the observed values z_iZ(x_i) with weights  w_i(x_0),\;i1,\ldots,n chosen such that the variance (also called kriging variance or kriging error):: \begin{align}\sigma^2_k(x_0) &:\mathrm{Var}\left(\hat{Z}(x_0)-Z(x_0)\right) \\&\sum_{i1}^n\sum_{j1}^n w_i(x_0) w_j(x_0) c(x_i,x_j) + \mathrm{Var}\left(Z(x_0)\right)-2\sum_{i1}^nw_i(x_0)c(x_i,x_0)\end{align}is minimized subject to the unbiasedness condition::\mathrm{E}\hat{Z}(x)-Z(x)\sum_{i1}^n w_i(x_0)\mu(x_i) - \mu(x_0) 0The kriging variance must not be confused with the variance :\mathrm{Var}\left(\hat{Z}(x_0)\right)\mathrm{Var}\left(\sum_{i1}^n w_iZ(x_i)\right)\sum_{i1}^n\sum_{j1}^n w_i w_j c(x_i,x_j)of the kriging predictor \hat{Z}(x_0) itself.MethodsDepending on the stochastic properties of the random field different types of kriging apply. The type of kriging determines the linear constraint on the weights w_i implied by the unbiasedness condition; i.e. the linear constraint, and hence the method for calculating the weights, depends upon the type of kriging.Classical methods of kriging are* Simple kriging assumes a known constant trend: \mu(x)0.* Ordinary kriging assumes an unknown constant trend: \mu(x)\mu.* Universal kriging assumes a general polynomial trend model, such as linear trend model \mu(x)\sum_{k0}^p \beta_k f_k(x).* IRFk-kriging assumes \mu(x) to be an unknown polynomial in x.* Indicator kriging uses functions instead of the process itself, in order to estimate transition probabilities.* kriging is a version of indicator kriging working with a family of indicators. However, MIK has fallen out of favour as an interpolation technique in recent years. This is due to some inherent difficulties related to operation and model validation. Conditional simulation is fast becoming the accepted replacement technique in this case.* Disjunctive kriging is a nonlinear generalisation of kriging.* Lognormal kriging interpolates positive data by means of logarithms.Simple krigingSimple kriging is mathematically the simplest, but the least general. It assumes the expectation of the field to be known, and relies on a function. However, in most applications neither the expectation nor the covariance are known beforehand. Simple kriging assumptions The practical assumptions for the application of simple kriging are:* wide sense stationarity of the field.* The expectation is zero everywhere: \mu(x)0.* Known function c(x,y)\mathrm{Cov}(Z(x),Z(y)) Simple kriging equation The kriging weights of simple kriging have no unbiasedness condition and are given by the simple kriging equation system::\begin{pmatrix}w_1 \\ \vdots \\ w_n \end{pmatrix}\begin{pmatrix}c(x_1,x_1) & \cdots & c(x_1,x_n) \\\vdots & \ddots & \vdots  \\c(x_n,x_1) & \cdots & c(x_n,x_n) \end{pmatrix}^{-1}\begin{pmatrix}c(x_1,x_0) \\ \vdots \\ c(x_n,x_0) \end{pmatrix}This is analogous to a linear regression of Z(x_0) on the other z_1 , \ldots, z_n. Simple kriging interpolation The interpolation by simple kriging is given by::\hat{Z}(x_0)\begin{pmatrix}z_1 \\ \vdots \\ z_n  \end{pmatrix}\begin{pmatrix}c(x_1,x_1) & \cdots & c(x_1,x_n)  \\\vdots & \ddots & \vdots   \\c(x_n,x_1) & \cdots & c(x_n,x_n)   \end{pmatrix}^{-1}\begin{pmatrix}c(x_1,x_0) \\ \vdots \\ c(x_n,x_0)\end{pmatrix} Simple kriging error The kriging error is given by::\mathrm{Var}\left(\hat{Z}(x_0)-Z(x_0)\right)\underbrace{c(x_0,x_0)}_{\mathrm{Var}(Z(x_0))}-\underbrace{\begin{pmatrix}c(x_1,x_0) \\ \vdots \\ c(x_n,x_0)\end{pmatrix}\begin{pmatrix}c(x_1,x_1) & \cdots & c(x_1,x_n)  \\\vdots & \ddots & \vdots  \\c(x_n,x_1) & \cdots & c(x_n,x_n) \end{pmatrix}^{-1}\begin{pmatrix}c(x_1,x_0) \\ \vdots \\ c(x_n,x_0) \end{pmatrix}}_{\mathrm{Var}(\hat{Z}(x_0))}which leads to the generalised least squares version of the theorem (Chiles & Delfiner 1999, p. 159)::\mathrm{Var}(Z(x_0))\mathrm{Var}(\hat{Z}(x_0))+\mathrm{Var}\left(\hat{Z}(x_0)-Z(x_0)\right).Ordinary kriging Ordinary kriging is the most commonly used type of kriging. It assumes a constant but unknown mean. Typical ordinary kriging assumptions The typical assumptions for the practical application of ordinary kriging are:* Intrinsic stationarity or wide sense stationarity of the field* enough observations to estimate the variogram.The mathematical condition for applicability of ordinary kriging are:* The mean EZ(x)\mu is unknown but constant* The variogram \gamma(x,y)E(Z(x)-Z(y))^2 of  Z(x) is known. Ordinary kriging equation The kriging weights of ordinary kriging fulfill the unbiasedness condition:\sum_{i1}^n \lambda_i  1and are given by the ordinary kriging equation system::\begin{pmatrix}\lambda_1 \\ \vdots \\ \lambda_n \\ \mu \end{pmatrix}\begin{pmatrix}\gamma(x_1,x_1) & \cdots & \gamma(x_1,x_n) &1 \\\vdots & \ddots & \vdots  & \vdots \\\gamma(x_n,x_1) & \cdots & \gamma(x_n,x_n) & 1 \\1 &\cdots& 1 & 0 \end{pmatrix}^{-1}\begin{pmatrix}\gamma(x_1,x^*) \\ \vdots \\ \gamma(x_n,x^*) \\ 1\end{pmatrix}the additional parameter \mu is a multiplier used in the minimization of the kriging error \sigma_k^2(x) to honor the unbiasedness condition. Ordinary kriging interpolation The interpolation by ordinary kriging is given by::\hat{Z}(x^*)\begin{pmatrix}\lambda_1 \\ \vdots \\ \lambda_n  \end{pmatrix}\begin{pmatrix}Z(x_1) \\ \vdots \\ Z(x_n) \end{pmatrix} Ordinary kriging error The kriging error is given by::var\left(\hat{Z}(x^*)-Z(x^*)\right)\begin{pmatrix}\lambda_1 \\ \vdots \\ \lambda_n \\ \mu \end{pmatrix}\begin{pmatrix}\gamma(x_1,x^*) \\ \vdots \\ \gamma(x_n,x^*) \\ 1\end{pmatrix} Properties (Cressie 1993, Chiles&Delfiner 1999, Wackernagel 1995)* The kriging estimation is unbiased: E\hat{Z}(x_i)EZ(x_i)* The kriging estimation honors the actually observed value: \hat{Z}(x_i)Z(x_i) (assuming no measurement error is incurred)* The kriging estimation \hat{Z}(x) is the linear unbiased estimator of Z(x) if the assumptions hold. However (e.g. Cressie 1993):** As with any method: If the assumptions do not hold, kriging might be bad.** There might be better nonlinear and/or biased methods.** No properties are guaranteed, when the wrong variogram is used. However typically still a good interpolation is achieved.** Best is not necessarily good: e.g. In case of no spatial dependence the kriging interpolation is only as good as the arithmetic mean.* Kriging provides \sigma_k^2 as a measure of precision. However this measure relies on the correctness of the variogram.Related terms and techniques Terms A series of related terms were also named after Krige, including kriged estimate, kriged estimator, kriging variance, kriging covariance, zero kriging variance, unity kriging covariance, kriging matrix, kriging method, kriging model, kriging plan, kriging process, kriging system, block kriging, co-kriging, disjunctive kriging, linear kriging, ordinary kriging, point kriging, random kriging, regular grid kriging, simple kriging and universal kriging. Related methods Kriging is mathematically closely related to analysis. Both theories derive a linear unbiased estimator, based on assumptions on covariances, make use of theorem to prove independence of the estimate and error, and make use of very similar formulae. They are nevertheless useful in different frameworks: kriging is made for interpolation of a single realisation of a random field, while regression models are based on multiple observations of a multivariate dataset.In the statistical community the same technique is also known as process regression, Kolmogorov Wiener prediction, or best linear unbiased prediction. The kriging interpolation may also be seen as a spline in a kernel Hilbert space, with reproducing kernel given by the covariance function.() The difference with the classical kriging approach is provided by the interpretation: while the spline is motivated by a minimum norm interpolation based on a Hilbert space structure, kriging is motivated by an expected squared prediction error based on a stochastic model.  Kriging with polynomial trend surfaces is mathematically identical to least squares  polynomial fitting. Kriging can also be understood as a form of inference.() Kriging starts with a prior distribution over functions. This prior takes the form of a Gaussian process: N samples from a function will be normally distributed, where the covariance between any two samples is the covariance function (or kernel) of the Gaussian process evaluated at the spatial location of two points. A set of values is then observed, each value associated with a spatial location. Now, a new value can be predicted at any new spatial location, by combining the Gaussian prior with a Gaussian function for each of the observed values. The resulting posterior distribution is also Gaussian, with a mean and covariance that can be simply computed from the observed values, their variance, and the kernel matrix derived from the prior.History The theory of kriging was developed by the French mathematician Matheron based on the Masters thesis of Gerhardus Krige, the pioneering plotter of distance-weighted average gold grades at the Witwatersrand reef complex. The English verb is to krige and the most common adjective is kriging. The method was called krigeage for the first time in Matherons 1960 Krigeage dun Panneau Rectangulaire par sa Priphrie. Matheron, in this Note Gostatistique No 28, derives k*, his estimateur and a precursor to the kriged estimate or kriged estimator. In classical statistics, Matherons k* is the length-weighted average grade of each of his panneaux in his set. What Matheron failed to derive was var(k*), the variance of his estimateur. On the contrary, he computed the length-weighted average grade of each panneau but did not compute the variance of its central value. In time, he replaced length-weighted average grades for three-dimensional sample spaces such as Matheronian blocks of ore with more abundant distance-weighted average grades for zero-dimensional sample spaces such as Matheronian points.See also* linear statistics* process* kriging* variogram* dependence* Variogram* interpolationReferences( Books * Abramowitz, M., and Stegun, I. (1972), Handbook of Mathematical Functions, Dover Publications, New York.* Banerjee, S., Carlin, B.P. and Gelfand, A.E. (2004). Hierarchical Modeling and Analysis for Spatial Data. Chapman and Hall/CRC Press, Taylor and Francis Group.* Chiles, J.-P. and P. Delfiner (1999) Geostatistics, Modeling Spatial uncertainty, Wiley Series in Probability and statistics.* Cressie, N (1993) Statistics for spatial data, Wiley, New York* David, M (1988) Handbook of Applied Advanced Geostatistical Ore Reserve Estimation, Elsevier Scientific Publishing* Deutsch, C.V., and Journel, A. G. (1992), GSLIB - Geostatistical Software Library and Users Guide, Oxford University Press, New York, 338 pp.* Goovaerts, P. (1997) Geostatistics for Natural Resources Evaluation, Oxford University Press, New York* Isaaks, E. H., and Srivastava, R. M. (1989), An Introduction to Applied Geostatistics, Oxford University Press, New York, 561 pp.* Journel, A. G. and C. J. Huijbregts (1978) Mining Geostatistics, Academic Press London* Journel, A. G. (1989), Fundamentals of Geostatistics in Five Lessons, American Geophysical Union, Washington D.C.* . Also, Section 15.9. Gaussian Process Regression.* Stein, M. L. (1999), Statistical Interpolation of Spatial Data: Some Theory for Kriging, Springer, New York.* Wackernagel, H. (1995) Multivariate Geostatistics - An Introduction with Applications, Springer BerlinHistorical references# Agterberg, F P, Geomathematics, Mathematical Background and Geo-Science Applications, Elsevier Scientific Publishing Company, Amsterdam, 1974# Cressie, N. A. C., The Origins of Kriging, Mathematical Geology, v. 22, pp 239252, 1990# Krige, D.G, A statistical approach to some mine valuations and allied problems at the Witwatersrand, Masters thesis of the University of Witwatersrand, 1951# Link, R F and Koch, G S, Experimental Designs and Trend-Surface Analsysis, Geostatistics, A colloquium, Plenum Press, New York, 1970# Matheron, G., Principles of geostatistics, Economic Geology, 58, pp 12461266, 1963#Matheron, G., The intrinsic random functions, and their applications, Adv. Appl. Prob., 5, pp 439468, 1973# Merriam, D F, Editor, Geostatistics, a colloquium, Plenum Press, New York, 1970External links* GaussianProcess.com: Theory and Applications of Gaussian Processes* An information server about geostatistics and spatial statistics* On-Line Library of the Centre de Geostatistique at the Ecole des Mines de Parisde:Kriginges:Krigeajeeu:Krigekuntzafr:Krigeagehr:Krigingid:Krigingit:Kriginghu:Krigelspl:Krigingpt:Krigingsu:Krigingvi:Kriging
478684
Vijayanagara_Empire
footnotes   The Vijayanagara Empire ( ,  ), referred as the Kingdom of Bisnaga by the Portuguese, was a Indian empire based in the Plateau. Established in 1336 by I and his brother Raya I of Yadava Lineage.(A history of Vijayanagar: the never to be forgotten empire By Bangalore Suryanarain Row,((http://books.google.co.in/books?idDUl1PFJAOoAC&pgRA1-PA70&dqyadavas+of+vijaynagar&hlen&einh00TrjbHdCtrAfJ9ez1Dg&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum3&ved0CDsQ6AEwAg#vonepage&q&ffalse)))(Traditions in motion: religion and society in history By Supriya Varma, Satish Saberwal, Page no. 243 http://books.google.com/books?idS8EoAAAAYAAJ&qvijaynagar+yadava&dqvijaynagar+yadava&lr&eis4doS9joA5TMlQSbhpGvCw&cd30) The empire rose to prominence as a culmination of attempts by the southern powers against Islamic invasions by the end of the 13th century.() It lasted until 1646 although its power declined after a major military defeat in 1565 by the sultanates. The empire is named after its capital city of Vijayanagara, whose impressive ruins surround modern Hampi, now a Heritage Site in modern Karnataka, India. The writings of medieval European travelers such as Paes, Nunes(Robert Sewell, Ferno Nunes, Domingos Paes, A forgotten empire: Vijayanagar; a contribution to the history of India (Includes a translation of Chronica dos reis de Bisnaga, from Domingos Paes and Fernao Nuniz from 1520 and 1535 respectively), Adamant Media Corporation, 1982, ISBN 0543925889) and Da Conti and the literature in local vernaculars provide crucial information about its history. Archaeological excavations at Vijayanagara have revealed the empires power and wealth. The empires legacy includes many monuments spread over South India, the best known being the group at Hampi. The previous temple building traditions in South India came together in the Architecture style. The mingling of all faiths and vernaculars inspired architectural innovation of Hindu temple construction, first in the Deccan and later in the Dravidian idioms using the local granite. Secular royal structures show the influence of the Northern Deccan Sultanate architecture. Efficient administration and vigorous overseas trade brought new technologies like water management systems for irrigation. The empires patronage enabled fine arts and literature to reach new heights in the languages of Kannada, Telugu, Tamil and Sanskrit, while music evolved into its current form. The Vijayanagara Empire created an epoch in South Indian history that transcended regionalism by promoting Hinduism as a unifying factor.HistoryImage:Balakrishna temple DK.jpg|thumb|200px|left|Chalukya pillars and Dravida Vimana, Hampi.Differing theories have been proposed regarding the Vijayanagara empires origins. Some claim that I and Raya I, the founders of the empire, or Kuruba people first associated with the Kakatiya kingdom who took control of the northern parts of the Empire during its decline.(Robert Sewell (A Forgotten Empire Vijayanagar: A Contribution to the History of India, 1901), Nilakanta Sastri (1955), N. Ventakaramanayya (The Early Muslim expansion in South India, 1942) and B. Surya Narayana Rao (History of Vijayanagar, 1993) in Kamath (2001) pp157160.) Other historians propose they were Kannadigas and commanders in the army of the Empire stationed in the Tungabhadra region to ward off Muslim invasions from the Northern India.(Historians such as B. Desai (History of Vijayanagar Empire, 1936), Heras (The Aravidu Dynasty of Vijayanagara, 1927), Saletore (Social and Political Life in the Vijayanagara Empire, 1930), G.S. Gai (Archaeological Survey of India), William Coelho (The Hoysala Vamsa, 1955) and Kamath (Kamath 2001, pp157160))(Karmarkar (1947), p30)(Kulke and Rothermund (2004), p188)(Rice (1897), p345) Irrespective of their origin, historians agree the founders were supported and inspired by Vidyaranya, a saint at the Sringeri monastery  to fight the Muslim invasion of South India.(Nilakanta Sastry (1955), p216)(Kamath (2001), p160) Writings by foreign travelers during the late medieval era combined with recent excavations in the Vijayanagara principality have uncovered much-needed information about the empires history, fortifications, scientific developments and architectural innovations.(Portuguese travelers Barbosa, Barradas and Italian Varthema and Caesar Fredericci in 1567, Persian Abdur Razzak in 1440, Barani, Isamy, Tabataba, Nizamuddin Bakshi, Ferishta and Shirazi and vernacular works from the 14th century to the 16th century. (Kamath 2001, pp157158))(Fritz & Michell (2001) pp1&ndash;11)Before the early 14th century rise of the Vijayanagara Empire, the Hindu states of the Deccan, the Yadava Empire of Devagiri, the Kakatiya Kingdom of Warangal, the Empire of Madurai, and the tiny kingdom of Kampili had been repeatedly invaded by Muslims from the north, and by 1336 they had all been defeated by Khilji and bin Tughluq, the Sultans of Delhi. The Empire was the sole remaining Hindu state in the path of the Muslim invasion.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p216) After the death of Hoysala Ballala III during a battle against the Sultan of Madurai in 1343, the Hoysala Empire merged with the growing Vijayanagara empire.File:Cheluvanarayanaswamy temple melkote DK.jpg|thumb|200px|left|Kalyanamantapa Melkote.In the first two decades after the founding of the empire, Harihara I gained control over most of the area south of the Tungabhadra river and earned the title of Purvapaschima Samudradhishavara (master of the eastern and western seas). By 1374 Bukka Raya I, successor to Harihara I, had defeated the chiefdom of Arcot, the dynasty of Kondavidu, the Sultan of Madurai and gained control over Goa in the west and the Tungabhadra-River doab in the north.(Kamath (2001), p162)(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p317) The original capital was in the principality of Anegondi on the northern banks of the Tungabhadra River in todays Karnataka. It was later moved to nearby Vijayanagara on the rivers southern banks during the reign of Bukka Raya I. With the Vijayanagara Kingdom now imperial in stature, II, the second son of Bukka Raya I, further consolidated the kingdom beyond the River and brought the whole of South India under the Vijayanagara umbrella.(The success was probably also due to the peaceful nature of Muhammad II Bahmani, according to Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p242) The next ruler, Raya I, emerged successful against the Gajapatis of Orissa and undertook important works of fortification and irrigation.(From the notes of Portuguese Nuniz. Robert Sewell notes that a big dam across was built the Tungabhadra and an aqueduct  long was cut out of rock (Nilakanta Sastri 1955, p243).) Raya II (called Gajabetekara)(Also deciphered as Gajaventekara, a metaphor for great hunter of his enemies, or hunter of elephants (Kamath 2001, p163).) succeeded to the throne in 1424 and was possibly the most capable of the Sangama dynasty rulers.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p244) He quelled rebelling feudal lords as well as the Zamorin of Calicut and Quilon in the south. He invaded the island of Lanka and became overlord of the kings of Burma at Pegu and Tanasserim.(From the notes of Persian Abdur Razzak. Writings of Nuniz confirms that the kings of Burma paid tributes to Vijayanagara empire (Nilakanta Sastri 1955, p245))(Kamath (2001), p164)(From the notes of Abdur Razzak about Vijayanagara: a city like this had not been seen by the pupil of the eye nor had an ear heard of anything equal to it in the world (Hampi, A Travel Guide 2003, p11)) The empire declined in the late 15th century until the serious attempts by commander Narasimha Deva Raya in 1485 and by general Narasa Nayaka in 1491 to reconsolidate the empire. After nearly two decades of conflict with rebellious chieftains, the empire eventually came under the rule of Krishnadevaraya, the son of Tuluva Narasa Nayaka.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p250)In the following decades the Vijayanagara empire dominated all of Southern India and fought off invasions from the five established Sultanates.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p239)(Kamath (2001), p159) The empire reached its peak during the rule of Krishnadevaraya when Vijayanagara armies were consistently victorious.(From the notes of Portuguese traveler Domingo Paes about Krishnadevaraya: A king who was perfect in all things (Hampi, A Travel Guide 2003, p31)) The empire annexed areas formerly under the Sultanates in the northern Deccan and the territories in the eastern Deccan, including Kalinga, while simultaneously maintaining control over all its subordinates in the south.(The notes of Portuguese Barbosa during the time of Krishnadevaraya confirms a very rich and well provided Vijayanagara city (Kamath 2001, p186)) Many important monuments were either completed or commissioned during the time of Krishnadevaraya.(Most monuments including the royal platform (Mahanavami Dibba) were actually built over a period spanning several decades (Dallapiccola 2001, p66)) Krishnadevaraya was followed by Raya in 1530 and in 1542 by Raya while the real power lay with Rama Raya, the son-in-law of Krishnadevaraya, whose relationship with the Deccan Sultans who allied against him has been debated.(Dr. P. B. Desai asserts that Rama Rayas involvement often was at the insistence of one Sultan or the other (Kamath 2001, p172).) Image:Karnataka Hampi IMG 0730.jpg|200px|thumb|left|Virupaksha temple, HampiThe sudden capture and killing of Aliya Rama Raya in 1565 at the of Talikota, against an alliance of the Deccan sultanates, after a seemingly easy victory for the Vijayanagara armies, created havoc and confusion in the Vijayanagara ranks, which were then completely routed. The Sultanates army later plundered Hampi and reduced it to the ruinous state in which it remains; it was never re-occupied. Tirumala Raya, the sole surviving commander, left Vijayanagara for Penukonda with vast amounts of treasure on the back of 550 elephants.(Some scholars say the war was actually fought between Rakkasagi and Tangadigi in modern Bijapur district, close to Talikota, and the battle is also called Battle of Rakkasa-Tangadi. Shervani claimed that the actual venue of the battle was Bannihatti (Kamath 2001, p170)) The empire went into a slow decline regionally, although trade with the Portuguese continued, and the British were given a land grant for the establishment of Madras.(The Telugu work Vasucharitamu refers to Aravidu King Tirumala Raya (1570) as the reviver of the Empire. (Ramesh 2006))(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p268) Deva Raya was succeeded by his son I later followed by II who made Chandragiri his capital, repulsed the invasion of the Sultanate and saved Penukonda from being captured.(Kamath (2001), p174) His successor, Ramadeva, took power and ruled till 1632 after whose death, III became king and ruled for about ten years after which Vellore was made the capital. The empire was finally conquered by the Sultanates of Bijapur and Golkonda.( The largest feudatories of the Vijayanagar empire  the Mysore Kingdom, Nayaka, Nayaks of Madurai, Nayaks of Tanjore, of Chitradurga and Nayak Kingdom of Gingee  palegars of gummanayakanapalya  declared independence and went on to have a significant impact on the history of South India in the coming centuries. These Nayaka kingdoms lasted into the 18th century while the Mysore Kingdom remained a princely state until Independence in 1947 although they came under the Raj in 1799 after the death of Sultan.(Kamath (2001), p220, p226, p234)GovernanceImage:Hampi natural fortress Dk.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Natural fortress at Vijayanagarathumb|left|200px|Royal Insignia: boar, sun, moon and daggerThe rulers of the Vijayanagara empire maintained the well-functioning administrative methods developed by their predecessors, the Hoysala, Kakatiya and Pandya kingdoms, to govern their territories and made changes only where necessary.(A war administration, (K.M. Panikkar in Kamath 2001, p174)) The King was the ultimate authority, assisted by a cabinet of ministers (Pradhana) headed by the prime minister (Mahapradhana). Other important titles recorded in inscriptions were the chief secretary (Karyakartha or Rayaswami) and the imperial officers (Adhikari). All high ranking ministers and officers were required to have military training.(From the notes of Persian Abdur Razzak and research by B.A. Saletore (Kamath 2001, p175)) A secretariat near the kings palace employed scribes and officers to maintain records made official by using a seal imprinted with the ring of the king.(From the notes of Nuniz (Kamath 2001, p175)) At the lower administrative levels, wealthy feudal landlords (Goudas) supervised accountants (Karanikas or Karnam) and guards (Kavalu). The palace administration was divided into 72 departments (Niyogas), each having several female attendants chosen for their youth and beauty (some imported or captured in victorious battles) who were trained to handle minor administrative matters and to serve men of nobility as courtesans or concubines.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p286)The empire was divided into five main provinces (Rajya), each under a commander (Dandanayaka or Dandanatha) and headed by a governor, often from the royal family, who used the native language for administrative purposes.(From the notes of Duarte Barbosa (Kamath 2001, p176). However, the kingdom may have had nine provinces (T.V. Mahalingam in Kamath 2001, p176)) A Rajya was divided into regions (Vishaya Vente or Kottam), and further divided into counties (Sime or Nadu) themselves subdivided into municipalities  (Kampana or Sthala). Hereditary families ruled their respective territories and paid tribute to the empire while some areas, such as Keladi and  Madurai, came under the direct supervision of a commander.On the battlefields, the kings commanders led the troops. The empires war strategy rarely involved massive invasions; more often it employed small scale methods such as attacking and destroying individual forts. The empire was among the first in India to use long range artillery commonly manned by foreign gunners. (Gunners from present day Turkmenistan were considered the best).(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p287) Army troops were of two types: The kings personal army directly recruited by the empire and the feudal army under each feudatory. King Krishnadevarayas personal army consisted of 100,000 infantry, 20,000 cavalrymen and over 900 elephants. This number was only a part of the army numbering over 1.1 million soldiers, a figure that varied as an army of two million has also been recorded along with the existence of a navy as evidenced by the use of the term Navigadaprabhu (commander of the navy).(From the notes of Abdur Razzaq and Paes respectively (Kamath 2001, p176)) The army recruited from all classes of society (supported by the collection of additional feudal tributes from feudatory rulers), and consisted of archers and musketeers wearing quilted tunics, shieldmen with swords and poignards in their girdles, and soldiers carrying shields so larges that no armour was necessary. The horses and elephants were fully armoured and the elephants had knives fastened to their tusks to do maximum damage in battle.(From the notes of Nuniz (Nilakanta Sastri 1955, p288))The capital city was completely dependent on the water supply systems constructed to channel and store water, and ensure a consistent supply throughout the year. The remains of these hydraulic systems have given historians a picture of the prevailing surface water distribution methods in use at that time in South Indias semiarid regions.(Davison-Jenkins (2001), p89) Contemporary inscriptions and notes of foreign travelers describe how huge tanks were constructed by labourers.(From the notes of Domingo Paes and Nuniz (Davison-Jenkins 2001, p98)) Excavations have uncovered the remains of a well-connected water distribution system existing solely within the royal enclosure and the large temple complexes (suggesting it was for the exclusive use of royalty, and for special ceremonies) with sophisticated channels using gravity and siphons to transport water through pipelines.(Davison-Jenkins (2001), p90) The only structures resembling public waterworks are the remains of large water tanks that collected the seasonal monsoon water and then dried up in summer except for the few fed by springs. In the fertile agricultural areas near the River, canals were dug to guide the river water into tanks. These canals had sluices that were opened and closed to control the water flow. In other areas the administration encouraged the digging of wells monitored by administrative authorities. Large tanks in the capital city were constructed with royal patronage while smaller tanks were funded by wealthy individuals to gain social and religious merit.EconomyImage:Hampi Marketplace DK.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Ancient market place and plantation at Hampi.The empires economy was largely dependent on agriculture. Sorghum (jowar), cotton and pulse legumes grew in semi arid regions, while sugarcane, rice and wheat thrived in rainy areas. Betel leaves, areca (for chewing), and coconut were the principal cash crops, and large scale cotton production supplied the weaving centers of the empires vibrant textile industry. Spices such as turmeric, pepper, cardamom and ginger grew in the remote Malnad hill region and were transported to the city for trade. The empires capital city was a thriving business centre that included a burgeoning market in large quantities of precious gems and gold.(From the notes of Duarte Barbosa (Kamath 2001, p181).) Prolific temple-building provided employment to thousands of masons, sculptors, and other skilled artisans.Land ownership was important. Most of the growers were farmers and were given the right of part ownership of the land over time. Tax policies encouraging needed produce made distinctions between land use to determine tax levies. For example, the daily market availability of rose petals was important for perfumers, so cultivation of roses received a lower tax assessment.(From the notes of Abdur Razzak in Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p298) Salt production and the manufacture of salt pans were controlled by similar means. The making of ghee (clarified butter), which was sold as an oil for human consumption and as a fuel for lighting lamps, was profitable.(From the notes of Abdur Razzak in Nilakanta Sastry (1955), p299) Exports to China intensified and included cotton, spices, jewels, semi-precious stones, ivory, rhino horn, ebony, amber, coral, and aromatic products such as perfumes. Large vessels from China made frequent visits, some captained by the Chinese Admiral Ho, and brought Chinese products to the empires 300 ports, large and small, on the Sea and the of Bengal. The ports of Mangalore, Honavar, Bhatkal, Barkur, Cochin, Cannanore, Machilipatnam and Dharmadam were the most important.(From the notes of Abdur Razzak in Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p304) When merchant ships docked, the merchandise was taken into official custody and taxes levied on all items sold. The security of the merchandise was guaranteed by the administration officials. Traders of many nationalities (Arabs, Persians, Guzerates, Khorassanians) settled in Calicut, drawn by the thriving trade business.( Ship building prospered and keeled ships of 1000&ndash;1200 bahares (burden) were built without decks by sewing the entire hull with ropes rather than fastening them with nails. Ships sailed to the Sea ports of Aden and Mecca with Vijayanagara goods sold as far away as Venice. The empires principal exports were pepper, ginger, cinnamon, cardamom, myrobalan, tamarind timber, anafistula, precious and semi-precious stones, pearls, musk, ambergris, rhubarb, aloe, cotton cloth and porcelain.( Cotton yarn was shipped to Burma and indigo to Persia. Chief imports from Palestine were copper, quicksilver (mercury), vermilion, coral, saffron, coloured velvets, rose water, knives, coloured camlets, gold and silver. Persian horses were imported to Cannanore before a two week land trip to the capital. Silk arrived from China and sugar from Bengal. East coast trade hummed, with goods arriving from Golkonda where rice, millet, pulse and tobacco were grown on a large scale. Dye crops of indigo and root were produced for the weaving industry. A mineral rich region, Machilipatnam  was the gateway for high quality iron and steel exports. Diamond mining was active in the Kollur region.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p305) The cotton weaving industry produced two types of cottons, plain calico and muslin (brown, bleached or dyed). Cloth printed with coloured patterns crafted by native techniques were exported to Java and the East. Golkonda specialised in plain cotton and Pulicat in printed. The main imports on the east coast were non-ferrous metals, camphor, porcelain, silk and luxury goods.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p306)CultureSocial lifeImage:Vijayanagar snakestone.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Nga (snake) stone worship at Hampi.Most information on the social life in Vijayanagara empire comes from the writings of foreign visitors and evidence that research teams in the Vijayanagara area have uncovered. The caste system was prevalent and rigidly followed, with each caste represented by a local body of elders who represented the community. These elders set the rules and regulations that were implemented with the help of royal decrees. Untouchability was part of the caste system and these communities were represented by leaders (Kaivadadavaru). The Muslim communities were represented by their own group in coastal Karnataka.(Kamath (2001), p179) The caste system did not, however, prevent distinguished persons from all castes from being promoted to high ranking cadre in the army and administration. In civil life, by virtue of the caste system, Brahmins enjoyed a high level of respect. With the exception of a few who took to military careers, most Brahmins concentrated on religious and literary matters. Their separation from material wealth and power made them ideal arbiters in local judicial matters, and their presence in every town and village was a calculated investment made by the nobility and aristocracy to maintain order.(According to Sir Charles Elliot, the intellectual superiority of Brahmins justified their high position in society (Nilakanta Sastri 1955, p289)) However, the popularity of low-caste scholars (such as Molla and Kanakadasa) and their works (including those of Vemana and Sarvajna) is an indication of the degree of social fluidity in the society.The practice of Sati was common, though voluntary, and mostly practiced among the upper classes. Over fifty inscriptions attesting to this have been discovered in the Vijayanagara principality alone. These inscriptions are called Satikal (Sati stone) or Sati-virakal (Sati stone). Satikals commemorated the death of a woman by entering into fire after the death of her husband while Sati-virakals were made for a woman who performed Sati after her husbands heroic death. Either way, the woman was raised to the level of a demi-goddess and proclaimed by the sculpture of a Sun and crescent moon on the stone.(Verghese (2001), p41)The socio-religious movements of the previous centuries, such as Lingayatism, provided momentum for flexible social norms to which women were expected to abide. By this time Indian women had crossed most barriers and were actively involved in matters hitherto considered the monopoly of men, such as administration, business and trade, and involvement in the fine arts.(B.A. Saletore in Kamath (2001), p179) Tirumalamba Devi who wrote Varadambika Parinayam and Gangadevi who wrote Madhuravijayam were among the notable women poets of the era.( Early Telugu women poets like Tallapaka Timmakka and Atukuri Molla became popular during this period. The court of the of Tanjore is known to have patronised several women poets. The system existed, as well as legalised prostitution relegated to a few streets in each city.(Kamath, p180) The popularity of harems amongst men of the royalty is well known from records. Well-to-do men wore the Pethaor Kulavi, a tall turban made of silk and decorated with gold. As in most Indian societies, jewellery was used by men and women and records describe the use of anklets, bracelets, finger-rings, necklaces and ear rings of various types. During celebrations, men and women adorned themselves with flower garlands and used perfumes made of water, civet, musk or sandalwood.(Kamath (2001), p. 180) In stark contrast to the commoners whose lives were modest, the lives of the empires kings and queens were full of ceremonial pomp in the court. Queens and princesses had numerous attendants who were lavishly dressed and adorned with fine jewellery, their daily duties being light.(From the writings of Portuguese Domingo Paes (Nilakanta Sastri 1955, p. 296))Physical exercises were popular with men and wrestling was an important male preoccupation for sport and entertainment. Even women wrestlers are mentioned in records.( Gymnasiums have been discovered inside royal quarters and records speak of regular physical training for commanders and their armies during peace time.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p296) Royal palaces and market places had special arenas where royalty and common people alike amused themselves by watching matches such as cock fights, ram fights and wrestling between women.( Excavations within the Vijayanagara city limits have revealed the existence of various types of community-based activities in the form of engravings on boulders, rock platforms and temple floors, implying these were places of casual social interaction. Some of these games are in use today and others are yet to be identified.(Mack (2001), p39)ReligionImage:Ugranarasimha statue at Hampi.JPG|thumb|right|Ugra Narasimha (Avatar of Vishnu) at HampiFile:Virupaksha temple mantapa DK.jpg|thumb|right|Ornate pillars, Virupaksha temple Hampi.Image:Sculpture at Hazara Rama Temple in Hampi.jpg|thumb|right|Lord Rama breaking Shivas bow in Hazare Rama Temple at Hampi.The Vijayanagara kings were tolerant of all religions and sects as writings by foreign visitors show.(From the notes of Duarte Barbosa (Kamath 2001, p178)) The kings used titles such as Gobrahamana Pratipalanacharya (protector of cows) and Hindurayasuratrana (upholder of Hindu faith) that testified to their intention of protecting Hinduism and yet were at the same time staunchly Islamicate in their court ceremonials and dress as Philip Wagoner points out in his 1996 article Sultan Among Hindu Kings published in the Journal of Asian Studies. The Empires founders Harihara I and Bukka Raya I were devout Shaivas (worshippers of Shiva), but made grants to the  Vaishnava order of Sringeri with Vidyaranya as their patron saint, and designated Varaha (the boar, an Avatar of Vishnu) as their emblem.(Kamath (2001), p177) It is also important to note here that over one-fourth of the archaeological dig found a Islamic Quarter not far from the Royal Quarter. Nobles from Central Asias Timurid kingdoms also came down to Vijayanagara. The later Saluva and Tuluva kings were Vaishnava by faith, but worshipped at the feet of Lord Virupaksha (Shiva) at Hampi as well as Lord Venkateshwara (Vishnu) at Tirupati. A Sanskrit work, Jambavati Kalyanam by King Krishnadevaraya, called Lord Virupaksha Karnata Rajya Raksha Mani (protective jewel of Empire).(Fritz & Michell, p14) The kings patronised the saints of the dvaita order (philosophy of dualism) of Madhvacharya at Udupi.(Kamath (2001), p177178)The Bhakti (devotional) movement was active during this time, and involved well known Haridasas (devotee saints) of that time. Like the Virashaiva movement of the 12th century, this movement presented another strong current of devotion, pervading the lives of millions. The haridasas represented two groups, the Vyasakuta and Dasakuta, the former being required to be proficient in the Vedas, Upanishads and other Darshanas, while the Dasakuta merely conveyed the message of Madhvacharya through the Kannada language to the people in the form of devotional songs (Devaranamas and Kirthanas). The philosophy of Madhvacharya was spread by eminent disciples such as Naraharitirtha, Jayatirtha, Vyasatirtha, Sripadaraya, Vadirajatirtha and others.(Shiva Prakash in Ayyappapanicker (1997), p192, pp194&ndash;196) Vyasatirtha, the guru (teacher) of Vadirajatirtha, Purandaradasa (Father of Carnatic music(Iyer (2006), p93)(Owing to his contributions to carnatic music, Purandaradasa is known as Karnataka Sangita Pitamaha. (Kamat, Saint Purandaradasa))) and Kanakadasa(Shiva Prakash (1997), p196) earned the devotion of King Krishnadevaraya.(Shiva Prakash (1997), p195)(Kamath (2001), p178)(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p324) The king considered the saint his Kuladevata (family deity) and honoured him in his writings.() During this time, another great composer of early carnatic music, Annamacharya composed hundreds of Kirthanas in Telugu at Tirupati in present day Pradesh.(Kamath (2001), p185) The defeat of the Jain Ganga Dynasty by the Cholas in early 11th century and the rising numbers of followers of Vaishnava Hinduism and Virashaivism in the 12th century was mirrored by a decreased interest in Jainism.(Kamath (2001), pp.112, 132) Two notable locations of Jain worship in the Vijayanagara territory were Shravanabelagola and Kambadahalli.  Islamic contact with South India began as early as the 7th century, a result of trade between the Southern kingdoms and  Arab lands. Jumma Masjids existed in the Rashtrakuta empire by the 10th century(From the notes of Arab writer Al-Ishtakhri (Nilakanta Sastry 1955, p396)) and many mosques flourished on the coast by the early 14th century.(From the notes of Ibn Batuta (Nilakanta Sastri 1955, p396)) Muslim settlers married local women; their children were known as Mappillas (Moplahs) and were actively involved in trading and manning shipping fleets. The interactions between the Vijayanagara empire and the Bahamani Sultanates to the north increased the presence of Muslims in the south. The introduction of Christianity began as early as the 8th century as shown by the finding of copper plates inscribed with land grants to Malabar Christians. Christian travelers wrote of the scarcity of Christians in South India in the Middle Ages, promoting its attractiveness to missionaries.(From the notes of Jordanus in 132021 (Nilakanta Sastri 1955, p397)) The arrival of the Portuguese in the 15th century and their connections through trade with the empire, the propagation of the faith by Saint Xavier (1545) and later the presence of Dutch settlements fostered the growth of Christianity in the south.LiteratureDuring the rule of the Vijayanagara Empire, poets, scholars and philosophers wrote in Kannada, Sanskrit and other regional languages like Telugu and Tamil and covered such subjects as religion, biography, Prabhanda (fiction), music, grammar, poetry and medicine. The Court language of the Vijayanagara Empire was Kannada. Later, Telugu language became a popular literary medium, reaching its peak under the patronage of Krishnadevaraya.Most Sanskrit works were commentaries either on the Vedas or on the  Ramayana and Mahabharata epics, written by well known figures such as Sayana and Vidyaranya that extolled the superiority of the Advaita philosophy over other rival Hindu philosophies.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p321) Other writers were famous Dvaita saints of the Udupi order such as Jayatirtha (earning the title Tikacharya for his polemicial writings), Vyasatirtha who wrote rebuttals to the Advaita philosophy and of the conclusions of earlier logicians, and Vadirajatirtha and Sripadaraya both of whom criticised the beliefs of Sankara.(Nilakanta Sastry (1955), p324) Apart from these saints, noted Sanskrit scholars adorned the courts of the Vijayanagara kings and their feudatory chiefdoms. Many kings of the dynasty were themselves litterateurs and authored classics such as King Krishnadevarayas Jambavati Kalyana, a poetic and dramatically skillful work.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p318)The Kannada poets and scholars of the empire produced important writings supporting the Vaishnava Bhakti movement heralded by the Haridasas (devotees of Vishnu), Brahminical and Virashaiva (Lingayatism) literature. The Haridasa poets celebrated their devotion through songs called Devaranama (lyrical poems) in the ragale metre. Their inspirations were the teachings of Madhvacharya and Vyasatirtha. Purandaradasa and Kanakadasa are considered the foremost among many Dasas (devotees) by virtue of their immense contribution.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p365) Vyasa, the most notable of Brahmin scholars wrote Gadugina Bharata, a translation of the epic Mahabharata. This work marks a transition of Kannada literature from old Kannada to modern Kannada.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p364)  Chamarasa was a famous Virashaiva scholar and poet who had many debates with Vaishnava scholars in the court of Devaraya II. His  Prabhulinga Lile, later translated into Telugu and Tamil, was a eulogy of Saint Prabhu (the saint was considered an incarnation of Lord Ganapathi while Parvati took the form of a princess of Banavasi).(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p363)At this peak of Telugu literature, the most famous writing in the Prabhanda style was Manucharitamu. King Krishnadevaraya was an accomplished Telugu scholar and wrote the celebrated Amuktamalyada.(During the rule of Krishnadevaraya, encouragement was given to the creation of original Prabhandas (stories) from Puranic themes (Nilakanta Sastri 1955, p372)) In his court were the eight famous scholars regarded as the pillars (Ashtadiggajas) of the literary assembly, the most famous being Peddana honoured with the title Andhrakavitapitamaha (father of Telugu poetry) and Ramakrishna, Krishnadevarayas court jester who authored several acclaimed works.(Like the Nine gems of King Vikramadityas court, the Ashtadiggajas of Krishnadevaras court are famous in legend (Nilakanta Sastri 1955, p372))  This was the age of Srinatha, the greatest of all Telugu poets in legend, who wrote books like Marutratcharitamu and  Salivahana-sapta-sati. He was patronised by King Devaraya II and his stature was equal to the most important ministers in the court.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p370) Though much of the Tamil literature from this period came from Tamil speaking regions ruled by the feudatory Pandya who gave particular attention on the cultivation of Tamil literature, some poets were patronised by the Vijayanagara kings. Desikar wrote an anthology of 2824 verses, Sivaprakasap-perundirattu, on the Advaita philosophy. His pupil the ascetic, Tattuvarayar, wrote a shorter anthology, Kurundirattu, that contained about half the number of verses. Krishnadevaraya patronised the Tamil Vaishnava poet Haridasa whose Irusamaya Vilakkam was an exposition of the two Hindu systems, Vaishnava and Shaiva, with a preference for the former.(Nilakanta Sastri (1955), p347)Notable among secular writings on music and medicine were Vidyaranyas Sangitsara, Rayas Ratiratnapradipika, Sayanas Ayurveda Sudhanidhi and Panditas Vaidyarajavallabham.(Prasad (1988), pp.268270)ArchitectureImage:Yali pillars1 in Aghoreshwara Temple in Ikkeri.jpg|thumb|150px|left|Yali pillars in Aghoreshwara Temple at Ikkeri in District.Image:Stone Chariot at the Vitthala Temple in Hampi.jpg|thumb|right|Stone Chariot in Vitthala Temple at Hampi.Image:Hazara Rama Temple Rear View at Hampi.jpg|thumb|right|Inside the Hazara Rama temple at Hampi.Vijayanagara architecture is a vibrant combination of the Chalukyan, Hoysalan, Pandyan and Cholan styles, idioms that prospered in previous centuries.(Art critic Percy Brown calls Vijayanagara architecture a blossoming of Dravidian style (Kamath 2001, p182))(Arthikaje, Literary Activity)  Its legacy of sculpture, architecture and painting influenced the development of the arts long after the empire came to an end. Its stylistic hallmark is the ornate pillared Kalyanamantapa (marriage hall), Vasanthamantapa (open pillared halls) and the Rayagopura (tower). Artisans used the locally available hard granite because of its durability since the kingdom was under constant threat of invasion. While the empires monuments are spread over the whole of Southern India, nothing surpasses the vast open air theatre of monuments at its capital at Vijayanagara, a UNESCO Heritage Site.(So intimate are the rocks and the monuments they were used for make, it is was sometimes impossible to say where nature ended and art began (Art critic Percy Brown, quoted in Hampi, A Travel Guide, p64)) In the 14th century the kings continued to build vesara or Deccan-style monuments but later incorporated Dravida-style gopurams to meet their ritualistic needs. The Prasanna Virupaksha temple (underground temple) of Bukka and the Hazare Rama temple of Raya are examples of Deccan architecture.(Fritz & Michell, p9) The varied and intricate ornamentation of the pillars is a mark of their work.(Nilakanta Sastri about the importance of pillars in the Vijayanagar style in Kamath (2001), p183) At Hampi, though the Vitthala temple is the best example of their pillared Kalyanamantapa style, the Hazara Ramaswamy temple is a modest but perfectly finished example.(Drama in stone wrote art critic Percy Brown, much of the beauty of Vijayanagara architecture came from their pillars and piers and the styles of sculpting (Hampi, A Travel Guide, p77)) A visible aspect of their style is their return to the simplistic and serene art developed by the Chalukya dynasty.(About the sculptures in Vijayanagara style, see Kamath (2001), p184) A grand specimen of Vijayanagara art, the Vitthala temple, took several decades to complete during the reign of the Tuluva kings.(Several monuments are categorised as Tuluva art (Fritz & Michell 2001, p9))Another element of the Vijayanagara style is the carving of large monoliths such as the Sasivekalu (mustard) Ganesha and Kadalekalu (nut) Ganesha at Hampi, the Gommateshvara Bahubali statues in Karkala and Venur, and the Nandi bull in Lepakshi. The Vijayanagara temples of Bhatkal, Kanakagiri, Shringeri and other towns of coastal Karnataka, as well as Tadpatri, Lepakshi, Ahobilam, Venkateswara Temple and Srikalahasti in Pradesh, and Vellore, Kumbakonam, Kanchi and Srirangam in Nadu are examples of this style. Vijayanagara art includes wall-paintings of the Dashavatara and Girijakalyana (marriage of Parvati) in the Temple at Hampi, the Shivapurana paintings (tales of Shiva) at the Virabhadra temple at Lepakshi, and those at the Jain basadi (temple) and the Kamaskshi and Varadaraja temple at Kanchi.(Some of these paintings may have been redone in later centuries (Rajashekhar in Kamath 2001, p184)) This mingling of the South Indian styles resulted in a richness not seen in earlier centuries, a focus on reliefs in addition to sculpture that surpasses that previously in India.(Historians and art critics K.A. Nilakanta Sastri, A. L. Basham, James Fergusson and S. K. Saraswathi have commented about Vijayanagara architecture (Arthikaje Literary Activity).)An aspect of Vijayanagara architecture that shows the cosmopolitanism of the great city is the presence of many secular structures bearing Islamic features. While political history concentrates on the ongoing conflict between the Vijayanagara empire and the Deccan Sultanates, the architectural record reflects a more creative interaction. There are many arches, domes and vaults that show these influences. The concentration of structures like pavilions, stables and towers suggests they were for use by royalty.(Fritz & Michell (2001), p10) The decorative details of these structures may have been absorbed into Vijayanagara architecture during the early 15th century, coinciding with the rule of Deva Raya I and Deva Raya II. These kings are known to have employed many Muslims in their army and court, some of whom may have been Muslim architects. This harmonious exchange of architectural ideas must have happened during rare periods of peace between the Hindu and Muslim kingdoms.(Philon (2001), p87) The Great Platform (Mahanavami dibba) has relief carvings in which the figures seem to have the facial features of central Asian Turks who were known to have been employed as royal attendants.(Dallapiccola (2001), p69)Languagethumb|left|Poetic inscription in Kannada by Vijayanagara poet Manjaraja (1398 CE)Kannada, Telugu and Tamil were used in their respective regions of the empire. Over 7000 inscriptions (Shasana) including 300 copper plate inscriptions (Tamarashasana) have been recovered, almost half of which are in Kannada, the remaining in Telugu, Tamil and Sanskrit.(G.S. Gai in Kamath (2001), p10, 157.)() Bilingual inscriptions had lost favour by the 14th century.(Thapar (2003), pp 39395) The empire minted coins at Hampi, Penugonda and Tirupati with Nagari, Kannada and Telugu legends usually carrying the name of the ruler.()() Gold, silver and copper were used to issue coins called Gadyana, Varaha, Pon, Pagoda, Pratapa, Pana, Kasu and Jital.() The coins contained the images of various Gods including Balakrishna (infant Krishna), Venkateshwara (the presiding deity of the temple at Tirupati), Goddesses such as Bhudevi and Sridevi, divine couples, animals such as bulls and elephants and birds. The earliest coins feature Hanuman and Garuda (divine eagle), the vehicle of Lord Vishnu. Kannada and Telugu inscriptions have been deciphered and recorded by historians of the Survey of India.()()See also*of India*of South India*Karnataka*Hampi*history of medieval KarnatakaNotesReferences *****Hampi travel guide (2003). New Delhi: Good Earth publication & Department of Tourism, India. ISBN 81-877801-7-7, .**id *************External links*Hampi - History and Tourism*www.Hampi.in - Photos, descriptions & maps of the Hampi Ruins.ca:Vijayanagarde:VijayanagarVijayanagaraimperiode VijayangaraWijayanagaradi Vijayanagaranl:Vijayanagararijkja:no:VijayanagarariketWidajanagarude BisnagaEmpirefi:Vijayanagarasv:Vijayanagarth:mparatorluuvi:Vijayanagarazh:
479964
Sandvik
intl  yesSandvik is a Swedish company founded in 1862 by Fredrik Gransson in Sandviken. It is a high-technology engineering group and a world-leader in tooling, stainless steel alloys and materials technology, mining and construction. It has about 47,000 employees in 130 countries, with annual sales of approximately SEK 83 billion.Corporate StructureSandvik consists of three business areas as following:*Sandvik Mining and Construction*Sandvik Material Technology*Sandvik ToolingSandvik Mining and Constructionthumb|right|A Sandvik LH517 underground loaderThe Mining and Construction business area offers solutions for many applications in the mining and construction industry, including surface rock excavation, tunneling, demolition, recycling and road rehabilitation. *Drill rigs and tools for rock drilling*Crushers*Hydraulic breakers (hammers) for Excavators and demolition machines.*Manufacture cutters and ground engagement wear parts (Cutting tools and replaceable teeth)*Mining machinery*Conveyor components*Services, including performance contracts delivered with On Demand pricing models.Sandvik Materials Technology The Materials Technology business area specializes in speciality stainless steel alloys such as Sandvik 12C27 and to a lesser extent, other special metal alloys.Sandvik() is the strategic partner to medical technology companies that can support at each step, from R&D to the launch and in the production of the next generation of medical materials and medical devices.(Sandviks Medical Business)(Watch video YouTube.com)Sandvik Toolingthumb|right|240px|Sandvik 1881The Tooling business area is primarily concerned with the production and development of metal cutting tools. Manufactures of carbide tipped tooling for metal cutting applications.*It is composed of several brands as a result of Sandvik acquiring other corporations and keeping their brands. Tooling began as Sandvik Coromant and Coromant remains one of Sandvik Toolings most important brand.*Another Brand is the Tools company  of Sheffield, England. Formerly known as the Sheffield Twist Drill and Steel Co. Ltd whose brand name is Dormer.(Sheffield Telegraph Newspapers, 4/7/08) Birmingham Sandviks first overseas arm was in Birmingham, England. The UK headquarters is now in nearby Halesowen, and each year the company provides the citys official Tree, which is erected in Victoria Square.See also* of Swedish companiesReferences Competitors Include * Carbide Tool* ISCAR* KennametalExternal links*ABde:Sandvikes:Sandvikfi:Sandvikfr:Sandvikis:Sandvikit:Sandvikja:pt:SandvikAB
481837
List_of_state_universities_in_the_United_States
In the States, a state college or state university is one of the public colleges or universities funded by or associated with the state government. In some cases, these institutions of learning are part of a university system, while in other cases they are not. Several U.S. territories also administer public colleges and universities. The U.S. federal government does not run colleges or universities except for the military academies and colleges. However, the federal government does make federal grants to state universities. Most state universities receive at least part of their funding from the state, although many have substantial income from tuition and fees, endowment proceeds, donations (such as from alumni or philanthropists), and revenue from royalties. State universities usually offer lower tuition costs to in-state residents. According the Board, public four-year colleges charge on average $7,605 per year in tuition and fees for full-time in-state students and $11,990 for out-of-state students.(http://www.collegeboard.com/student/pay/add-it-up/4494.html)Notes:*As a general rule, schools are not alphabetized by their complete names, but rather by the names by which they are normally called. For example, in a list alphabetized by normal rules, Auburn University would precede University of Alabama, but the schools are virtually always referred to in popular conversation as Auburn and Alabama (followed by a campus identifier if required by the context). Therefore, in this article, Alabama precedes Auburn.*The list also includes schools that grant first-professional doctorates only (e.g., schools, schools, veterinary schools) that are independent of any other school in a state system.Alabama*of Alabama System**of Alabama (main campus, at Tuscaloosa)**of Alabama at Birmingham (UAB)**of Alabama in Huntsville *Agricultural and Mechanical University (Alabama A&M or AAMU)*State University*State University*Auburn University system**University (main campus, at Auburn)**University at Montgomery*State University*of Montevallo*of North Alabama*of South Alabama*University system**University (Troy- main campus)**Troy University at Dothan**University at Montgomery*of West AlabamaAlaska*of Alaska System**of Alaska Anchorage**of Alaska Fairbanks (main campus)**of Alaska SoutheastAmerican Samoa*Samoa Community College (currently offers two-year degrees only)Arizona*of Arizona*State University*Arizona UniversityArkansas*of Arkansas System**of Arkansas (main campus, at Fayetteville)**of Arkansas  Fort Smith**of Arkansas at Little Rock**of Arkansas for Medical Sciences**of Arkansas at Monticello**of Arkansas at Pine Bluff*State University*Tech University*of Central Arkansas*State University*Arkansas UniversityCalifornia*State University system**State University, Bakersfield**State University, Channel Islands**State University, Chico (Chico State)**State University, Dominguez Hills**State University, East Bay**State University, Fresno (Fresno State)**State University, Fullerton (CSUF or CSF)**State University**State University, Long Beach (Long Beach State or Cal State Long Beach)**State University, Los Angeles**Maritime Academy**State University, Monterey Bay**State University, Northridge (CSUN)**California State Polytechnic University, Pomona (Cal Poly Pomona)**State University, Sacramento (Sacramento State)**State University, San Bernardino**Diego State University  (SDSU)**Francisco State University**Jose State University  (SJSU)**California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo (Cal Poly San Luis Obispo or Cal Poly SLO)**State University, San Marcos**State University**State University, Stanislaus*of California system**of California, Berkeley (Cal) - (flagship campus)**of California, Davis (UCD)**of California, Hastings College of the Law (law school; administered independently from the other UC campuses)**of California, Irvine (UCI)**of California, Los Angeles (UCLA)**of California, Merced**of California, Riverside (UCR)**of California, San Diego (UCSD)**of California, San Francisco  (UCSF)**of California, Santa Barbara (UCSB)**of California, Santa Cruz (UCSC)Colorado*State College*of Colorado system**of ColoradoBoulder (main campus)**of Colorado Colorado Springs**of Colorado Denver*School of Mines*State University (main campus, at Fort Collins)**State UniversityPueblo*Lewis College*State College*State College of Denver*of Northern Colorado*State CollegeConnecticut*State University System**Connecticut State University**Connecticut State University**Connecticut State University**Connecticut State University*of Connecticut systemDelaware*of Delaware*State UniversityDistrict of Columbia*of the District of ColumbiaNote that the District of Columbia provides tuition grants to its residents toward the difference between in-state and out-of-state tuition at public four-year colleges and universities throughout the US, Guam and Puerto Rico.http://osse.dc.gov/seo/cwp/view,a,1226,q,536770,seoNav_GID,1511,seoNav,|31238|,.aspFlorida*University System of Florida**of Central Florida**of Florida**A&M University**Atlantic University**Gulf Coast University**International University**State University**College of Florida**of North Florida**of South Florida**of West FloridaGeorgia*System of Georgia**State University**Atlantic State University**State University**State University**State University**State College**Valley State University**of Georgia**College and State University**Health Sciences University**Institute of Technology**Southern University**Southwestern State University**State University**State University**State College**Georgia College**Georgia College and State University**State University**Polytechnic State University**State University**of West GeorgiaGuam*of GuamHawaii*of Hawaii system**of Hawaii at Manoa (main campus)**of Hawaii at Hilo**of Hawaii-West OahuIdaho*State University*of Idaho*State University*State CollegeIllinois*State University*Illinois University*State University*State University*of Illinois system**of Illinois at Chicago**of Illinois at Springfield**of Illinois at UrbanaChampaign (flagship campus)*Illinois University*Illinois University*Illinois University system**Illinois University Carbondale (main campus)**Illinois University Edwardsville*Illinois UniversityIndiana*State University*Indiana University System (IU)**University Bloomington (flagship campus)**University East**University Kokomo (IUK)**University Northwest**University South Bend (IUSB)**University Southeast**University  Purdue University Indianapolis (IUPUI) - (IU appoints chancellor; joint academics with Purdue.)***University  Purdue University Columbus (IUPUC)*State University*Ivy Tech Community College System (Statewide with 23 campuses)*University system**University (Lafayette- flagship campus)**University  Purdue University Fort Wayne (IPFW) - (Purdue appoints chancellor; joint academics with IU.)**University Calumet**University North Central*of Southern Indiana*UniversityIowa*of Iowa*State University*of Northern IowaKansas*State University*Hays State University*of Kansas*State University*State University*State University:Note: University in Topeka is the only remaining municipally-chartered university in the United States.Kentucky*Kentucky University*of Kentucky*State University*of Louisville*State University*State University*Kentucky University*Kentucky UniversityLouisiana*State University System**State University at Alexandria**State University (Rouge, main campus)**State University at Eunice**State University in Shreveport**State University Health Sciences Center Shreveport (medical school and allied health)**State University Health Sciences Center New Orleans (medical school)**M. Hebert Law Center (law school on the main Baton Rouge campus)**of New Orleans*of Louisiana System**State University**of Louisiana at Lafayette (main campus)**of Louisiana at Monroe**Tech University**State University**State University**State University**Louisiana University*University System**University, (Rouge, main campus)**University at New Orleans**University at ShreveportMaine*of Maine System**University of Maine at Orono (main campus)**of Maine at Augusta**of Maine at Farmington**of Maine at Fort Kent**of Maine at Machias**of Maine at Presque Isle**of Southern Maine***of Maine Law SchoolMaryland*State University*Marys College of Maryland*System of Maryland**State University**State University**State University**University**University**of Baltimore**of Maryland, Baltimore**of Maryland, Baltimore County**of Maryland, College Park (main campus)**of Maryland Eastern Shore**of Maryland University College**of Maryland Center for Environmental Science**of Maryland Biotechnology Institute*Regional College of Veterinary Medicine (constituent college of both the of Maryland, College Park and Virginia Tech; independent of the University System of Maryland)Massachusetts*of Massachusetts system**of Massachusetts Amherst (main campus)**of Massachusetts Boston**of Massachusetts Dartmouth**of Massachusetts Lowell**of Massachusetts Medical School*State University system**State University**State University**State University**State University**State University**State University**College of Art and Design**College of Liberal Arts**Maritime AcademyMichigan*Michigan University*Michigan University*State University*Valley State University*Superior State University*University of Michigan system**of Michigan (Ann Arbor, main campus)**of MichiganDearborn**of Michigan-Flint*State University*Technological University*Michigan University*University*Valley State University*State University*Michigan UniversityMinnesota*State Colleges and Universities**State University**State University, Mankato**State University Moorhead**State University**Minnesota State University**Cloud State University**State University*of Minnesota System**of Minnesota Crookston**of Minnesota Duluth**of Minnesota Morris**of Minnesota Rochester**University of Minnesota Twin Cities (main campus)Mississippi*State University*State University*State University*State University*University for Women*Valley State University*of Mississippi*of Southern MississippiMissouri*of Central Missouri*State University*Lincoln University of Missouri*of Missouri System**of Missouri (Columbia- main campus)**of MissouriKansas City**University of Science and Technology**of MissouriSt. Louis*Southern State University*State University*Western State University*Missouri State University*Missouri State University*State UniversityMontana*State University System**State University - Bozeman (main campus)**State University - Billings**State University - Northern**State University - Great Falls College of Technology*of Montana System**The University of Montana (main campus in Missoula)**of Montana Western (Dillon)**Tech of The University of Montana (Butte)**of Montana - Helena College of TechnologyNebraska* State College System** State College** State College** State College* of Nebraska system** of Nebraska-Lincoln (main campus)** of Nebraska at Kearney** of Nebraska at Omaha** of Nebraska Medical CenterNevada*System of Higher Education:**Basin College (a college which, in addition to degrees, offers a few degrees)**of Nevada, Reno (main campus)**State College, Henderson**of Nevada, Las Vegas (UNLV)**of Southern NevadaNew Hampshire*System of New Hampshire**State College**State College**State University**of New HampshireNew Jersey*University*College of New Jersey*of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey*State University*Jersey City University*Jersey Institute of Technology*College of New Jersey*Stockton College of New Jersey*University*The State University of New Jersey system**University, New Brunswick-Piscataway (main campus)**Rutgers-Newark**Rutgers-Camden*Edison State College*Paterson University of New JerseyNew Mexico*of New Mexico*Mexico Institute of Mining and Technology (New Mexico Tech)*Mexico State University*Mexico Highlands University*New Mexico University*New Mexico UniversityNew York*University of New York (CUNY) system**College**College**College of New York**Graduate Center**Law School**of Staten Island**College**Jay College of Criminal Justice**College**Evers College**York City College of Technology**Queens College**Davis School of Biomedical Education**York College*University of New York (SUNY) system** University Centers*** at Albany, The State University of New York*** University*** at Buffalo, The State University of New York*** University of New York at Stony Brook** Other Doctoral-Granting Institutions*** Science Center Brooklyn*** University of New York Upstate Medical University*** York State College of Ceramics (contract college at University)*** College of Agriculture and Life Sciences (contract college at University)*** College of Human Ecology (contract college at University)*** College of Veterinary Medicine (contract college at University)*** School of Industrial and Labor Relations (contract college at University)*** University of New York College of Environmental Science and Forestry*** University of New York State College of Optometry** University Colleges***State College***State College***University of New York at Brockport***University of New York at Cortland***University of New York at Fredonia***University of New York at Geneseo***University of New York at New Paltz***University of New York at Old Westbury***University of New York at Oneonta***University of New York at Oswego***University of New York at Plattsburgh***University of New York at Potsdam***University of New York at Purchase** Technology Colleges***State College***University of New York at Canton***University of New York at Cobleskill***University of New York at Delhi***University of New York at Farmingdale***University of New York at Morrisville***University of New York Institute of Technology***University of New York Maritime College**Institute of Technology (a SUNY college which, in addition to degrees, also offers bachelors and degrees)North Carolina*of North Carolina**State University**Carolina University**City State University**State University**Carolina A&T State University**Carolina Central University**Carolina State University**of North Carolina at Asheville**of North Carolina at Chapel Hill**of North Carolina at Charlotte**of North Carolina at Greensboro**of North Carolina at Pembroke**of North Carolina at Wilmington**of North Carolina School of the Arts**Carolina University**State UniversityNorth Dakota*State University*State University*State University*of North Dakota*Dakota State University*City State UniversityNorthern Mariana Islands*Marianas CollegeOhio*System of Ohio**of Akron**Green State University***Firelands (Huron)**State University**University of Cincinnati system***of Cincinnati (Cincinnati) (main campus)***University of Cincinnati, Clermont College (Batavia)***University of Cincinnati, Raymond Walters College (Blue Ash)**State University**State University system**Miami University system***University (Oxford) (main campus)***Miami University Hamilton***Miami University Middletown***Miami University Dolibois European Center (Differdange, Luxembourg)**The Ohio State University system***State University (Columbus) (main campus) (flagship)***State University Agricultural Technical Institute (Wooster)***State University, Lima Campus***State University, Mansfield Campus***State University, Marion Campus***State University, Newark Campus**University system***Ohio University (Athens) (main campus)***Ohio University Chillicothe***Ohio University Eastern (St. Clairsville)***Ohio University Lancaster***Ohio University Pickerington***Ohio University Southern (Ironton)***Ohio University Zanesville**State University**of Toledo**State University**State UniversityOklahoma*University*of Central Oklahoma*Central University*University*State University*Oklahoma State University*of Oklahoma-Norman**of Oklahoma-Tulsa**of Oklahoma Health Sciences Center*Panhandle State University*State University System**State University - Center for Health Sciences**State University - Okmulgee**State University - Oklahoma City**State University - Stillwater (the main campus)**State University - Tulsa*State University*of Science and Arts of Oklahoma*Oklahoma State University*Oklahoma State UniversityOregon*University System**Oregon University**of Oregon**Health and Science University**Institute of Technology**State University**State University**Oregon University**Oregon UniversityPennsylvaniaState System of Higher Education (PaSSHE)The 14 universities in PaSSHE are state-owned. They are directly governed by gubernatorial appointees sitting on the PaSSHE Board of Governors. Each university also has an independent Council of Trustees appointed by the commonwealths governor.* State-owned universities:** University of Pennsylvania** University of Pennsylvania** University of Pennsylvania** University of Pennsylvania*** Clarion University of Pennsylvania, Venango** Stroudsburg University of Pennsylvania** University of Pennsylvania** University of Pennsylvania (IUP)*** Indiana University of Pennsylvania, Academy of Culinary Arts*** Indiana University of Pennsylvania, Armstrong*** Indiana University of Pennsylvania, Northpointe*** Indiana University of Pennsylvania, Punxsutawney** University of Pennsylvania** Haven University of Pennsylvania*** Lock Haven University of Pennsylvania, Clearfield** University of Pennsylvania** University of Pennsylvania** University of Pennsylvania** Rock University of Pennsylvania** Chester University of PennsylvaniaSystem of Higher EducationUniversities of the System of Higher Education receive public funds and reduce tuition for PA residents. Gubernatorial appointees are always a minority of their respective governing boards.*State-related institutions:** Lincoln University** State University*** administration and multi-college campus at University Park*** State Abington*** State Altoona*** State Berks*** State College of Medicine*** State Dickinson School of Law*** State Erie, The Behrend College*** State Great Valley*** State Harrisburg*** College of Technology*** University College**** State Beaver**** State Brandywine**** State DuBois**** State Fayette, The Eberly Campus**** State Greater Allegheny**** State Hazleton**** State Lehigh Valley**** State Mont Alto**** State New Kensington**** State Schuylkill**** State Shenango**** State Wilkes-Barre**** State Worthington Scranton**** State York** University*** University Ambler** of Pittsburgh*** of Pittsburgh at Bradford*** of Pittsburgh at Greensburg*** of Pittsburgh at Johnstown*** of Pittsburgh at TitusvillePuerto Rico*of Puerto Rico system (UPR)**of Puerto Rico, Medical Sciences Campus (UPR-CM)**of Puerto Rico at Aguadilla (UPRAG)**of Puerto Rico at Arecibo (UPRA)**of Puerto Rico at Bayamn (UPRB)**of Puerto Rico at Carolina (UPRC)**of Puerto Rico at Cayey (UPR-Cayey)**of Puerto Rico at Humacao (UPRH)**of Puerto Rico at Mayagez (UPRM)**of Puerto Rico at Ponce (UPRP)**of Puerto Rico at Rio Piedras (UPR-RP) (main campus)**of Puerto Rico at Utuado (UPRU)*of Plastic Arts of Puerto Rico*of Music of Puerto RicoRhode Island*Island College*of Rhode Island systemSouth Carolina*The Citadel*University*Carolina University*of Charleston*Marion University*University of South Carolina*of South Carolina System**of South Carolina Aiken**of South Carolina Beaufort**University of South Carolina Columbia (main campus)**of South Carolina Lancaster**of South Carolina Salkehatchie**of South Carolina Sumter**of South Carolina Union**of South Carolina Upstate*Carolina State University*UniversitySouth Dakota*Hills State University*State University*State University*of South Dakota*Dakota School of Mines & Technology (South Dakota Mines)*Dakota State UniversityTennessee*Peay State University*Tennessee State University*of Memphis*Tennessee State University*of Tennessee System**of Tennessee at Chattanooga**University of Tennessee at Knoxville (main campus)***of Tennessee Health Science Center (at Memphis)***of Tennessee Space Institute (at Tullahoma)**of Tennessee at Martin*State University*Technological UniversityTexas*of Houston System**of Houston**of HoustonClear Lake**of HoustonDowntown**of HoustonVictoria*State University*of North Texas System**of North Texas**of North Texas at Dallas*F. Austin State University*The University of Texas System** The University of Texas at Arlington** The University of Texas at Austin** The University of Texas at Brownsville** The University of Texas at Dallas** The University of Texas at El Paso** The University of TexasPan American** The University of Texas of the Permian Basin** The University of Texas at San Antonio** The University of Texas at Tyler*A&M University System** View A&M University** State University** A&M International University** A&M University** A&M UniversityCommerce** A&M UniversityCorpus Christi** A&M UniversityKingsville** A&M UniversityTexarkana** Texas A&M University*Southern University*State University System** University** Houston State University** Ross State University** State UniversitySan Marcos*Tech University System**State University**Tech UniversityUtah*Utah University*of Utah*State University*Valley University*State UniversityVermont*State Colleges**State College**College of Vermont**State College**State College**Technical College*of VermontVirginia*Newport University*Virginia Medical School*Mason University*Madison University*University*of Mary Washington*State University*Dominion University*University*of Virginia*of Virginias College at Wise*Commonwealth University*Military Institute (VMI)*Polytechnic Institute and State University (Virginia Tech)**Regional College of Veterinary Medicine (a constituent of both Virginia Tech and the of Maryland, College Park)*State University*College of William & MaryVirgin Islands*of the Virgin Islands system**of the Virgin Islands- St. Croix**of the Virgin Islands- St. ThomasWashington*Washington University*Washington University*The Evergreen State College*of Washington system (Seattle, Tacoma and Bothell campuses)*State University system (Pullman, Spokane, Tri-Cities and Vancouver campuses)*Washington UniversityWest Virginia*State College*University*State University*State College*University**University Graduate College*University*Liberty University*West Virginia University system**State College of West Virginia University**Virginia University (Morgantown, main campus)**Virginia University Institute of Technology (WVU Tech)**Virginia University at Parkersburg*Virginia School of Osteopathic Medicine*Virginia State UniversityWisconsin*of Wisconsin System**of WisconsinEau Claire**of WisconsinGreen Bay (also known as Green Bay, especially in an athletic context)**of WisconsinLa Crosse**of WisconsinMadison (flagship campus)**of WisconsinMilwaukee (also known as Milwaukee, especially in an athletic context)**of WisconsinOshkosh**of WisconsinParkside**of WisconsinPlatteville**of WisconsinRiver Falls**of WisconsinStevens Point**of WisconsinStout**of WisconsinSuperior**of WisconsinWhitewater**of Wisconsin Colleges (13 two-year colleges)***of WisconsinBaraboo/Sauk County***of WisconsinBarron County***of WisconsinFond du Lac***of WisconsinFox Valley***of WisconsinManitowoc***of WisconsinMarathon County***of WisconsinMarinette***of WisconsinMarshfield/Wood County***of WisconsinRichland***of WisconsinRock County***of WisconsinSheboygan***of WisconsinWashington County***of WisconsinWaukesha***of Wisconsin Colleges OnlineWyoming*of WyomingNotes
485943
1854_in_Canada
See also: in Canada, other events of 1854, in Canada.----Events from the year 1854 in Canada.Events*January 27 - The Great Western Railway opens, linking Toronto, Hamilton and Windsor. *June 6 - The Reciprocity Treaty is signed*October 27 - A Great Western Railway passenger train collides with the tail end of gravel train at Baptiste Creek, Canada West. At least 52 people are killed.*Establishment of the African Baptist Association of Nova Scotia.Birthsthumb|right|100px|Robert Borden*April 13 - Henry Drummond, poet (d.1907)*May 21 - Gawler Prior, mining engineer, politician and Premier of Columbia (d.1920)*June 8 - Colin Cameron, politician and Lieutenant-Governor of Manitoba (d.1921)*June 26 - Borden, lawyer, politician and 8th Minister of Canada (d.1937)*August 29 - Peters, politician and Premier of Edward Island (d.1908)*September 1 - Alexander Lougheed, businessman and politician (d.1925)Deaths* January 20 - Papineau, joint premier of the Province of Canada (b.1789)* September 19 - George Arthur, 1st Baronet, army officer and colonial administrator (b.1784) 
488581
Dave_Lister_(fictional_character)
David Dave Lister, commonly referred to simply as Lister, is a character from the British fiction comedy Dwarf, portrayed by Charles. (In the never-aired pilot for the American version of the show, Lister was played by Bierko.)Lister is normally dressed in a jacket and hat, his suits and his lengthy dreadlocks that he grows only from the back of his head. Until series VII, he was presumed to be the last human being alive, due to a radiation leak on the mining ship Red Dwarf which killed the crew while he was in stasis. Holly, the ships computer, piloted the ship away from Earth and kept Lister in stasis for 3 million years, at which point the radiation levels had again returned to normal and Lister was released. As a crew member of Red Dwarf, Lister and the other characters encountered many strange beings and life-forms, usually of human origin.Early lifeAn orphan, he was discovered at six weeks old on 26 November 2155, under a pool table in a Liverpool pub (the Aigburth Arms), nestled in a box with the mysterious word ouroboros scribbled on its side.  Lister celebrates his birthday on 14 October, most of the time. Lister is in fact his own father, shown in the episode Ouroboros when he fills up a test tube for Kochanski, and then realises after seeing a battery box with an Ouroboros logo, that he in fact is the baby in the test tube.He was adopted by the Wilmot family, but after his adoptive father died when he was six() he went to live with Grandma Lister. She was a tough, pipe-smoking woman who once famously headbutted the headmaster of Listers school when Lister came bottom in French, leading to Listers expulsion, and whose cooking led to his being nicknamed Fat Boy from ages eleven to thirteen. Lister decided to lose weight after his grandmother died when she was hit by a truck, and he was ashamed to find that the coroner had to go back for a second piece of chalk to complete the chalk outline. After his grandmothers death, Lister apparently lived and attended school in an orphanage, sleeping in a pitch-dark dormitory alongside many other boys including Squeaky Gibson, whose life he saved on one occasion when he discovered Gibson having an epileptic fit. Around the same time he got his first job as a supermarket trolley attendant, which he would eventually quit after ten years because he didnt want to get tied down to a career.thumb|left|Young Lister performing with his band Smeg and the HeadsLister lost his virginity at the age of twelve in one of the bunkers on the ninth hole of Bootle Municipal course. He also spent a good part of his puberty lusting after the older sister of one Pete Tranter. Lister suffers from claustrophobia, which stems from an incident at age 17 when a vengeful husband caught him making love to his wife, in the supermarket where he was employed. The man kidnapped the naked Lister, locked him in a box and threatened to throw him into a canal. Lister begged for mercy and was finally released onto the stage of a local theatre in the nude, in the middle of the Bootle Amateur Players production of Importance of Being Earnest. Around the same time, he formed a band called Smeg and the Heads in which he was the singer and guitarist, along with his friends Dobbin (drums) and Gazza (bassist). Seemingly their only song was called Om, the only lyrics to which appeared to be repetitions of the vocalisation om. Lister was accepted at college, but dropped out on his first day when he learned his schedule would include lectures first thing in the afternoon. Lister went out with a girl named Lise Yates, but the relationship ended because he did not want a commitment, a fact that Lister has since secretly regretted.(Red Dwarf, Series II, Episode 3 - Thanks for the Memory)Within the continuity of the books by Naylor, Lister went on a drunken Monopoly board pub crawl with his friends to celebrate his 24th birthday, where he got very, very drunk; when he awoke, he was on Mimas, one of Saturns moons, wearing a ladys pink crimplene hat and a pair of yellow fishing waders, with no money and a passport in the name of Emily Berkenstein. Lister, determined to make enough money to get back home, spent six months stealing hoppers (the equivalent of taxis on Mimas) and collecting the fares, but he loses all his money several times from blowing it all on alcohol (with the belief that if he gets drunk enough again, he will awaken back in London) and on one occasion being mugged by a drug addict who was high on the narcotic Bliss. Eventually, Lister signs up for a job on the mining ship Red Dwarf, which unknown to him was due to make a four-and-a-half-year mining run to Triton before heading back to Earth.Life onboard Red Dwarfthumb|left|Dave Lister being put into stasis at the start of his 3-million-year wait.As a third-class technician, Lister was the lowest ranking crewman on Red Dwarf, a ship with a crew of 169,( This number has changed between series. In the first series, it was mostly given as 169, although it was 129 in one episode. In Series IV, Episode 3, Rimmer is accused of 1,167 counts of manslaughter, due to his own guilt over the accident that killed the crew of Red Dwarf. This would make the crew count 1,169 (as Lister is the only survivor and Rimmer cannot be charged with his own murder). The novelisation Welcomes Careful Drivers states that the crew number is actually 11,169.) and spent his time performing tasks too menial for the skutters (under the hated supervision of Rimmer), or getting drunk with his friends Olaf Petersen, Selby and Chen. Lister was imprisoned in a stasis booth because he smuggled an unquarantined cat, which he named Frankenstein, aboard the ship. In the book, he deliberately let the cat be discovered so that he would be placed in stasis, thus getting back to Earth in (subjectively) no time at all.While Lister was in stasis, a release of lethal radiation occurred onboard as a result of a faulty repair carried out by Rimmer, killing the entire crew. Holly, the ships computer, kept Lister in stasis for three million years until the radiation levels returned to normal. Lister was left as presumably the last human being in the universe, accompanied on Red Dwarf by a hologram simulation of Rimmer and a humanoid creature that evolved from his cat. Lister is actually believed to be the god of this race of cat-people, who know him as Cloister the Stupid. After a sexual liaison with Deb Lister, his female alter-ego from a female-oriented parallel universe, he, via section, gave birth to twin sons named Jim and Bexley, named after his favourite zero-gravity football player, Jim Bexley Speed. Due to them being born in a different reality to their conception, both of them grew to be eighteen years old within three days. Realising that if they stayed with him they would be dead within a fortnight, Lister sent them back to their mothers dimension.(Opening Crawl of Series III episode 1 )Lister has a tattoo on his right buttock, dedicated to the love of his life: it is a heart with an arrow through it and underneath it has in dripping curry sauce, I love Vindaloo. It was obtained while on planet leave on Ganymede with Petersen, who spiked his cocktail with four-star petrol. When he woke up the next day, he had enrolled as a novice monk in a Ganymedian monastery.() He also has another tattoo claiming that he loves Petersen placed on his inner thigh, which stems from an unidentified incident where the two got so heavily drunk together that Lister had no idea what was happening to him. In the Red Dwarf roleplaying game, Petersens character profile (featured in The Extra Bits booklet) states that he has a reciprocal tattoo from the same incident.thumb|right|Deb Lister, an alternate universe version of Dave.Lister is dedicated to resurrecting and winning over the one true love of his life - Kochanski, the long dead navigation officer of Red Dwarf. It is his ambition to marry Kristine Kochanski and start a frugal life on a farm on the Earth islands of Fiji.FateThroughout the previous series at least several glimpses of Listers future have been seen:thumb|right|Elderly Lister as seen in a future echo.* In the episode Echoes in the first series of the show, a vision of Lister is seen with him as a very old man of 171 years old with a mechanical hand. This future version of Lister still has his dreadlocks, although they are over two metres long and almost white with age.* In the episode Cassandra in the eighth series of the show, the Dwarfers make contact with a prophetic and clairvoyant computer that has the ability to predict the future without a margin of error. Lister is told by Cassandra that he will live to 181 years old and will die whilst trying to take a bra off with his teeth. Though Lister believed this was an incredibly sexy way to go, the others quickly pointed out that at 181 years old it may be his own bra, and that the teeth may not be in his mouth at the time (It should be noted that Cassandra was aware that Lister would kill her, and hence may not have been entirely honest about his fate).* In the book Better Than Life, which explores different adventures than the TV series, Lister eventually discovers Earth, but finds that it is ruled by eight-foot-long cockroaches. He becomes their king and plans to rebuild the planet. The others find him thirty-six years later (after believing Lister was missing for a fortnight due to a time dilation). Later, after Lister dies of a heart attack in a confrontation with a polymorph, his body is taken to the alternative universe where time runs backwards and is told that he will be rescued in thirty-six years time. Two accounts of what followed  are Backwards and Human.*In Timeslides, when transported to an alternate reality in which he is rich and famous, Holly finds a news report stating he died in a plane crash aged 98; he was making love to his 14th wife at the time.Back to EarthIn the 2009 special Red Dwarf: Back to Earth, after an encounter with a female despair squid, Lister, along with the rest of the crew, hallucinate an alternate reality in which they are fictional characters and that their lives are just a TV series that they have somehow escaped from.PersonalityLister is very lazy, and more importantly, unmotivated. He is a slob, his best shirt is a one with only two curry stains on the front, and prior to going into stasis he saved money by never buying soap, deodorant or socks. He enjoys bumming around, drinking large amounts of lager, and eating Indian food. Lister has dreadlocks on the back of his head, which he seems to have for most of his life (in Echoes, Lister meets himself at age 171, and his dreadlocks are the length of his body; they are also present, if shorter, on his 17-year-old self in Timeslides). Listers religious beliefs are unclear. In the episode, The Last Day, Kryten states that Lister is a pantheist, believing God to be in all things; however, in the later episode Back to Reality he is described as the ultimate atheist. In Waiting For God, Lister displays disgust over the Cat peoples war over a religious disagreement stating that they were using religion as an excuse to be really crappy to each other.  He prides himself on being a good man possessing moral courage, something which is used against him by a despair squid in Back to Reality; when hallucinating under the influence of the squids ink, he was driven to suicidal despair by his belief that, in the alternate world in which he found himself, he was a genocidal minister in a totalitarian state, responsible for the murder of countless innocent people. When confronted with an evil version of himself on a corrupted version of Red Dwarf, Lister says of his evil counterpart, But he kills; Im not capable of that. Likewise when he kills The Creator of Red Dwarf during his Back to Earth hallucination, his initial reaction is to state that he doesnt kill people and doesnt understand why he did it. His value for life was also shown when he and Kryten were being hunted by the Inquisitor, Lister being deeply affected by the knowledge that Krytens seemingly imminent death would only mean something because he had helped Kryten to break his programming, thus giving him a life to lose. He has also shown some philosophical traits over the course of the series, such as when he reflected on the relative futility of the Justice Field witnessed in Justice saying it denied people free will and didnt truly rehabilitate the inmates. He also lamented on the escalation of uncontrolled evolution that resulted in the creation of the Despair Squid in Back to Reality.In many ways, Lister is the complete opposite of Rimmer, and the two are constantly at odds with each other. Rimmer is constantly accusing Lister of stupidity but Lister has actually been shown to be quite intelligent on several occasions and his lack of motivation is really what holds him back. For example, he managed to learn the international language Esperanto from Rimmers tapes, while Rimmer himself was unable to. He is capable of piloting a spaceship and has a knack for mechanical repairs, particularly amateur cybernetics. Lister is a very socially capable person; well liked by his friends and has had a number relationships with women, albeit not all successful (his lack of ambition being the main cause for not settling down). He has a high emotional intelligence being capable of reading people and empathizing with them. The novel Human explains that Lister often knows the solution to a problem but that he usually consults Kryten as he lacks confidence in his own opinion. He also considers himself good at pool, saying that he was nicknamed Dave Bianco Lister because once he was on a table you couldnt get rid of him.Dave Lister is also an avid junk collector who has purchased (among other things) a talking toilet, a talking toaster with artificial intelligence, and two robot goldfish, which he named Lennon and McCartney (the latter of which swims backwards and is prone to breaking down).EntertainmentTo prevent boredom, Lister enters in many recreational activities.*Television  Lister and Cat have in depth discussions about Flintstones (debating if Wilma Flintstone is sexier than Betty Rubble) as well as of the Riverbank: The Next Generation (Camille).*Films  Lister enjoys watching films, from classics like Kane and Casablanca (the remake with Myra Binglebat and Beardsley, which Lister described definitive) to films like Revenge of the Surfboarding Killer Bikini Vampire Girls. Lister also likes soppy romance films (see Confidence And Paranoia and Holoship). In the novels, his all-time favourite film is A Wonderful Life.*Games  To pass time onboard Red Dwarf, Lister has created many different games including Match the Bodypart to the Crewmember and Armpit Name That Tune (Blue). Kochanski even suggests that Listers favourite games include Name That Smell and How Many Marbles Can You Fit Up Your Nostril (Beyond A Joke).*Virtual/Artificial Reality  Lister enjoys using the virtual reality suite onboard Starbug playing such games as Wimbledon and Gumshoe (Gunmen Of The Apocalypse). Rimmer claims that Lister only uses the AR machine to have sex  a claim supported in Me a Clipper. Although Lister agreed with Kochanski to partake in Austen World, Lister found the experience boring (Beyond A Joke).GuitarLister is very attached to his guitar,(LISTER: All Ive ever had is that guitar. Its the only thing in the whole of my miserable smegging life that hasnt walked out on me. ) believes himself to be an excellent guitarist, although his belief is misplaced. In the episode Psirens, his companions are able to distinguish a psiren disguised as Lister from the real Lister because the psiren is able to play guitar (having taken its pattern from Listers own mind, the psiren performed as the guitar virtuoso Lister perceives himself to be, rather than the dismal ability he usually displays). Lister eventually acknowledges his inability to play the guitar to at least some degree; in Nanarchy he comments, after playing his guitar with assistance from Kryten due to the loss of an arm, at least now Im only half-crap. In Series 1, Listers guitar is firstly an Ovation acoustic and silver in colour. Then in Series 3, episode 2 (Marooned), his guitar is shown to be a black, electric guitar  according to Lister it is a genuine Paul copy.)Alternative Listersthumb|left|Listers meets his Sperm-in-law (left).As well as Deb Lister, there have been various other alternative versions of Lister.In the alternate reality where we first meet Rimmer there is a version of Lister who goes by the name Spanners.  While its not established what his real name is, he is a highly skilled technician and we find out later in the episode he married Kochanski and had twin boys, Jim and Bexley. Unlike Rimmer Lister is pleased a version of him is doing so well.During an encounter with The Inquisitor, Dave is replaced with an alternative version of himself. This Dave Lister, one of the sperm who didnt have the chance to fertilise his mothers egg, was given the chance to live a better life than the one lived by the real Lister. However, the fact that he is dressed identically, and also stranded on Red Dwarf, suggests that this Dave fared no better. This Dave was ultimately killed by The Inquisitor whilst the real Dave tried to escape deletion from existence.thumb|right|Unknown man takes on the role of Lister in the Red Dwarf: Total Immersion Videogame.Under the influence of a despair squids hallucinogenic ink, Lister is fooled into thinking that his time aboard Red Dwarf was just a realistic encounter in a Total Immersion Videogame. After leaving the game, Lister briefly gets to watch the action as another group plays the game as it was intended to be played - the scenario observed involves the team having exciting adventures in outer space and interacting in a far less dysfunctional manner, and where the role of Lister is filled by a good-looking and suave new player.Discovering a temporal rift in normal space, Lister, along with the rest of the crew, travel through it and encounter an alternative Red Dwarf crew, with some small differences: in this reality, it is Lister who is the hologram, having failed to survive the accident which wiped out the crew. His hologramatic status led to this Lister becoming a better person, more caring and attentive, and cured of his slobby habits.During the novel Last Human, the crew fought an alternate version of Lister who was adopted by different parents, this Lister choosing the wealthy but psychotic Thorntons over the poorer but more emotionally stable parents which the normal Lister had. As a result, this Lister grew up to be a sociopath, often manipulating others with his efforts, claiming not to believe in even the concept of love, and perfectly willing to murder his shipmates in order to achieve his goals. This Lister is eventually killed when he is destroyed by the gestalt telepathic entity known as the Rage.References and footnotesExternal links*Dave Lister biography*Dave Lister Biography at Red Dwarf.co.uk*ListerListerLister
491534
Peder_Griffenfeld
Image:Peder Griffenfeld (Abraham Wuchters).jpg|thumb|250px|Peder Schumacher portrayed by Wuchters in 1672 Count Peder Griffenfeld (before ennoblement Peder Schumacher) (24 August 1635  12 March 1699) was a Danish statesman.Early yearsBorn at Copenhagen into a wealthy trading family connected with the leading civic, clerical and learned circles in the Danish capital, he was prepared for university (at the age of ten) byJens Vorde.  Vorde praises his extraordinary gifts, his mastery of the classical languages and his unnerving diligence. The brilliance he showed in his preliminary examination won him the friendship of the examiner, Bishop Brokman, at whose palace he first met King III of Denmark. The king was struck with Schumacher; and Brokman, proud of his pupil, made him translate a chapter from a Hebrew Bible first into Latin and then into Danish, for the entertainment of the scholarly monarch.In 1654 young Schumacher went abroad for eight years, to complete his education. From Germany he proceeded to the Netherlands, staying at Leiden, Utrecht and Amsterdam, and passing in 1657 to Queens College, Oxford, where he spent three years. The epoch-making events that occurred in England while he was at Oxford profoundly interested him. Coinciding with the Revolution in Denmark, which threw open a career to the middle classes, it convinced him that his future was in politics. In the autumn of 1660 Schumacher visited Paris, shortly after Mazarins death, when the young XIV of France first seized the reins of power. Schumacher seems to have been profoundly impressed by the administrative superiority of a strong centralised monarchy in the hands of an energetic monarch who knew his own mind; and, in politics, as in manners, France ever afterwards was his model. The last year of his travels was spent in Spain, where he obtained a thorough knowledge of the language and literature. He is said to have brought home easy morals as well as exquisite manners.CareerOn his return to Copenhagen, in 1662, Schumacher found the monarchy established on the ruins of the aristocracy, and eager to buy the services of every man of the middle classes who had superior talents to offer. The young adventurer contrived to secure the protection of Gabel, the kings confidant, and in 1663 was appointed the royal librarian. A romantic friendship with the kings bastard, Count Frederick Gyldenlve, consolidated his position. In 1665 Schumacher obtained his first political post as the kings secretary, and the same year composed the memorable Kongelov. He was now a personage at court, where he won many over by his amiability and gaiety; and in political matters also his influence was beginning to be felt.On the death of Frederick III (9 February 1670) Schumacher was the most trusted of all the royal counsellors. He alone was aware of the existence of the new throne of ivory embellished with three silver life-size lions, and of the new regalia, both of which treasures he had, by the kings command, concealed in a vault beneath the royal castle. Frederick III had also confided to him a sealed packet containing the Kongelov, which was to be delivered to his successor alone. Schumacher had been recommended to his son by Frederick III on his death-bed. Make him a great man, but do it slowly, said Frederick, who thoroughly understood the characters of his son and of his minister. Christian V was, moreover, deeply impressed by the confidence which his father had ever shown to Schumacher. When, on 9 February 1670, Schumacher delivered the Kongelov to Christian V, the king bade all those about him withdraw, and after being closeted a good hour with Schumacher appointed him his Obergeheimesekreter.His promotion was rapid. In May 1670 he received the titles of excellency and privy councillor; in July of the same year he was ennobled under the name of Griffenfeld, deriving his title from the gold griffin with outspread wings which surmounted his escutcheon; in November 1673 he was created a count, a knight of the of the Elephant and, finally, imperial chancellor In the course of the next few months he gathered into his hands every branch of the government: he had reached the apoge of his short-lived greatness.Seldom has any man united so many and such various gifts in his own person and carried them so easily a playful wit, vivid imagination, oratorical and literary eloquence and, above all, a profound knowledge of human nature both male and female of every class and rank, from the king to the meanest citizen. He had captivated the accomplished Frederick III by his literary graces and ingenious speculations; he won over the obtuse and ignorant Christian V by saving him trouble, by acting and thinking for him, and whilst making him believe that he was thinking and acting for himself. Moreover, his commanding qualities were coupled with an organizing talent which made itself felt in every department of the state, and with a marvellous adaptability which made him a great diplomat.On 25 May 1671 the dignities of count and baron were introduced into Denmark; a few months later the of the Dannebrog was instituted as a fresh means of winning adherents by marks of favour. Griffenfeld was the originator of these new institutions. To him monarchy was the ideal form of government. But he had also a political object. The aristocracy of birth, despite its reverses, still remained the elite of society; and Griffenfeld, the son of a burgess, was its most determined enemy.  The new baronies and countships, owing their existence entirely to the crown, introduced a strong solvent into aristocratic circles. Griffenfeld saw that, in future, the first at court would be the first everywhere. Much was also done to promote trade and industry, notably by the revival of the Kammer Kollegium, or board of trade, and the abolition of some of the most harmful monopolies. Both the higher and the provincial administrations were thoroughly reformed with the view of making them more centralized and efficient; and the positions and duties of the various magistrates, who now also received fixed salaries, were for the first time exactly defined. But what Griffenfeld could create, Griffenfeld could dispense with, and it was not long before he began to encroach upon the jurisdiction of the new departments of state by private conferences with their chiefs. Nevertheless it is indisputable that, under the single direction of this master-mind, the Danish state was now able, for a time, to utilize all its resources as it had never done before.In the last three years of his administration, Griffenfeld gave himself entirely to the conduct of the foreign policy of Denmark. It is difficult to form a clear idea of this, first, because his influence was perpetually traversed by opposite tendencies; in the second place, because the force of circumstances compelled him, again and again, to shift his standpoint; and finally because personal considerations largely intermingled with his foreign policy, and made it more elusive and ambiguous than. it need have been. Briefly, Griffenfeld aimed at restoring Denmark to the rank of a great power. He proposed to accomplish this by carefully nursing her resources, and in the meantime securing and enriching her by alliances, which would bring in large subsidies while imposing a minimum of obligations. Such a conditional and tentative policy, in a period of universal tension and turmoil, was most difficult; but Griffenfeld did not regard it as impossible.The first demand of such a policy was peace, especially peace with Denmarks most dangerous neighbour, Sweden. The second postulate was a sound financial basis, which he expected the wealth of France to supply in the shape of subsidies to be spent on armaments. Above all things Denmark was to beware of making enemies of France and Sweden at the same time. An alliance, on fairly equal terms, between the three powers, would, in these circumstances, be the consummation of Griffenfelds system; an alliance with France to the exclusion of Sweden would be the next best policy; but an alliance between France and Sweden, without the admission of Denmark, was to be avoided at all hazards. Had Griffenfelds policy succeeded, Denmark might have recovered her ancient possessions to the south and east comparatively cheaply. But again and again he was overruled. Despite his open protests and subterraneous counter-mining, war was actually declared against Sweden in 1675, and his subsequent policy seemed so obscure and hazardous to those who did not possess the clue to the perhaps purposely tangled skein, that the numerous enemies whom his arrogance and superciliousness had raised up against him, resolved to destroy him.TrialOn 11 March 1676, while on his way to the royal apartments, Griffenfeld was arrested in the kings name and taken to the citadel, a prisoner of state. A minute scrutiny of his papers, lasting nearly six weeks, revealed nothing treasonable; but it provided the enemies of the fallen statesman with a deadly weapon against him in the shape of an entry in his private diary, in which he had imprudently noted that on one occasion Christian V in a conversation with a foreign ambassador had spoken like a child. On 3 May, Griffenfeld was tried not by the usual tribunal, in such cases the Hjesteret, or supreme court, but by an extraordinary tribunal of 10 dignitaries, none of whom was particularly well disposed towards the accused. Griffenfeld, who was charged with simony, bribery, oath-breaking, malversation and lse-majest, conducted his own defence under every imaginable difficulty.For forty-six days before his trial he had been closely confined in a dungeon, without lights, books or writing materials. Every legal assistance was illegally denied him. Nevertheless he proved more than a match for the prosecution. Finally, he was condemned to degradation and decapitation; though one of the ten judges not only refused to sign the sentence, but remonstrated in private with the king against its injustice. And indeed its injustice was flagrant. The primary offence of the ex-chancellor was the taking of bribes, which no twisting of the law could convert into a capital offence, while the charge of treason had not been substantiated.Griffenfeld was pardoned on the scaffold, at the very moment when the axe was about to descend. On hearing that the sentence was commuted to life-long imprisonment, he declared that the pardon was harder than the punishment, and vainly petitioned for leave to serve his king for the rest of his life as a common soldier. For the next twenty-two years Denmarks greatest statesman was a lonely prisoner, first in the fortress of Copenhagen, and finally at Munkholmen on Trondhjem fjord, where he died. Griffenfeld had married Kitty Nansen, the granddaughter of the great Burgomaster Nansen, who brought him half a million rix-dollars. She died in 1672, after bearing him a daughter. Griffenfeldsgade in Nrrebro, Copenhagen is a street named after him.References*Danmarks Riges Histoire, vol. v. (Copenhagen, 18971905);*A.D. Jrgensen, Peter Schumacher Griffenfeld (Copenhagen, 18931894);*O. Vaupell, Rigskansler Grev Griffenfeld (Copenhagen, 18801882);*Bain, Scandinavia, cap. x. (Cambridge, 1905).*Johannes Jensen, Peder Schumacher - Graf von Griffenfeld, in Sankt Petri Kopenhagen 1575-2000. 425 Jahre Geschichte deutsch-dnischer Begegnung in Biographien, ed. Jrgen Beyer & Johannes Jensen (Copenhagen, 2000), 13-21Schumacher GriffenfeldSchumacher GriffenfeldSchumacher GriffenfeldSchumacher GriffenfeldSchumacher Griffenfeld
493145
Cramlington
Cramlington is a town and civil parish in the county of Northumberland, East England, situated  north of the city of upon Tyne. The towns name suggests a probable founding by the Danes or an Anglo-Saxon origin, the word ton meaning town. The population was estimated as 39,000 in 2004. It sits on the border between Northumberland and Tyneside with the traffic interchange at Moor Farm, Annitsford (in the latter) linking the two areas.The village of East Cramlington lies east of the A189, on the road that connects Cramlington to Delaval.HistoryThe first record of the Manor of Cramlington is from a mention in 1135  when the land was granted to Nicholas de Grenville. A register of early chaplains begins with John the Clerk of Cramlington (c.1163-1180). The register continues to the present day. From the 12th century onwards, its history has been mostly rural incorporating several farms and the parish church of St. Nicholas (built at a cost of 3,000 during 1865-1868 in the style). During the early 19th century, mining with several mine shafts in the immediate vicinity (the first was sunk in 1824) began to change that. It remained small, however, until 1964 when it was proclaimed a New Town and developers such as William Leech and J.T. Bell developed large estates. Those estates have since been named Beaconhill, Collingwood, Eastfield, Mayfield, Shankhouse, Southfield, and Whitelea and the town has effectively become a dormitory town of the much larger city to its south.During War I, the North East of England was protected by the No. 36 Home Defence Squadron. The squadron was formed at Cramlington on 1 February 1916 by Capt. R. O. Abercromby, with Cramlington subsequently becoming an important base for military planes and airships.http://www.flickr.com/photos/newcastlelibraries/4079059926/ The Airship Station was at Nelson Village. A reference to Cramlington airfield is made in E. Johns 1935 book The Black Peril from the extremely popular Biggles series.During the Domesday Project in 1986 it was recorded that Cramlingtons population was around 30,000. EstatesWith the establishment of the new town, the area was arranged into estates, primarily with a designator of the part of the town in which the estate was to be found.The estates are:* Northburn (constructed between the late 1980s and the 1990s)* Eastfield (constructed primarily in the late 1970s with an estate added in the mid-1990s)* Westwood (constructed in the early 1980s)* Southfield (constructed in the early 1970s)* Southfield Gardens (constructed in the early 2000s)* Mayfield (partially existing prior to the new town designation but with addition building in the late 1960s)* Whitelea (one of the earliest of the new town estates, constructed in the late 1960s and early 1970s)* Barns Park (constructed in the 1970s)* Parkside (constructed in the 1970s)* Beacon Hill (constructed in the 1970s)* Beacon Lea (constructed in the 1970s)EconomyThere are several large industrial zones in Cramlington, most to the towns north-west near the sewage treatment plant, housing major pharmaceutical companies including Sharp and Dohme. Other growing chemical companies including Aesica Pharmaceuticals are also present. Officers Club menswear firm has its headquarters and supply warehouse in Cramlington,( )() while other companies such as GE Oil & Gas also occupy large sites.()The Manor Walks shopping centre was constructed in the centre of the town in the 1970s, and was subsequently expanded in the mid-1990s and in 2003/4. The centre now includes retailers such as Argos, Asda, Boots, Next and Sainsburys. Provisional permissions were recently given to an open cast mining operation to the north-west of the town, however the fine detail of how much coal is to be extracted has yet to be agreed.(Revised Opencast Plans - Northumberland County Council) As of July 2006, it now appears mining will not go ahead.() Landmarks Woods Country Park lies just to the north of Cramlington, with the River Blyth flowing through the country park. Transport right|thumb|240pxThe town is served by railway station, with services to the MetroCentre, Morpeth and upon Tyne provided by Rail. Cramlington has an extensive bus service which is provided by Arriva Northumbria, including a number of express services to Newcastle upon Tyne.Cramlington also has good road transport links, being situated between the A1, A19 and A189 roads.In line with many of the UKs post-war New Towns, Cramlington has an extensive bicycle network. With a grid spacing of approximately 500m, segregated cycle routes are provided free of motorised traffic.EducationUntil September 2008, all schools in Northumberland operated under a three tier system, however, following a decision to convert the county to a two tier system, Cramlington was chosen as one of the first towns to complete this.Prior to the closure of the areas many middle schools, some primary schools relocated to the former middle school sites. This will allow disused sites and land to be sold to housing developers and other parties.There had been concern from local residents over traffic and parking arrangements at the new sites.(Site visits to schools as residents raise issues - News Post Leader)Cramlington Learning VillageIn September 2008 Cramlington Community High School was renamed Cramlington Learning Village in line with the transfer from three to two tiers. The village has three sections: a Junior Learning Village (for Years 7 and 8), a Senior Learning Village (for Years 9 to 11) and an Advanced Learning Village (for Years 12 and 13). Religious sites Cramlington has a number of Christian churches of various denominations:Methodist* Doxford Place Methodist Church* Welcome Methodist Church (formerly Station Terrace Methodist Church)of England* St. Nicholas Parish Church* St. Andrews (a plant from St. Nicholas in the Beaconhill area of the town)* St. Peters (a plant from St. Nicholas in the Northburn area of the town)Catholic* St. Pauls* St. John the BaptistOthers*of the Nazarene*Frontline* Episcopal ChurchLeisureCramlingtons main leisure centre, Concordia, is situated in the town centre adjacent to the shopping mall and was opened by Queen Elizabeth II in 1977. It consists of a leisure pool, originally designed as an indoor tropical paradise, indoor football pitches, tennis, badminton and squash courts, as well as a climbing wall. It also features a gymnasium, sauna, bowling green, and bar. 2008 sees a number of improvements to the centre to bring it in line with the current Disability Discrimination laws in England.As part of the new town design, the town has a large cycle path network. A cycle route also connects the town to the nearest beach, in Blyth. As of late March 2007, Blyth Valley council have announced that the cycle network is to be extended to allow access to the neighbouring town of Bedlington.The village square is home to four houses, including the Grade II listed Blagdon Arms.()Twin townsCramlington participates in a town twinning scheme with three other towns - two in Germany and one in the Russian Federation.Notable residents* Noble, comedian, comes from Cramlington.* Sting briefly was a first schoolteacher at St Pauls First School.* Fenwick, Trade Unionist, was born in the town.* Ray Stevenson, actor, grew up in Cramlington.* Sam Heads, entomologist and palaeontologist, comes from Cramlington.Sport* Footballers Shearer, Steven Taylor and Ramage played youth football for Juniors F.C..* Joe Brown, football player in the 1940s and 50s, Burnley manager* James Brown, Hartlepool United striker was born in Cramlington* Isaac, footballer in the 1930s and 40s for Town, born in Cramlington.* Owens, winger former FC youth graduate and current F.C player, was born in Cramlington* Sinton, former Wednesday and Spurs footballer was born in Cramlington* Uttley, former England national Rugby Union player was a sports teacher at High School* Gary Robson, professional darts player born and lives in Cramlington.* Haddock, professional football player lived in Cramlington. Most notable for playing for United, he also played for United and Burnley* McClen, footballer who now plays for Town F.C, after coming up through the youth ranks at United.* John Carver (Footballer), former footballer, assistant manager at United under Bobby Robson, F.C Manager and current Argyle assistant manager, coached Juniors F.C for a short period.* Clattenburg, Premier League Referee, was raised in the town and went to High School* Oliver (Referee), youngest ever Premier League Referee, was born, raised and resides in Cramlington.* Caldwell, former Newcastle United Defender and current Burnley captain and Scotland international, used to live in the centre of the town, while he was at Newcastle.* Stephen Miller (Athlete), Paralympic Gold Medalist comes from Cramlington.* Brittain, professional footballer and former United and current F.C. midfielder is from Cramlington.* Martin Taylor, professional footballer currently with City, went to High School.References(External links*History of the No. 36 Home Defence squadron*Northumberland Communities Photos and maps of Cramlington from 1610-1910.*Cramlington United FC Childrens football in Cramlington for kids from aged 4 to young adult.de:Cramlingtonfr:Cramlingtonit:Cramlingtonnl:Cramlingtonnn:Cramlingtonpl:Cramlingtonro:Cramlingtonsimple:Cramlingtonvo:Cramlington
494934
Vinnytsia_Oblast
 website                www.vin.gov.uaVinnytsia Oblast (, translit. Vinnytska oblast; also referred to as Vinnychchyna - ) is an oblast of Ukraine.  Its administrative center is Vinnytsia.GeographyThe area of the region is 26,500 km; its population (as of 2004-05-01) is 1.7 million.The Vinnytsia Oblast was founded on February 27, 1932, its area makes 4.5% of the states territory. The oblast is located in the central part of the Right Bank Ukraine and borders on seven administrative oblasts of Ukraine. In the southwest of the oblast along the Dnister river passes a 202 kilometer long section of the state border with Moldova.Administratively the oblasts territory is divided into 27 village districts, the oblast center is divided into 3 town districts. The oblast has 17 towns, 30 town type villages and 1,467 villages. The town of Vinnytsia, which is over 630 years old, has more than 400 thousand residents.As of 1 January 1997 the urban population of the oblast was 886,700 and the rural 975,500. The population density is 70 people per km. The proportion of employable population is 56.4%.The Vinnytsya oblast is a land with an appreciable mineral raw material base. 1,159 deposits and manifestations of various mineral resources, tens of peat deposits, unique deposits of granite and kaolin, garnet and fluorite have been explored. A number of medicinal mineral water springs have been found in the oblast, they function as well as radons water springs in the town of Khmilnyk. Having such invaluable mineral springs the Vinnytsya oblast may soon take the leading position in their export to CIS countries or to the world market.The oblast has the world largest deposit of competitive mineral raw material kaolin (800million t). The range of its use is very broad: paper, ceramic (porcelain/faience), electrical engineering (insulators), refractory, aluminum, textile, cable, rubber, chemical and soap industries as well as perfumery, manufacture of pencils and mineral paints.Unique decorative qualities of Vinnytsias granites, sobites, vinnytsites, charnockites allow to manufacture stone, facing slabs, window sills, monuments, etc.Three granite deposits (whose resources are 10 million cu.m) have been explored and are being mined, an experimental mining is carried out in eight developed deposits. Enterprises are provided with resources for more than 100 years.The Vinnytsia oblast is the only oblast of Ukraine containing large pelicanite resources (39 deposits with the total inferred resources of about 170 million tons).The brown coal of the Vinnytsia land is similar in quality to that mined in well known brown coal mines of the Dniprobas and can be well used for energy purposes, for processing by semicoking and hydrogenation methods. Three deposits in the oblast with resources about 50million t have been preliminarily explored and three more are in the process.The building materials industry widely uses local sand and gravel. There are five sand deposits, all of which are exploited, one of them is for silicate bricks, three for building mortars and one for ballast.In the Vinnytsya land there have been revealed and are being employed the therapeutic properties of the mineral water of the Khmilnyk radon deposit. Also 21 table water springs have been prospected, ten of them have been certified and at five deposits filling has been arranged (Rehina, Kniazhna, Shumylivska, Podilska and Rosiana). Myrhorodska type mineral water has been found. Revealing new radon deposits is possible.Bauxite (the ore for aluminum making) has been found for the first time in Podillia. The geologists took stock of their resources that are about 3 million tons.Historical SitesThe following sites were nominated for the Wonders of Ukraine.* The Villa of Mykola Pyrogov* Scythian settlement* Slavic cave temple (Bushi relief)EconomicsIndustryThe oblasts industrial potential is represented by such enterprises as the Ladyzhyn thermal power station, associations Zhovten, Infrakon, Maiak, Krystal, Vinnytsya Bearing Works, Khimprom, tens of processing and light industry enterprises. In all about 400 enterprises of various industrial sectors are functioning in the oblast. The largest of them are situated in the oblast capital.The Vinnytsya oblast has 12.7% of the industrial production potential, 2% of the cost of fixed production assets and 2.6% of the industrial output.The oblast has a multisectoral industrial complex, where leading places are held by the food industry, machine building and metalworking.Over 400 industrial enterprises of 13 industrial sectors are functioning in the oblast. Main of them are food industry (57.5%), electric power industry (15.6%), machine building and metalworking (9.4%), chemical and petrochemical industry (5.7). Microbiology and medicine are developing.72 machine building enterprises are specialized in manufacture of products in 12 industrial sectors, the main of which are electrical engineering, machine tool and toolmaking, instrument engineering, bearing, tractor and farm machinery industries. The Vinnytsya oblasts machine building products include metal cutting tools, pumps, rolling bearings, water, gas and heat flow meters, electric motors, electric spindles, computer facilities, production equipment for processing industries, farm machinery for plant growing and animal husbandry, integrated circuits, semiconductor and vacuum electronic devices, high economy luminescent lamps, stereoanagraphs, scales, automobile lifters, mills, milking equipment, etc.The share of consumer goods output in the oblast in their total production in Ukraine is of 5.7% (1996). They are manufactured by 359 enterprises.The oblast specializes in production of foodstuffs. The total output of consumer goods in 1996 made 81.1%, domestic and recreational purpose goods 9.0% and light industry products 6.4%.In the output of consumer foodstuffs in 1996 the Vinnytsya oblast was the second and of non food goods took the 11th place among the oblasts of Ukraine.Main positions in the structure of production of domestic and recreational goods are held by products manufactured at enterprises of the machine building complex, chemical and defense industries: complex domestic facilities, small mechanization means for household plots and small holdings, domestic chemistry goods.Among the light industry enterprises is of great use concluding agreements with foreign firms to manufacture goods from the raw material supplied by the customer of the products. Cooperation with firms of Germany, USA, Slovakia, Czech, Hungary, India and others has been established. In 1996 the Vinnytsya joint stock company Podillia, public joint stock company Khmilnyk Garment Factory Lileia, Vinnytsya public joint stock company Volodarka, joint stock company Tulchin Garment Factory and others worked on raw materials supplied by the foreign firms customers.The electric power generating capacity of power plants at the oblasts territory is 10,523,400 kWh per year. At present, they are under loaded. The electric power generation in 1996 produced 3,548 kWh, while its consumption in the same year was 5,041,000 kWh.The oblast has 39 sugar factories and 13 distilleries. A quite good base for processing sunflower seeds and groats crops has been formed.AgricultureThe total farmland area is 19,605 square kilometres; of them, arable lands occupy 16,940 km, and perennial plantations, 512 km.As of 1 January 1997 in the oblast there were functioning 749 collective agricultural enterprises, 56 state farms of all systems, 25 inter farm agricultural enterprises, and 818 private (peasants) farms.Agricultural enterprises of all forms of ownership are primarily specialized in growing of cereal crops and sugar beets, the animal husbandry, meat and milk production. In the overall structure of sown areas, winter wheat crops occupy 18%, barley 14% and sugar beets 10%.In 1996 the oblast produced 7% of grain, 14.3% of sugar beets, 7.5% of fruits and berries, 6.1% of meat in live weight, 5.4% of milk and 4.0% of eggs of their total production in Ukraine.Transport and CommunicationsThree trunk pipelines cross the oblasts territory: Urengoi-Pomary-Uzhhorod, Soiuz and Dashava-Kyiv. 3,299.8 km of gas distributing networks are in service. It was planned to put 261 km of gas networks in operation in 1997.Foreign Economic RelationsIn 1996 enterprises and organizations of the oblast executed foreign trade operations with partners from 73 countries of the world. The total foreign trade volume for this period made $397,500,000, including export ($280,900,000) and import ($116,600,000), which resulted in positive balance ($164,300,000).The oblasts foreign trade with CIS and Baltic countries in this time reached 58.2% of the total foreign trade turnover. The largest export deliveries are to the Russian Federation (42.6%), Belarus (5.4%), Belgium (7.2%) and Germany (7.45%).No considerable changes have taken place in the structure of commodity exports. As before, leading in this field are the food industry (47.5%), light industry (14.18%), machine building (10.96%), chemical industry (5.09%) and agriculture (6.36%).Enterprises of the Vinnytsya oblast seek to import urgently needed products which are in short supply. Main items of import in 1996 were mineral fertilizers (2.68%), petroleum products (10.27%), equipment (11.63%), surface transport facilities (3.82%), inorganic chemistry products, electrical machines, fabrics and yarn.Taking into account main lines of production, considerable quantities of farm machinery and equipment for processing and building materials industries are brought to its territory. Owing to this agricultural enterprises of the oblast managed in 1996 to perform a full range of fieldwork and obtained a good harvest of cereal and industrial crops. At the same time large quantities of products that are not in demand of population as well as goods manufactured in sufficient quantities by the oblasts enterprises are brought to the oblast. Moreover a considerable amount of valuable raw leather is brought out on so called tolling terms in exchange of poor quality semi manufactures, footwear, leather jackets, etc.Of special concern is the fact that enterprises of the oblast are steeply reducing import of the equipment, spare parts, completing items, while import of alcoholic drinks, juices, and other low grade consumer goods is rising. As shown by calculations, the oblast, having a considerable export/import potential, has real opportunities through an effective use of the foreign trade to increase revenues both of the local and of the state budget and to provide itself with the necessary critical products.The oblasts enterprises seek to attract foreign investments for increasing the output of products. Since 1991 till December 1997 about 300 joint enterprises with foreign investments amounting to $23,300,000 were established in the Vinnytsya oblast. Enterprises and citizens from 41 countries of the world participated in organization of the enterprises. The largest amount of investments came from the USA, Germany, Poland, Israel and some other countries. Subdivisions thumb|right|175px|A map fragment showing Vinnytsia OblastThe Vinnytsia Oblast is administratively subdivided into 27 raions (districts), as well as 6 cities (municipalities) which are directly subordinate to the oblast government: Khmilnyk, Koziatyn, Ladyzhyn, Mohyliv-Podilskyi, Zhmerynka, and the administrative center of the oblast, Vinnytsia. NomenclatureMost of Ukraines oblasts are named after their capital cities, officially referred to as oblast centers (, translit. oblasnyi tsentr). The name of each oblast is a relative adjective, formed by adding a feminine suffix to the name of respective center city: Vinnytsia is the center of  the Vinnytska oblast (Vinnytsia Oblast). Most oblasts are also sometimes referred to in a feminine noun form, following the convention of traditional regional place names, ending with the suffix -shchyna or chyna, as is the case with the Zhytomyr Oblast, Vinnychchyna.See also* of Ukraine* Wonders of UkraineReferencessngde VnnytsiaoblastWinnyzjaoblastde Vinnytsiaprovincode Vinnytsiade VinnitsiaoblastVinnytsiadi VinnycjaapgabalssritisterletVinnytsjaja:winnickide VinnitsavilyetiViniaOblastoblasoblastalueoblastOblast(tnh)Oblastzh:
496909
Tura_River
Image:Rika Tura.jpg|thumb|300px|The Tura near VerkhoturyeTura River (), also known as Dolgaya River (Long River), ) is a historically important Siberian river which flows eastward from the central Mountains into the River, a part of the River basin. The main town is Tyumen. From about 1600 to 1750 the Tura River was the main entry point into Siberia. Most people and goods entering or leaving passed through the customs house at Verkhoturye. There are a number of mining towns in the upper Tura basin.It is located in the Oblast and Oblast in Russia. It is 1030 km long with a basin is 80,400 km. The Tura River is navigable within 753 km from its mouth. It freezes up in late October - November and stays under the ice until April - first half of May.The Tura basin is bounded on the west by the Mountains with the city of Perm, on the north by the River basin, on the east by the River with the city of Tobolsk and on the south by the River basin with the city of Yekaterinburg.The Tura flows north through Tura and Tura, receives an east-flowing river from the mining town of Kachkanar, flows east past Verkhoturye, turns east-southeast, receives the River from the east, passes Turinsk, receives the east-flowing River, passes Tyumen, turns directly east, receives the east-flowing River from the south and joins the River about 75 kilometers above Tobolsk. The Tura basin is fan-shaped with the Tura on the north side and the Pyshma on the south.()(eka)(Fluss)jgiTur(rivire)(fiume)kk:(up)(foly)(rivier)ja:no:Turann:Turaelva(rzeka)()(joki)(flod)()zh:
496919
Kolyma_River
right|300pxThe Kolyma River () is a river in northeastern Siberia, whose basin covers parts of the Republic, Autonomous Okrug, and Oblast of Russia. It rises in the mountains north of Okhotsk and Magadan, in the area of  andempties into the Gulf (Kolymskiy Zaliv) of the Siberian Sea, a division of the Ocean, at . The Kolyma is  long. The area of its basin is 644,000 km.The Kolyma is frozen to depths of several metres for about 250 days each year, becoming free of ice only in early June, until October.HistoryIn 1640 Dimitry Zyryan (also called Yarilo or Yerilo) went overland to the Indigirka. In 1641 he sailed down the Indigirka, went east and up the Alazeya. Here they heard of the Kolyma and met Chukchis for the first time. In 1643 he returned to the Indigirka, sent his yasak to Yakutsk and went back to the Alazeya. In 1645 he returned to the Lena where he met a party and learned that he had been appointed prekazshchik of the Kolyma. He returned east and died in early 1646. In the winter of 1641-42 Stadukhin, accompanied by Dezhnyov, went overland to the upper Indigirka. He spent the next winter there, built boats and sailed down the Indigirka and east to the Alazeya where he met Zyryan. Zyrian and Dezhnev stayed at the Alazeya, while Stadukhin went east, reaching the Kolyma in the summer of 1644. They built a zimovye, probably at Srednekolymsk and returned to Yakutsk in late 1645.()In 1892-1894 Eduard Von Toll carried out geological surveys in the basin of the Kolyma (among other Far-eastern Siberian rivers) on behalf of the Russian Academy of Sciences (Barr, 1980). During one year and two days the expedition covered 25,000 km, of which 4,200 km were up rivers, carrying out geodesic surveys en route. The Kolyma is known for its Gulag camps and mining, both of which have been extensively documented since Stalin era Soviet archives opened. The river gives its title to a famous anthology about life in Gulag camps by Shalamov, Kolyma Tales.After the camps were closed, state subsidies, local industries and communication have dwindled to almost nothing. Many people have migrated, but those who remain in the area make a living by fishing and hunting.Mouths of the KolymaIn the last 75 km stretch the Kolyma divides into two large branches. There are many islands at the mouth of the Kolyma before it meets the East Siberian sea. The main ones are:*Mikhalkino  is the largest island, it lies to the west of the Kolymas eastern branch, the Prot. Kammennaya Kolyma. This island breaks up into smaller islands on its northern end. It is 24 km long and 6 km wide. Mikhalkino is also known as Glavsevmorput Island after the Directorate of the Northern Sea Route.*Sukharnyy, or Sukhornyy , is located 3 km from the northeastern shores of Mikhalkino. It is 11 km long and about 5 km wide. Northeast of Sukhornyy lies a cluster of small islands known as the Morskiye Sotki Islands.*Piat Paltsev lies 5 km to the southeast of Sukhornyys southern end. It is 5 km long and has a maximum width of 1.8 km.*Nazarovsky Island  lies on the western side of the Kolymas western branch, the Prot. Pokhodskaya Kolyma, in an area where there are many small islands. It is 4.5 km long and 1.3 km wide.*Shtormovoy Island  lies offshore, about 10 km to the north of Nazarovsky Island. Shtormovoy is the northernmost island off the Mouths of the Kolyma. It is 4.3 km long and 1.5 km wide.See alsoThe Kolyma article which provides additional information about the Gulag.ReferencesGeneral references* William Barr, Baron Eduard von Tolls Last Expedition: The Russian Polar Expedition, 1900-1903 (1980). http://pubs.aina.ucalgary.ca/arctic/Arctic34-3-201.pdf* Shalamov, Varlam Tikhonovich (1994) Kolyma tales rasskazy, Glad, John (transl.), Penguin twentieth-century classics, Harmondsworth : Penguin, ISBN 0-14-018695-6* Once-cursed Gulag river now Siberian lifeline: http://dl1.yukoncollege.yk.ca/agraham/newsItems/departments/russia* Strandberg, Mikael and Johan Ivarsson, travelled down the full length of the Kolyma River 2004. An Expedition hailed internationally as one of the coldest ever.* Position and names of islandsExternal links* Information and a map of the Kolymas watershed* Picture of Mikhalkino Islandbs:Kolima()Kolim()cs:KolymaKolymade:KolymajgiKolymeo:Kolima(fleuve)hr:KolimaKolyma(fljt)it:Kolymahe:la:Colymalt:Kolymalmo:Kolymahu:Kolimanl:Kolymaja:(elv)nn:Kolymaelvapl:KoymaKolymaro:Kolma()()()sh:Kolimafi:Kolymasv:Kolymafloden()zh:
498648
Killingworth
Killingworth, formerly Killingworth Township, is a town north of Upon Tyne, in Tyneside, Kingdom.Built as a planned town in the 1960s, most of Killingworths residents commute to Newcastle, or the citys surrounding area.  However, Killingworth itself has a sizeable commercial centre, strong bus links to the rest of and Wear.  Killingworth is not on the and Wear Metro network but the nearest metro station is Palmersville.Nearby towns/villages include Village (which existed for centuries before the Township was built), Hall, Moor and Backworth.Killingworth in Australia is named after Killingworth in England on account of its extensive history of coal-mining; it lies to the west of Newcastle, South Wales, so-named for the same reason.Cultureleft|thumb| Former British Gas building* Killingworth was used in the filming of the sitcom Happened to the Likely Lads? in 1973/1974. The Highfields estate (Garth Sixteen), built in the early 1970s and containing some of Killingworths first privately-owned houses, was seen as a suitable location for the new home (on Falkirk) of the young couple Thelma and Bob, while Terry Collier works at a factory (filmed at the Killingworth industrial estate). Although Killingworth is not mentioned in the series, its presence can be seen as reflective of the times.* In an episode of the architecture series Wonders on Tyne Tees, Grundy deemed Killingworths former British Gas Research Centre the best industrial building in the North East.* Killingworth has a lot of recreational land, such as the fields used by local schools.* The Who episode titled of the Rani depicted a 19th-century Killingworth in its episode, with the 6th Doctor in search of Stephenson after the villager goes mad.Early HistoryKillingworth township, was part of Longbenton parish. It was held as part of the barony of Merlay (Morpeth). Land within the township was held and tenemented by many individuals and institutions, the main ones being the Killingworth family. 1373 - A detailed survey was made of Killingworth in this year. The township was divided into fields (more than twenty named) and within each field the various landholders farmed strips, or selions, of land. Fifteen landholders are mentioned as holding tenements in Killingworth and strips of land scattered among the fields. One of the fields mentioned is Dimisdale (Dymmyngesdale). This name survived until the 18th century and can be identified with the lands abutting Burradon township.1704 - The last male heirs of the Killingworth family, Oliver and Luke, were by this date dead and the lands that they had held in Killingworth were divided out between their sisters: Mehitabel, Deborah, Blandina and Bethseba. Dimisdale was assigned to Mehitabel Killingworth, wife of Thomas Partis. c. 1737 - Dimisdale farm and other lands in Killingworth were sold to John Williams of the Close Gate glass house. 1763 - John Williams died leaving his Killingworth property to his son, John Williams, who rebuilt Killingworth Hall. 1767 - John Williams sold his land and property in Killingworth to George Colpitts. Colpitts was to pay a land tax of 8 4s. 9d. in this year and again in 1779. This is just short of the figure for Burradon township. We can therefore calculate that he held about 500 acres. 1790 - Elizabeth Harrison, the niece and heiress of George Colpitts, married Henry Utrick Reay of Co. Durham and brought ownership of the lands by marriage to him. 1793 - The common lands of Killingworth Township were enclosed by a parliamentary act. It is possible that some enclosure had taken place previous to this date - Dimisdale Farm could be almost coterminous with Hill Head farm which survived until the 1960s. Each landholder was allocated a tract of land within the township to enclose, where before they would have had scattered strips and closes throughout the township. This land would become an individual farm, each one adjoining the village of Killingworth. Henry Utrick Reay was allocated Hill Head farm, although part of this may have been sold shortly afterwards to the Ogle family of Burradon. Thomas Pugh was allocated West House farm which ran to the line where Moor View now occupies. He was also allocated White House farm which covered the west side of Camperdown where the industrial estate now occupies. See the Ownership Map of Killingworth Farms.  www.burradon-camperdown.co.uk/resources/FieldsKillingworth.jpgh 1828 Mar.13 - Henry Utrick Reay died in London. His eldest daughter Elizabeth Anne inherited his lands. She married Matthew Bell of Woolsington. They were to live in Killingworth Hall. He served as a member of Parliament.1841 Census  Killingworth TownshipPopulation 112; Dwellings 14.HistoryConstruction of Killingworth, a town, began in 1963. Intended for 20,000 people, it was a former mining community, and was formed on  of derelict colliery land near Village, which had existed since the 18th century and earlier. The building of Killingworth Township was undertaken by County Council, and was not sponsored by the Government. It was assigned New Town status in the 1960s in a similar fashion to the nearby town of Cramlington.left|thumb|Killingworth boating lake, 2 May 2006 Taken by Pat AlexanderUnlike that town, Killingworths planners adopted a radical approach to town centre design, resulting in a development of relatively high-rise buildings in an avant-garde and brutalist style, and won awards for architecture, dynamic industry and attractive environment.This new town centre consisted of pre-cast concrete houses, with millions of small shells unusually embedded into their external walls, 5 to 10 storey flats, offices, industrial units and service buildings, which often consisted of artistic non-functional characteristics, shops and residential multi-storey car parks, interconnected by ramps and walkways. These made up a deck system of access to shopping and other facilities, constructed on the Swedish Skarne method of construction http://www.rls.org.uk/database/record.php?usi000-000-001-233-L.Originally named Killingworth Township, the latter part of the name was quickly dropped through lack of colloquial use. Killingworth is often referred to as Killy by a large portion of residents of the town and residents of the surrounding areas.Around 1964, during the reclamation of the derelict pit sites, a  lake south of the town centre was created; spoil heaps were levelled, seeded and planted with semi-mature trees. Today, swans, ducks and local wildlife live around the two lakes which span the main road into Killingworth.  The lake is kept well stocked with fish and an angling club and model boating club use the lakes regularly.Killingworth CollieryKillingworth was home to a number of pits including the world-famous Killingworth Colliery. It was here in 1814 that Stephenson, enginewright at the colliery, built his first locomotive Blcher with the help and encouragement of his manager at Killingworth, Wood, in the colliery workshop behind his house Dial Cottage on Lime Road. This locomotive could haul 30 tons of coal up a hill at 4 mph (6.4 km/h), and was the first successful flanged-wheel adhesion locomotive; its traction depended only on the contact between its flanged wheels and the rail. It was used to tow wagons of coal along the wagonway from Killingworth to the Wallsend coal staithes. Although Blcher did not survive long it provided Stephenson with the knowledge and experience to build better locomotives at Killingworth. Later he would build the famous Rocket in his locomotive works in Newcastle.(Biography)At the same time Stephenson was also developing his own version of the miners safety lamp, which he demonstrated underground in Killingworth pit a month before Sir Humphry Davy presented his design to the Royal Society in London in 1815. Known as the Geordie lamp it was to be widely used in the North-east in place of the lamp.(The Safety Lamp)HousingGarthsKillingworth originally consisted of local authority houses. The first houses at Angus Close, owned by the local authority, were built to house key workers for the British Gas Research Centre. The rest of Killingworths estates were cul-de-sacs named Garths - all numbered, although Garths 1-3 never existed. The actual numbering of the Garths was;4,6,7,9,11,12,13,etc. In the 1990s the Garths located in West Bailey changed their names to street names with estates taking certain trends such as garth 11 is named after trees, Laburnum Court, Willow Gardens etc. and garth 12 after birds e.g. Dove Close, Chaffinch Way.The houses in most of the Garths in West Bailey (the west of Killingworth) were built of concrete and had flat roofs, but around 1995 the Local Housing Association modernised these houses by adding pitched roofs to the flat-roofed homes, renewed fencing, built new brick sheds, and relocated roads and pathways. Along with this they changed several Garths names and replaced them with names of lakes, birds and trees.The lowest remaining numbered Garth is Garth Four (the highest is Garth Thirty-Three in East Bailey aka Hadrian court). The housing estate formally known as garth 21 was not built as Local Housing but as a private estate, the houses are detached and semi detached 3 and 4 bed room. The street names are Crumstone Court, Longstone, Megstone etc.Many of the Local Authority Homes have been purchased by the tenants, some of whom still reside in the houses that were built new in the 1960s.Highfields, first privately-owned homesKillingworth has grown since the early 1960s, with the addition of new privately-owned homes, Highfields Estate was built in the 1970s and was named after battles e.g. Flodden, Agincourt, Stamford, Culloden, Sedgemoor, etc.The TowersImage:Killingworth 1970s.jpg| The Towers in the 1970s  Image:Killingworth Towers 1987 (2).jpg| The Towers just prior to demolition in 1987 (photo taken by David John Fisher)Image:Killingworth_Towers_1987.jpg| The Towers again just prior to demolition in 1987 (photo taken by David John Fisher)Killingworth Towers 1986 Video http://www.youtube.com/watch?vjUmcQIdLT6wThe most eye-catching and radical aspect of the township was the 3-tier housing estate called the Killingworth Towers - apartment blocks built in the early 1970s. Tenanted by the local authority, they were made of dark grey concrete blocks, and were named Bamburgh, Kielder and Ford Tower etc., after castles. They consisted of a combination of 1, 2 and 3 storey homes built on top of each other rising to 10 storeys high in some towers, with tremendous views.The estate was originally designed to mimic a medieval castle with an outer wall and inner keep all interconnected to elevators and garbage chutes by ramps and a two-tier walkway (see gallery). This design could be realized on maps of the Towers which existed on the cast-iron drain covers within the estate. The walkways all led to a  mile long elevated walkway leading straight through the, mostly covered, Killingworth Citadel Shopping Centre. This communal configuration was experimental and somewhat typical of the time.DeclineThe idea was to create community interaction, with large parks in the grasslands around the towers and social clubs for the adults. However, despite this vision of an integrated society, the design did not live up to expectations. The estate started to look, and feel, like a prison rather than a castle with the introduction of measures to stop anti-social behavior from youths (would-be ASBOs) congregating within the high rise instead of in the parks.Grating was retrofitted to prevent risk takers sliding down the 100 ft high girders holding up the walkways. Cast iron grills were erected to stop thoroughfare by over-exuberant youths racing their bikes and skateboards along the perfectly smooth walkway racetrack. Dogs fouling the limited ecosystem walkways, blocked garbage chutes, vandalism and fires set in the communal bins, stairwells, lifts and multi-storey residential car parks also added to the ever growing list of problems. The residents fight to have pride in their homes was never easy due to their design. The Towers were not widely popular and were consequently demolished in 1987.The last remaining eyesore, the walkway to the shops, was eventually demolished as it served no further practical interconnecting or visually pleasing purpose after the Towers demise, but it stood alone for 10 years until funds were found to bring it down. Although happy to see the end of them, some local people still look upon the Towers with the nostalgia of a failed new age of architecture with lessons learned.The land is now occupied by two new estates of privately-owned homes which were built by Cussins Homes and Barratt Homes.Town centreHistory of commercethumb|right|250px|The Killingworth Centre, 2 May 2006, taken by Pat AlexanderThe first two shops built in Killingworth in the 1960s were Moores and a small confectionery shop, situated between Garth Six and Angus Close and next door to the West House pub, but these shops were demolished in the 1970s.thumb|left|250px|The Killingworth Centre with Amberly House in the background, Spring/Summer 1987 Taken by Dave Gilmore.The original town centre was built in the 1960s. The boxer Cooper declared the shopping centre open while standing on the steps of the Puffing Billy pub. The centre included a large store, Woolco, which sold groceries and car parts, and even incorporated a tyre service bay. The shopping centre also included Dewhurst butchers, Greggs bakery, and newsagents, but it was demolished in the 1980s.Puffing Billy Pub / Mr Browns Video Fire 1990 can be seen here http://www.youtube.com/watch?vc0e6SLzVXEYIn the 1980s and 1990s, the Morrisons shopping complex (containing the Morrisons supermarket) was the commercial centre of Killingworth, while the former Woolco site stood as wasteland for more than a decade. Then, in the early 2000s, the Killingworth Centre, a modern shopping mall, was built on the former Woolco site. Morrisons moved into a new purpose-built store. The premises vacated by Morrisons are now occupied by Matalan. In 2010, a new KFC and public house (The Shire Horse) was constructed next to McDonalds in the grounds of Killingworth Centre. The Hello Eco Living website designed by Killingworth based 21 Inspired (http://21inspired.com/work/hello-eco-living) was chosen as a showcase site for the 1.2 release of the BuddyPress social network.TransportThe Killingworth Centre also incorporates a covered bus station which is served by Stagecoach, Arriva, Go-North East, Northumbria Coaches and Classic Buses.The White Swan Centre siteright|thumb|250px|White Swan Centre, 8 May 2006 Taken by Pat AlexanderThis is a large white building in the town centre.Originally, a building owned by & McLellan, built in the 1960s, stood here. This office block contained  of office space and employed 600 professional and clerical people. Constructed by County Council, the building towered over Killingworth and could be seen for miles around.Over the years, the office space became vacant and, like the former Woolco site, it was disused through the 1990s. Then the building was reduced in height, remodernised, reopened and renamed the White Swan Centre. The name White Swan was chosen from suggestions provided by local school children and reflects the swans found on the local lake. The White Swan Centre was built to house many of the local services previously provided in the demolised buildings which had been attached to the high-level shopping precinct. For example the doctors surgery and library, a small gym was also housed in the White Swan centre as the swimming pool and sports centre had also been demolished. The new Lakeside swimming pool and sports centre has since been built alongside the lake (next to the High School).SchoolsKillingworth is also home to four schools (Westmoor, Bailey Green, Moor Edge and Amberley) and a school, George Stephenson High School. In recent years Killingworth has moved from a three-tier education system consisting of, First, Middle and High schools, to the current two-tier system.Public housesKillingworth has four public houses (and there are two more in Village).* The West House, originally called the West House Inn, is in West Bailey. It was built from a derelict farmhouse and barn (see early history 1793 , West House farm was occupied by an original landowner together with Whitehouse farm which is now converted to private housing in westmoor)- this in the style of an old Northumberland inn.* The Station public house is on the industrial estate to the west of the town. It was originally next to the Killingworth railway station, which was demolished some years ago. The railway still runs by the Station pub, with a crossing within 50 m of the pub.* Killingworth Working Mens Social Club (in East Bailey) was built in the 1970s and located next to the Town Centre.* The Shire Horse, situated next to the White Swan Centre, was opened in May 2010 on the same piece of land as a new KFC. Run by Marstons, it has a popular carvery and selection of real ales.The two public houses in Killingworth Village are:* The Killingworth Arms (originally a hotel) is located at the top of Killingworth Bank* The Plough Inn, situated in the centre of Killingworth Village opposite the entrance to the parkReferences5. http://www.burradon-camperdown.co.uk/23.html6. http://www.youtube.com/watch?vjUmcQIdLT6w  -  KILLINGWORTH TOWERS 1986 Video7. http://www.youtube.com/watch?vc0e6SLzVXEY  - KILLINGWORTH MR BROWNS / PUFFING BILLY FIRE 1990 VideoSee also*Killingworth lakeFacebook Killingworth Photos and videos(Tyne and Wear)nl:Killingworthnn:Killingworthpl:Killingworthro:Killingworth
501515
Antelope_Valley
File:Geese and Antelope Valley poppies.jpg|thumb|350px|geese take flight over wildflowers near California, 2011.Image:Antelope valley californie.jpg|thumb|right|350px|A truck passes eastbound along the busy Highway 138 through the Antelope Valley. The Mountains are visible in the distance.The Antelope Valley in California, States, is located in northern Los Angeles County and the southeastern portion of County, California, and constitutes the western tip of the Desert. It is situated between the Tehachapi and the Gabriel Mountains.()The valley was named for the graceful pronghorn antelopes that are said to have roamed there until being eliminated by hunters and bad weather in the 1880s.( The principal cities in the Antelope Valley are Palmdale and Lancaster.GeographyShaped like a sideways letter V, the Antelope Valley comprises the western tip of the Desert, opening up to the Valley and the Basin to the east. Lying north of the Gabriel Mountains and southeast of the Tehachapis, this desert ecosystem spans approximately . Precipitation in the surrounding mountain ranges contributes to recharge.Flora and faunaFile:Joshua Trees in Snow.jpg|thumb|Joshua trees in snow, near CaliforniaThe Antelope Valley is home to a wide range of plants and animals. It is home to hundreds of plants like the Joshua tree, oak, Creosote, and the poppy. Winter brings much-needed rain which slowly penetrates the areas dry ground, bringing up native grasses and wildflowers. Poppy season depends completely on the precipitation, but a good bloom can be killed off by the unusual weather in the late winter and early spring months. Snow is not unusual for the Antelope Valley in spring, because it is often the most unstable weather the valley receives. The Antelope Valley gets its name from its history of pronghorn antelope grazing in large numbers. In 1882-85, the valley lost 30,000 head of antelope, almost half of the antelope for which it was named. Unusually heavy snows in both the mountains and the valley floor drove the antelope toward their normal feeding grounds in the eastern part of the valley. Since they would not cross the railroad tracks, many of them starved to death. Others were attacked by coyotes and wildcats or became easy prey for hunters. Once abundant, they mostly died off or migrated into the Central Valley. A drought in the early 1900s caused a scarcity in grass, their main food source. Now the sighting of a pronghorn is rare, although there are still a small number in the valley. black bears are resident, with sightings as recent as July 17, 2008; they like to hide in the hills behind the towns and often are only in the valley for foraging or resting in caves. When they come into towns, they are sometimes tranquilized and relocated (but often just outside of town). Bobcats and coyotes are very common. Coyotes often howl or cry at night or day during spring, summer, and fall months. tortoises are not rare, but they often hide in burrows to escape the desert heat.Water issuesHuman water use in the Antelope Valley depends mainly on pumping of groundwater from the valleys aquifers and on importing of additional water from the Los Angeles aqueduct. Long-term groundwater pumping has lowered the table, thereby increasing pumping lifts, reducing well efficiency, and causing land subsidence.(Ikehara and Phillips (1994). Determination of land subsidence related to ground-water-level declines using global positioning system and leveling surveys in Antelope Valley and Los Angeles and Kern Counties, California, http://ca.water.usgs.gov/projects/av_subsidence.html) While aqueducts supply additional water to meet increasing human demand for agricultural, industrial, and domestic uses, diversion of water from the Joaquin River Delta in northern California has had, and continues to have, adverse environmental and social effects in the delta. Over decades, the competing uses for water supply and habitat have jeopardized the Deltas ability to meet either need. All stakeholders agree the estuary is in trouble and requires long-term solutions to ensure reliable, quality water supplies and a healthy ecosystem.(Department of Water Resources)Antelope Valleys rapid human population growth and development place considerable stress on the local and regional water systems. According to David Leighton of the United States Geological Survey (USGS), A deliberate management effort will be required to meet future water demand in the Antelope Valley without incurring significant economic and environmental costs associated with overuse of the ground-water resource.(USGS)Human historyThe first peoples of the Antelope Valley include the Kawaiisu,(http://web.archive.org/web/20080505080632/http://home.att.net/~write2kate/artbyhorseindex.html) Kitanemuk, Serrano, and Tataviam. The valley was first entered by Europeans in the 1770s during colonization of America. Father Garces, a Spanish Franciscan friar, is believed to have traveled the west end of the valley in 1776. By 1808, the invaders forced native peoples out of the valley and into missions.(http://www.colapublib.org/history/antelopevalley/faq.html#q16)Panoramic.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Panoramic view of LancasterSmith came through in 1827, and C. Fremont made a scientific observation of the valley in 1844 along with his other California explorations.Stagecoach lines came through the valley along its foothills after Fremonts visit and were the preferred way of travel for colonists before the coming of the Southern Pacific Railroad in 1876. The rail service linking the valley to the Central Valley and Los Angeles started the first large influx of white settlers to the valley, and farms and towns soon sprouted on the valley floor.The aircraft (now referred to as aerospace) industry took hold in the valley at Plant 42 in 1952. Edwards AFB, then called Muroc Army Air Field, was established in 1933.DemographicsIn recent decades the valley has become a community, to the Los Angeles area. Major housing tract development and population growth took off beginning in 1983, which has increased the population of Palmdale around 12 times its former size as of 2006. Neighboring Lancaster has increased its population since the early 1980s to around 3 times its former level. Major retail has followed the population influx, centered on Palmdales Valley Mall. The Antelope Valley is home to over 475,000 people, and the population is expected to reach 1,000,000 by the year 2020.Non-Hispanic whites make up approximately 48% of the population of the Antelope Valley and form a majority or plurality in most of its cities and towns. Hispanics are the next largest group, followed by Americans and Americans.Some long-term residents living far out in the desert have been cited by Los Angeles Countys Nuisance Abatement Teams for code violations, forcing them to make improvements or move. One of the properties is a church building which was used to film Kill Bill. The code enforcers have arrived on some of their visits in SWAT team formats. ()Military baseImage:STS-114 Landing.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Discovery (STS-114) touches down in the Antelope Valley (Air Force Base), (August 9, 2005)Air Force Base lies east of Rosamond, 37 miles (60 km) northeast of Palmdale. Edwards AFBs dry lakebeds are the lowest geographic elevation in the valley.Significant amounts of U.S. military flight testing is performed there, and it has been the site of many important aeronautical accomplishments, including the first flight to break the barrier.NASA shuttles originally landed at Edwards because the lake beds offer a vast landing area. NASA has since built a huge landing strip at Space Center, and Edwards remains the backup in case of bad weather at Canaveral.NASA Hugh L. Dryden Flight Research Center is a tenant organization at Edwards AFB. The Center is best known for the X-15 experimental rocket ship program. It has been the home of NASAs high-performance aircraft research since it was founded for the X-1 program. The Orbiter is serviced there when it lands at Edwards.IndustryAerospaceImage:Kluft-photo-SS1-landing-June-2004-Img 1406c.jpg|thumb|250px|right|SpaceShipOne (Flight 15P) landing at Air & Space Port (June 21, 2004)S. Air Force Plant 42 in northeast Palmdale is home to Martin, Boeing, Grumman, and Systems, among other aerospace-related companies. Notable projects assembled and/or designed there include the space shuttle orbiters, Spirit bomber, Nighthawk fighter, Joint Strike Fighter, and the L-1011 Tristar, a passenger jet aircraft.The newly dedicated Air & Space Port is also located in this region. The spaceport is famous as the base of operations for Composites, the company that designed SpaceShipOne and won the X-Prize.Much of the work done at these facilities is performed in coordination with Edwards Air Force Base and the NASA Dryden Flight Research Center (see above), from the creation and testing of proof-of-concept X-planes, to Space Shuttle operations, to the manufacturing and integration and testing of new military aviation equipment.AgricultureImage:Antelope vally spring.jpg|thumb|right|Antelope Valley in spring covered by a carpet of goldfields californica.The valleys first main industry as a part of the United States was agriculture. Historically known regionally for its extensive alfalfa fields and fruit crops, farmers now are growing a wider variety of crops, such as carrots, onions, lettuce, and potatoes. As housing tracts continue to build in the middle of the valley, the farm operations are now found farther to the west and east sides than in previous decades.MiningThe second largest borax open-pit mine in the world is located near Boron. Public touring is available.Manufacturing* U.S. Pole Company Inc.* Senior Systems Technology* Scientific* Lance Camper Manufacturing Corporation* Harvest Farms Inc.EducationColleges and universities* The University of Antelope Valley is the first native University to the Antelope Valley. It consists of two campuses located in Lancaster and a satellite classroom in Rosamond, CA. UAV offers a variety of certificate programs and several courses for Associate and Bachelor degrees, along with one Masters program in Criminal Justice.* The Valley Community College District is the local public college system that covers the area with a primary service area of  covering portions of Los Angeles and Kern counties. Instruction is offered at multiple sites, including Palmdale and Lancaster, as well as through online and instructional television courses. It has 2 campuses. The main one, Valley College is a comprehensive community college located in Lancaster. The college offers Associate in Arts/Associate in Science (two-year) degrees in 67 fields, as well as certificate programs in 56 vocational areas. It also hosts a satellite location of State University, Bakersfield-Antelope Valley, where students can obtain bachelors and masters degrees. Enrollment for the 2007-2008 academic year exceeds 14,000. The second campus is a satellite campus in Palmdale with an enrollment of just over 500.* of Phoenix has a satellite campus in Lancaster.* of La Verne has a satellite campus in Palmdale.* University and its Graduate School of Management has a satellite campus in Palmdale.* University has a satellite campus in Palmdale.* The Institute at the Institute of Technology is a facility in Palmdale at the Civic Center. It is operated by the Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), and the City of Palmdale, and distance learning through a number of universities is available including Purdue, USC, of San Diego, University, Aeronautical University, Caltech and Poly Pomona. This specialized school offers graduate and undergraduate education in aerospace science, engineering, and technical skills.* Coast Baptist College in Lancaster, is an unaccredited Independent Fundamental Baptist Bible college offering graduate and undergraduate degrees in Pastoral studies, evangelism, missions, church ministries, music, Christian education, youth ministry, and secretarial studies. West Coast opened in 1995, and now has about 1,000 students.* The University Center in Lancaster provides local students education in engineering and technology. The $3.5 million reconstruction of Challenger Hall, located at the old Antelope Valley Fairgrounds, gave the new campus 13 classrooms, 2 of which are high tech distance learning rooms and 2 of which are lab classrooms, as well as office space. The school was created through partnerships with California State University, Bakersfield, State University, Fresno, and local aerospace companies.* Care Institute, Inc. in Lancaster, is an accredited vocational school offering training in allied health field programs such as vocational nursing, medical assisting, medical billing, and limited permit x-ray technician.  The school was founded in 1998, by Edmund Carrasco, who serves as the Chief Executive Officer.  Career Care Institute has experienced steady growth by opening its second campus in the City of Ventura in 2004, and its third campus in the Moreno Valley Mall in 2007.  The school maintains the best passage rates on the National Council Licensure Examination for Practical Nurses in the Antelope Valley.High schools* The Valley Union High School District is the primary public school district covering the vast majority of high school education in the metropolitan Palmdale and Lancaster area. The district has 25,000 students in 8 regular high schools in Palmdale and Lancaster, a continuation school in each city, and a trade school in Palmdale. These are:** Valley High School - Lancaster** Valley Regional Occupational Program (AV ROP) - Palmdale** Winds High School - Lancaster** Eastside High School - Lancaster** Highland High School - Palmdale** Lancaster High School - Lancaster** High School - Littlerock, California** High School - Palmdale** Knight High School - Palmdale** Hill High School - Quartz Hill** Rex Parris Continuation High School - Palmdale* The Kern Unified School District provides all public school education in Rosamond and nearby Willow Springs.* The Joint Unified School District provides all public school education for Air Force Base, and the northern Antelope Valley communities of North Edwards, and Boron.* The Unified School District provides all public school education in the northern Antelope Valley communities of Mojave and California City.There are also several private and home school high schools in the area, most notably:* Abraham Lincoln High School - Rosamond* High School* Christian High School* Valley Christian School - Lancaster* Christian High School* High School* Sands Charter Schools - Lancaster* Sands Charter Schools - Palmdale* Opportunities for Learning Charter Schools - Lancaster* Opportunities for Learning Charter Schools - PalmdaleSchool districts* The School District is the areas largest school district, with an enrollment of over 28,000 in 29 schools. The district covers the central portion of the city.* The Lancaster School District is the areas third largest school district after Palmdale and the A.V. High School District. This school district covers most of central and part of eastern Lancaster with 15,000 students in 19 schools.* The Union School District covers western Palmdale and Lancaster and their immediate suburbs including Quartz Hill, Del Sur, Leona Valley, and Antelope Acres. It has over 8,250 students in 11 schools.* The Union School District covers eastern Lancaster with 3,500 students in 4 schools.* The Union School District covers eastern Palmdale and its immediate suburbs, including the eastern Antelope Valley communities of Lake Los Angeles, Pearblossom, Littlerock, Sun Village, Llano, and Valyermo. It has 6 schools with over 3,000 students.* The Kern Unified School District provides all public school education in Rosamond and nearby Willow Springs.* The Joint Unified School District provides all public school education for Air Force Base, and the northern Antelope Valley communities of North Edwards, and Boron.* The Unified School District provides all public school education in the northern Antelope Valley communities of Mojave and California City.CultureThe Antelope Valley Symphony Orchestra is a professional ensemble that performs four concerts each year at the Lancaster Performing Arts Center. It is an auxiliary of Antelope Valley College, and performs regularly with the Antelope Valley College Civic Orchestra.ParksFile:Antelope Valley Poppy Preserve.jpg|thumb| Valley California Poppy Reserve, March 2008* Valley California Poppy Reserve, home to Californias state flower* B. Ripley Desert Woodland State Park* Valley Indian Museum State Historic Park* Butte State Park* Devils Punchbowl County ParkHospitals* Valley Hospital* Regional Medical Center The Antelope Valley was formerly served by a county hospital, High Desert Hospital, which was converted into an urgent care clinic in 2003 due to the countys budget problems.  As a result, indigent patients with serious but non-life-threatening medical conditions must seek treatment at View  UCLA Medical Center in Sylmar, which is over 50 miles away.TransportationFile:STS-128 landing 01.jpg|thumb|Shuttle Discovery touches down at Air Force Base, 2009.Major highways and roadsInclude:* Forest Highway, a key county road, connects Palmdale with Crest Highway as an alternate route to the Los Angeles basin.* The Valley Freeway (State Route 14)* State Route 18 (connects SR 138 east of Palmdale to Victor Valley and U.S.Route 395) There is currently a proposal to turn this into a freeway.* State Route 138 (of which Highway comprises its eastern leg)* State Route 58 (freeway status now that the new Mojave bypass has been completed)* U.S. Route 395 (which technically lies east of the Valley proper)On the ridgeline of the San Gabriel Mountains, the Angeles Crest Highway (State Route 2) snakes 60 miles (100 km) through the National Forest to La Canada Flintridge and the Greater Los Angeles metropolitan region.Rail* Metrolink passenger rail service to the Los Angeles Basin and other parts of Southern California provides service to Antelope Valley commuters at its Lancaster, Palmdale, and Vincent Grade/Acton stations.* Amtrak passenger rail service has a commuter bus that stops at the Transportation Center and the Lancaster Metrolink station, connecting Antelope Valley residents to the national rail network.* A future rail line is planned between the Palmdale Transportation Center and Palmdale Regional Airport. This will connect the airport directly with the extensive California transit network. As of 2007 it is still unknown whether this will be a subway or an rail line.* The High Speed Rail authority has designated Palmdale as a stop on the future rail line between San Francisco and San Diego. Due to a lack of funding, as of 2007 it will be several years before this project is begun.Bus* The Valley Transit Authority is the local city-bus system for metropolitan Palmdale and Lancaster. The service also operates a commuter bus network from its hubs at the Transportation Center and the Lancaster Park & Ride to several locations in Los Angeles.* Bus has stops at the Palmdale Transportation Center and the Lancaster Metrolink station.Airports* Regional Airport, co-sited with Plant 42 is by far the largest and busiest airport in the valley and is owned by Angeles World Airports (LAWA), the Los Angeles city government entity which owns and operates LAX. Although mostly military flights occur at this airport, it also has an unused commercial terminal.* William J. Fox Airfield in Lancaster is the valleys busiest general aviation airport. It is the fourth largest airport in the valley. Charter air service and helicopter rides are available. This airport also has the valleys only aviation school.* Airport in Inyokern, near Ridgecrest, is a large general aviation airport with limited commercial airline service to Angeles International Airport, serving the northern Antelope Valley and Indian Wells Valley communities. Charter service is also available. It is the areas third largest airport.* Air & Space Port in Mojave is a large civil aviation center and the second largest airport in the valley. Voyager and SpaceShipOne were developed and flown from its location.* Valley Airport in Tehachapi is a gliderport, privately owned but open to the public, which offers glider training for civilian and military pilots* Municipal Airport in Tehachapi is a small general aviation airport.* Dulce Airpark in Agua Dulce is a medium sized general aviation airport.* Skypark Airport in Rosamond is a small general aviation airport, privately owned and operated.* City Municipal Airport in California City is a small general aviation airport.* Airport in Llano is a small airstrip principally dedicated to glider flights.Notable peopleFile:Chuck Yeager.jpg|thumb|Yeager with Glennis at Muroc, circa 1947Some people of note have spent time in the valley, including:* Aud, actor/stuntman turned professional poker player, went to High School before transferring over to Bethel Christian.* Garland, then known in the valley as Frances Gumm. As a girl, she would sing in public to her Lancaster neighbors.* Wayne, then known as Marion Morrison, was briefly a Lancaster schoolboy who was known not to tie up his horse properly when he left it by the street, as was the old time custom.* Fry, a contactee, attended Antelope Valley High School in Lancaster during the 1920s.* The 90s R&B group All-4-One was from the AV.* Huxley drew writing inspiration from the solitude found at his Llano home. A little known childrens book, The Crows of Pearblossom, is set in the valley and was the only childrens book he is known to have written.* Barnes the legendary aviatrix and friend to the U.S. Air Forces test pilots of what is now called Edwards Air Force Base, established the celebrated Bottom Riding Club near Rogers Dry Lake in 1935, later living in Cantil and Boron.* Yeager was an early USAF test pilot at then-Muroc Army Air Field, now known as Edwards Air Force Base, where he became the first to break the sound barrier on October 14, 1947.* Zappa attended Valley High School in Lancaster, graduating in 1958. He met Van Vliet (Captain Beefheart) there, a fellow student at the time.* McKenna noted writer, public speaker, philosopher, psychonaut, and ethnobotanist graduated from Antelope Valley High School in 1965.* Dandurand, more frequently known as Duran, lives in Palmdale due to his daily radio show.* Hedren, who made her major motion picture debut in The Birds, is an Acton resident since at least 1981 (Acton not being in the valley proper, but nearby to the south).* Michael Deaver, former aide to Reagan, is a former Mojave resident.* Soliah, who achieved notoriety as a member of the Liberation Army in the 1970s and then as a fugitive living a quiet, middle-class life in Paul, Minnesota, grew up in Desert View Highlands, graduating from Palmdale High School in 1965.* Rutan and his brother Rutan of Composites, the firm which produced SpaceShipOne and the Voyager aerospace vehicles, work out of Air & Space Port in Mojave.* Lee Ermey of Metal Jacket and Call fame is a current Palmdale resident.* Home to members of the punk bands Shoes and Killradio.* Joseph Foreman, more frequently known as Afroman, lives in Palmdale.See also Walk of Honor - downtown Lancaster sidewalk tribute to the U. S. Air Force flight test community.* Vilma Drever, who started the non-profit animal rescue called Antelope Valley Dog and Cat Rescue where Vilma ventures out into the desert to find, rescue and rehabilitate pets.Valley place namesCities over 100,000 population* Lancaster (population 156,633) - incorporated in 1977* Palmdale (population 152,750) - incorporated in 1962Cities less than 100,000 population* California City (population 14,828) - incorporated in 1965*Centennial (planned for 70,000).(Jon Gertner, Playing Sim City for Real, New York Times Magazine, March 18, 2007)Unincorporated towns and districtsOver 10,000 population* Rosamond (18,150)* Lake Los Angeles (12,328)* Quartz Hill (10,912)* Sun Village (11,302)Under 10,000 population* Acton (technically in the Gabriel Mountains) (7,596)* Agua Dulce (technically in the San Gabriel Mountains) (4,254)* Antelope Acres (3,059)* Boron (2,253)* Del Sur (1,750)* Elizabeth Lake (technically in the Leona Valley) (1,756)* Inyokern (technically in the Indian Wells Valley)* Johannesburg* Juniper Hills (1,101)* Lake Hughes (technically in the Leona Valley)* Leona Valley (technically in the Leona Valley)* Littlerock (1,377)* Llano (739)* Mojave (2,942)* Monolith (technically in the Tehachapi Valley)* Neenach (560)* North Edwards* Pearblossom (2,435)* Pinon Hills (technically in the Victor Valley)* Randsburg* Saltdale* Valyermo (691)* Wilsona Gardens (210)* Willow Springs (1,784)ReferencesExternal links* The Geography of Suburban Sprawl in the Antelope Valley: In-depth study of the Valleys historical development and recent (1990s) urban conditions* Antelope Valley New Press* Antelope Valley Restaurant Guide Antelope Valleys Restaurant menu listing and directory.* Antelope Valley Press* Antelope Valley Weekly* Antelope Valley Indian Museum and State Historical Park* Antelope Valley Conservancy* Antelope Valley Business DirectorydAntelopeValleyValleyja:
503228
Coal_miner
#REDIRECT mining
505838
Khammam
Buddhists (0.02%).Khammam (Telugu: ), is the headquarters of the District in Pradesh state of India and is located about  east of state capital, Hyderabad. Recently, AP govt has announced Khammam as Municipal Corporation, adding 14 villages around it which developed in business with the town.HistoryThe present name of Khammam is said to have been derived from the name of the temple Narsimhadri, later Stamba Sikhari and then it was termed as Stambadhri which has an ancient temple of Narasimha Swamy on its top.This temple is believed to have been existing since Yuga. The vertical rock under the temple is known as KAMBA(Urdu) which literally means piller. The name of the town Khammam has been derived from Kambam Mettu to Khammam Mettu  to the present Khammam. The district is named as Khammam.The town is located on the banks of a river called Munneru which is a tributary of the River. Khammam district has a lot of historical importance in Pradesh.There is a festival held in Khammam remembering the old name Stambhadri.It is held in Taruni hut showing the culture of Khammam people. Khammam town which was the seat of Taluk Administration was part of the larger Warangal District, till 1 October 1953. Five taluks of the Warangal district viz., Khammam, Madhira, Yellandu, Burgampadu and Paloncha (Now Kothagudem) were carved out and a new district Khammam with Khammam as District Headquarters. In 1959 Bhadrachalam Revenue Division consisting Bhadrachalam and Nuguru Venkatapuram Taluks of East Godawari district, which were on the other side of the river Godawari were merged into Khammam on grounds of geographical contiguity and administrative viability.In 1973 a new taluk with Sathupalli as headquarters was formed carving out from Madhira and Kothagudem taluks. In the year 1976 four new taluks were formed viz., Tirumalayapalem, Sudimalla, Aswaraopeta and  Several famous people such as Vengala Rao, former Chief Minister of AP, K. Venkata Ramiah, Founder Vice-chancellor of KU  hail from Khammam. Historical Account of the Godavary District in the Presidencyof Madras, H. Morris, 1878, London, p. 216).(A manual of the Krishna district in the presidency of Madras,  Gordon Mackenzie, 1883, Madras, p. 25, 80)(Buddhist remains in ndhra and the history of ndhra between 224 & 610 A.D., K. R. Subramanian, p. 149)(A Handbook for India, Part I, Madras, John Murray, 1859, London)(The Geography of India, J. Burgess, 1871, London, p. 48)(The Church Missionary Intelligencer,Volume 2,1866, London, p. 73)Educational institutionsMining University under kakatiya university is only a major institute.It is the only one of its kind in the country.It is located in Kothagudem,the head of Singareni Colleries.manair educational institutions are famous in the district.Mamatha medical college,khammam is also one of the famous and top private medical institute in the state..GeographyKhammam is located at .(Falling Rain Genomics, Inc - Khammam) It has an average elevation of 107 metres (351 feet). The district is bounded by Chhattisgarh state to the north, Orissa state to the northeast, East and Godavari districts to the east, District to the south, Nalgonda District to the southwest, and Warangal District to the west. It has an area of 16,029 km. Well known power city, Kothagudem, is located in this district.Also Sattupalli a new power city started.khammam culture is a mixed culture of telangana and andhra, people of kmm city is well coordinate with east & west godavari, krishna. this city is nearer to vijayawada,eluru,tiruvur,nuziveedu,warangal, suryapet,kodad, Nalgonda and hyderabad.there are 11engeneering colleges,20 mba,mca colleges,6 pharmacy colleges,8degree colleges around the khammam city.1-the vazir sultan college of engineering2-sbce3-kits4-sarada5-bomma6-sbit7-vijaya8-mahmadiya9-dare10-pulipati11-laqshyaFreedom MovementHistory of khammam shows that it has produced a number of leaders who were part of the Freedom struggle and Telangana Movement; Khammam district was initially a part of larger Warangal District.* 1857 - First Independence Movement  Bhadrachalam area* 1879 - Rompa Revolution by Pulitanti Sambaiah, Kuru Thimma Dora, Ambul Reddy, Bandala Chandraiah* 1920 - Seetharama Raju Manyam Revolution by Darikonda Venkatappaiah, Chinthalachervu Venkatadri, Kurichati Venkata Subba Rao* 1931 - First Independence movement in Khammam proper* 1934 - Library Movement. Viraatrayandhra Grandhalayam at Nelakonda-pally was reorganised for movement by Pendyala Satya Narayana Rao. The Library was established in 1912.* 1935 - First Library established in Khammam town* 1935 - Satyagraha Movement by Pendyala Satya Narayana rao, Peravelli Venkata Ramanaiah, Nedumuri Jagannatha Rao, Pabbaraju Ranga Rao, Sarvadevabhatla Ramadham, Jamalapuram Nizam Movement, Jamalapuram Keshava Rao, Madapati Ramachandar Rao, Pandit Rudra Dev, Miriyala Narayana Reddy, Chandra Lakshmi Narayana, Bachu Simhadri* 1938 -Established Palair rytu project under the leadership of Pendyala Satya Narayana Rao* 1941 - Freedom movement writers (Darasathi Brothers)* 1942 -Established Political schools in many parts of Warangal district by Pendyala Satya Narayana Rao to activate the anti Rytu activities in Jamabandi which was conducted by Patel, Patwari and other officials of Nizam.* 1944 - State Congress National Conference at Jujjula-rao-peta* 1944 - Bandi-pattala Movement (Farmers Movement) by Pendyala Satya Narayana Rao, Gangavarapu Sreenivasa Rao, K.L. Narasimha Rao*1945  -12th State Andhra Mahasabha meeting at Khammam organised by Pendyala Satya Narayana Rao as general secretary, Aahvana sangham. Elected Baddam Ellareddy as president and Pendyala Satya Narayana Rao as vice-president to 13th State Andhra Mahasabha in that meeting. The meeting was held on march 26,27 and 28th. Puchala-pally Sundaraiah participated in the meeting as guest.* 1946 - Mahathma Gandhis visit to Khammam mett (Khammam town) on 5 August 1946* 1946 -Pendyala satyanarayana rao General secretary, Warangal district Andhramaha sabha and communist party attended the All India samshtaan peoples conference on June 8 and 9 at NEW DELHI as a member of standing committee from the Nizam state.Then the movement takes turn into complete freedom.* 1947 August, 7  Satyagraham at Madhira and Khammam by Jamalapuram Kesava Rao, Kurapati Venkata Raju, Vattikonda Ramakotaiah, Heeralal Moriya, Kolipaka Kishan Rao, Gella Keshava Rao, Pullabhotla Venkateswarlu (Hyderabad congress present)* 1969 - Non mulki go back movement started in kothagudem which turned into a very big telangana agitation later on......* 2009 - Blow out of telangana agitation when KCR shifted from karimnagar to Khammam while he was on the way to hungerstrike for the cause of telangana...Felicitation by the Chief Minister of Andhra PradeshKilaru Varadaiah the noted village leader from V Venkatayapalem was felicitated by the late Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh Jalagam Vengala rao.Kilaru Varadaiah was also given the best village leader award by the collector of Khammam prior to that.DemographicsAs of the 2001 Indian census,() Khammam had a population of 158,022. Males constitute 51% of the population and females 49%. Khammam has an average literacy rate of 87.72 %, greater than the national average of 59.5% with female literacy of 84.16 %. In Khammam, 11% of the population is under 6 years of age.Khammam declared as Municipal Corporation in 2011Tourist destinations*Bhadrachalam*Fort*Parnasala*Nelakondapalli*Kinnerasani DAM/Reservoir*Hills*Neeladri*Madhira*Stambhadri Narasimha swamy temple (gutta)*lake, Khammam city*Danavayagudem Gardens*Paleru reservoir*wyra reservoir*Shivalayam in Kusumanchi*Jakkepalli Jatara on Shivaratri*Sri Ramgiri*Parnasala* damTransportationKhammam town has a good road and rail travel facility.By RoadKhammam is well connected to major cities and towns in Andhrapradesh.A.P.S.R.T.C service provides many bus facilities to Bhadrachalam, Hyderabad, Vishakapatnam, Kothagudem, Manuguru, Nalgonda and many other towns and cities in districts in Andhra Pradesh.A large fleet of buses are provided from here to Bhadrachalam,the Temple Town and Manuguru and Kothagudem,the Coal town of South India  and Sathupalli and Yellandu.Special luxury buses & Hitech Buses are newly set for & Bengaluru,the shrine of Shri Sai Baba and new buses are being set for Mantralayam,the shrine for Shri Raghavendra Swamy.Khammam also has a State Highway Rajamundry-Warangal passing through it,decreasing the journey distance between Vishakapatnam and Warangal.It has a good road quality in the town.Due to the heavy rush in the present Bus Station, a new Bus Station is being constructed in the Indira nagar which is to be completed in the year of 2012.A new OUTER RING ROAD is also being constructed round the town.By RailKhammam is one of the major Railway stations on the Hyderabad-Vijayawada Railway line which connects the town with Hyderabad, Vijayawada, Vishakapatnam, Tirupati, Bhadrachalam Rd. and trains going to major cities in India like Kolkata, New Delhi, Mumbai, Chennai take halt at this station.  The town is 13 km from the Dornakal, which is a railway junction connects it to Bhadrachalam Rd. Station, the Kothagudems Railway station from which there are bus services to the Temple town, Bhadrachalam.  A new railway line is proposed from Khammam to Sathupalli Coal mines.By AirKhammam is 199 km from RGIA Airport in Hyderabad .A new Airport proposal at Kothagudem(or) in Khammam  is under proposalKhammam RoadsKhammam has a well road system.There are road connections to Bhadrachalam, Kodad, Suryapet, Bonakal, Warangal, Yellandu, Sathupalli the primary towns comes after this major town in all the directions.  The road from the Bhadrachalam to Khammam town divides into two, one for Warangal State Highway and another for the Khammam Main Road which connects to the Bus Stand and routes for other towns.The Main Road connects the major business sector of the town also called as the Wyra Road.  It connects the people to the District Collectrate, SBH Bank, SBI Bank and many other major shopping centres with tall buildings and attractive designs.  This road is a big road having a divider with plants bringing the beauty to the road.  The major junctions like Ambedkar junction and the Yellandu Cross Road junction, where starts the route to Yellandu is one of the busiest roads in the town.This Yellandu cross road connects to Warangal State Highway in a famous junction called the NTR Marg where the other statues exist with NTR,Lal Bhagjeevan and Telangana Thalli statue making it the biggest multiple junction in the town.  The town has three Railway bridges and two river bridges.  The Bus Stand road gives the way to the Railway Station and is one of the busiest traffic roads in the town also giving route to the Head Post Office.  There is a major centre called Gandhi Chowk nearest to the Railways in Khammam.  This centre being the shopping and residential colony is named after the Great Mahatma Gandhi who visited and talked with people here.Today, this is a major Jewel centre in Khammam almost serving more than 10 jewel shops in the same area.There is a tall and big Anjaneya Swamy Statue in the centre of Gandhi Chowk which is a major junction where you can see many jewel shops around and there is an easy straight route from this statue to the Second Side of the Railway Station.  The Bus Stand center also comprises with busy traffic road from here to the main entry of the Railway Station and has many textile shops around, called the Kaman Bazar major hub of textiles in this town.  Mayuri center is the major junction very near to the Bus Stand where the Railway Bridge starts.The other way from here gives the many of the television Headquarters of the town and the internet centers and the famous Hotel Vishnu where the celebrities of the Cinemas and Serials meet the people.This same route gives the way to the District Public Library and the Pavillion Grounds where major sports and political events takes place and the only Bus Depo in the town.This road also gives direct connection to the Bypass Road.Khammam TheatresThere are about 9 theatres in Khammam town.Srinivasa Theatre (in front of Head Post Office)Tirumala Theatre (near Wyra road)Aditya Theatre (near Bonakal cross road)Raghava Theatre (P.S.R Road)Sundarmax Theatre (near Gandhi Chowk)Nartaki megaplex (near Gandhi Chowk)Sairam Theatre (Kalvoddu)vinodha mahal(mayuri centre)kinnerasani theatre venkateshwara etc...Khammam FloodsKhammam was also effected by the floods of Munneru, the tributary of Krishna River.In 2007, the floods stuck by the River drowned the Bokkalagadda with the heavy 3 day rain. Again in 2009, floods stuck and drowned the area again.Proposal was also there for the construction of barricade here.FCI Godowns in Khammam release the food for the victims whenever flood comes.ReferencesExternal links* Official website of Classifieds Khammam District.* Official website of Khammam District in telugu.* Official website of Khammam District.* http://www.hellokhammam.ines:Khammamhi:bpy:it:Khammampam:Khammamnew:pt:Khammamru:ta:te:vi:Khammam
507099
Dalnegorsk
dateMay 2010Dalnegorsk (, lit. far in the mountains) is a town in Krai, Russia.  It was formerly known from its founding in 1899 as Tetyukhe (; ; literally meaning river of wild boars), until it was renamed in the 1970s as part of a campaign to change any Chinese-derived placenames in the Primorsky Krai.HistoryThe settlement of Tetyukhe was founded in 1899, with the founding of a lead and zinc mine by Swiss immigrant Julius Brynner.  Brynners son Boris maintained the right to mine on the site until 1931, one of the longest-running private enterprises in the Union.  Boris Brynners son Brynner later became a famous actor in the States.(Mining history of the town on the website of Dalnegorsk (Russian))In 1930 the Tetyukhe was designated an settlement.  The settlement was renamed in 1972, along with the Tetyukhe River which was rechristened Rudnaja, from the Russian word Ruda meaning ore.  Town status was granted to Dalnegorsk in 1989.EconomyMost population of the town are employed by two industrial enterprises: JSC Bor and JSC Dalpolimetal.Established in 1965, Bor is the worlds largest specialized chemical enterprise. Due to the unique deposits of commercial minerals found in the district and the high technologies Bor successfully operates in the world market and is included in the list of Russias 40 most prospective enterprises.  75% of its production is exported to the Kingdom, Italy, France, Japan, Australia, Korea, China, and other countries in Europe and Asia.Dalpolimetal (established in 1897) produces 58% of Russias lead; Pristan has a large smelting plant. Two thirds of its production is exported to Japan, China, and Korea.Despite the highly-developed industrialization of Dalnegorsk, over 90% of the territory under its jurisdiction is covered with Pine and mixed broadleaf forests which attract nature tourism enthusiasts. However, Dalnegorsk residents suffer from serious lead poisoning from an old smelter and the unsafe transport of lead concentrate from the local lead mining site. This led the Institute to declare Dalnegorsk and neighboring Pristan as one of the 10 worst polluted places on earth.(Website of Blacksmith Institute)  However, according to Anatoly Lebedev, leader of the ecological NGO BROK, this inclusion is questionable.(Regnum New Agency.  Ecologists of Primorye Territory (Russia) surprised at listing Rudnaya Pristan among the most polluted places in the world)TransportDalnegorsk is connected by road to Vladivostok (517 km).  The nearest railway station (Chuguyevka) is located 198 km from Dalnegorsk.  The nearest sea port in 35 km from the town at Pristan.PoliticsOn October 19, 2006, three days before the elections, Dmitry Fotyanov, the mayoral candidate from the Russia party who came second in the initial round of elections,(Mosnews.com News.  Contenders Murder Leads to Canceled Elections in Russias Far East) was gunned down with Kalashnikov assault rifle fire.(ITAR-TASS.  Mayoral candidate killed in Dalnegorsk)  The weapons were located by the police in a minivan that was blown up near the offices of the local newspaper soon after the murder.(News.  Election murder in Russian town)  The run-off election was called off as both remaining candidates agreed to stand down.(  The United Russia party called Fotyanovs death a political murder.Alleged UFO incidentIzvestkovaya, also known as Height 611, is located in Dalnegorsk.  It is the place of the 611 UFO Incident of 1986.ReferencesExternal links*Official website of Dalnegorsk*Giant Crystals of the Dalnegorsk minesar:de:Dalnegorskeo:Dalnegorskfa:fr:Dalnegorskko:hr:Daljnegorskit:Dalnegorsklt:Dalnegorskashu:Dalnyegorszknl:Dalnegorskja:no:Dalnegorsknn:Dalnegorskpl:Dalniegorskru:tl:Dalnegorskwar:Dalnegorskdiq:Dalnegorskzh:
509891
History_of_British_Columbia
Columbia is the westernmost province in Canada. Originally politically constituted as a pair of British colonies, British Columbia joined the Confederation on July 20, 1871.Early history (until 1774)tea party.jpg|thumb|right|Tsimshian people c. 1890, Metlakatla.British Columbia, before the arrival of the Europeans, was home to many Indigenous peoples speaking more than 30 different languages, including Babine, Beaver, Carrier, Tsilhqotin, Gitksan, Haida, Halkomelem, Kaska, Kutenai, Statimcets, Nisgaa, Nuu-chah-nulth, Nuxlk, Sekani, Secwepemc, Sinixt, Swxw7mesh, Tagish, Tahltan, Nlakapamux, Tlingit, Tsetsaut, and Tsimshian.The abundance of natural resources, particularly salmon and cedar, enabled the development of a complex hierarchical society on the Columbia Coast. With so much food being available, the peoples of the B.C. coast could focus their time on other pursuits such as art, politics, and warfare.Early European explorations (1774-1788)The arrival of Europeans began around the mid-18th century, as traders entered the area to harvest otters. While it is thought that Francis Drake may have explored the British Columbian coast in 1579,  it was Francisco de la Bodega y Quadra who completed the first documented voyage, which took place in 1775. In doing so, Quadra reasserted the Spanish claim for the Pacific coast, first made by Nez de Balboa in 1513.In 1774, the Spanish navigator Jos Prez Hernndez, a native of Majorca, sailed from San Blas, Galicia (modern-day Western Mexico), with instructions to reach 60 north latitude to discover possible Russian settlements and take possession of the lands for the Spanish Crown. Hernndez reached 55 north latitude, becoming the first European to sight the Charlotte Islands and Island. He traded with the natives near Point, although apparently without landing. The expedition was forced to return to Nueva Galicia, due to the lack of provisions.(Centro de Investigacin Cientfica y de Educacin Superior de Ensenada)(Nootka Sound Service LTDs website)Since Prez Hernndezs first expedition failed to achieve its objective, the Spanish organized a second expedition in 1775 with the same goal. This expedition was commanded by de Heceta on board the Santiago, piloted by Prez Hernndez, and accompanied by Francisco de la Bodega y Quadra in La Sonora. After illnesses, storms, and other troubles had affected the expedition, de Heceta returned to Nueva Galicia, while Quadra kept on a northward course, ultimately reaching 59 North in what today is Alaska.(The Online Encyclopedia of Washington State History)  During this expedition, the Spanish made sure to land several times and formally claim the lands for the Spanish Crown, while verifying the absence of Russian settlements along the coast. In the following years, several other Spanish expeditions would set sail from Nueva Galicia bound for the Northwest.Three years later, in 1778, the British Navy Captain Cook arrived in the region, searching for the Passage, and successfully landed at Sound on Island, where he and his crew traded with the Nuu-chah-nulth First Nation.  Upon trading his goods for sea otter pelts, his crew in turn traded them for an enormous profit in Macau on their way back to Britain. This led to an influx of traders to the British Columbian coast, and ongoing economic contact with the aboriginal peoples there. Early European settlements (1788-1790s) Image:Nootka Sound NASA.PNG|thumb|left|Sound marked in Island.Image:Spanish fort San Miguel at Nootka in 1793.jpg|thumb|right|Reconstruction of San Miguel.Image:Vancouver-friendly-cove.jpg|thumb|right|Cove, Sound. Volume I, plate VII from: A Voyage of Discovery to the North Pacific Ocean and Round the World by Vancouver.In 1788, Meares, an English navigator and explorer, sailed from China and explored Sound and the neighbouring coasts.  He bought some land from a local chief named Maquinna and built a post there.Two years later, in 1789, the Spanish commander Jos Martnez, a native of Seville, established a settlement and started building a fort in Cove, Sound, which was named San Miguel.  This territory was already considered as part of Spain by the Spanish due to the previous explorations of the region.  Upon Martinezs arrival, a number of British ships were seized, including those of Captain Meares. This originated the Crisis, which almost led to a war between Britain and Spain.  The controversy resulted in the abandonment of the Nootka Sound settlement by the Spanish.  Some months later, Antonio Flores, of New Spain, ordered a de Eliza to rebuild the fort.  The expedition, composed of three ships, the Concepcin, under the command of De Eliza, the San Carlos, under the command of Fidalgo and the Princesa Real, under the command of Quimper, sailed in early 1790 from Blas in Nueva Galicia and arrived at Nootka Sound in April of that year. The expedition had many Catalan volunteers from the Free Company of Volunteers of Catalonia, commanded by dAlbern, a native of Tortosa. The expedition rebuilt the fort, which had been dismantled after Martnez abandoned it. The rebuilt fort included several defensive constructions as well as a garden to ensure the settlement had food supplies. The Catalan volunteers left the fort in 1792 and Spanish influence in the region ended in 1795 after the Convention came into force.(Catalans al Canad, page 7, study from the Fundaci dEstudis Histrics de Catalunya) Late British expeditions (1790s-1821) Subsequently, European explorer-merchants from the east started to discover British Columbia. Three figures dominate in the early history of mainland British Columbia: Sir Alexander Mackenzie, Simon Fraser, and David Thompson.  As employees of the West Company, the three were primarily concerned with discovering a practicable river route to the Pacific, specifically via the River, for the extension of the trade. In 1793, Mackenzie became the first European to reach the Pacific overland north of the Grande. He and his crew entered the region through the Mountains via the Peace River, reaching the ocean at Bentinck Arm, near present-day Bella Coola. Shortly thereafter, Mackenzies companion, John Finlay, founded the first permanent European settlement in British Columbia, Fort St. John, located at the junction of the Beatton and Peace Rivers.Simon Fraser was the next to try to find the course of the Columbia. During his expedition of 1805-09, Fraser and his crew, including John Stuart, explored much of the British Columbia interior, establishing several forts (Hope, Trout Lake Fort, Fort George, Fraser, and Fort St. James). Frasers expedition took him down the river that now bears his name, to the site of present-day Vancouver. Although both Mackenzie and Fraser reached the Pacific, they found the routes they took impassable for trade. It was David Thompson who found the Columbia River and followed it down to its mouth in 1811. He was unable to establish a claim, however, for the American explorers and Clark had already claimed the territory for the United States of America six years earlier. The Fur Company of Jacob Astor had founded Astoria just months before Thompson arrived, though within a year the local staff at Astoria sold the fort and others in the region to the North West Company, which renamed it Fort George.  Though returned to US hands as a result of treaty complications at the end of the of 1812, this meant only there was a parallel US fort adjacent to the NWC one, which was the more prosperous of the two.  Following the forced merger of the North West Company and Hudsons Bay Company in 1821, Vancouver was established as the new regional headquarters.From fur trade districts to colonies (1821-1858)Although technically a part of North America, British Columbia was largely run by the Bay Company after its merger with the North West Company in 1821. The Central Interior of the region was organized into the New Caledonia District, a name that came to be generally attributed to the mainland as a whole. It was administered from Fort St. James, about 150 km northwest of present-day Prince George. The Interior south of the River and north of California was named by the company the District, and was administered first from Fort Vancouver, and later from Fort Victoria.Fort Victoria was established as a trading post in 1843, both as a means to protect HBC interests, as well as to assert British claims to Vancouver Island and the adjacent Islands. In 1844, the States Democratic Party asserted that the U.S. had a legitimate claim to the entire Country, but President James Polk was prepared to draw the border along the 49th parallel, the longstanding U.S. proposal. When the British rejected this offer, Polk broke off negotiations, and American expansionists reasserted the claim, coining slogans (most famously Forty or Fight!). With the outbreak of the War diverting attention and resources, Polk was again prepared to compromise. The boundary dispute was settled in the 1846 Treaty of Washington. The terms of the agreement established the border between British North America and the United States at the 49th parallel from the Mountains to the sea, the original American compromise proposal, with all of Vancouver Island retained as British territory. In 1849, the Crown of Vancouver Island was created; and in 1851, James Douglas was appointed Governor. Douglas, known as the father of British Columbia, established colonial institutions in Victoria. Meanwhile on the mainland, New Caledonia continued to be an unorganized region, its 100 or so non-native inhabitants (mostly HBC employees and their families) under the administrative oversight of Douglas, who was also the HBCs regional chief executive.Colonial British Columbia (1858-1871)In 1858, gold was found along the banks of the River just east of what is now British Columbia, triggering the Canyon Gold Rush. When word got out to Francisco about gold in British territory, Victoria was transformed overnight into a tent city as prospectors, speculators, land agents, and outfitters flooded in from around the world, mostly via Francisco. The Hudsons Bay Companys Fort Langley burgeoned economically as the staging point for many of the prospectors heading by boat to the Canyon.At the time, the region was still not under formal colonial authority. Douglas, fearing challenges to the claim of British sovereignty in the region in the face of an influx of some 20,000 Americans, stationed a gunboat at the mouth of the Fraser in order to obtain license fees from those seeking to head upstream. The British colonial office responded to the new situation by establishing the mainland as a crown colony on August 2, 1858, naming it the of British Columbia.(It was named after the Columbia Department of the Hudsons Bay Company, which in turn was named after the Columbia River. Ged Martin, The Naming of British Columbia, Albion: A Quarterly Journal Concerned with British Studies, Vol. 10, No. 3 (Autumn, 1978), pp. 257-263 in JSTOR) On 19 November 1858, a government for the colony was established with Fort Langley, on the southern reaches of the Fraser, as its provisional capital.(Barman, Jean. The West Beyond the West. 72) Westminster was chosen as its first official capital, however, for reasons of military security. New Westminster, at a defensible location on the north bank of the Fraser River, possessed, according to Lieutenant-Governor Moody, great facilities for communication by water, as well as by future great trunk railways into the interior.(Margaret Ormsby, British Columbia, A History, Toronto:  Macmillan Company of Canada Limited, 1976, p. 174) Governor Douglas proclaimed Queensborough (as the site was initially called by Moody) the new capital on February 14, 1859.(Ormsby, p. 175) Queensborough, however, did not appeal to London and it was Queen Victoria who proposed New Westminster, after Westminster,(Ormsby, pl 175) that part of the British capital of London where the Parliament Buildings were situated. New Westminster became the first city incorporated on the mainland in 1860. Douglas was named joint governor of the three colonies (the of the Queen Charlotte Islands had been in existence since 1853 and was merged with the Mainland Colony under Douglas regime, in 1863). A second major gold rush in the Cariboo region of the colony occurred in 1861-64, in the midst of a smaller ones, notably in the Omenica, Big Bend and on the Stikine. The influx of gold miners into B.C.s economy led to the creation of basic infrastructure in B.C., most notably, the creation of the Wagon Road which linked the Mainland to the rich gold fields of Barkerville. However, the enormous costs of the road, and its predecessor the Road and services such as the Escort, left B.C. in debt by the mid-1860s. In 1866, because of the massive debt leftover from the gold rush, the mainland and Vancouver Island became one colony named British Columbia, with its capital in Victoria.Annexation debateIn 1867, there were three options open: to continue as a British colony, to be annexed by the United States, or to join with the newly formed Dominion of Canada.(Jean Barman, The West Beyond the West: A History of British Columbia (1991) p. 91)(Charles Hou and Marlena Morgan, eds. The Destiny of British Columbia: confederation or annexation? (1984))  Financially, becoming officially part of the United States made sense since British Colombia was economically essentially a satellite of San Francisco. The opening of the American transcontinental railroad in 1869 made it possible to travel by ship from Victoria to San Francisco, then by train to Ottawa or Washington in just 24 days. With the gold now gone, most of the American miners had left, and the economic future did not look promising unless B.C. could join the very rapidly growing, rich economies of the Pacific states. There was vocal sentiment in favor of annexation by the merchant community, but there was also a large element from Ontario and the Maritimes that wanted to join Canada, despite the vast distances involved. When American Secretary of State H. Seward negotiated the Purchase in 1867, it was part of his plan to incorporate the entire northwest Pacific Coast, chiefly for the long-term commercial advantages to the United States in terms of Pacific trade. Seward believed that the people in British Columbia wanted annexation and that Britain would accept this in exchange for the claims. In the event, Seward dropped the idea of an exchange and accepted an arbitration plan that settled the Alabama claims for cash.(Charles Emmerson, The Future History of the Arctic (2010) p 74)  Until the Alaska Purchase and the new Dominion status(Reginald Trotter, Canada as a Factor in Anglo-American Relations in the 1860s, Canadian Historical Review, (1935) 16:354.) (which were almost simultaneous), the British had been indifferent to the fate of British Columbia.  London now paid attention, and realized the value of B.C. as a base for its imperial trade opportunities in the Pacific and the need of the Royal Navy for a station in the region.(John Herd Thompson and Stephen J. Randall, Canada and the United States: Ambivalent Allies (4th ed. 2008) pp 46-7)  Governor Musgrave proposed an attractive plan for joining Canada, with the Dominion paying off the B.C. debt and building a new Canadian transcontinental railway that would eliminate the reliance on the American transcontinental.  Meanwhile, the United States was so focused on issues of Reconstruction, that few Americans picked up on Sewards grand dream to expand Manifest Destiny to the Pacific.(Barman, The West Beyond the West (1991) pp 91-97)(Doris W. Dashew, The Story of An Illusion: The Plan to Trade Alabama Claims for Canada, Civil War History, Dec 1969, Vol. 15 Issue 4, pp 332-348)(David E. Shi, Sewards Attempt to Annex British Columbia, 1865-1869, Pacific Historical Review, May 1978, Vol. 47 Issue 2, pp 217-238 in JSTOR)(Frederic William Howay and Walter Noble Sage, Chapter VIII British Columbia in the Balance Annexation or Confederation 1866-1871 in British Columbia and the United States: the north Pacific slope from fur trade to aviation (1942))Entry into Canada (1871-1900)thumb|right|1896 map of British Columbia showing federal electoral districts.thumb|right|A map produced in London in 1873 to facilitate emigration to British Columbia showing the natural resources of the new province.Both the depressed economic situation arising from the collapse of the gold rushes, as well as a desire for the establishment of truly responsible and government, led to enormous domestic pressure for British Columbia to join the Confederation, which had been proclaimed in 1867. The Confederation League, spearheaded by three future premiers of the province  De Cosmos, Beaven, and Robson  took a leading role in pushing the colony towards this goal. And so it was on July 20, 1871, that British Columbia became the sixth province to join Canada. In return for entering Confederation, Canada absorbed B.C.s massive debt, and promised to build a railway from Montreal to the Pacific coast within 10 years. In fulfillment of this promise, the last spike of the Pacific Railway was driven in Craigellachie in 1885. The mining frontier in B.C. led to the creation of many mines and smelters, mostly through American investment. One of the worlds largest smelters still exists today in Trail. The capital and work to be found in B.C. during the turn of 19th century to the 20th century led to the creation of several new towns in B.C. such as Nelson, Nakusp, Slocan, Kimberley, Castlegar, Rossland, and Salmo. A large coal empire run by Dunsmuir, and his son and later premier, Dunsmuir also developed on Vancouver Island during this era.As the economy on the mainland continued to improve as a result of improved transportation and increased settlement, other resource-based economic activity began to flourish. Throughout the latter half of the nineteenth century, fishing, forestry, and farming (including the planting of extensive orchards in the Okanagan region) became the three Fs on which the new province built its economy  a situation that persisted well into the late twentieth century.With the booming economy came the expansion of the original fur trading posts into thriving communities (such as Victoria, Nanaimo, and Kamloops). It also led to the establishment of new communities, such as Yale, New Westminster, and  most notably, though a latecomer  Vancouver. The product of the consolidation of the burgeoning mill towns of Granville and Hastings Mill located near the mouth of the Fraser on Inlet in the later 1860s, Vancouver was incorporated in 1886 following its selection as the railhead for the Pacific Railway. Despite a devastating fire which all but wiped out the city three months later, Vancouver quickly became the largest city in the province, its ports conveying both the resource wealth of the province as well as that transported from the prairie provinces by rail, to markets overseas. Vancouvers status as the principal city in the province has endured, augmented by growth in the surrounding municipalities of Richmond, Burnaby, Surrey, Delta, Coquitlam, and Westminster. Today, Vancouver is the third most populous metropolitan area in Canada, behind Toronto and Montreal.20th centurySince the days of the fur trade, British Columbias economy has been based on resources, particularly fishing, logging and mining. From the canneries to the mills and mines, B.C.s resource sector was increasingly the domain of large commercial interests. With industrialization and economic growth, workers arrived to join in the seemingly boundless prosperity. Increasingly, these workers came from Asia as well as Europe. The mix of cultures and diversity was a source of strength, but also, often, of conflict. The early part of the 20th century was a time of great change and foment between immigrants and the First Nations, all of whom found their lives changing rapidly.Rise of the labour movementThe dominance of the economy by big business was accompanied by an often militant labour movement. The first major sympathy strike was in 1903 when railway employees struck against the CPR for union recognition. Labour leader Frank Rogers was killed while picketing at the docks by CPR police during that strike, becoming the British Columbia movements first martyr.() Canadas first general strike occurred following the death of another labour leader, Ginger Goodwin, in 1918, at the Cumberland coal mines on Island.() A lull in industrial tensions through the later 1920s came to an abrupt end with the Depression. Most of the 1930s strikes were led by Communist Party organizers.() That strike wave peaked in 1935 when unemployed men flooded the city to protest conditions in the relief camps run by the military in remote areas throughout the province. After two tense months of daily and disruptive protesting, the relief camp strikers decided to take their grievances to the federal government and embarked on the Trek,() but their commandeered train was met by a gatling gun at Hatzic, just east of Mission City, and the strikers arrested and interned in work camps for the duration of the Depression.(Carved From Wood: A History of Mission 1861-1992, Andreas Schroeder, publ. Mission Foundation (1991), 227 pp., ASIN: B000WB9TWM)Race and ethnic relationsDuring the 20th century, many immigrant groups arrived in British Columbia and today, Vancouver is the second most ethnically diverse city in Canada, only behind Toronto. In 1886, a Tax was imposed on the Chinese, which reached as much as $500 per person to enter Canada by 1904. By 1923 the government passed the Chinese Immigration Act, which prohibited all Chinese immigration until 1947. Sikhs had to face an amended Immigration Act in 1908 that required Sikhs to have $200 on arrival in Canada, and immigration would be allowed only if the passenger had arrived by continuous journey from India, which was impossible. Perhaps the most famous incident of anti-Sikh racism in B.C. was in 1914 when the Maru arrived in Vancouver harbour with 376 Sikhs aboard, who were all denied entry. The Komagata Maru spent two months in harbour while the Society went through the courts to appeal their case. The Khalsa Society also kept the passengers on the Komagata Maru alive during those two months. When the case was lost, , a Navy cruiser, towed the Komagata Maru out to sea while thousands of white people cheered from the seawall of Park. During the Second World War, security concerns following the bombing of Harbor and Canadas entry into the war versus Japan led to controversial measures. The local Japanese-Canadian population was openly discriminated against, being put in internment camps. The Coast Militia Rangers were formed in 1942 in order to provide an armed presence on the coast in addition to the pre-war fortress garrisons, which were expanded after hostilities. Japanese military attacks against BC amounted to a small number of parachute bombs released from great distance away and by the middle of 1942 the threat of direct attack diminished following defeat at the of Midway by US forces. A Pacific Command was created in 1942 also, and was disbanded in 1945. Militia units from southern BC provided cadres for many regiments that eventually fought in Europe, and the Mountain Rangers sent a battalion to fight the Japanese in the of the Aleutian Islands in 1943. Thousands more British Columbians volunteered for the Canadian Navy and Canadian Air Force. Two soldiers, Alvia Smith and Keefer Mahony, were awarded the Victoria Cross for actions with BC-based regiments in Italy.ProhibitionAlcohol was prohibited in British Columbia for about four years, from 1917 to 1921. A referendum in 1916 asked BC citizens whether they approved of making alcohol illegal (the other question was whether women had the right to vote). The contested results rejecting prohibition led to a major political scandal that subsequently saw the referendum being overturned and alcohol prohibited.(Electoral History, Elections BC) However, by 1921 the failures were so apparent&mdash;a thriving black market, arbitrary (often class- and race-based) enforcement and punishment, rampant corruption&mdash;that alcohol was established as a commodity subject to government regulation and taxation as it is today. U.S. prohibition in the 1920s and early 1930s led to a thriving business of producing and smuggling alcohol to quench the thirst of BCs southern neighbors. Many of Vancouvers richest families built or consolidated their fortunes in the rum-running business. Some compare todays robust cannabis-growing industry in BC (the number-one cash crop) to this earlier era.()Columbia River TreatyIn 1961, British Columbia ratified the River Treaty which required the building of three large dams in British Columbia in return for financial compensation related to U.S. hydroelectric power production enabled by the dams. The dams flooded large areas within British Columbia, but would prove to a very stable and renewable source of power for the province.First NationsThe status of the Nations (aboriginal) people of British Columbia is a long-standing problem that has become a major issue in recent years. First Nations were confined to tiny reserves that no longer provide an economic base. They were provided with inadequate education and discriminated against in numerous ways. In many areas they were excluded from restaurants and other establishments. Native people only gained the right to vote in 1960. They were prohibited from possessing alcohol, which rather than preventing problems with this drug, exacerbated them by fostering unhealthy patterns of consumption such as binge drinking. The lives of status Indians are still governed by the Act. With the exception of what are known as the Treaties, negotiated by Sir James Douglas with the native people of the Victoria area, no treaties were signed in British Columbia. Many native people wished to negotiate treaties, but the province refused until 1990. Another major development was the 1997 decision of the Supreme Court of Canada in the v. British Columbia case that aboriginal title still exists in British Columbia. 60% of First Nations in British Columbia are aligned with the First Nations Summit.  This bring a total of 58 First Nations, but only 20 are said to be in active-negotiations.  Three Final Agreements have been settled, with one being rejected by Tenneh in 2007. The other two, the Maa-nulth treaty group, a 5 Nuu-chah-nulth member group, and the First Nation. Although these treaties have yet to be ratified by Parliament in Ottawa and Legislature in Victoria, neighboring First Nations are seeking to block these treaties in the courts. A group of Vancouver Island and some mainland First Nations, the WSANEC, Lekwungen, and Semiahmoo, are seeking to block to Tsawwassen First Nation treaty, claiming infringement on their rights and land titles. On the westcoast of Vancouver Island, the Ditidaht First Nation is doing the same against the Maa-nulth treaty group. The only treaty, the Nisgaa Treaty (1998) signed in recent years was negotiated outside of the current treaty process. There is considerable disagreement about treaty negotiations. Many non-indigenous are vehemently opposed to it.  For indigenous, there is mounting criticism of extinguishment of title, continued assimilation strategies by attempting to change the indigenous peoples from nations to municipal style government.  Therefore, a substantial number of Nations governments consider the current treaty process inadequate and have refused to participate.A November 2007 court ruling for the Gwetin First Nation has called future participation in the process into question. The judge ruled that the Gwetin could demonstrate title to half of the Valley, and that the province had no power over these lands.(Huge win for Interior natives, Province, November 22, 2007) Under the BC treaty process, negotiating nations have received as little as 5% of their claimed land recognized. Grand Chief Phillip, president of the of B.C. Indian Chiefs, has called the court victory a nail in the coffin of the B.C. treaty process.(See alsoIndigenous peoples* peoples of the Pacific Northwest Coast* Dunneza* Dakelh** Babine** Wetsuweten* Okanagan* Haida* Sto:lo* Kaska* Ktunaxa* Kwakwakawakw* Gitxsan* Musqueam* Statimc**In-SHUCK-ch**Lilwat* Nisgaa* Nuu-chah-nulth* Nuxlk* Sekani* Wuikinuxv* Secwepemc* Sinixt* Swxw7mesh* Tagish* Tahltan* Haisla* Nicola* Tsilhqotin* Nlakapamux* Tlingit* Tsetsaut* Tsimshian* Heiltsuk* SaulteauxEuropean empires*colonies and territories in Canada* Empire* Empire* EmpireImportant figuresBy nationality, in chronological order of influence to the region:* Natives:** Maquinna, Nuu-chah-nulthchief** Chief Nicola, leader of the eponymous people and Grand Chief of the Okanagan** Klatassine (Klatsassan), Tsilhqotin chief** Capilano (Khatsahlano), Skwxwu7mesh chief** Chief Dan George, Tsleil-waututh (Burrard) chief and actor* Spaniards:** Nez de Balboa (14751519), Spanish explorer and conquistador from de los Caballeros, claimed possession of the Pacific Ocean and all adjoining lands in the name of the Spanish sovereigns in 1513.** Jos Prez Hernndez (17251775), Majorcan born Spanish explorer, first European to explore the region in 1774.** de Heceta (17441807), Basque born Spanish explorer, explored the region in 1775.** Francisco de la Bodega y Quadra (17431794), Liman born Spanish explorer, explored the region in an expedition in 1775 along with de Heceta.** Jos Martnez, Sevillan born Spanish explorer who founded the Spanish fort in Sound in 1789. It can be considered the first formal colony in the region (prior to that there was only a post founded by the Englishman Meares).** Lpez de Haro, accompanied Esteban Jos Martnez in the 1789 expedition.** de Eliza, made an expedition to Nootka Sound in 1790 to rebuild the Spanish fort abandoned by Esteban Jos Martnez.** dAlbern (17471802), Catalan born Spanish soldier and explorer from Tortosa, Captain of the Free Company of Volunteers of Catalonia appointed in Nootka Sound. His mission was to rebuild the fort, after Esteban Jos Martnez had abandoned it. He went with his company in the expedition of de Eliza, in 1790.** Fidalgo, Catalan born Spanish explorer from Seu dUrgell, made an expedition to Nootka Sound in 1790.** Mara Narvez, Spanish explorer, discovered Grey (modern day Vancouver, Columbia) on July 5, 1791.* British or from the British Isles** Drake, British privateer** Cook, British explorer** Meares, British explorer** Vancouver, British explorer** Alexander Mackenzie, British explorer** David Thompson, British explorer** James Douglas, first Governor of British Columbia** Baillie Begbie, first Chief Justice of British Columbia* The Canadas and the Maritimes**Simon Fraser, fur company explorer**Jones Barnard, expressman and entrepreneur (Ontario)**de Cosmos, newspaperman and Premier (Nova Scotia)**Bennett, retailer and Premier (New Brunswick)Places* Northwest* Alaska* Columbia* of British Columbia* New Caledonia* District* Washington* Oregon* Country* British Columbia ghost towns* Territory* Charlotte Islands* Island* of Vancouver Island* SoundEvents* Crisis* Convention* Treaty* Columbia Gold Rushes* boundary dispute* Boundary Dispute* War* River Treaty* Maru* Canadian internmentOther history pages* of the west coast of North America* of ships in British Columbia* of Royal Navy ships in the Pacific NorthwestFurther reading:See of British Columbia for a more extensive guide to resources. This is a basic guide to major works.*  Barman, Jean. The West Beyond the West: A History of British Columbia U. of Toronto Press, 1991. 430pp* Carlson, Roy L. and Bona, Luke Dalla, eds. Early Human Occupation in British Columbia. Vancouver: U. of British Columbia Press, 1996. 261 pp.* Carty, R. K., ed. Politics, Policy, and Government in British Columbia. Vancouver: U. of British Columbia Press, 1996. 381 pp.* Francis, Daniel, ed. Encyclopedia of British Columbia. Madeira Park, B.C.: Harbour, 2000. 806 pp.* Griffin, Harold. Radical Roots: The Shaping of British Columbia. Vancouver: Commonwealth Fund, 1999.* Hak, Gordon. Turning Trees into Dollars: The British Columbia Coastal Lumber Industry, 1858-1913. U. of Toronto Press, 2000. 239 pp.* Harris, Cole. The Resettlement of British Columbia: Essays on Colonialism and Geographical Change. Vancouver: U. of British Columbia Press, 1997. 314 pp.* Hayes, Derek. Historical Atlas of British Columbia and the Pacific Northwest: Maps of Exploration. Vancouver: Cavendish, 1999. 208 pp.* Johnston, Hugh, ed. The Pacific Province: A History of British Columbia. Vancouver: Douglas & McIntyre, 1996. 352 pp.* McGillivray, Brett. Geography of British Columbia: People and Landscapes in Transition. Vancouver: U. of British Columbia Press, 2000. 235pp* Muckle, Robert J. The First Nations of British Columbia. Vancouver: U. of British Columbia Press, 1998. 146pp.* Norris, John. Strangers Entertained: A History of Ethnic Groups in British Columbia. Vancouver: Evergreen Press, 1971. 254 pp.* Ormsby, Margaret A. British Columbia: A History (Macmillan, 1958)  online edition* Recksten, Terry. The Illustrated History of British Columbia. Vancouver: Douglas & McIntyre, 2001. 280 pp.* Woodcock, George. British Columbia: A History of the Province. Vancouver: Douglas & McIntyre, 1990. 288 pp.ReferencesExternal links*  British Colonist newspaper in Victoria, complete text Dec. 1858 to June 1910, searchable*British Columbia History Internet/Web Site, 19952004, compiled by historian and archivist David Mattison, was succeeded by the British Columbia History Portal, 2003present.*First Nations Languages of British Columbia contains information about the native languages of British Columbia.*BC History Journal*Coastal Moving Image Gallery, 1920s film clips of BC First Nations taken by anthropologist Harlan I. Smith, from BC Archives website.* CBC Digital Archives: BC 150: Splendour without diminishmentBritish Columbiasde la Colombie-BritanniqueKolumbii Brytyjskiej
512247
Jezkazgan
Jezkazgan or Zhezkazgan ( / Jezqazan), formerly known as Dzhezkazgan (, until 1992), is a city in Province, Kazakhstan, on a reservoir of the Kara-Kengir River. The city population is of 90,000 (1999 census). Its area includes the neighbouring mining town of Satpayev, for a total city population of 148,700.55% of Jezkagan population are Kazakhs, 30% Russians, with smaller minorities of Ukrainians, Germans, Chechens and Koreans.GeographyJezkazgan is situated in the very heart of the Kazakh upland, far away from a big river. It has an extreme climate. The average temperature ranges from   in July to  in January.HistoryThe city was created in 1938 in connection with the exploitation of the rich local copper deposits. In 1973 a large mining and metallurgical complex was constructed to the southeast to smelt the copper that until then had been sent elsewhere for processing. Other metal ores mined and processed locally are manganese, iron and gold.During the Soviet era, Jezkazgan was the site of a Gulag camp, Kengir, mentioned in Solzhenitsyns book Gulag Archipelago, and Dolguns An American In The Gulag.IndustryToday the city is the headquarters of the copper conglomerate Kazakhmys, the citys main employer. The company has subsidiaries in China, Russia and the Kingdom and is listed on the Stock Exchange.There is a power station, Power Plant with generation capacity of 207 MW and a 220 metres tall main chimney.TransportAlthough Jezkazgan is centrally located in the country, it has limited connections to the other regions by rail, except for a rail line to the regional capital city Karaganda. Jezkazgan is connected by road to the cities Karaganda (by class-B route E018), Kyzylorda and Arkalyk (both by the route E123). The city is accessible by air via Airport.OtherThe Cosmodrome lies  to the south west and, by tradition, every cosmonaut plants a tree in Jezkazgans Seyfullin-Boulevard to mark his safe return from space.Persons associated with Jezkazgan*Klimuk, a cosmonaut, a citizenBorn in Jezkazgan* Savin, a former Soviet athlete* Yankovsky, a Russian actor* Nurmagambetov, a flatwater canoerReferencesExternal links*City website*Photos of the cityar:roa-rup:Zhezkazgande:Schesqasghanet:ezkazganfa:fr:Djezkazgankk:lv:ezkazghanalt:ezkazganashu:Zsezkazgannl:Jezqazanno:Dzjezkazgannn:Dzjezkazganpl:ezkazganpt:Dzhezkazganru:sco:Jezkazganuk:zh:
514866
Giant_Kangaroo_Rat
Merriam, 1904)The Giant Kangaroo Rat, Dipodomys ingens, is an endangered rodent species endemic to California.(DescriptionDipodomys ingens,  the Giant Kangaroo Rat, is one of over 20 species of kangaroo rats, which are small members of the rodent family. The Giant Kangaroo Rat is the largest of the rats, measuring about 15 cm (6 in.) in length, not including its long, tufted tail. It is tan or brown in color. Like other kangaroo rats it has a large head and large eyes, and long, strong hind legs with which it can hop at high speeds.HabitatThe Giant Kangaroo Rat lives on dry, sandy grasslands and digs burrows in loose soil. It lives in colonies, and the individuals communicate with each other by drumming their feet on the ground. These foot thumping signals range from single, short thumps to long, drawn out footrolls that can average over 100 drums at 18 drums per second. These audible signals serve both as a warning of approaching danger, as a territorial communication, and to communicate mating status.In the spring and summer, individuals generally spend less than two hours of the night foraging above ground. They are very territorial and never leave their den for more than 15 minutes per day. The Giant Kangaroo Rat then stores the seeds in a larder for later eating and gives birth to a litter of 1 to 7 babies, with an average of 3 per litter. It communicates with potential mates by sandbathing, where the Giant Kangaroo Rat rubs its sides in sand, leaving behind a scent to attract mates.  They live for only 24 years.This species was declared endangered on both the federal and California state levels in the 1980s. It inhabits less than a mere 2% of its original range and can now be found only in isolated areas west of the Joaquin Valley, including the Plain, the Plain, and the Hills. The Giant Kangaroo Rat, like many other rodent species, lost much of its habitat as the Central Valley fell under agricultural use. Much information still needs to be obtained regarding their basic biology and compatibility with various land uses before clear directives can be made. Besides some projects currently underway in the Carrizo Plain National Monument, studies need to be conducted on populations whose range overlaps with private lands.According to information vetted by Los Padres Forest Watch, the GKR is a keystone species in the Carrizo Plain and probably elsewhere in the San Joaquin Valley. It provides food for predators and creates burrow systems used by other animals. It is important to recognize that GKR viability is not simply a matter of one obscure species, at all, but rather an integral cornerstone  of the entire affected ecosystem. In the Carrizzo Plain, just outside the National Monument, GKR is in jeopardy due to several proposed massive solar installations as well as a mining proposal linked to the CVSR project.ReferencesREFERENCEtheExternal links*ARKive - images and movies of the Giant Kangaroo rat (Dipodomys ingens)*link: Giant Kangaroo Ratingenswielki ingens
517404
Murray-Darling_basin
thumb|right|Map of the Murray-Darling BasinThe Murray-Darling basin is a large geographical area in the interior of southeastern Australia, whose name  is derived from its two major rivers, the River and the River. It drains one-seventh of the Australian land mass,( and is currently by far the most significant agricultural area in Australia.  It spans most of the states of South Wales, Victoria, and Australian Capital Territory, and parts of the states of Queensland (lower third) and Australia (south-east corner). It is  in length (the Murray River is  long).Most of the  basin is flat, low-lying and far inland, and receives little direct rainfall. The many rivers it contains tend to be long and slow-flowing, and carry a volume of water that is large only by Australian standards.Native faunaThe Murray Darling Basin is home for many native animal species. The true numbers are not known, but a fairly confident estimate has been made of these animals and the current status of their population. Among the indigenous fauna in the region, the study found  that there were:* 85 species of mammals, with 20 extinct and 16 endangered.* 53 species of frogs, with none endangered.* 46 species of snakes, with 5 endangered.* 5 species of tortoises, with none endangered* 34 species of fish, with none endangered.Introduced speciesthumb|200px|The carp, introduced in 1850, is now a trouble species in the Murray-Darling river systemThe Basin has also played host to a variety of introduced species. One of the most well known is the carp.Introduced in around 1851, the four varieties of carp were used to stock up fish dams. Since then they have made their way into the river systems, where they spread quite quickly. These fish are very mobile, as they can travel easily on flood waters and their eggs can be transported by birds.These fish are a problem because they feed by sucking gravel from the river bed and taking all the edible material off it, before returning the rest to the water. This stirs up all the sediment, reducing the quality of the water. When caught by a fisherman, it must be killed by law.PhysiographyThis area is one of the physiographic provinces of the larger Australian Basins division, and encompasses the smaller Platform and Shelf physiographic sections.HydrologyTotal water flow in the Murray-Darling basin 1885 to the present has averaged around 24,000 gigalitres per year. This is the lowest rate of the worlds major river systems.() In most years only half of this quantity reaches the sea and in dry years much less. Estimated total annual flows for the basin have ranged from 5,000 gigalitres in 1902 to 57,000 gigalitres in 1956. Despite the magnitude of the basin, the hydrology of the streams within it is quite varied.These waters are divided into three types: (Brown, J. A. H. (John Alexander Henstridge); Australias Surface Water Resources. ISBN 0644026170)* The Darling and Lachlan basins. These have extremely variable flows from year to year, with the smallest annual flow being typically as little as 1 percent of the long-term mean and the largest often more than ten times the mean. Periods of zero flow in most rivers can extend to months and in the drier parts (Warrego, Paroo and Lower Darling basins) to years.( Flows in these rivers are not strongly seasonal. In the northern regions the majority of floods occur in the summer from monsoonal penetration. For most of the Darling and Lachlan catchments it is typical to see high or low flows begin in winter and extend to the following autumn (see Nio). High water extraction rates for irrigation and mining have heavily compromised these rivers.* The south-western basins (Campaspe, Loddon, Avoca, Wimmera). These have a marked winter rainfall maximum and relatively lower precipitation variability than the Lachlan or Darling. However, the age and infertility of the soils mean that run-off ratios are exceedingly low (for comparison, around a tenth that of a European or American catchment with a similar climate(McMahon, T.A. and Finlayson, B.L.; Global Runoff: Continental Comparisons of Annual Flows and Peak Discharges; pp. 86-98 ISBN 3-923381-27-1.)). Thus, variability of runoff is very high and most of the terminal lakes found in these basins very frequently dry up. Almost all runoff occurs in the winter and spring and, in the absence of large dams for regulation, these rivers are often seasonally dry during summer and autumn.* A number of small catchments in South Australia, of which the largest are the Angas River flowing through Strathalbyn and the Finniss River further west, are  part of the Murray-Darling Basin. These catchments lead to Lake Alexandrina, one of the lakes at the end of the Murray system. The Angas River is often dry in summer because of high levels of water extraction. The Finniss River has permanent flow which previously went into Lake Alexandrina but now has been cut off by a weir. The Finniss now fills the Goolwa Channel for recreational boating.* The Murrumbidgee, Murray and Goulburn basins (except the Broken River which resembles the south-western basins). Because these catchments have headwaters in alpine country with relatively young peaty soils, the runoff ratios are much higher than in other parts of the basin. Consequently, although gross precipitation variability is no lower than in the Lachlan or Darling basins, runoff variability is markedly lower than in other parts of the basin. Typically these rivers never cease to flow and the smallest annual flow is typically around 30 percent of the long-term mean and the largest around three times the mean. In most cases the flow peaks very strongly with the spring snow melt and troughs in mid-autumn.Of the approximately 13,000 gigalitres of flow in the basin, which studies have shown to be divertible, 11,500 gigalitres are removed for irrigation, industrial use, and domestic supply. Agricultural irrigation accounts for about 95% of the water removed,( including for the growing of rice and cotton. This extraction is highly controversial among scientists in Australia, regarding the agriculture industrys high water use in a region extremely short of water (as much due to exceptionally low run-off coefficients as to low rainfall).(Government, politics, power and policy in Australia / editors Dennis Woodward, Andrew Parkin, John  Summers.)Rivers in the Murray-Darling Basin*River - western South Wales: from the confluence of the Culgoa and Barwon rivers which, in turn, originate from tributaries in Queensland and northern and central New South Wales**River - from the most western branch of the River. Flows south-west to join the Darling River near Bourke, New South Wales*River (New South Wales)  forms a section of the border between the states of South Wales and Queensland.**River (formed from rivers known as the Rivers)*River - also forms part of the border between the states of South Wales and Queensland.**River (Queensland)*Creek (Queensland)**River (Queensland)*River (New South Wales),**River NSW*Brook**River (New South Wales)*Waters NSW**River middle of three branches of the River whose main tributaries are the River from the northern Downs, Qld and the Maranoa & Merivale Rivers, Qld.*River - joins the Barwon River near Collarenebri**River - branches east of Moree, the main branch being the Mehi river.*Horton River - drains most of the northern slopes of the Range. Joins the Gwydir River between the towns of Bingara and Gravesend**River (New South Wales) - joins the Gwydir River near Bundarra*River -  joins the Barwon River, near the town of Walgett**River (Bendemeer),*River**River (New South Wales),*River**River*River - headwaters rise in the central highlands of South Wales near the town of Oberon**River*River**River*Creek**River - rises at Goonumbla, 19 kilometres north-west of Parkes and flows in a north-westerly direction to join the Darling-Barwon near where the Culgoa river joins*River - joins the Darling River below Bourke**River*River - designated as most of the border between South Wales and Victoria**River (anabranch)*River - NSW and ACT Dam**River*River**River*River**River*River - NSW**River*River**River - joins the Murrumbidgee River, at Darbalara near the town of Gundagai.*River**River - joins the upper Murrumbidgee River near Bredbo.*River**River*River - meets the Murray River near the town of Echuca**Goulburn River*Broken River**River*River**River*King River**River*Buckland River**River - joins the Murray east of Albury.*Mitta River - the source of approximately 40% of the Murray Rivers flow.**River* Big River, just south of Rest, VictoriaManagementThe basin covers five states and territory governments, who according to the Constitution, are responsible for managing water resources. The River Murray Commission was established in 1917.( Under the River Murray Waters Agreement, which never included Queensland despite the state containing about a quarter of the basin, the Commissions role was only as an advisory body with no authority for the enforcement of provisions. For a long time the Commission was only concerned with water quantity until salinity became a problem. This lead to minor reforms in 1982 in which quality became part of the Commissions responsibilities.( However, it was soon recognised that a new organisational structure which considered the national perspective was needed for effective management.The Murray-Darling Basin Agreement was first adopted in 1985 but it wasnt until 1993 that its full legal status was in-acted.( The Agreement led to the creation of a number of new organisations under what is known as the Murray-Darling Basin Initiative. These included the Murray-Darling Basin Ministerial Council and the Murray Darling Basin Commission.The Murray-Darling Basin PlanIn October 2010, The Basin Authority released a major document outlining its plan to secure the long-term health of the Murray-Darling Basin. This entails cutting existing water allocations and increasing flows.() The document is officially titled the Guide to the Proposed Murray-Darling Basin Plan. It is the first part of a three-stage process to address the problems of the Murray-Darling Basin.(The Murray-Darling Plan explained. Sarah Clarke and staff. 8 October 2010. News Online. Australian Broadcasting Corporation.) MDBA is responsible for preparing and overseeing a legally-enforceable management planthe Basin Plan.The Basin Plan is designed to set and enforce environmentally sustainable limits on the quantities of water that may be taken from Basin resources, to set Basin-wide environmental, quality and salinity objectives, to develop efficient trading regimes across the Basin, to set requirements for state water resource plans and to improve water security for all Basin users.(Summary of Murrumbidgee Region From the Guide to the proposed Basin Plan) It also intends to optimise social and economic impacts once these environmental outcomes have been met.()With the release of the Guide to the Proposed Murray-Darling Basin Plan there have been a number of protests and voiced concerns about the plan in rural towns that the MDBA have visited to present the plan to consultation meetings.(Tractor convoy as SA irrigators protest 15 October 2010. Australian Broadcasting Corporation) Over 5,000 people attended a MDBA meeting in Griffith where Griffith Mayor, Mike Neville, said the plan would obliterate Murrumbidgee valley communities.() Other groups also echo this feeling, such as the Victorian Farmers Federation(VFF Declares War!: Stop the MDBA plundering.) and Wine Group Growers Australia.(Federal Government urged not to forget people in Basin Plan. Media Release. 13 October 2010.) Conversely, support for the Murray-Darling Basin plan has been received by various groups, including Conservation Foundation,(Cautious support from scientists for the emerging MurrayDarling Basin Plan.) and Victoria.(Murray-Darling Basin Plan  whats it all about? 11 March 2010.)New legal advice from lawyers for the Federal Government is changing the plan. The Governments reading is that the plan must give equal weight to the environmental, social and economic impacts of proposed cuts to irrigation. Environmentalists and South Australian irrigators, at the end of the river in South Australia, say the authority should stick to its original figure.(Jason Om. (27 October 2010). SA irrigators back Murray-Darling cuts. ABC News.)In October 2010, a parliamentary inquiry into the economic impacts of the plan was announced.(Tim Lee. (18 October 2010). Murray authority chairman faces uphill battle. ABC News.)In late October 2010 the Water Minister, Tony Burke, played down the prospect of a High Court challenge to the Murray-Darling Basin plan, as confusion continued over new legal advice released by the Government. In response to community concerns that the Murray-Darling Basin Authority had put environmental issues first over social and economic needs, Burke released new advice on the requirements of the Water Act. Burke stated that the Act does allow for the authority to optimise the needs of all three areas, but constitutional lawyer, George Williams, had cast doubts over the interpretation of the laws, stating it could be subject to a legal challenge.(Emma Rodgers. (28 OCtober 2010) Burke plays down challenge to basin plan. ABC News.)The MDBA announced in November 2010 that it might be forced to push back the release of its final plan for the river system until early 2012.(Kerrin Binnie. (2 November 2010) Basin authority flags delay to final plan. ABC News.)The MDBA chairman, Mike Taylor, reassured the public meeting that more work is being done to look at how the proposed cuts would affect regional communities. He stated; Importantly, we want to make sure the social and economic impactswhich under any sort of scenario is very significantwere fully teased out.((4 November 2010). Water cuts treat farmers as second-class citizens. ABC News.) Taylor resigned as he believed that the overriding principle should be the environmental outcome which was in conflict with the Gillard Government and following a period of sustained criticism of the Authority and the implementation of the proposed draft basin plan.() He was replaced by former New South Wales Planning Minister, Knowles.()()()See also* change in Australia* Cap* PlateauReferencesExternal links* Murray-Darling Basin Authority* Murray-Darling Basin Water Budget Project* Murray Darling Freshwater Research Centre* River Murray Water Restrictions* Murray Outback - Guide to the major towns on the Murray and Murray Outback Region.* Save the Murray - lobby group* Murray Darling Basin Resources* The Basin Plan* Guide to the Proposed Basin Plan* Guide to the Basin Plan, Volumes 1 - 21* Basin Plan - lobby group;News* Fire, Flood and Acid Mud - ABC TV Catalyst*del Murray-Darlingde:Murray-Darling-Becken -Murray-DarlingMurray-DarlingBasinfi:Murray-Darling-jokialuezh:-
518127
Bulli,_New_South_Wales
 location1 thumb|250px|right|Map of BulliBulli ( ) is a northern suburb of Wollongong situated on the south coast of South Wales, Australia. Bulli is derived from an Aboriginal word signifying double or two mountains.(Bulli  Place Names. Wollongong Library. Retrieved 24 August 2008.)Originally inhabited by Wodi Aborigines, European wood cutters worked in the area from about 1815. The area was once abundant in Red Cedars, these are now still seen but thinly. The first permanent European settler was Cornelius OBrien, who established a farm in 1823 and whose name was given in the pass at OBriens Road south at Figtree.CoalThe Coal Company opened a mine in 1862 on the escarpment and built cottages to house miners and their families. Coal was transported by rail from the mine to a jetty at Sandon Point where it was loaded onto ships.(The Bellambi and Bulli Coal Mining Company Railway Eardley, G.H. Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, May, 1976 pp89111)The miners were paid in accordance with production, they were not paid a set wage. The first union in the Illawarra region was formed by miners at Bulli in 1879. Management retaliated by firing and evicting union miners and hiring non-union labour.On March 23, 1887 a explosion in the mine killed 81 men and boys, leaving 50 women widows and 150 children without fathers. There was one survivor, a 17 year old boy who became known as Boy Cope. The mine reopened later in the year. The Bulli Mine Disaster was one of the worst in the regions history, see Kembla. The mine has since long been leveled, with only concrete foundations revealing the location of the old office area and other buildings. Hidden along the cliff behind said foundations can be found the old mine entrances. These have been sealed with up to 12 feet of concrete, with a drainage line set in the concrete. To the east is the remnants of the sorting site, a few scattered foundations and a tar patch.The old railway line from the mine to the coast has mostly been removed, but as you drive south into Bulli you will see the bridge it was set in, now used as a walkway over the highway after a fatal car accident involving a school child saw it restored. This bridge now features a welcome sign for the historic black diamond district.Landmarksthumb|left|300px|Bulli viewed from Sandon PointBulli Beach (pictured at left) is a popular surfing spot. The northern tip (Sandon Point) is a venue for regular surfing competitions.Bullis main historical feature is the railway station, situated between the escarpment and the surf beaches. The station was the first on the south coast and contains a museum which is open every Sunday. Another historic feature is the Heritage Hotel, which was opened in 1889. This is in the heart of the Black Diamond district.The Illawarra Grevillea Park is an arboretum and botanic garden which opened in 1993. It houses the repository or living collection of the Grevillea Study Group of the Australian Plants Society (previously SGAP). It is a botanic garden containing plants native to Australia  its collections include grevilleas, prostantheras and rainforest plants. Staffed and run by volunteers, it is open 6 weekends a year.Behind the Illawarra Grevillea Park is Slacky Flat Park which is home to some reasonably undisturbed remnant rainforest and numerous species of native birds and marsupials.The town has a small chain of commerce in its central district west of the station, and includes a newsagent and several specialty stores. The town is home to St Josephs Catholic Primary School (current principal Mr Terry Westblade), Bulli Public School, Waniora Public School and Bulli High School.At Sandon Point and Tramway Creek immediately north of the promontory, there is some remnant bushland including turpentine forest. This is an important migratory bird location and a history walk has been set up along the road were the old railway used to go. This point is also the site of a midden area.  For over fifteen years the local community has been campaigning against residential development of this coastal floodplain and wetland.  This included over 150 submissions to a Commission of Inquiry which recommended against further major development.  Minister for Planning, Frank Sartor, however has overridden his COI to give Stockland and the Anglican Village Retirement Trust approval to add over 1000 residential houses and units.Picture galleryFile:Bulli Family Hotel.jpg|Bulli Family HotelFile:Bulli Railway Station.jpg|Bulli Railway StationFile:Bulli Coal Train.jpg|Bulli Coal Train,a remnant of the type of train that transported coalFile:Acacia baileyana prostrate IGP email.jpg|Prostrate Cootamundra Wattle in Grevillea ParkFile:BulliRF133 3344.jpg|Slacky Flat Park External links * Illawarra Coal  An unofficial history of coal mining in the Illawarra* The Illawarra Grevillea Park Page*Bulli Community Web Portal*References 
520313
Ussuriysk
dateMay 2010Ussuriysk () is a city in Krai, Russia, situated in the fertile valley of the River,  north of Vladivostok. The city is about  from both the Chinese border and the Ocean.HistoryMedieval history12th-century stone tortoise from a Jurchen grave now can be seen in Ussuriysks central parkFrom the middle of the ninth century, the territory of what now is Ussuriysk was located in the kingdom of Balhae. Prior to that, the area was settled by Yulou Mohe tribes.Modern eraIn 1866, the settlement of Nikolskoye () was founded on the area of todays Ussuriysk, named after Tsar Nicholas I. Due to its advantageous geographic location at the crossing of the transportation lines of South Primorye, the village experienced rapid growth during the 1870s, turning into a trade center.  The role of the village increased after the railroad connecting Khabarovsk and Vladivostok (now part of the Railway) was built, and in 1898 it was given town status and renamed Nikolsk-Ussuriysky ().By the beginning of the 20th century the towns population totaled 15,000 people, and the annual turnover of its trade enterprises was equal to three million rubles. After the War of 1904-1905, Nikolsk-Ussuriysky became one of the most important commercial and economic centers of the Far East. In 1913 the city ranked fourth after Vladivostok, Blagoveshchensk, and Khabarovsk in terms of population. Enterprises were established processing agricultural products such as mills, dairies, soap-boiling plants and tanneries, as well as macaroni and sausage factories and breweries. Brick factories, quarries and saw-mills also appeared in the city.The central part of the city began to be built up with two- and three-story masonry buildings. In 1914, there were fourteen educational institutions, a theater, a circus, and three movie-theaters in Nikolsk-Ussuriysky.After the October Revolution of 1917, Ussuriysks economy experienced rapid growth. The city specialized in processing agricultural products.  The towns named changed again to Voroshilov in 1935 after Voroshilov. With Khrushchevs ascent to power after Stalins death the citys name was changed to Ussuriysk after the nearby River in 1957.Until the 1980s, the city ranked second in the krai in population, having only recently yielded to Nakhodka. Ussuriysk is still second only to Vladivostok as a theatrical and higher-educational center (it is home to the Pedagogical and Agricultural Institutes, and the Higher Military School).Business and industryThe citys industry is represented by 28 enterprises, including 12 of the industry, 2 of industry, 6 of industry, and 4 of construction industry. Ussuriysk has always specialized in the production of goods. That is why at present it is in a more favorable situation as compared with other large cities of Primorye where enterprises of industry prevailed. The largest enterprises of light industry are Primorsky Sakhar (which provides the Far East with sugar, producing 160,000 tonnes per year), Dalsoya (which produces oil, margarine, and soap), Ussuriysky Balsam (24 kinds of liqueur and vodka products, and balsams made of a blend of dozens of herbs). Five articles of Ussuriysky Balsam were given diplomas of the first and the second degrees at all-Russian competition of alcohol products.One more economic feature of Ussuriysk is its wholesale trade. There are approximately 30 specialized and multipurpose trade bases many of which had developed contacts with foreign partners before the external economic policy was liberalized in Russia.Among the citys other enterprises that are worth mentioning are the Grado firm which annually produces up to 600,000 pairs of footwear, and the Locomotive Repairing Plant. The annual industrial output of Ussuriysk equals 8% of Krais production. Besides, the city is the crossing point of all major highways and railroads of Primorye.husbandry is well-developed in District. Soybeans, buckwheat, wheat, barley, potatoes, and vegetables are grown here. Manufacture of furs is also developed in this District. Oktyabrsky JSC supplies mink fur-skins to the Russian market and abroad.The joint Ussuriysky Administration has worked out a program of social and economic development in the city and the District. This presupposes an active exploration of the deposits of mineral sources found in the territory of the city and the district, namely, hard and coal, tuff, and clay. Foreign investors are welcome in the mining of these sedimentary rocks.TheatersThe Ussuriysk Drama Theater of the East Military District is located at #31 Sovyetskaya St. The theater was founded in 1937 and is one of the two theaters of the Russian Army (the other is the Central Theater of the Russian Army in Moscow). The theater maintains the militarypatriotic tendency and realistic style.The Ussuriysk Drama Theater is located at #33 Volodarskogo St. It was opened in 1937. The theater is of classical tendencies. Plays are staged both for adults and children. The hall can accommodate 428 people.Geographythumb|right|The citys main Intercession Church. Built in 1914, it is one of the few churches in the region to have survived the revolution and Communist periods.The downtown including Lenina, Chicherina, Krasnoznamyonnaya, and Ageyeva Streets is of historic value. The citys oldest hotel (#28 Lenina St.) was constructed in 1880. #53 Lenina St. which houses the citys oldest movie-theater Grand-Illyuzion was built in 1908.On the central square there is a monument to the Red Guards and partisans, who died in the battles at Ussuriysk in June 1918. A monument to Lenin is on the Railway Station Square.Steam locomotive YeL 629 is set on plinth as a memorial to 3 Bolshevik revolutionaries (Lazo, Lutsky and Sibirtsev) who were roasted alive by White Guards in its firebox in 1920.The Intercession Church at #80A Chicherina St. was built in 1914. It is Krais only religious building which has been kept without any reconstruction since 1917 and used for its original purpose.Ussuriysk is very green because of many trees (such as poplars, elms, and jasmine, have been transplanted here from the taiga) and ranked third after Arsenyev and Vladivostok.thumb|right|Steam Locomotive YeL 629 in UssuriyskInternational relationsTwin towns/sister citiesUssuriysk is twinned with:* Mudanjiang, China.* Changwon, Korea.See also*Astrophysical ObservatoryExternal links*Official website of the city of UssuriyskReferencesar:be-x-old:bg:de:Ussurijsket:Ussuriiskes:Ussuriiskeo:Ussurijskfa:fr:Oussouriiskko:id:Ussuriyskos:it:Ussurijsklv:Usurijskalt:Usurijskashu:Usszurijszknl:Oessoeriejskja:no:Ussurijsknn:Ussurijskpl:Ussuryjskro:Ussuriyskru:fi:Ussurijsksv:Ussurijsktl:Ussurijskuk:zh-classical:war:Ussuriyskdiq:Ussuriyskzh:
520579
Maryport
Maryport is a town and civil parish within the Allerdale borough of Cumbria, England, in the historic county of Cumberland. It is located on the road north of Workington, and is the southernmost town on the Firth. railway station is on the Coast Line. The town is in the parliamentary constituency of Workington. Maryport lies at the northern end of the former Coalfield.HistoryRoman and medieval timesThe town was first established as the Roman fort Alauna in around AD 122 as a command and supply base for the coastal defences of Wall at its western extremity.  There are substantial remains of the Roman fort, which was the last in a series of forts stretching southwards along the coast from Hadrians Wall, aimed at preventing the wall being avoided by a crossing of the Firth. Recent geomagnetic surveys have revealed a large Roman town surrounding the fort. A recent archaeological dig discovered evidence of a second, earlier and larger fort next to, and partially under the present remains. After the Roman withdrawal from Britain the town was soon reduced in size and importance.On Castle Hill are the earthworks and buried remains of a twelfth century  motte and bailey castle.  On the summit are the foundations of a World War II gun emplacement.To the north are the ruins of Netherhall Estate. The only remains of this once grand manor are stables and a fourteenth century Tower, formerly part of a large house of later date which was demolished in 1979 following a fire.Georgian timesFor many years the town was named Ellenfoot but the name was changed by Humphrey Senhouse as he began developing the town as a port, following the example of Whitehaven. In 1749 an of Parliament was passed to allow the creation of the present town. Senhouse named the new town after his wife Mary. The Senhouse family were landowners in the area and responsible for the development of the town and excavation of its Roman past. The family also had interests in the West Indies.  In 1770, Humphrey Senhouses son, William, was appointed Surveyor General of Customs in Barbados where he purchased a sugar plantation and managed another for Sir James Lowther of Whitehaven. Williams brother, Joseph, had a coffee plantation in Dominica. Both men were considerable slave-owners.(Richard B. Sheridan: Material relating to the West Indies from the Senhouse Papers, University of Kansas, 1977.)It was during this period that the towns lighthouse was built.Victorian timesThe town quickly developed as an industrial centre throughout the 19th century. An iron foundry opened and the port developed as did shipyards, such as Woods yard and Ritsons yard, which was famous for launching ships broadside into the Ellen because it was not wide enough to allow ships to be launched the usual way. By this time, coal mines were operating all around the town  at Ellenbough, Dearham, Moor, Gilcrux and Birkby.The Maryport & Carlisle Railway, opened in the 1840s, with Stephenson as its engineer, made the transport of coal much easier. Large new mines were sunk in the Aspatria area and almost all their production passed through the port. In 1846, 213,152 tons of coal were shipped from Maryport and by 1857 this had risen to more than 340,000 tons.Much of the coal produced in the area was turned into coke for the local iron and steel industry. By 1890, the Allerdale Coal Company had thirty Beehive coke ovens working on its site at Buckhill, Broughton Moor.In 1874, the owners announced a cut of 10% in the miners wages. A strike began in the Aspatria pits and then the owners made a further cut of 15%. By December, the strike had spread to the whole area with 2,000 men involved. The strike lasted until March 1875. There was violence when some blacklegs were assaulted and many colliers left the area to seek work elsewhere.In 1894, John Osmaston who operated the Dearham Colliery became insolvent and the bank took over his pits. Two groups of local miners formed co-operatives and leased the mines at Crosshow and Townhead from the Lowthers. They found it impossible to compete with the other wealthy coal-owners in a tight market and also had serious problems with drainage. This unique experiment ended in 1903 when both companies went into liquidation.(Oliver Wood: West Cumberland Coal 1600-1982 (Cumberland and Westmorland Antiquarian and Archaeological Society, 1988))Modern timesDuring the early years of the 20th century, trade in the docks remained steady but was badly affected by the United Kingdom General Strike. Then, in 1927, a new deep-water dock was opened in Workington. Previously, the Workington Iron and Steel works had imported much of their raw material through Maryport but all of this trade was immediately transferred to the new facility. The local Solway Blast Furnaces also closed.(J.Y. Lancaster & D.R. Wattleworth: The Iron and Steel Industry of West Cumberland (British Steel Corporation, 1977))Maryport became a ghost town. The government declared West Cumberland a Special Area but, by 1933, 57.3% of the towns insured workforce was unemployed. 1,684 men were out of work. Maryport was for the most part, living on public funds(John Jewkes and Allan Winterbottom: An Industrial Survey of Cumberland & Furness (Manchester University Press, 1933)) Despite a minor boom during the Second World War, when coal from North East England was diverted to the port, Maryport never recovered. The docks were closed to cargo ships in the 1960s. The last deep pit in the area, at Risehow, closed in 1966 and open-cast mining ended in 2000.Today, after a series of major regeneration projects, prospects for the town are looking better.(http://www.allerdale.gov.uk/business/regeneration/regeneration-projects.aspx)PoliticsThe town is a mainly Labour voting area, although far right parties such as the National Party have tried to make inroads.EconomyTourism is now the main business in Maryport. There is an aquarium, a maritime museum and a Roman museum.  The latter houses numerous Roman artefacts, most notably a series of altars to Jupiter Optimus Maximus, which were excavated in the 18th century from the parade ground of the Roman fort.In July 2008, a new tourism venue, The Wave Centre, opened its doors. The Wave Centre is a theatre and conference facility, an interactive heritage exhibition on the local history of Maryport, the Tourist Information Centre for Maryport, and a gift shop and bistro.Maryport Golf Club was formed on January 21, 1905 and is now a well established 18 hole course.(http://www.maryportgolfclub.co.uk, Maryport Golf Club Website)CultureThe town is a major name on the blues music scene, holding the popular Maryport Blues Festival every summer, This has previously attracted names such as Holland, Warwick, Brooks, Guy, Jethro Tull, Morrison and Berry.The three-day event usually takes place on the last weekend of July, attracting both local and international artists.The town has a Scout Group (2nd Maryport) that has been in the town for over 70 years and incorporates most sections within the Scouting Movement. The Group was visited by the Bishop of Carlisle to mark the centenary of Scouting in 2008.Notable peopleNotable past residents of Maryport have included:*Douglas Clark*Henry Ismay*Christian*Tosh *Heron*Milroy*Tom Smith*James LomasReferences*Biggins, J. A. and Taylor, D. J. A., 2004b, The Roman Fort and Vicus at Maryport: Geophysical Survey, 20002004, in R. J. A. Wilson and I, Caruana (eds.), Romans on the Solway, CWAAS for the Trustees of the Senhouse Museum, Maryport, 102-133.External links*Index of Maryport Sailing Ships*article on the Maritime Museum*Maryport local information and news website*Maryport Blues website*The Wave Centre website*Maryport Golf Club website*iRomans Link to a website showing a selection of roman objects from Maryport stored with collection at Tullie House Museum.*Senhouse family in the West Indiesbg:de:Maryportit:Maryportnl:Maryportnn:Maryportpl:Maryportro:Maryportsimple:Maryportvo:Maryport
521967
Multistate_Anti-Terrorism_Information_Exchange
The Multistate Anti-Terrorism Information Exchange Program, also known by the acronym MATRIX, was a federally funded data mining system originally developed for the Department of Law Enforcement described as a tool to identify terrorist subjects.The system was reported to analyze government and commercial databases to find associations between suspects or to discover locations of or completely new suspects. The database and technologies used in the system were housed by Seisint, a Florida-based company since acquired by Nexis.The Matrix program was shut down in June 2005 after federal funding was cut in the wake of public concerns over privacy and state surveillance.(http://www.privacyinternational.org/article.shtml?cmd%5B347%5Dx-347-205261, Privacy International, 5 June 2005, loaded 30 March 2007)HistoryMatrix was the brain child of Asher a serial businessman in the data aggregation field. Asher reportedly contacted Florida police immediately after the September 11 terrorist attacks claiming he could find the hijackers as well as other potential terrorists.(http://www.alternet.org/story/16985/, Alternet, 16 October 2003, loaded 30 March 2007) Asher reportedly offered to make available the database and technology that could do the job quickly, for free, supplied by the company he owned and operated, Seisint.Control of the system was handed over to law enforcement officials, although Seisint continued to house and operate it on their behalf. After a demonstration of the system at the White House in January 2003 Matrix received US$4 million in grants from the Justice Department and the program was earmarked US$8 million by Homeland Security.(http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/articles/A50577-2004Jul14.html LexisNexis To Buy Seisint For $775 Million, Washington Post, 15 July 2004, loaded 2 April 2007)The program snowballed, as states signed up to participate including Alabama, Connecticut, Florida, Georgia, Kentucky, Louisiana, Michigan, New York, Oregon, Pennsylvania, South Carolina, Ohio and Utah. California and Texas joined then exited the program citing privacy and security concerns. The federal government and the CIA was cited as likely future users.The programs similarity to the Total Information Awareness (TIA) federally funded initiative that was terminated following public concerns contributed to Matrixs demise.  Matrix came under scrutiny by the Civil Liberties Union (ACLU)  which made of Information Act requests in Florida, where the program originated, and to the federal government on 30 October 2003.(requests) The ACLU followed this up with simultaneous information requests in Connecticut, Michigan, New York, Ohio and Pennsylvania for information about those states participation in Matrix.(Why We Should Fear The Matrix, ACLU)The ACLUs requests sought to find out the information sources that Matrix was drawing upon, who had access to the database and how it is being used. As well as the funding and operational described here, the ACLUs requests revealed that the Matrix would perform an almost identical function to the banned TIA. Matrix would bind together government and commercial databases to allow federal and state law enforcement entities to conduct detailed searches on individuals.Public revelation of the projects funding caused an uproar in the media and states began withdrawing their support. The Matrix program was finally shut down in June 2005 after federal funding was cut in the wake of public concerns over privacy and state surveillance.Seisint retained the technology used to operate Matrix. Both Seisint and its Matrix technology are now owned by NexisFunctionThe Matrix website stated that the data would include criminal histories, drivers license data, vehicle registration records, and  public data record entries. Other data was thought to include credit histories, drivers license photographs, marriage and divorce records, social security numbers, dates of birth, and the names and addresses of family members, neighbors and business associates. The ACLU pointed out that the type of data that the Matrix compiles could be expanded to include information in commercial databases encompasses such as purchasing habits, magazine subscriptions, income and job histories.Matrix would combine these government records and information from commercial databases in a warehouse. Dossiers would be reviewed by specialized software to identify anomalies using mathematical analysis. When anomalies are spotted, they would be scrutinized by personnel who would search for evidence of terrorism or other crimes.(Congressional testimony (25 March 2003),)Like the TIA, Matrix would use mining where searches for patterns in this data (including the anomalies) would be used to identify individuals possibly involved in terrorist or other criminal activity. Congressional critic B. Dockery pointed out that like the TIA, this kind of data mining may be ineffective, and have severe downsides, including its privacy costs.Data from Matrix would be transferred through the Information Sharing Systems network , an existing secure law enforcement network used to transmit sensitive information among law enforcement agencies. The network was linked to High Intensity Drug Trafficking Areas, United States Attorneys Offices, other federal agencies and several state law enforcement systems.(Commentaries Expression Policy Project)(First responders get homeland security network, Government Computer News, v. 23, #9, 28 April 2003) See also *Assisted Passenger PreScreening System II*Total Information Awareness*Regional Information Exchange System*Information Sharing Systems*Surveillance*Screening Center*Violations Reciprocity and License Agreement*PATRIOT ActReferencesExternal links*MATRIX web site, for Intergovernmental Research. Contact: Clay Jesterhttp://www.iir.com/matrix/contacts.htm.  Program Contacts.*ACLU Links to TIA information, FOIA requests, and news clips on the Matrix program.* The MATRIX: Total Information Awareness Reloaded (438 KB pdf download), ACLU, 30 October 2003.*When maverick cyber-pioneer Hank Asher invented MATRIX, Vanity Fair 050131: When maverick cyber-pioneer Hank Asher invented MATRIXa controversial personal-information databasehe gave the government a powerful tool for tracking terrorists. So why isnt he a hero?.*Global Intelligence Working Group Connectivity/Systems Committee, Meeting Summary, 28 January 2003 includes discussion of the Matrix.*Scroll down to Steve G. Hodges, National Issues Coordinator, Regional Information Sharing System (RISS) where you will find mention of MATRIX in December 2002.*Florida hires firm founded by man implicated in drug-smuggling to fight terror, CNews.canoe.ca: Hank Asher is founder of Seisint, Inc., an information-technology company with a $1.6-million contract with the Florida Department of Law Enforcement to work on a pilot program for the Matrix network, through which sensitive information on terrorism and other crime suspects would be exchanged.*State contracts with company founded by man linked to smuggling (cache file), AP, 3 August 2003.*OHarrow, Jr., U.S. Backs Floridas New Counterterrorism Database. Matrix Offers Law Agencies Faster Access to Americans Personal Records, WashingtonPost, 5 August 2003.*Robert OHarrow, Jr., US Backs Floridas New Counterterrorism Database. Matrix Offers Law Agencies Faster Access to Americans Personal Records, Washington Post, 6 August 2003.*Enter the Matrix in the War Against Terror, Spartacus, 6 August 2003.*Florida Creates the Matrix, a Big Brother-Like Surveillance System with Help From Choicepoint-Related Firm, Democracy Now, 7 August 2003.*Lucy Morgan, Troubled Business May Lose Contract with State, St. Petersburg Times, 13 August 2003.*Matrix Database May Substitute For Total Information Awareness Project, FuturePundit.com, 14 August 2003: The database is being developed by a company called Seisint which already markets a commercial database service called Accurint which is a database service for locating people and past and present addresses.*Man Implicated As Ex-Smuggler Quits Job, AP, 29 August 2003.*States build anti-terror database. Project resembles federal database thwarted by privacy fears, AP, 23 September 2003.*Jim Krane, U.S. funding privately run database intended for tracking terrorists, AP, 24 September 2003: Dubbed Matrix, the database has been in use for a year and a half in Florida, where police praise the crime-fighting tool as nimble and exhaustive. It cross-references the states driving records and restricted police files with billions of pieces of public and private data, including credit and property records. ... Privacy advocates, officials in two states and a competing data vendor have branded Matrix as playing fast and loose with Americans private details. ... They complain that Matrix houses restricted police and government files on colossal databases that sit in the offices of Seisint Inc., a Boca Raton, Fla., company founded by a millionaire who police say flew planeloads of drugs into the country in the early 1980s.*Thomas C. Greene, A back door to Poindexters Orwellian dream, TheRegister, 24 September 2003: The company profiting from this data bonanza, Florida outfit Seisint Inc., is run by a gentleman implicated two decades ago in a drug smuggling ring, according to the Associated Press. This certainly qualifies him as an appropriate understudy to Poindexter.*Carl Hulse, Poindexters Office Closed: Department Tried Terrorism Futures, San Francisco Chronicle, 26 September 2003.*Total/Terrorism Information Awareness (TIA): Is It Truly Dead?. Frontier Foundation: Its Too Early to Tell; 3 October 2003.*Courtesy of PRWatch at GuerrillaNews.com, 3 October 2003: Communications is representing Seisint Inc., the Boca Raton-based database company, that is home to the Matrix -- Multistate Anti-Terrorism Information Exchange -- which has privacy advocates on edge, ODwyers PR Reports.*Counterterrorism Database Could Threaten Privacy, OMBWatch.org, 8 October 2003.*Ashlee Vance, Georgia runs from the MATRIX, Register/UK, 22 October 2003: The state of Georgia has pulled out of the U.S. Department of Justice sponsored MATRIX information collection program, leaving data only on its felons and sexual offenders behind in the Orwellian database. ... The list of states willing to participate in the MATRIX project is dwindling. Kentucky, Oregon and South Carolina pulled out earlier this year. Georgias exit leaves the Party with Alabama, Connecticut, Florida, Michigan, New York, Ohio, Pennsylvania and Utah as guinea pigs. ... The handy life-tracking database idea should sound familiar. DARPA tried to get some backing for its Total Information Awareness (TIA) program before being shut down by Congress. It seems, however, that was bit a mini-bump in the road. Along with TIA and MATRIX, we have NIMD (Novel Intelligence from Massive Data); CAPPS (Computer Assisted Passenger Pre-Screening System); HID (Human Identification at a Distance), and ARM (Activity Recognition Monitoring).*State May Link Its Databases With Anti-Terrorism MATRIX Project, 25 October 2003. (CT)*State not rushing to link databases to interstate anti-terrorism program, 25 October 2003. (OH)*October,0,6278662.story?collhc-headlines-local-wire ACLU seeks records to anti-terrorism program, AP, 30 October 2003.*Nancy Kravich, A Blip in the MATRIX, AlterNet, 8 November 2003.*2 February 2004: Utah unplugs; 2 articles: http://deseretnews.com/dn/view/0,1249,590039368,00.html, http://deseretnews.com/dn/view/0,1249,590039724,00.htmlAnti-Terrorism Information Exchange
522827
Edgar_Dewdney
thumb|upright|Edgar DewdneyEdgar Dewdney, PC (November 5, 1835 &ndash; August 8, 1916) was a Canadian politician born in Devonshire, England. He served as Lieutenant Governor of the North-West Territories and the fifth Governor of British Columbia. Early life and careerFollowing his education in engineering, he emigrated from England to Columbia in 1859. In 1864, Dewdney married Jane Shaw Moir, the daughter of a tea plantation owner from Ceylon. This marriage was without issue.Dewdney was originally employed as a railway surveyor, and supervised the survey of New Westminster. In 1865, Dewdney was appointed by Governor of British Columbia Seymour to oversee the construction of a trail to the East Kootenay region of the Columbia Interior so that coastal merchants might benefit from the burgeoning trade associated with gold mining in that area. Although used for only a few years, parts of the Trail, as it was known, remain to this day and are used for recreational hiking. Provincial Highway 3 largely follows the route of the Dewdney Trail.Entry into politicsFrom 1868 to 1869, Dewdney became active in Colonial politics, representing the electoral district of Kootenay in the Assembly of British Columbia. After B.C. joined the confederation in 1871, he served as a Conservative of Parliament for the riding of Yale following his election in 1872. He was appointed a member of Prime Minister Sir A. Macdonalds cabinet in 1879, where he served as Indian commissioner for the Territories until 1888. In 1881, Macdonald arranged Dewdneys appointment as Lieutenant-Governor of the North-West Territories, then an executive position. Dewdney resigned his seat in the Commons, but remained Indian commissioner during his term as Lieutenant-Governor, which lasted until 1888. government had not been granted to the North-West Territories, so Dewdney was the Territories head of government. Perhaps his most notable decision in office was changing the territorial capital from Battleford to Regina in 1883 -- a featureless location without water, trees or topography, but where Dewdney had secured substantial real estate for himself adjacent to the Canadian Pacific Railway line.After his term as Lieutenant-Governor of the North-West Territories, Dewdney was again elected to Parliament and served as the member for Assiniboia East (now southeastern Saskatchewan) from 1888 to 1891. During this period he also served as minister of the Interior and superintendent of Indian Affairs. In 1892, he was appointed to the non-executive post of of British Columbia. He served in this post until 1897.He retired from politics in 1900, after unsuccessfully running for Parliament in Westminster, British Columbia.In 1909, following the death his wife Jane, Dewdney remarried. His new wife was Blanche Kemeys-Tynte, the daughter of Colonel Charles John Kemeys-Tynte of Halswell, Somerset, England.HonoursDewdney had the prenomial the Honourable and the postnomial PC for life by virtue of being made a member of the Privy Council for Canada on September 25, 1888.(http://www.pco-bcp.gc.ca/default.asp?LanguageE&Pageinformationresources&SubPrivyCouncilMembers&docPCMembersHistList-A-E_e.htm)Heritage*A major east-west street in Regina, Dewdney Avenue, is named after him; Government House, the original Territorial government building and the local detachment of the RCMP (formerly its headquarters before these were transferred to Ottawa) and national training centre are on Dewdney Avenue.*British Columbia is the name of a locality immediately east of British Columbia, located below the 920 m Dewdney Peak on the north shore of the River.  The community was the namesake of the former Dewdney provincial electoral district and also of the now-dismantled Regional District*The Trunk Road was one of the earliest main roads in the Lower Fraser Valley of British Columbia, running from Port Moody to the community of Dewdney.  Today it exists in sections in Coquitlam and Coquitlam is a major thoroughfare running between Maple Ridge and Mission (where it is now officially Dewdney Street) , today ending short of Dewdney at Hatzic.See also*of Lieutenant-Governors of British Columbia*of Northwest Territories lieutenant-governorsReferencesExternal links* * DewdneyDewdney
524524
Lunch_box
Image:Harry S. Truman Lunch Box.jpg|thumb|Lunch box and vacuum bottle owned by S. TrumanThe lunch box, also referred to as a lunch pail or lunch kit, is used to store food to be taken to work or school. The concept of a food container has existed for a long time, but it wasnt until people began using tobacco tins to haul meals in the early 20th century, followed by the use of lithographed images on metal, that the containers became a staple of youth, and a marketable product.The lunch box has most often been used by schoolchildren to take lunches, or a snack, from home to school. The most common modern form is a small case with a clasp and handle, often printed with a colorful image that can either be generic or based on childrens television shows or films. Use of lithographed metal to produce lunch boxes in the 1950s, 1960s, 1970s and 1980s gave way in the 1990s to use of injection-molded plastic.A lunch kit comprises the actual box and a matching vacuum bottle. However, pop culture has more often embraced the singular term lunch box, which is now most commonly used.HistoryDavid Shayt, curator of the National Museum of American History, pins the evolution of the lunch box as beginning in the mid-nineteenth century. Some of our earliest examples, from the 19th century, were woven baskets with handles. A meal would be wrapped in a handkerchief. Depending on your station, a fancy wooden box would be used by the wealthy, he says. It wasnt possible to go home to lunch every day when more and more Americans were now working in factories and not on the farm, thus it was necessary to have something to protect and transport a meal in.(The Ultimate Collection of Classic Lunchboxes; When Superman Went to School)Lunch boxes have been manufactured using various materials. Typically, childrens school lunch boxes are made of plastic or vinyl, while adult workers lunch boxes are commonly made of metal, such as tin or aluminium, due to the greater need for durability. The aluminium variant was invented in 1954 by Leo May, a miner in Sudbury, Ontario, after he accidentally crushed his tin lunch box.(Out to lunch. Mining Solutions Journal, December 2008.)In 1935, Geuder, Paeschke and Frey produced the first character lunch box, Mouse. It was a lithographed oval tin, with a pull-out tray inside. It had no vacuum bottle, but did have a handle.In 1950, Industries created the first childrens lunch box based on a television show, Cassidy. The Hopalong Cassidy lunch kit, or Hoppy, quickly became Aladdins cash cow. Debuting in time for back-to-school 1950, it would go on to sell 600,000 units in its first year alone, each at a modest $2.39 USD.While television was experiencing amazing growth during the 1950s, manufacturers saw a potential for sales. Manufacturers grew to include ADCO Liberty, American Thermos (later King Seeley Thermos, or KST), Kruger Manufacturing Company, Landers, Frary and Clark (Universal), Okay Industries, and a number of other producers through the 1980s.The first use of plastics was the lunch box handle, but later spread to the entire box, with the first molded plastic boxes produced during the 1960s. Vinyl lunch boxes debuted in 1959.During the 1960s, the lunch box had few changes. The vacuum bottle included in them, however, steadily evolved during the course of the decade and into the 1970s. What was originally a steel vacuum bottle with glass liner, cork or rubber stopper, and bakelite cup became an all-plastic bottle, with insulated foam rather than vacuum. Aladdin produced glass liners into the 1970s, but they were soon replaced with plastic.TodayToday, lunch boxes are generally made of vinyl, with foam insulation, and an aluminum/vinyl interior. As a result, theyre usually much better at retaining their temperature but are less rigid/protective.Lunch box collecting is a popular hobby. Many lunch boxes, including those from the 1950s and 1960s sell for hundreds of dollars, some even into the thousands of dollars. In December 2003, a mint Isolina lunch box was auctioned for $11,500 at Chickens Go Moo, Inc. auctions. With the 15% buyers premium, the total price of this lunch box was $13,225.(Superman lunchbox auctioned)Legacy*A Superman DVD set was released in a case resembling a tin lunch box, albeit notably smaller.*A DS starter kit was released in a case resembling a tin lunch box with Super Mario Bros. graphics.*The collectors edition of 3 was made available in a metal Vault-Tec lunch box the likes of which can be found throughout the game world itself.Health issuesHealth concerns came to light in August 2002, when the Center for Environmental Health discovered that many popular vinyl lunch boxes contained dangerously high levels of lead. Many, though not all, were pulled from the shelves.(Lead in vinyl lunchboxes)In 2001, most major manufacturers began testing their lunch boxes for lead levels, remedied the issue, and labeled their boxes as lead free.(Testing lead in vinyl lunchboxes)See also*Bento - Japan*carrier - India*Amundson - AmericaReferencesExternal links* Comprehensive list of vintage lunchboxes* Lunchbox ideas* Tin Lunch Boxes HQca:Carmanyolada:Madkassede:Brotdosees:Fiambreranl:Brooddoosja:no:Matbokspt:Lancheirasimple:Lunchboxfi:Lounaslaatikko
526324
John_Endecott
John Endecott (before 1601  15 March 1664/5,( also spelled Endicott) was an English colonial magistrate, soldier and the first governor of the Bay Colony.  During all of his years in the colony but one, he held some form of civil, judicial, or military high office.  He served a total of 16 years as governor, including most of the last 15 years of his life; this period of service was the longest of any colonial governor.  He also held important posts representing the colony as part of the England Confederation, and was a leading force in expanding the settlement of Massachusetts and other parts of Essex County.Endecott was a zealous and somewhat hotheaded Puritan, with Separatist attitudes toward the Church.  This sometimes put him at odds with Nonconformist views that were dominant among the colonys early leaders, which became apparent when he gave shelter to the vocally Separatist Roger Williams.  Endecott also argued that women should dress modestly and that men should keep their hair short, and issued judicial decisions banishing individuals who held religious views that did not accord well with those of the Puritans.  He notoriously defaced the English flag because he saw Georges Cross as a symbol of the papacy, and had four Quakers put to death for returning to the colony after their banishment.  An expedition he led in 1636 is considered the opening offensive in the War, which practically destroyed the Pequot tribe as an entity.Endecott used some of his properties to propagate fruit trees; a pear tree he planted still lives in Massachusetts.  He also engaged in one of the earliest attempts to develop a mining industry in the colonies when copper ore was found on his land.  His name is found on a rock in Winnipesaukee, carved by surveyors sent to identify the Massachusetts colonys northern border in 1652.  Places and institutions are named for him, and (like many early colonists) he has several notable descendants.LifeMost of what is known about John Endecotts origins is at best circumstantial.  Biographers of the 19th century believed he was from the Dorset town of Dorchester because of his significant later association with people from that place.(Endicott, p. 11)  In the early 20th century, historian Lethbridge proposed that Endecott was born circa 1588 in or near Chagford in Devon.( (Based on this evidence, Chagford now has a house from the period named in Endecotts honour.)()  However, more recent research by the England Historic Genealogical Society has identified problems with Lethbridges claims, which they dispute.(Anderson, p. 2:644)  According to their research, Endecott may have been born in or near Chagford, but there is no firm evidence for this, nor is there evidence that identifies his parents.  They conclude, based on available evidence, that he was probably born no later than 1600.(  A John Endecott was active in Devon early in the 17th century, but there is no firm evidence connecting him to this Endecott.(Mayo, pp. 67)Very little is known of Endecotts life before his association with colonisation efforts in the 1620s.  He was known to Sir Coke, and may have come to know Roger Williams through this connection.(Mayo, p. 4)  He was highly literate, and spoke French.(  Some early colonial documents refer to him as Captain Endecott, indicating some military experience, and other records suggest he had some medical training.(Endicott, p. 12)Settlement in the New WorldIn March 1627/8(In the calendar, then in use in England, the year began on March 25.  To avoid confusion with dates in the calendar, then in use in other parts of Europe, dates between January and March were often written with both years.  Dates in this article are in the Julian calendar unless otherwise noted.)  Endecott was one of seven signatories to a land grant given to The New England Company for a Plantation in Massachusetts (or the England Company) by the Earl of Warwick on behalf of the Council for New England;(Mayo, pp. 712) the council was at the time the umbrella organisation overseeing English colonisation efforts in North America between 40 and 48 degrees latitude.(Bremer, p. 151)Endecott was chosen to lead the first expedition, and sailed for the New World aboard the Abigail with fifty or so planters and servants on 20 June 1628.(Mayo, p. 12)  The settlement they organized was first called Naumkeag, after the local Indian tribe, but was eventually renamed Salem in 1629.(Mayo, p. 15)  The area was already occupied by settlers of the failed Company, some of whose backers also participated in the New England Company.  This group of earlier settlers, led by Roger Conant, had migrated from a settlement on Ann (near present-day Massachusetts) after it was abandoned.(Mayo, pp. 1315)  Endecott was not formally named governor of the new colony until it was issued a royal charter in 1629.  At that time, he was appointed governor by the companys council in London, and Craddock was named the companys governor in London.(Mayo, p. 22)Image:Endicott pear.jpeg|thumb|left|The Pear Tree in 1997Endecotts responsibility was to establish the colony and to prepare it for the arrival of additional settlers.(Endicott, p. 28)  The winters of 1629 and 1630 were difficult compared to those in England, and he called on the Plymouth Colony for medical assistance.(Mayo, p. 49)  His wife, who had been ill on the voyage over, died that winter.(Endicott, p. 26)  Other difficulties he encountered included early signs of religious friction among the colonys settlers (dividing between Nonconformists and Separatists), and poor relations with Thomas Morton, whose failed Colony and libertine practices (which including a pole and dancing) were anathema to the conservative Puritanism practiced by most settlers in the Massachusetts Bay and Plymouth colonies.  Early in his term as governor he visited the abandoned site of Mortons colony and had the Maypole taken down.(Bremer, p. 166)  When one group of early settlers wanted to establish a church independent of that established by the colonial leadership, he had their leaders summarily sent back to England.(Moore, pp. 350351)Early 1630sEndecotts first tenure as governor came to an end in 1630, with the arrival of Winthrop and the colonial charter.  The company had reorganised itself, relocating its seat to the colony itself, with Winthrop as its sole governor.(Mayo, pp. 5152)  After seeing the conditions at Salem, Winthrop decided to relocate the colonys seat at the mouth of the River, where he founded what is now the city of Boston.(Mayo, pp. 5458)  Endecott, who was chosen as one of the governors Assistants (a precursor to the later notion of a Council), chose to remain in Salem, where he was one of its leading citizens for the rest of his life, serving in roles as town councilor and militia leader, in addition to statewide roles as militia leader, magistrate, deputy governor, and governor.  He established a plantation called Orchard in Salem Village (now known as Danvers), where he cultivated seedlings of fruit trees.  One particular pear tree, brought over as a sapling on one of the early settlement convoys, still lives and bears fruit; it is known as the Pear Tree.(Mayo, pp. 7276)Image:EndicottCuttingFlag.jpg|thumb|right|upright1.2|Illustration by Pyle showing Endecott defacing the English flag.  Pyle has incorrectly depicted the flag as a Jack, when the flag at the time only contained Georges Cross.In the early 1630s the religious conflict between the Nonconformists and the Separatists was the primary source of political disagreement in the colony, and it was embodied by the churches established in Boston and Salem.  The Salem church adhered to Separatist teachings, which sought a complete break with the of England, while Nonconformist teachings, which were held by Winthrop and most of the colonial leadership in Boston, sought to reform the Anglican church from within.(Mayo, pp. 6364)  The arrival in Boston in 1631 of Roger Williams, an avowed Separatist, heightened this conflict.  Authorities there banished him, and he first went to Salem, where, due to Endecotts intervention, he was offered a position as a teacher in the local church.  When word of this reached Boston, Endecott was criticised for supporting Williams, who was banished from the colony.(Mayo, pp. 6567)  Williams went to Plymouth, but returned to Salem a few years later, becoming the churchs unofficial pastor following the death of Skelton in 1634.(  Boston authorities called for his arrest after he made what they viewed as treasonous and heretical statements; he fled, eventually establishing Rhode Island.(Mayo, p. 92)  During this time Endecott argued that women should be veiled in church,(Mayo, p. 83) and controversially defaced the local militias flag, because it bore Georges Cross, which Williams claimed was a symbol of the papacy.(Mayo, pp. 8485)  This action is celebrated in Hawthornes story, Endicott and the Red Cross, where the writer presents the tension between Endecott as a symbol of religious intolerance and as an? emblem of heroic resistance to foreign domination of New England.(Wright, p. 80)  Endecott did this at a time when the Council of King Charles I was examining affairs in Massachusetts, and the colonial administration was concerned that a strong response was needed to prevent the loss of the colonial charter.(Bremer,  pp. 238239) Endecott was censured for the rashness of his action (and not for the act itself), and deprived of holding any offices for one year; 1635 was the only year in which he held no office.(Mayo, pp. 87,90)  The committee managing the colonial militia voted that year to stop using the English flag as its standard.(Bremer, p. 239)  Following the incident, and the refusal of the colonial assembly to grant Salem additional land on the Marblehead Neck because of Williams presence in Salem, the Salem church circulated a letter to other churches in the colony, calling the legislative act a heinous sin.(Mayo, p. 90)  Although the authorship of the letter is uncertain, Endecott defended the letter when summoned to Boston, and was consequently jailed for a day; after he came and acknowledged his fault, he was discharged.(Mayo, p. 91)Pequot WarIn 1636 the boat of Massachusetts trader John Oldham was seen anchored off Island, swarming with Indians.  The Indians fled at the approach of the investigating colonists, and Oldhams body was found below the main deck.(Cave, p. 104)  The attackers were at the time believed to be from tribes affiliated with the Narragansetts, but Narragansett leaders claimed that those responsible had fled to the protection of the Pequots.(Bremer, p. 267)(Cave, pp. 105107)  At the time the Pequots were aggressively expansionist in their dealings with the surrounding native tribes (including the Narragansett), but had generally kept the peace with the English colonists of present-day southern New England.  The accusation of the Narraganssetts angered Massachusetts authorities (then under governor Henry Vane), who were already upset that the Pequots had earlier failed to turn over men implicated in killing another trader on the River.  This second perceived affront produced calls in Massachusetts for action against the Pequots.(Cave, pp. 100, 107109)  In August 1636 Governor Vane placed Endecott at the head of a 90 man force to extract justice from the Pequots.(Cave, p. 109)Image:EndicottBlockIsland1636.jpg|thumb|left|240px|Engraving depicting Endecotts men landing on IslandEndecotts instructions were to go to Block Island, where he was to kill all of the Indian men and take captive the women and children.(  He was then to go to the Pequots on the mainland, where he was to make three demands: first, that the killers of Oldham and the other trader be surrendered; second, that a payment of one thousand fathoms of wampum be made; and third, that some Pequot children be delivered to serve as hostages.(  Endecott executed these instructions with zeal.  Although most of the Indians on Block Island only briefly opposed the English landing there, he spent two days destroying their villages, crops and canoes; most of the Indians on the island successfully eluded English searches for them.  English reports claimed as many as 14 Indians were killed, but the Narragansetts only reported one dead.(Cave, pp. 111112)  Endecott then sailed for Saybrook, an English settlement at the mouth of the Connecticut River.  Gardiner, the leader there, angrily informed Endecott when he learned of the missions goals, You come hither to raise these wasps around my ears, and then you will take wing and flee away.(Cave, p. 113)After some discussion and delays due to bad weather, Gardiner and a company of his men agreed to accompany the Massachusetts force to raid the Pequot harvest stores.(  When they arrived at the Pequot village near the mouth of the Thames River, they returned the friendly greetings of the inhabitants with stony silence.  Eventually a Pequot sachem rowed out to meet them; the English delivered their demands, threatening war if they did not receive satisfaction.(Cave, p. 114)  When the sachem left to discuss the matter in the village, Endecott gave a promise to await his return; however, shortly after the sachem left, he began landing his fully armed men on shore.  The sachem rushed back, claiming the senior tribal leaders were away on Island; Endecott responded that this was a lie, and ordered an attack on the village.(Cave, p. 116)  Most of the villagers got away, and once again the expeditions activity was reduced to destroying the village and seizing its crop stores; Gardiner reported that the Bay-men killed not a man.(Cave, p. 117)  After completing this work, Endecott and the Massachusetts men boarded their boats to return to Boston, leaving Gardiner and his men to finish the removal of the crops.  The Pequots regrouped and launched an attack on Gardiners party whose armor protected them from the arrowfire, but their escape was nevertheless difficult.(Cove, pp. 117118)Historian Alfred Cave describes Endecotts actions as a heavy-handed provocation of an Indian war.(Cove, p. 119)  All of the surrounding colonies protested the action, complaining that the lives of their citizens were placed in jeopardy by the raid.(  Since the Pequots had previously been relatively peaceful with the English, Endecotts raid had the effect Gardiner predicted and feared.  Communities on the Connecticut River were attacked in April 1637, and Gardiner was virtually besieged in Saybrook by Pequot forces.(Cave, pp. 135136)  Endecott had no further role in the war, which ended with the destruction of the Pequots as a tribe; their land was divided up by the colonies and their Indian allies in the 1638 of Hartford, and the surviving tribespeople were distributed among their neighbors.(Cave, pp. 162163)Later terms as governorEndecott was elected deputy governor in 1641(Mayo, p. 151)  and in this role was one of the signatories to the Body of Liberties, which enumerated a number of rights available to all colonists, and presaged the States Bill of Rights.(Mayo, pp. 150151)(Schwartz, p. 51)  The next few years were quiet, although rumors of war with the Indians led to the formation in 1643 of the England Confederation, designed to facilitate united action by the New England colonies against common external threats as well as internal matters like dealing with escaped slaves and fugitives from justice.(Mayo, p. 161)In 1643, Governor Winthrop became embroiled in a controversy over the propriety of taking sides in a power struggle going on in neighbouring French Acadia.  Endecott pointed out that he should have let the French fight amongst themselves without English involvement, as this would weaken them both.(Mayo, p. 166)  The 1644 governors election became a referendum on Winthrops policy; Endecott was elected governor, with Winthrop as his deputy.(Mayo, p. 170)  During his one year term he oversaw the division of the colony into four counties: Suffolk, Essex, Middlesex, and Norfolk.(Mayo, p. 172)  The ascent of the Salem-based Endecott also prompted an attempt by other Salem residents to have the colonial capital relocated there; the attempt was rejected by the governors council of assistants.(Mayo, pp. 173174)Fallout from the Civil War (begun in 1642) also permeated Boston during Endecotts tenure.  Two ships, one with a Royalist captain, the other with a Parliamentarian captain, arrived in Boston, and the Parliamentarian sought to seize the Royalist ship.  After much deliberation, Endecotts councils essentially adopted support of the Parliamentarian position, reserving the right to declare independence if the Parliament should hereafter be a malignant spirit.(Mayo, pp. 177178)  The Parliamentarian was permitted to seize the Royalist vessel, and the colony also began seizing Royalist vessels that came into port.(Mayo, pp. 179183)Thomas Dudley was elected governor in 1645, with Winthrop as his deputy.  Endecott, as a consolation, was given command of the colonial militia, reporting to the governor.(Mayo, p. 188)  He was also once again made a governors assistant, and was chosen to represent the colony to the confederation in 1646.(Mayo, p. 193)  The threat of Indian conflicts in neighbouring colonies prompted the colony to raise its defensive profile, in which Endecott played a leading role.(Mayo, pp. 189192)  Winthrop was reelected governor in 1646; after his death in 1649, Endecott succeeded him as governor.  By annual re-elections Endecott served nearly continuously until his death in 1665; for two periods (16501651 and 16541655) he was deputy governor.(Mayo, p. 200)()In 1639 Endecott had been granted several hundred acres of land north of Salem, in what is now Boxford and Topsfield.  The tract was not formally laid out until 1659, but as early as 1651 Endecott was granted an additional three hundred acres of land to tend the furtherance of a copper works that was adjacent to his land.(Topsfield Historical Society, p. 17)  Endecott hired Richard Leader, an early settler who had done pioneering work at an iron works in nearby Lynn, but the efforts to develop the site for copper processing failed.(A persistent shortage of coinage in all of the colonies prompted Massachusetts to establish a mint in 1652, and begin production of coins from its silver reserves.(Mayo, p. 219)  This act solved a practical problem, but the colony had no authority to do so from the crown.(Adams, p. 304)  Although this did not become an issue while Endecott was governor, it eventually became a source of controversy with the crown, and the mint had apparently ceased operations around 1682.(American Antiquarian Society, pp. 294301)The colonys boundaries expanded somewhat during Endecotts tenure, mainly in the 1650s.  In addition to formally claiming present-day Connecticut as spoils from the Pequot War, Endecott sought to establish the colonys northern boundary.  In 1652 he sent a commission with surveyors to locate the most northerly point on the River, since the colonial grant defined its northern border as  north of that river.  These surveyors were led by Indian guides to the outlet of Winnipesaukee which was claimed by the guides to be the source of the Merrimack.(Mayo, pp. 221223)  At that location, the party incised an inscription on a rock that survives, and is now located in a small Hampshire state park.()  When this survey line was extended eastward, the boundary was determined to fall on the coast at Bay, and the colony thus claimed most of what is now southern Maine and New Hampshire.(Mayo, pp. 225226)Religious intoleranceImage:MaryDyerByHowardPyle.jpg|thumb|right|upright|Dyer being led to the gallows in 1660 (painting by Pyle)One written statement made early in his tenure in May 1649 showed Endecotts dislike of a fashionable trend toward long hair: Forasmuch as the wearing of long haire after the manner of Ruffians and barbarous Indians, hath begun to invade new England contrary to the rule of gods word ... Wee the Magistrates who have subscribed signed this paper ... doe declare and manifest our dislike and detestation against the wearing of such long haire.(Mayo, p. 201)  In 1651 he presided over a legal case in which three people were accused of being Baptists, a practice that had been banned in the colony in 1644.(Mayo, pp. 212213)  In convicting John Clarke and sentencing him to either pay a fine or be whipped, Endecott, according to Clarkes account of the exchange, told Clarke that he deserved death, and said he would not have such trash brought into his jurisdiction.(Mayo, p. 214)  Clarke refused to pay the fine; it was paid by friends against his wishes, and he returned to Rhode Island.(Mayo, p. 215)  Of the three men convicted, only Holmes was whipped; Crandall, out on bond, returned to Rhode Island with Clarke.(Mayo, pp. 216217)When Cromwell consolidated his control over England in the early 1650s, he began a crackdown on religious communities that dissented from his religious views.(Mayo, p. 236)  This notably included Baptists and Quakers, and these groups began their own migration to the North American colonies to escape persecution.  Those that first arrived in Boston in 1656 were promptly deported by Endecotts deputy, Bellingham, while Endecott was in Salem.  More Quakers arrived while Endecott was resident in Boston, and he had them imprisoned pending trial and deportation.(Mayo, p. 237)  He met several times with the Quaker, Mary Prince, after receiving an outrageous letter from her.(Mayo, p. 238)  The meetings were apparently fruitless, and she and the other Quakers were deported.  Following these acts, the members of the New England Confederation all adopted measures for the prompt removal of Quakers from their jurisdiction.(Mayo, p. 240)The measures adopted were insufficient to prevent the influx of these perceived undesirables, so harsher measures were enacted.  Repeat offenders were to be punished by having ears cut off, and, on the third offense, to have the tongue bored through with a hot iron.(Mayo, p. 241)  By 1658 the punishment for the third offense had been raised to death, except they do then and there plainly and publicly renounce their said cursed opinions and devilish tenets.(  In October 1658 the death penalty was enacted for the second offense in Massachusetts.(Mayo, p. 243)  One year later, three Quakers were arrested and sentenced to death under this law.  Two of them, Marmaduke Stephenson and William Robinson, where hanged, while the third, Dyer, received a reprieve at the last minute.(Mayo, p. 244)  Dyer returned to the colony in 1660, and, under questioning by Endecott and the other magistrates, refused to either recant her beliefs or agree to permanent banishment from the colony.  She was hanged on 1 June 1660;  she, Stephenson, Robinson, and William Leddra (hanged in 1661) are now known as the martyrs.(Mayo, pp 248249)  The severity of these acts was recognized by the colonists as problematic, and the laws were changed so that execution was the penalty for the fifth offense.(Mayo, p. 249)  (The poor treatment of Quakers and other religious dissenters would be cited as one of the reasons for revocation of the colonial charter in 1684.)(Adams, p. 381)Endecotts role in the treatment of the Quakers was immortalized by Greenleaf Whittier in his poem Cassandra Southwick, named for another Quaker who suffered while Endecott was governor.  Whittier characterized Endecott as dark and haughty, and exhibiting bitter hate and scorn for the Quaker.(Even though the Puritan colonists of New England were supportive of Oliver Cromwells reign in England, they were not always receptive to Cromwells suggestions.  In response to a proposal by Cromwell that New Englanders migrate to Ireland to increase its Protestant population, the Massachusetts assembly drafted a polite response, signed by Endecott, indicating that its people were happy where they were.(Mayo, p. 232)English RestorationIn July 1660 word arrived in Boston that Charles II had been restored to the English throne.  This was an immediate cause of concern in all of the colonies that had supported Cromwell, since their charters might be revoked.  In Boston it created a more difficult problem for Whalley and Goffe, two of the regicide commissioners who had voted to execute Charles I.  Although Charles promised in the 1660 of Breda that all were pardoned except by act of Parliament, the and Oblivion Act of 1660 singled out all of the regicides for punishment.  Whalley and Goffe moved freely about the Boston area for some time, and Endecott refused to order their arrest until word arrived of the passage of the Indemnity Act.(Mayo, pp. 257259)  Endecott then issued a warrant for their arrest on 8 March 1661.  It is unknown whether Whalley and Goffe had advance warning of the warrant, but they fled, apparently to the New Haven area.(Mayo, p. 260)II (de Champaigne).jpg|thumb|right|upright|Portrait of Charles II, c. 1653Endecotts warrant was followed by an order issued by King Charles in March and received by Endecott in May 1661 containing a direct order to apprehend the two fugitives and ship them back to England.(  Endecott dutifully obeyed, but he appointed two recently arrived Royalists to track them down.(Mayo, p. 261)  Somewhat predictably, their search came up empty, and Whalley and Goffe thus escaped.  Biographer Lawrence Mayo suggests Endecott would have appointed different men for the search had he been serious about catching them.(Mayo, p. 262)Opponents to the rule of the Puritans in Massachusetts were vocal in airing their complaints to the new king.  Among their complaints was the fact that Charles ascension to power had not been formally announced; this only took place in 1661 after Endecott received a chastising order from the king.(Mayo, p. 264)  This prompted the assembly to draft another of several laudatory letters it addressed to the king, congratulating him on his rise to power.(  The mint was claimed to be a bald-faced attempt to devalue good English currency, some colonists complained that the expansion of the colonys borders in 1652 was little more than a land grab, while others put forward claims of administrative malfeasance with respect to funds provided by the crown for the Christianization of Indians, and the Quakers cataloged a long list of grievances.(Mayo, pp. 265266)  Believing that it was best to ignore the accusations, Endecott and other members of the old guard opposed sending representatives to London to argue against these charges.  Supporters of the idea raised funds in a private subscription, and sent a commission to London.(Mayo, p. 270)The colonial mission, led by future governor Bradstreet and pastor John Norton, was successful, and King Charles announced that he would renew the colonial charter, provided the colony allowed the Church of England to practice there.(Mayo, p. 271)  The Endecott administration dragged its feet on implementation, and after months of  inaction, the king sent a commission headed by Samuel Maverick, one of the colonys most vocal critics, to investigate.(Mayo, p. 274)  Endecott had advance warning of what the commission was to investigate, and took steps to address in form, if not in substance, some of the expected actions.  Charles insisted that all religious dissenters be freed, which Endecott had done long before Mavericks arrival, but he did so by deporting them.(Mayo, p. 277)  Upon the commissioners arrival, the assembly took up the matter of allowing Church of England activity in the colony.  They passed a law deliberately using the kings language, allowing anyone orthodox in religion to practice in the colony; however, they also defined such orthodoxy as consisting of views that were acceptable to local ministers. This effectively negated the law, because there were probably no ministers in the colony who would agree that Anglicans satisfied their idea of orthodoxy.(Mayo, p. 279)Last yearsIn 1655 the Massachusetts assembly passed a law requiring its governor to live closer to Boston; this was probably done in response to Endecotts sixth consecutive election as governor.  Endecott was consequently obliged to acquire a residence in Boston; although he returned to Salem frequently, Boston became his home for the rest of his life.(Mayo, pp. 233234)  Endecott died in Boston on 15 March 1664/5.  Although early accounts claim he was buried at Bostons Kings Chapel, later evidence has identified his burial site as tomb 189 in the Burying Ground.(Mayo, p. 284)FamilyImage:William Endicott, bw photo portrait, 1886.jpg|thumb|right|upright|Endecott descendant Crowninshield EndicottBefore he came to the colonies in 1628, Endecott was married to his first wife, Anne Gower, who was a cousin of Governor Craddock.(Anderson, p. 2:643)  After her death in New England, he was married in 1630 to a woman whose last name was Gibson, and by 1640 he was married to Elizabeth, the daughter of Philobert Cogan of Somersetshire.(Mayo, p. 56)  It is uncertain whether these represent two different wives, or a single wife whose name was Elizabeth (Cogan) Gibson.  Because of the uncertainty concerning his wives, it is not known who the mother of his two sons was.  There is only firm evidence that he was already married to Elizabeth in 1640, and the records that survive for the 1630s, when his sons were born, do not otherwise identify his wife by name.( Endecotts last wife, Elizabeth, was a sister-in-law of the colonial financier and magistrate Ludlow.  Endecotts two known children were John Endecott and Dr. Zerubabbel Endecott, neither of whom, seemingly to his disappointment, followed him into public service.(  There is also evidence that Endecott fathered another child in his early years in England; in about 1635 he arranged funds and instructions for the care of a minor also named John Endecott.(Mayo, pp. 6869)Despite his high position, Endecott was never particularly affluent.  According to his will, several large tracts of land, including the Orchard estate in Salem and one quarter of Block Island, were distributed to his wife and sons; however, it was also noted that some of his books were sold to pay debts.(Mayo, p. 282)  One unexpected legacy left behind by Endecott was the uncertain boundaries of the Orchard estate.  Several generations later, his descendants were involved in litigation concerning disputed occupancy of part of the estate.()Endecotts descendants include Massachusetts governor Peabody and States Secretary of War Crowninshield Endicott.  His descendants donated family records dating as far back as the colonial era to the Historical Society.()()  In 1930, the Massachusetts tercentenary was marked by the issuance of a medal bearing Endecotts likeness; it was designed by Gardin Fraser.(Mayo, p. 285) College in Massachusetts (once a part of Salem) is named for him.()NotesReferences*************Further reading* Endecott biography, pp. 385386.External links*Biography of Endecott at the Massachusetts Government Interactive State House
528692
Angelus-Rosedale_Cemetery
Angelus-Rosedale Cemetery is a cemetery at 1831 West Washington Boulevard Angeles, California, in the historic West Adams District a short distance southwest of Downtown.It was founded as Rosedale Cemetery in 1884,(Angeles Times, Nov. 20, 1884, Rosedale --- The Opening of a New Cemetery in this City, p. 0_4) when Los Angeles was a small city of around 28,000 people,() on  of land running from Washington to Venice Boulevard (then 16th Street) between Normandie Avenue and Walton and Catalina Streets, and often used by California politicians, notably former Mayors of the City of Los Angeles. The interments include pioneers and members of leading families who had a conspicuous place in Los Angeles institutions and the state.Rosedale was the first cemetery in Los Angeles open to all races and creeds, and was the first to adopt the concept of the new approach of design called lawn cemeteries, where the grounds are enhanced to surround the burial places of the dead with beautiful and decorative trees, shrubs, flowers, natural scenery and works of monumental art. Among the more traditional structures, headstones and mausoleums, the cemetery also has several pyramid crypts.In 1887, the second crematory in the United States was opened at Rosedale Cemetery.(Rosedale --- Cemetery, Mortuary and Crematory by Msgr. Francis J. Weber) It was also the first crematory west of the Mountains.(Los Angeles County History - An Illustrated History of Southern California - Los Angeles City) The initial cremation took place on June 16, when the body of Mrs. Olive A. Bird (c. 1845-1886), wife of prominent physician O.B. Bird, was incinerated. By 1913, there had been 2,392 cremations performed at Rosedale. Next to the cemetery at 1605 S. Catalina Street, is another cremation facility, the domed, observatory shaped of the Pines Crematory.In 1993, Rosedale was bought by the Funeral Home on Crenshaw Boulevard and renamed Angelus-Rosedale Cemetery.__NOTOC__Notable intermentsSources not listed here can be found in the articles referenced.A*George Alexander (18391923), politician, 38th Mayor of Los Angeles*Allensworth (18421914), Lt. Colonel of the U.S. Army, founder of Allensworth, California*Anderson (19051949), jazz singer and actress*Armstrong (19121988) champion boxerB*L. Baker, Jr. (18651913), U.S. Army officer, Medal of Honor recipient during Spanish-American War*Banning (18301885), financier, known as the Father of the Port of Los Angeles*Bowen (18301912), Medal of Honor recipient during the American Civil War*Browning (18801962), film director and screenwriter, known as The Master of the Macabre*David Burbank (18211895), dentist, businessman and landholder, Burbank, California, was named for him*Burbridge (18951987), actress(Find-a-Grave)C*Eric Campbell (18791917), actor*Carewe (19091955), actress*Carr (18771936), writer, newspaper columnist and editor*Chance (18771924), Hall of Fame baseball playerD*Dolphy (19281964), American jazz musicianEF*Benton Frmont (18241902), writer, wife of Lieutenant Colonel John C. FrmontG*Reynolds Gardiner (19442006), author*Thornton Glassell (18311879), Confederate Naval officer, granduncle of General George S. Patton*Glaum (18881970), actress, silent screen Vamp*Goodfellow (18551910), physician, medical pioneer, known as the Gunfighters SurgeonH*C. Harper (18661948), politician, 36th Mayor of Los Angeles*Harris (19091985), actress*Otis Houghton (18281914), lawyer, politicianIJK*Kellar (18491922), American magician who influenced Harry HoudiniL*Lamas (19151982), Argentinian-born actor/director, husband of Esther Williams, was cremated at Rosedale*Chambers Ludlow (18311898), Union officer during the American Civil WarM*Mansfield (18221896), politician, lieutenant governor of California from 1880 to 1883*Marshall (18761931), Major League Baseball player*B. Mayes (18371900), Union Army soldier, Medal of Honor recipient*McAleer (18581944), politician, Canadian-born 35th mayor of Los Angeles*McDaniel (18951952), actress, first black person to win an Academy Award*G. Millard (18561895), politician, 20th lieutenant governor of California*Monohan (18881953), murder victim; her death sent Barbara Graham, Emmet Perkins and Jack Santo to the gas chamber*C. Moody (18321904), American politician, congressman and senator*Tim Moore (18871958), vaudevillian, comic actorN*Nadeau (18191887), French Canadian pioneer who arrived in Los Angeles in 1861*Neilan (18911958), director, actor, motion picture pioneer*R. Newberry (18501933), businessman, pioneer grocer, founded J.R. Newberry and Company, one of the first chain grocery stores in Los Angeles*G. Nichols (18131898), 3rd and 10th Mayor of Los AngelesO*Z. Osborne (18481923), politician, served in the House of Representatives from CaliforniaP*John Henry Patterson (18671947),  Officer in the Army, author of Man-Eaters of Tsavo.*Peete (18831947), notorious multiple murderess, executed in the gas chamber at San Quentin*Price (18921955), actorQR*Rader (18481897), politician, 31st Mayor of Los Angeles*Razaf (18951973), lyricist, composer, wrote Aint Misbehavin and Honeysuckle Rose*H. Rindge (18571905), American businessman, philanthropist and writer*A.C. Rogers (18211899), politician, served in the House of Representatives from Arkansas*Rasputin (18891977), daughter of Russias notorious mad monk, Grigori RasputinS*Salisbury (18761935), actor*Severance (18201914), social reformer, suffragette*S. Slauson (18651922), Southland pioneer, citrus grower and former president of the Chamber of Commerce, prominent in civic affairs*Sloane (19091965), actor, was in Orson Welles Theatre, played Mr. Bernstein in Citizen Kane*Stewart Sparks (18711932), Los Angeles City Council member*Stephens (18591944), 24th California GovernorT*Tatum (19091956), jazz pianist (has cenotaph; originally interred here, he was removed to Forest Lawn Cemetery, Glendale)*I. Traeger (18801935), lawman, politician, football coach, sheriff of Los Angeles County  from 1921 to 1932, served term in the House of Representatives from California*Q. Tufts (18401908), politician, served in the House of Representatives from IowaUVW*Wade (19061983), actress, played Sapphire Stevens on radio and TVs Amos n Andy*Morris Wardwell 1861-1918, engineer, Italie Mining Company, gold mine in Twenty Nine Palms*Wellborn (18431921), politician, served in House of Representatives from Texas*Werfel (18901945), Austrian writer (whose body was transferred in 1975 to the Zentralfriedhof, Vienna)(Franz Werfel  timeline and works )*Whitman (18931954), actor, played the Carpetbaggers friend in Gone with the Wind*M. Widney (18381929), American lawyer, judge, a founder of the University of Southern California*Harvey H. Wilcox (18321891), owned a ranch northwest of Los Angeles, which his wife, Daeida, named Hollywood. Originally interred in Rosedale, alongside his mother, Azubah (Mark) Wilcox (c. 18041888); he was removed to Hollywood Cemetery in 1922*Wilson (18861953), actor, musician, played Sam in Casablanca*May Wong (19051961), actress, the first Chinese American movie star*T. Woodman (18721949), politician, 41st mayor of Los Angeles*Wu (18961945), actorYZ*Zier (19091952), actressReferencesExternal links*Angelus Funeral Home Website*Political Graveyard - a listing of politicians by burial place
530686
Vermont_Law_School
Vermont Law School (VLS) is a private, Bar Association accredited school located in South Royalton, Vermont (a village of Vermont). The Law School has one of the United States leading programs in law, and the Law School is currently (2011) ranked #1 in Environmental Law by News and World Report; in recent years, the school has been ranked #1 in 2009 and 2007, and #2 in 2008 (never lower than #2 since rankings began in 1991, #1 ranked 12 times).() The Law School offers several degrees, including Doctor (JD), of Laws (LL.M) in Environmental Law, Master of Environmental Law and Policy (MELP) (formerly known as Master of Studies in Environmental Law (MSEL)), and dual degrees with a diverse range of institutions, including the University of Cambridge, the Yale University School of Forestry and Environmental Studies, the Thunderbird School of Global Management, the Tuck School of Business at Dartmouth.  Profile of the 2010 JD Entering Class * JD Class: 233(http://www.vermontlaw.edu/Admissions/JD_Admissions/JD_Class_Statistics.htm)* LSAT 75th percentile: 159* LSAT Median: 156* LSAT 25th percentile: 153* GPA 75th percentile: 3.55* GPA Median: 3.37* GPA 25th percentile: 3.13* Students of Color: 27 (13%)* Median Age: 26* States and Territories: 44* Undergraduate Institutions: 153* Merit Scholars: 109thumb|300px|Oakes Hall, Vermont Law SchoolCampusVermont Law Schools 13 acre (53,000 m) campus resides in South Royalton, central Vermont.  The campus is set just above the broad banks of the White River. The oldest and centermost classroom building on the campus is the towns original schoolhouse, built in 1892.  In 2005 the former town schoolhouse (the original Law School building in 1973) was renovated and renamed Debevoise Hall, after one of the first deans of the law school, Thomas M. Debevoise.  Practicing what it preaches, the Law School emphasized environmental concerns in the renovation, as well as historical preservation and design efficiency.  Debevoise Hall was the only LEED Silver Certified renovation building project in the state of Vermont. Debevoise Hall continues to serve as classroom space and now also houses administration offices, the Environmental Law Center, and the Yates Common Room.()The James L. and Evelena S. Oakes Hall building was constructed and dedicated in 1998. Oakes Hall incorporates green building techniques along with the latest classroom technology.()Jonathon Chase, the late former dean of Vermont Law School, liked to joke that South Royalton was the only town in America with a law school and no stop light.  Vermont Law School holds the distinction of being the law school farthest from a traffic light, at 27 miles. ()  As of September 2011, South Royalton does not have a stoplight. Julien and Virginia Cornell Library The Julien and Virginia Cornell Library opened in 1991.()  The Cornell Library contains over 250,000 print volumes, including primary and secondary legal materials focusing on state, national, and international law.  Its reference section includes legal encyclopedias and dictionaries and reference sources including bibliographies and form books.  The library also possesses a collection of microforms including congressional documents, state session laws, and briefs.   The librarys electronic collection includes access to LexisNexis and Westlaw and other online gateways and databases, as well as a large catalog of full-text electronic journals and books and databases offering primary legal materials.As Vermont Law School offers a world-class environmental law program, the library maintains an extensive interdisciplinary environmental collection, including journals, monographs, electronic resources, and other material related to the study of the environment and environmental law and policy.()HistoryVermont Law School was established by Anthony Doria in the summer of 1973 with 113 students.  In December 1973, VLS was certified by the State Board of Education as an institution of higher learning. Provisional ABA approval came in February 1975. Bells rang when the news arrived, and classes were canceled.  A full complement of classes arrived on campus for the fall 1975 term. The law schools charter class graduated in spring 1976.  Full approval by the ABA came in 1978, and the law school was accredited by the England Association of Schools and Colleges (NEASC) in 1980. VLS became a member of the of American Law Schools (AALS) in 1981.( Solomon Amendment Vermont Law School is one of two law schools in the U.S. to refuse cooperation with the Amendment, a statute passed by Congress requiring colleges and universities to allow military recruitment on campus or risk losing federal funding.()  VLS refused and in doing so gave up over a million dollars in federal funding.  The school is also part of FAIR, or the for Academic and Institutional Rights, a consortium of 38 law schools and law faculties that challenged the Solomon Amendment in v. FAIR, claiming that the militarys dont ask, dont tell policy was discriminatory.  The district court ruled for the Attorney General, but the Circuit Court of Appeals ruled for the law schools.  Oral arguments were heard before the Supreme Court on December 6, 2005, and a unanimous ruling for the government was issued on March 6, 2006, in part because the government could directly require campuses to allow military recruitment, it can therefore also indirectly require the campuses to allow recruitment or forego funds.()AcademicsAs well as the Doctor (JD), the Law School offers several degrees and joint-degrees to qualified candidates, including degrees with other Universities.  Possible degrees include a Master of Laws (LL.M) in Environmental Law, a Master of Laws (LL.M) in American Legal Studies, a Master of Environmental Law and Policy (MELP) (formerly known as Master of Studies in Environmental Law (MSEL)), and a Joint JD/MELP.  The Law School has partnered with a diverse range of American and international universities to develop dual-degree programs for qualified candidates.  American schools partnered with VLS for dual degrees include: School of Forestry and Environmental Studies (JD/Master of Environmental Management),  School of Business at Dartmouth (MELP/of Business Administration), of Vermont Rubenstein School of Natural Resources (MELP/Master of Science in Natural Resources), School of Global Management (JD/Masters of Business Administration), of South Carolina (MELP/JD), of South Dakota (MELP/JD), and University School of Law (MELP/JD).International schools partnered with VLS for dual degrees include: of Cambridge (JD/master of philosophy), of Cergy-Pontoise (France), and of Seville (Spain).Post-graduation employment23.5% of the Class of 2009 were known to be working for law firms in the private sector nine months after graduation. (http://www.lawschooltransparency.com/clearinghouse/?schoolvermont&showcharts&class2009)  11% of the Class of 2009 were unemployed nine months after graduation.  (http://www.lawschooltransparency.com/clearinghouse/?schoolvermont&showcharts&class2009).  These employment statistics are self-reported and not audited by an independent third party. ()The average Class of 2009 graduate had $127,914 of student loan debt. (http://www.lawschooltransparency.com/clearinghouse/?schoolvermont&showcharts&class2009)   Centers, institutes, clinics, and programs Law Centers and Research Institutes* Environmental Law Center--The Environmental Law Center (ELC) began in 1978 with eight masters degree students. Today, the ELC its program is consistently top-ranked by U.S.News & World Report, and confers both the Master of Environmental Law and Policy (MELP) and Master of Laws in Environmental Law (LLM) degrees. The Class of 2008 included 87 students receiving these masters degrees.* Institute for Energy & the Environment--The Institute for Energy and the Environment (IEE) is a national and international resource for energy law and policy. The institute offers a full course curriculum and a certificate of concentration during the academic year and through its Energy Summer seminars; distributes scholarly, technical, and practical publications; provides forums and conferences for professional education and issue development; and serves as a center for graduate research on energy issues, with an environmental awareness.  The Institutes research team is selected from top students in the energy and environmental programs at Vermont Law School. IEE student researchers work on some of the most pressing energy concerns the world faces today,including energy self-reliance, carbon sequestration, and renewable energy sources.  The Institute maintains the  IEE blog focused on current events and research.*  Environmental Tax Policy Institute--The Institute analyzes ways in which taxation can address environmental problems. As a resource for the public and private sectors, non-governmental organizations, the press and academia, the Institute seeks to better inform the public policy debate about the role of environmental taxes at the local, state and federal levels.*  Land Use Institute--The Land Use Institute (LUI) addresses intensifying land use law and policy issues at the local, national, and international levels that critically pertain to the development of a sustainable society.  These issues include application of smart growth principles, ecological planning, affordable housing, flood hazard mitigation, improving the confluence of energy and land use regulatory decision-making and other permitting processes, and land conservation strategies. LUI works with VLS faculty and students, and other nonprofit legal and professional planning partners, to provide sound and innovative information, experience, and education to advance the practice of land use law and planning. This mission is served through direct support for local and regional planning agencies, forums and conferences for issue development, preparation of legislation affecting critical land use issues, education and training for state and local land use planners and regulators, practical and scholarly publications, and graduate professional teaching.Clinics and Experiential Programs*  Environmental & Natural Resource Law Clinic--The clinics advocacy has produced significant accomplishments and raised visibility of environmental issues, including winning a major victory for the endangered gray wolf; protecting wetlands and tributaries; standing up for the health of individuals threatened by the mining operations of a major, multi-national company; and defending a sacred tribal site.  Student clinicians work on behalf of public interest, environmental, and conservation organizations, and learn how to find their way through the complex maze of laws and procedures that regulate economic development and resource extraction activities.* South Royalton Legal Clinic--The South Royalton Legal Clinic (legal clinic for the areas low-income residents) was established in 1979. In 200708, the clinic supervised 58 clinicians and work-study students and handled a caseload of 119 cases.* General Practice Program--The General Practice Program (GPP) was instituted in 1987. The GPP is recipient of the American Bar Associations E. Smythe Gambrell Award for Professionalism, a national award for law schools and other organizations in recognition for advancing professionalism in the practice of law. PublicationsVermont Law School students publish two legal journals, the Vermont Law Review  and the Vermont Journal of Environmental Law on a regular basis several times a year.  Both journals publish in print and online.  In addition to regular publication, both journals sponsor annual symposia. See also * of colleges and universities in the United States* List of colleges and universities in Vermont* A. Bradford, current professor at Vermont Law School, former member of the U.S. Regulatory Commission* M. Costle, former Dean of Vermont Law School and former Environmental Protection Agency Administer* Speth, current professor at Vermont Law School, co-founder of Resources Defense Council* Rachlin, current professor at Vermont Law School* K. Sovacool External links * Vermont Law School official website* U.S. News & World Report - Environmental Law Rankings * www.top-law-schools.comReferences
532840
ABET,_Inc.
ABET, Inc., formerly the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology, is a organization that accredits post-secondary programs in science, computing, engineering, and technology.  Accreditation is intended to certify the quality of these programs, mainly in the States but also internationally., around 3,100 programs are accredited, distributed over more than 600 universities and colleges in 21 countries.()( Found on ABET Accreditation Statistics.)ABET is the recognized U.S. accreditor of college and university programs in applied science, computing, engineering, and technology. ABET also provides leadership internationally through workshops, consultancies, memoranda of understanding, and mutual recognition agreements, such as the Accord. ABET has been recognized by the for Higher Education Accreditation (CHEA) since 1997.HistoryABET was established in 1932 as the Engineers Council for Professional Development (ECPD) by seven engineering societies:(ABET History from ABETs website) The Society of Civil Engineers (ASCE), the American Institute of Mining and Metallurgical Engineers - now the Institute of Mining, Metallurgical, and Petroleum Engineers (AIME), the Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME), the American Institute of Electrical Engineers - now the of Electrical and Electronics Engineers (IEEE), the Society for the Promotion of Engineering Education - now the Society for Engineering Education (ASEE), the Institute of Chemical Engineers (AIChE), and the National Council of State Boards of Engineering Examiners - now the Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying (NCEES).(ECPD was originally founded to provide a joint program for upbuilding engineering as a profession. However, it almost immediately began developing as an accreditation agency, evaluating its first engineering program in 1936 and its first engineering technology program in 1946.(ECPD changed its name to Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology (ABET) in 1980, and changed it again to ABET, Inc. in 2005.(MembersABET is a federation of 29 professional and technical societies (ABET member societies) representing the fields of applied science, computing, engineering, and technology.(ABETs Member Societies from ABET website) These societies own and operate the organization.Member Societies* AAEE - Academy of Environmental Engineers* ACerS/NICE - Ceramic Societys Institute of Ceramic Engineers* ACSM - Congress on Surveying and Mapping* AIAA - Institute of Aeronautics and Astronautics* AIChE - Institute of Chemical Engineers* AIHA - Industrial Hygiene Association* ANS - Nuclear Society* ASABE - Society of Agricultural and Biological Engineers* ASCE - Society of Civil Engineers* ASEE - Society for Engineering Education* ASHRAE - Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers* ASME - Society of Mechanical Engineers* ASSE - Society of Safety Engineers* BMES - Engineering Society* CSAB - formerly called the Computing Sciences Accreditation Board* IEEE - of Electrical and Electronics Engineers* IIE - of Industrial Engineers* INCOSE - Council on Systems Engineering* ISA - Society of Automation* NCEES - Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying* NSPE - Society of Professional Engineers* SAE - of Automotive Engineers* SFPE - of Fire Protection Engineers* SME - of Manufacturing Engineers* SME-AIME - for Mining, Metallurgy, and Exploration, Inc.* SNAME - of Naval Architects and Marine Engineers* SPE - of Petroleum Engineers* SPIE - An international society focused on optics and photonics* TMS - Minerals, Metals & Materials SocietyAssociate Member Society* MRS - Research SocietyThe ABET Accreditation ProcessAccreditation of engineering programs is voluntary; the request for accreditation is initiated by the institution seeking accreditation.(The Basics of Accreditation from the ABET website) Accreditation is given to individual programs within an institution rather than to the institution as a whole. Accredited programs must request re-evaluation every six years to retain accreditation; if the accreditation criteria are not satisfied, additional evaluations may be required within the six-year interval.( Programs without previous accreditation can apply for accreditation as long as they have produced at least one program graduate.(The first step in securing or retaining ABET accreditation is for an institution to request an evaluation of its program(s) by January 31 of the year in which accreditation is being sought.(Information for Programs Seeking Initial Accreditation: Answers to Frequently Asked Questions) The eligibility of the institution must be established, which can be satisfied if the institution is accredited by a regional accreditation agency.  Each program is then assigned to one of four accreditation commissions within ABET:(* Applied Science Accreditation Commission (ASAC) * Computing Accreditation Commission (CAC) * Engineering Accreditation Commission (EAC) * Technology Accreditation Commission (TAC) The program is assigned to a commission based on its title (the program name shown on the transcript).  Each commission has different accreditation criteria.(Each program then conducts an internal evaluation and completes a self-study report.( The self-study documents how well the program is meeting the established accreditation criteria in multiple areas, such as their students, curriculum, faculty, administration, facilities, and institutional support.(  The self-study report must be provided to ABET by July 1.(While the program conducts its self-study, the appropriate ABET commission (Applied Science, Computing, Engineering, or Technology Commission) will choose a team chair to head the on-campus evaluation visit.  A visit date (generally in the September - December time frame) is negotiated between the team chair and the institution.(  Once the date is set, the ABET commission will assign program evaluators (generally one per program being evaluated).  The institution is provided the opportunity to reject the team chair or program evaluators if a conflict of interest is perceived.(  The team chair and evaluators are volunteers from academe, government, industry, and private practice.(Once the program evaluators are accepted by the institution, they are provided with the self-study report for their assigned program.  This report forms the basis of their evaluation of the program, and prepares them for the campus visit.The evaluation team (team chair and program evaluators) will normally arrive on campus on a Saturday or Sunday.( During the on-campus visit, the evaluation team will review course materials from each program, as well as student projects and sample assignments.(  Evaluators will also interview students, faculty, and administrators, and tour the facilities to investigate any questions raised by the self-study.  The visit will normally conclude the following Tuesday with an exit interview with the institutions chief executive officer, dean, and other appropriate institution personnel as appropriate.(   This interview is intended to summarize the results of the evaluation for each program.Following the campus visit, the institution has 7 days in which to correct perceived errors of fact communicated during the exit interview.(   Following this period, the team chair will begin preparation of a draft statement to the institution; this statement undergoes extensive editing and will typically be provided to the institution several months after the visit.  On receipt of the draft statement, the institution has 30 days to respond to issues identified in the evaluation.(   After this response, the team chair prepares a final statement to the institution.The final statement and recommended accreditation action is reviewed by the large annual meeting of all ABET commission members in July after the campus visit.  Based on the findings, the commission members vote on the final accreditation action, and the school is notified of the decision in August.( The information the school receives identifies strengths, concerns, weaknesses, and deficiencies of the program, as well as recommendations for compliance with ABET criteria. Accreditation is granted for a maximum of six years, after which the institution must request another evaluation.(CriteriaABET specifies minimum curricula for various engineering programs.  For instance, ABET requires that all engineering graduates of a baccalaureate program receive at least one year of study in the natural or physical sciences and mathematics, and requires some study within general education.(Accreditation criteria from ABETs website)  ABET also requires that each student complete a capstone project or design class in their education.(  Because of ABETs involvement, engineering curricula are somewhat standardized at the bachelors level, thus ensuring that graduates of any ABET-accredited program have some minimal skill set for entry into the workforce or for future education.EC 2000For most of its history, ABETs accreditation criteria specifically outlined the major elements that accredited engineering programs must have, including the program curricula, the faculty type, and the facilities.  However, in the mid-1990s, the engineering community began to question the appropriateness of such rigid accreditation requirements.(Engineering Change: A study of the impact of EC2000 (executive summary))After intense discussion, in 1997, ABET adopted Engineering Criteria 2000 (EC2000).(  The EC2000 criteria shifted the focus away from the inputs (what material is taught) and to the outputs (what students learned).  EC2000 stresses continuous improvement, and accounts for specific missions and goals of the individual institutions and programs.(  The intention of this approach was to enable innovation in engineering programs rather than forcing all programs to conform to a standard, as well as to encourage new assessment processes and program improvements.MiscellaneousTo become a licensed engineer, one common prerequisite is graduation from an EAC or TAC of ABET-accredited program.  Requirements for professional engineer testing for EAC and TAC accredited programs vary from state to state.The Engineering Credential Evaluation International (ECEI) was established in 1997 as the credential evaluation service of ABET, Inc.  ECEI specialized in the evaluation of degrees in engineering, engineering technology, computer science, and surveying from outside the U.S.  As of October 30, 2006, ECEI stopped accepting applications for credentials evaluation; a business decision made by the ABET Board of Directors.(ECEI FAQ) References External links* Official ABET site* ABET FAQ from Wayne State University* ABET overview from VaNTH ERC* Mutual Accreditation Recognition Agreements
535094
Norton_Radstock
os_grid_reference     ST692550Norton Radstock used to be a small conurbation and large civil parish in and North East Somerset, England,  south west of Bath, and the same distance north west of Frome. It had a population of 21,325 according to the 2001 census.( The term Norton Radstock is not recognised by local residents, neither does it appear on any road map. It consisted of the towns of Norton and Radstock and the parish of Westfield. The town was north of the Hills.  It included the smaller settlements of Clandown, Westfield and Haydon.  Following a Governance Review in 2010, it was abolished in 2011 and replaced by three smaller councils.(http://www.bathnes.gov.uk/BathNES/media/news/2010/July/Council+make+decision+on+Community+Governance+Review.htm)Norton Radstock was twinned with Ambars-et-Lagrave in France from September 1982.()thumb|left|Holy Trinity ChurchClandown was formerly a mining village, on the coalfield, but the last pits in the area closed in the late 1960s. The villages roots date back to Celtic times, where it was given the name Clandown which means meeting place. The village changed hands many times from Celts to Romans to Saxons and so on. Clandowns Church of the Holy Trinity is a small church in quasi-perpendicular style, dating from 1847&ndash;49. It was built for the Rev. Charles Otway Mayne of Norton by the architect G. P. Manners (Bath City Architect). It is a Grade II building.() The church was converted to apartments some years ago. As well as the church, there were two chapels and three houses. One of the chapels has been demolished and the other has been converted to apartments. Two pubs have been demolished. A school was opened in 1861 (there having been a school before this) and closed in 2006.The nearby Quarry is a 0.25 hectare Site of Special Scientific Interest.(English Nature citation sheet for the site (accessed 9 July 2006))GovernanceThe parish was created in 1974 as a successor to the Norton-Radstock Urban District which had been created in 1933 by the merger of Midsomer Norton and Radstock urban districts, along with part of Rural District.()  Under the Government Act 1972 it became a parish to the urban district.The council was replaced in 2011 by separate town councils for Norton and Radstock, and a parish council for Westfield.( Norton Radstock was governed by the authority of and North East Somerset and by Norton Radstock Town Council, which elected 14 councillors across the four wards of Midsomer Norton North, Midsomer Norton Redfield, Radstock and Westfield.() It was part of the North East Somerset, which elects a of Parliament to the House of Commons of the of the United Kingdom.ReferencesRadstockRadstockRadstockRadstock
537010
University_of_Texas_at_Dallas
website  www.utdallas.edu The University of Texas at Dallas, also referred to as UT Dallas or UTD, is a public university in the of Texas System. The main campus is in the heart of the Richardson, Texas, Corridor,  north of downtown Dallas. The institution, established in 1961 as the Graduate Research Center of the Southwest and later renamed the Southwest Center for Advanced Studies (SCAS), began as a research arm of Instruments. In 1969 the founders bequeathed SCAS to the State of Texas and Governor Preston Smith signed the bill officially creating the University of Texas at Dallas.UTD offers over 142 academic programs across its seven schools and hosts more than 50 research centers and institutes. With a number of interdisciplinary degree programs, its curriculum is designed to allow study that crosses traditional disciplinary lines and to enable students to participate in collaborative research labs. Entering freshmen average math and critical reading SAT scores are consistently above 1200 and are among the highest of the public universities in Texas. The Carnegie Foundation classifies UT Dallas as a comprehensive doctoral research university and a high research activity institution. Research projects include the areas of space science, bioengineering, cybersecurity, nanotechnology, and behavioral and brain sciences.UT Dallas owns approximately  of generally contiguous land in Richardson, Texas consisting of  for campus development and another  adjacent to the main campus. From 2007 the university has added or started construction on more than  of new facilities including the first academic structure in Texas to be rated a LEED Platinum facility. In addition to the new facilities a $30-million campus landscape enhancement was completed in late 2010 and the university received a B- on the 2011 College Sustainability Report Card, which includes efforts to protect and conserve natural resources.The school has a Division III athletics program in the Southwest Conference and fields 13 intercollegiate teams. Student activities include more than 160 registered organizations and students provided more than 20,000 volunteer hours at community agencies in 2010. The university has a nationally recognized debate team, recruits worldwide for its chess team and the only school in Texas to field teams in all three of the major pre-law competitions. As of the 2010 fall commencement the university had over 68,250 alumni, who have earned more than 74,900 degrees.HistoryEstablishmentThe UT Dallas founders, McDermott, Howard Green and Erik Jonsson, purchased Service Incorporated (GSI) on December 6, 1941, the day before the on Pearl Harbor. With the increase in defense contracts the General Instrument Division of GSI grew to the point it was reorganized as Texas Instruments, Inc. (TI) in 1951 with GSI a wholly owned subsidiary.() Qualified personnel required by TI were not readily available in the Dallas-Fort Worth area because the regions universities did not provide enough graduates with advanced training in engineering and physical sciences. TI was forced to recruit talent from other states during its expansion and the founders observed in 1959 that To grow industrially, the region must grow academically; it must provide the intellectual atmosphere, which will allow it to compete in the new industries dependent on highly trained and creative minds.() To compensate for this shortage they established the Graduate Research Center of the Southwest in 1961. The institute initially was housed in the Fondren Science Library at Methodist University. Land for the center was acquired by Jonsson, McDermott, and Green in Richardson in 1962 and the first facility, the Laboratory of Earth and Planetary Science (later named the Founders Building), opened on the grounds of the present-day UTD campus in 1964. The Graduate Research Center of the Southwest was renamed the Southwest Center for Advanced Studies (SCAS) in 1967 and in 1969 the founders transferred the land and assets of SCAS to the State of Texas. On June 13, 1969 Governor Preston Smith signed the bill adding the institution to the University of Texas System and creating the University of Texas at Dallas.() In 1969 the school accepted its first students. Physics, biology and geological sciences were the first PhD degrees offered. Francis S. Johnson served as interim president and William B. Hanson was named the director of the Division of Atmospheric and Space Sciences now known as the William B. Hanson Center for Space Sciences.()Expansion and growthIn July 1971, Jordan became the universitys first president and served until 1981.() At that time the campus consisted of only one facility, the  Founders Building. During Jordans 10 year tenure the universitys campus expanded with the addition of a number of new facilities including the Cecil H. Green Hall, J. Erik Jonsson Hall, Lloyd V. Berkner Hall, the Eugene McDermott Library, a campus bookstore and the Visual Arts Building.. The Association of Colleges and Schools granted accreditation to UT Dallas in 1972 and in 1973 the first UT Dallas diplomas were awarded.() Prior to 1975 only graduate students were enrolled. Juniors and seniors were admitted for the first time in 1975 and enrollment increased from 700 in the fall of 1974 to 3,333 in 1975 and by the fall of 1977 to more than 5,300 students.( The universitys first bachelors degree was awarded at the schools spring commencement in 1976. The Callier Center for Communication Disorders became part of the University of Texas at Dallas in 1975 as part of the School of Human Development (now the School of Behavioral and Brain Sciences.() Also in 1975, the School of Management opened and has become the universitys largest and offers programs at the undergraduate, graduate and executive levels. UT Dallass first Nobel laureate, the late Kusch, was a member of the physics faculty from 1972 to 1982. When he retired, the university endowed a program of annual lectures with the theme Concerns of the Lively Mind in his honor.() Robert H. Rutford, an Antarctic explorer recognized with the naming of the Ice Stream and Rutford in Antarctica, became the second president of UT Dallas in May 1982.( Rutford served as head of the university until 1994. During his tenure as president, the university secured approval for a school of engineering, added freshmen and sophomores to its student body and built the first on-campus housing.() UT Dallas school of engineering opened in 1986 due to the efforts of business, community and education leaders. The Erik Jonsson School of Engineering and Computer Science is now the second-largest school at the university. By its 20th anniversary, in 1989, enrollment at UT Dallas topped 8,000.() In 1990, the Texas Legislature authorized the university to admit freshman and sophomore students.() Franklyn Jenifer became the third president of UT Dallas in 1994 and served until 2005. Under Jenifer, UT Dallass enrollment increased from less than 8,500 to nearly 14,000.()Recent historyIn the fall of 2001 Ray Baughman and Anvar Zakhidov left International to establish the UT Dallas NanoTech Institute.() With a donation in 2001 from Jim Von Ehr of $3.5 million and the 2002 appointment of the late MacDiarmid (April 14, 1927  February 7, 2007), UTDs second Nobel laureate, the institute has grown and is now the Alan G. MacDiarmid NanoTech Institute.()() The addition of new facilities continued with the Engineering and Computer Science South Building, a three-story  add-on to the universitys existing engineering facility in August 2002 and in the fall of 2003 the  School of Management building opened and featured 29 classrooms, two computer labs, and a 350-seat auditorium.()() In June 2005, E. Daniel became the fourth president of the University of Texas at Dallas and had served on the faculty at UT Austin and was the Dean of Engineering at the of Illinois from 2001 to 2005. He has continued the expansion of the campus with the Natural Science and Engineering Research Laboratory, a four-story  research facility, completed in December 2006, the for BrainHealth, near the University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center, dedicated in January 2007 and almost  of new facilities added from 2007 to 2010.(()() In 2009 UT Dallas marked its 40 years as a Texas public university and 20 years of freshman enrollment in the university.(AcademicsStudent bodyIn fall 2010, UTD had a total of 17,128 students enrolled consisting of 10,648 undergraduates students and 6,480 postgraduates students, which includes 1,143 doctoral students.() Relative to most universities in the United States, the school is unusual because it has more males, 56%, than females. The 2010 demographic ethnicity at the school was White American 44%, Asian-American 18%, International 16%, Hispanic 11%, and African-American 6%. Top undergraduate majors are Business Administration, Biology, Accounting & Information Management, Psychology, Electrical Engineering, Arts & Technology, and Computer Science.  The top graduate programs are Business Administration, Accounting & Information Management, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Humanities, Finance, Information Technology & Management, and Communication Disorders.()  The U.S. News & World Reports 2012 edition of Best Colleges classified UTDs admission process as more selective with an acceptance rate of 49.9%.( In the fall 2011-12 academic year 1,777 freshmen enrolled of which, 39% had finished in the top 10% of their class, 74% in the top quarter and 52 are Merit Scholars. Entering freshmen average math and critical reading SAT scores are consistently above 1200, (1248 for fall 2011), and are among the highest of the public universities in Texas.(() For 2010 the middle 50% of the freshmen had average scores as follows: in critical reading, 540670, math, 590700, and in writing 530650.() The freshman-to-sophomore retention rate from 2009 to 2010 was 85 percent.() For the spring 2011 commencement the university granted 989 graduate and PhD degrees and 1,166 undergraduates degrees. This brought the number of degrees granted by the university to more than 74,900 and over 68,250 alumni.()()RankingsThe U.S. News & World Reports 2012 edition of Best Colleges categorized the University of Texas at Dallas as a Tier 1 national university, ranked 143 overall, 73 in their national public school rankings and 3rd among Texas public universities.(() The 2011 Shanghai Jiao Tong Rankings placed UTD at 301400 worldwide and 111137 national rank. They also ranked UT Dallas Social Sciences at 5275 worldwide and Economics / Business at 44 worldwide.( Washington Monthly 2011 annual college and university rankings placed UTD at 222.( Kiplingers Personal Finance magazine, 100 Best Values in Public Colleges 2011, ranked UTD at 54th in value for in state residents and 67th for out of state students.()UTDs undergraduate business programs ranked 81st overall and 39th among public university business schools in the U.S. according to BusinessWeeks 2010 rankings and ranked 30th in overall student satisfaction() The 2010 Bloomberg BusinessWeek public universities rankings of undergraduate programs by specialty placed the UTD school of management 10th in both accounting and business law, 1st in teaching of quantitative methods, 3rd in teaching of calculus and  sustainability concepts,  6th in financial management,  7th in ethics and 9th in corporate strategy course work.()The U.S. News and World Reports, Americas Best Graduate Schools 2012, ranks the Full-Time MBA program among the top 40 in the nation and 17 among public universities in the U.S.()() Additional rankings by the U.S. News & World Reports, Best Graduate Schools 2012, include, Computer Engineering at 61,  Electrical Engineering at 66, Management Information Systems at 18 and the School of Engineering and Computer Science at 70.()UT Dallas ranked 10 in the 2011 Princeton Reviews list of the top graduate game design programs.()() In 2010 the UTD Geography and Geospatial Sciences program ranked 16th nationally and first in Texas by Academic Analytics of Stony Brook, N.Y.() Programs ranked less often than annually include the US News & World Report ranking of the universitys graduate audiology program as 4th in the nation and its graduate speech-pathology program at 12th in the nation.()()Academic programsFor fall 2010, the University of Texas at Dallas offered 142 academic programs across its seven schools including, 51 baccalaureate programs, 62 masters programs and 30 doctoral programs.(()  The school also offers 30 undergraduate and graduate certificates.() With a number of interdisciplinary degree programs its curriculum is designed to allow study that crosses traditional disciplinary lines and enable students to participate in collaborative research labs.() In 2002 the UTD Erik Jonsson School of Engineering and Computer Science was the first in the United States to offer an ABET-accredited B.S. degree in telecommunications engineering.() UTDs Arts and Technology program is Texass first comprehensive degree designed to merge computer science and engineering with creative arts and the humanities.() In 2004 the School of Arts and Humanities introduced the Arts and Technology (ATEC) program with the Erik Jonsson School of Engineering and Computer Science and in 2008 a complementary major, Emerging Media and Communication (EMAC), was offered.() In January 2007 the university offered the first doctoral degree in criminology in Texas. The School of  Economic, Political and Policy Sciences administers the degree.() The Bioengineering department offers MS and PhD degrees in biomedical engineering in conjunction with programs at the of Texas Southwestern Medical Center at Dallas and the of Texas at Arlington.() Geospatial Information Sciences is jointly offered with the School of Natural Sciences and Mathematics and with the School of Economic, Political and Policy Sciences (EPPS), which administers the degree. The EPPS program was the first from Texas admitted to the University Consortium for Geographic Information Science and offered the first master of science in geospatial information sciences in Texas.() UT Dallas is the fourth university in the nation to received an accreditation from the United States Geospatial Intelligence Foundation (USGIF) for a Geospatial Intelligence certificate.()ResearchThe 2010 Carnegie Classification of Institutions of Higher Education classifies UT Dallas as a comprehensive doctoral research university and a high research activity institution.(accessdate August 19, 2010) Research projects include the areas of space science, bioengineering, cybersecurity, nanotechnology, and behavioral and brain sciences. The university has more than 50 research centers and institutes and the UTD Office of Technology Commercialization, a technology transfer center, serves as the bridge between laboratory research and commercial development.()()For the fiscal year ending August 2010, UTDs research expenditures totaled $82 million, a 28 percent increase from Fiscal 09(.File:221588main CNOFSmodel HI.jpg|thumb|Scale model of the C/NOFS probe. NASAs CINDI instrument is installed on C/NOFS.Space science research has been a hallmark of the university since its inception in 1964. The William B. Hanson Center for Space Studies (CSS), affiliated with the Department of Physics, conducts research in space physics. It has its roots in the Earth and Planetary Sciences Laboratory of the universitys predecessor. The center also conducts a NASA-sponsored mission, Coupled Ion-Neutral Dynamics Investigation (CINDI), which was launched in April 2008 in cooperation with the United States Air Force.() CINDI, which is part of the payload for the Communication and Navigation Outage Forecast System program, seeks to uncover information about the equatorial plasma bubbles that interrupt radio signals.()() Furthermore, under the leadership of H. Hoffman, the center designed the spectrometer for the Mars Lander as part of the and Evolved Gas Analyzer (TEGA) experiment in cooperation with the of Arizona.()UT Dallas conducts cybersecurity research in a number of areas including cross-domain information sharing, data security and privacy, data mining for malware detection, geospatial information security, secure social networks, and secure cloud computing.() The university is designated a National Center of Academic Excellence and a National Center of Academic Excellence in Information Assurance Research for the academic years 2008-2013 by the Security Agency and of Homeland Security.()The Alan G. MacDiarmid NanoTech Institute was established in 2001 when Ray Baughman, a pioneering nanotechnologist, became the Robert A. Welch Distinguished Chair in Chemistry and director of the universitys NanoTech Institute. In 2007, it was renamed in memory of the late Alan G. MacDiarmid, who shared the 2000 Nobel Prize in chemistry with Heeger and Shirakawa. The NanoTech Institute has produced more than 200 refereed journal articles, 13 of which have been published in Science or Nature, and given over 300 lectures in the United States and abroad.() Ray Baughman was ranked number 30 on the March 2, 2011, Thomson Reuters list of the top 100 materials scientists.()()The Natural Science and Engineering Research Laboratory (NSERL), a four-story,  research facility, was completed in December 2006 after two years of construction. Including ISO 7 cleanroom facilities, the $85 million building provides open floor plans that allows chemists, biologists, nanotechnologists, materials scientists and other specialists to conduct multidisciplinary research. The laboratory provides extensive wet lab, fabrication, instrumentation, and high performance computing facilities to foster biomedical engineering and nano-technology research. The Nanoelectronics Materials Laboratory, on the fourth floor, includes a system that allows researchers to deposit thin film materials one atomic layer at a time. In May 2011 a $3 millon JEOL ARM200F scanning transmission electron microscope with an atomic resolution of 0.78 picometers, was added to the research laboratory, already home to two transmission electron microscopes.(()()The for BrainHealth, both its own facility and part of the School of Behavioral and Brain Sciences, is a research institute with clinical interventions focused on brain health. The center is located near the UT Dallas Callier Center for Communication Disorders and adjacent to the north campus of of Texas Southwestern Medical Center in the city of Dallas. Brain research is concentrated on brain conditions, diseases, and disorders including, Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder, autism, dementia, stroke, traumatic brain injury, and working memory.(The Callier Center for Communication Disorders became part of the University of Texas at Dallas in 1975 as part of the School of Human Development (now the School of Behavioral and Brain Sciences). Research, at the center,  includes the causes, prevention, assessment and treatment of communication disorders and the facilities include laboratories for research in child language development and disorders, autism spectrum disorders, speech production, hearing disorders, neurogenic speech and language, cochlear implants and aural habilitation.()  Additional ongoing research initiatives at UT Dallas include, researchers overseeing the long-running British Election Study (BES). Harold Clarke, the Ashbel Smith professor of political science in the School of Economic, Political and Policy Sciences, and Marianne Stewart, professor of political science are the co-principal investigators for the study, which began in 1964 and is one of the worlds oldest continuous political research projects. The other two co-investigators are David Sanders and Paul Whiteley of the of Essex in England.()Scholarship programsAll freshmen admitted to the university are automatically considered for an Academic Excellence Scholarship Award. Effective for the fall 2011 incoming freshmen class the awards range from $4,000 per year for tuition plus $3,000 per year for on-campus housing up to complete coverage of UT Dallas tuition and mandatory fees plus $3,000 per year for on-campus housing and a cash stipend.() The McDermott Scholars Program, established at UT Dallas in 2000, provides full scholarships and unique cultural and civic opportunities to academically talented high school students.() UT Dallas is also among only seven universities whose students are eligible for consideration for Terry Scholarships and became part of the program in 2006.()CampusThe main campus is in the heart of the Richardson, Texas, Telecom Corridor,  north of downtown Dallas, on the boundary of Dallas and Collin counties. UT Dallas owns generally contiguous land in Richardson, Texas consisting of approximately  for campus development and another  adjacent to the campus.() UTDs Waterview Science & Technology Center and the Research and Operations Center, a leased building, are adjacent to the main campus, on the west side of Waterview Parkway in the Dallas, Texas city limits.()  UTDs Callier Center, 8 buildings, is on  adjacent to the of Texas Southwestern Medical Center in the city of Dallas and nearby the for BrainHealth, a single building, on .() The city of Richardson, Texas passed a bond election on May 8, 2010, which allocated $2.8 million in funding for a UT Dallas loop road to connect the roads around campus. The loop road will be designed to help keep traffic contained within the campus, rather than on the citys roads.() The UTD Mercury noted in a February 15, 2011 article that a lack of on-campus parking has been an ongoing problem. Additional parking lots were added in 2010 and 2011. However, due to the continued increase in enrollment, the lack of available parking spaces continues to be a frustrating issue for the students. The university received a B- on the 2011 College Sustainability Report Card, which includes efforts to protect and conserve natural resources.()ArchitectureEarly architecture on the campus exhibits typical characteristics of Brutalism, a popular civic style when the structures were designed and built. In accordance with this style, many of the early buildings are pale, off-white, precast concrete with repetitive structures. Later architecture exhibits late modern or postmodern features such as bronze glass, bronze aluminum frames, unadorned geometric shapes, unusual surfaces, and unorthodox layouts. This later modern styling is seen in the Engineering and Computer Science building, School of Management, Cecil and Ida Green Center, and Natural Science and Engineering Research Lab facility (sometimes called the Mermaid Building due to its colorful anodized shingles). The Student Services building, completed in 2010, is the first academic structure in Texas to be rated a LEED Platinum facility by the United States Green Building Council.() To provide protection from inclement weather and extreme temperatures, many of the buildings on campus are connected by a series of elevated indoor walking paths also referred to as skyways.()Landscape ArchitectureA 30-million dollar Campus Landscape Enhancement Project, largely funded by Margaret McDermott the wife of UTD founder Eugene McDermott (1899-1973), was started in October 2008 and completed in late 2010. The project encompassed all aspects of landscape architecture from campus identity to pedestrian strategies, future growth patterns, sustainability and establishing a campus core. The project included the reforestation of the main entry drive with more than 5,000 native trees. Each tree hand-picked and individually arranged by the landscape architect after careful study of native stands in Texas, which includes the commitment to a riparian corridor consisting of a densely planted natural creek bed along the central entry median to the campus Alle. The main mall or Alle includes 116 hand-picked columnar Claudia Wannamaker Magnolias alongside five reflecting pools and four human-scale chess boards to represent the national and international achievements of the schools chess team.  At the northern terminus of the Alle and between the McDermott Library and the Student Union is a new pavilion-sized plaza. The plaza includes a granite fountain complete with mist column, an overhead trellis to be eventually covered in wisteria vines and a temperature-modifying shade structure design. The landscape architecture firm of Peter Walker and Partners (PWP) was the prime consultant for the project. PWP is recognized for design of the  Millennium Parklands in Sydney, Australia for the 2000 Summer Olympics and currently the World Trade Center Memorial at Ground Zero in Manhattan.()()()Building plansThe university added almost  of new facilities from 2007 through 2010.( The facilities include a  Science Learning Center (SLC), a renovation and expansion of Founders Hall, a new  Student Services Building and a  400-bed Residence Hall.(() More than  of additional facilities are planned for completion from 2011 through 2013. A second, $31 million  , freshman Residence Hall was started in July 2010 and officially completed on June 27, 2011.() A new, $9.5 million , University Bookstore and Visitors Center was started in January 2011 and completed in July 2011.() A 3rd, $31 million , freshmen Residence Hall has been approved and planned for occupancy by fall 2012.() Groundbreaking for a $60 million, , Arts and Technology Building was held on September 28, 2011 with a projected completion date of fall 2013. Spaces include 2,150 new classroom seats and 50 faculty offices, a 1200 seat auditorium, 2D drawing and painting art studios, 3D art studios, and an exterior video screen showcasing ATEC projects and other visual arts. For the design UT Dallas chose Architecturethe firm that designed Google Headquarters in Mountain View, California.().() A new Visual Arts Studio that will include areas for design, drawing, painting, sculpture studios and exhibition space is projected to start in June 2012 with a completion date in the summer of 2013. The $10 million,  facility will include space for advanced studio work for the Masters in Fine Arts.()Student lifeActivitiesThe University of Texas at Dallas has more than 160 registered student organizations, 15 national Greek-letter fraternities and sororities and students provided more than 20,000 volunteer hours at community agencies in 2009.() UTDs  Activity Center contains a state-of-the-art fitness center, racquetball courts, squash courts, basketball courts, a multi-purpose room, and indoor swimming pool. Also available are sand volleyball courts, soccer fields, tennis courts, softball fields, baseball fields and a golf course. The universitys Club Sports Program consists of student organizations that promote common sports and recreation interests.()The UT Dallas Debate Team was established in the fall of 1996 and won the Cross Examination Debate Associations Brady Lee Garrison Newcomer Sweepstakes Award in spring 1997. UTD first qualified a team for the Debate Tournament in 2004 and has qualified each year since. In 2004 the team also hosted its first annual Fear and Loathing tournament, the largest annual regular season college tournament in the region with more than 325 participants, coaches, and judges in attendance. The UT Dallas debate squad finished its 200910 season as the only organization in the country to advance a team to the quarterfinals in both the 64th Annual National Debate Tournament and the Cross Examination Debate Association, held in March 2010 at the of California, Berkeley.() In March 2011, UT Dallas was host to the 65th National Debate Tournament and placed 9th out of 78 teams.()The school fields teams in the major pre-law competitions: Moot Court, Mock Trial and Mediation. UT Dallas is the only Texas university to compete in all three and the law schools acceptance rate for UTD pre-law graduates was 86% in 2009.() In November 2009, the UT Dallas team won the National Mediation Tournament championship in the advocate/client division. The tournament was held at the John Marshall Law School in Chicago.() In 2010, UTD students again placed first and second in the advocate/client division to win the Dan Stamatelos National Trophy for Advocacy. The tournament was held at the University Law School and UT Dallas was the only school to place two teams to the final rounds.() UTD received first, second and fourth place at the November 2010, South Central Regional Moot Court Championships. The University of Arkansas at Little Rocks, William H. Bowen School of Law was host to the 32 teams.()UTDs recent campus enhancement project included four human-scale chess boards to represent the national and international achievements of the schools chess team. The internationally ranked UT Dallas chess team was launched in 1996 under the direction of Timothy Redman, a two-time president of the U.S. Chess Federation and professor of literary studies in UTDs School of Arts and Humanities.() The university recruits worldwide for its chess team and 18 Grandmaster and Masters have played for UT Dallas from 1996 to 2010. UT Dallas offers chess scholarships to qualified student-players and several full four-year tuition tournament-based scholarships.() UT Dallas has taken first place in eight of its 12 appearances at the Texas State College Championship and the UTD chess team has won or tied for first place in the Southwest Collegiate Championship for the years 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008 and 2009.()() It also won the Transatlantic Cup in 2007, 2008 and 2009, defeating the of Belgrade in an international chess match.() As of 2010, UTDs chess players have won or tied eight of the last eleven American Intercollegiate Team Chess Championship titles.() UT Dallas won first place with a perfect 6-0 score and the Best All-Around Womens Team in the December 2010 Pan American Intercollegiate Team Chess Championship()() The UT Dallas chess team has competed in each consecutive Final Four of Chess tournaments starting in 2001 though 2011, winning or tying for first place five times.()Student mediaThe UTD Mercury is the official student newspaper of the University of Texas at Dallas since 1980. They publish 7,000 copies every other Monday during the fall and spring semesters, and every third Monday during the summer. It is distributed free around campus or at the UTD newsroom in the Student Union. The UTD Mercury also publishes online at utdmercury.com. In April 2011, the Mercury won 12 awards at the 101st annual Texas Intercollegiate Press Association IPA convention.() In 2004, another student newspaper named A Modest Proposal (AMP) was formed. In contrast to The UTD Mercury, which is almost all news articles, AMP features mostly editorial content. AMP is published once a month, eight times a year. Any student, faculty, or staff of UTD can contribute to the paper. Copies of AMP are available for free at the first of each month around the campus, and can also be downloaded in PDF format from their website.() UTD, the universitys student-run, internet-only, radio station offers streaming music 24 hours a day, 7 days a week and broadcasts UTD sports games. Radio UTD has also been featured on XM Satellite Radio Channel 43 (XMU) on The Student Exchange Program.() The radio station was nominated for three college radio awards at the 2010 Music Journal annual Music Marathon and Festival. The nominations were for the following categories, Best Use of the Internet, Best Use of Limited Resources and Station of the Year.() In 2009, UTD TV, an internet-based campus TV station, was founded and launched by students. Still in its infancy, it has already webcast a range of student-interest programs from campus news and amusing serial stories to student affairs coverage.()Residential housingTotal on-campus housing capacity for the 2011-2012 academic year was 4,754 beds, which consisted of 1,237 apartments (3,954 beds) and two 400-bed residential halls for freshmen.()  The apartments are split into two areas. Buildings 137, 696 units, are owned by the Utley Foundation and is a self-managing entity under the name Waterview Park Apartments, LLC.() Buildings 3867, 541 units, and the residence halls are owned by the university and privately managed by Campus Communities under the name University Village. Apartment floor plans vary from 1-bedroom to 4-bedroom units and amenities include swimming pools, volleyball courts, outdoor grills, and study centers.() According to a UTD Mercury September 18, 2011 article both graduate and upperclassman housing continues to be in short supply due to the increase in enrollment.() During the 2010 fall semester, 64 percent of new freshmen lived on campus and 23 percent of undergraduates lived in on-campus housing.(On August 12, 2009 a  residence hall opened providing housing for 384 full-time freshmen residents and 16 peer advisers. The new residence hall offers living learning environments that group students with similar interests and majors. The building includes a mix of three-bedroom, single-bath suites for freshmen and one-bedroom, one-bath units for peer advisers. On each wing and each floor are several communal study areas and the ground floor features a  glass-enclosed rotunda with pool and ping-pong tables, large-screen televisions, couches and chairs.() A 2nd,  residence hall, directly north to the current hall, was officially completed June 27, 2011 and a 3rd freshmen residence hall adjacent to the two existing halls has been approved and planned for occupancy by fall 2012.(Dining on campusStudents have a selection of food sources on campus. The Student Union building houses The Pub and the Comet Cafe food court which includes a Subway, Chick-fil-A, Chefs Table and Johns.() The first dining hall on campus opened on August 12, 2009 in conjunction with the opening of the first residence hall.() The  dining hall provides seating for more than 400 and offers a variety of options including vegetarian and vegan options, home-style entrees, grilled-to-order items, pizzas and pasta, made-to-order omelets and traditional Tex-Mex cuisine.() All first-year students living on campus are required to purchase a meal plan; meal plans are optional for all other students who live on campus.()TraditionsSome of the traditions that give UT Dallas its distinctive flavor are Homecoming, Annual Oozeball Tournament, Ceremonial Mace, Legacy Lane, Welcome Week, Sounds of Class, Family Day, Splatterbeat and Cecil Greens Head. Cecil Green helped found the University of Texas at Dallas and outside Green Hall there is a bronze bust of Cecil Green. Rubbing Greens head for good luck has become a tradition for many students on their way to exams or presentations. Holiday Sing is one of the oldest tradition on campus, the annual Holiday Sing started in 1976 and is hosted by the School of Arts and Humanities during the month of December. In front of the Erik Jonsson Academic Center is the sculpture Jack, created in 1971 by artist  Jim Love (1927 - 2005). Margaret McDermott, wife of UTD founder Eugene McDermott (1899-1973), presented the sculpture to the university in 1976. The sculpture is affectionately known on campus as the Love Jack. Recently added is the Spirit Rock on the mall between the Jonsson and Green buildings. Students and organizations are allowed to paint whatever they like on the rock, provided it conforms to rules of student conduct.()()AthleticsThe University of Texas at Dallas athletics program started when UTD provisionally joined the Division III and the Southwest Conference (ASC) in 1998 and was granted full membership in the ASC in 2002.() Varsity sports include baseball, basketball, cross country, golf, soccer, softball, tennis, track and field, and volleyball.() In addition to varsity sports, the universitys Sport Clubs Programs offers recreational and competitive sport clubs, including  inline hockey, fencing, rugby, racquetball, mixed martial arts and soccer.()Varsity athleticsDuring the 2002 inaugural season, the men and womens soccer teams competed for conference championships. The women won the 2002 ASC title and UTD ended up hosting the conference tournament as well as the first round of NCAA playoffs in UTDs first year as active members. The success continued in 200304 when mens and womens soccer, mens basketball, baseball and softball all advanced to the post-season.() In 2005, the UTD Athletic Program claimed three ASC Championships:  mens soccer and mens basketball as well as a co-championship in womens soccer. The mens soccer and basketball teams advanced to the NCAA Division III national playoffs in their sports. On December 20, 2006 the Comets mens basketball team upset the University of Texas at Arlington Mavericks 7876 at UT Arlingtons Hall and became the first Division III team to defeat a Division I basketball team during the 20062007 season.() In 2007, the mens soccer team won the ASC championship, advancing to the NCAA tournament. Having 8 new team players as starters and only 3 veterans, the Comets led by top goal scorers Kevin White from Houston and Mihai Cotet from Braila, Romania led the team to its second ASC Tournament title in history.() The 2007 mens tennis program had a very successful season, beating Division II teams and advancing as far as the ASC Conference final before falling to Hardin-Simmons. The womens volleyball team claimed the 2009 American Southwest Conference championship at the UT Dallas Activity Center. The 250, 2009 womens volleyball team were the only undefeated NCAA Division III team in the nation.() The womans 2009 basketball team won the ASC East Division title. The UTD mens basketball team won the ASC East Division both in 2010 and 2011. For the 2011 season, the Comets mens baseball team finished in second place in the ASC East qualifying for the ASC Tournament for the eighth time in the programs 10-year history.Notable peopleFile:James Reilly.jpg|thumb|upright0.7|Astronaut F. ReillyUT Dallas people includes an Antarctic explorer,() an astronaut,() members of the National Academies,() a Nobel laureate,() a writer and folklorist,() a member of Indias Parliament,() the founder of the worlds first molecular nanotechnology company() and others who have achieved prominent careers in business, government, engineering, science, medicine, the arts and education.*Faculty*University presidents*AlumniReferencesExternal links*The University of Texas at Dallasstate autocollapseof Texas at Dallas  du Texas  Dallasja:zh:
539105
Zhang_Zuolin
 successor2XueliangZhang Zuolin (; 18751928) was the warlord of Manchuria from 1916 to 1928 (see Era in China). He successfully invaded proper in October 1924 in the Zhili-Fengtian War. He gained control of Peking, including Chinas internationally recognized government, in April 1926. The economy of Manchuria, the basis of Zhangs power, was overtaxed by his adventurism and collapsed in the winter of 1927-1928. Zhang was defeated by the Nationalist Kuomintang under Kai-shek in May 1928. He was killed by a bomb planted by a Japanese Army officer on 4 June 1928.(Hata 288) Although Zhang had been Japans proxy in China, Japanese militarists were infuriated by his failure to stop the advance of the Nationalists.Zhang was fiercely anti-communist and supported restoration of the dynasty. His nicknames include the Old Marshal (), Rain Marshal (and Mukden Tiger. The American press referred to him as Marshal Chang Tso-lin, Tuchun of Manchuria.(War? Time Sept. 8, 1924) Origins Early lifeZhang was born in 1875 in Haicheng county in southern Fengtian province. He was born to poor parents, who can hardly have offered him any formal education, and the only non-military trade that he learned in his lifetime was a small amount of veterinary science.( His grandfather had come to the northeast after fleeing a famine in Zhili (modern Hebei) in 1821. Growing up as a poor village urchin, Zhang was known by the nickname pmple. He spent his early youth hunting, fishing, and brawling.(Bonavia 63)  He hunted hares in the Manchurian countryside to help feed his family.  In appearance he was always thin and rather short. When he became old enough to seek work, Zhang worked at a stable in an inn, where he became familiar with many bandit-gangs that infested Manchuria at the time.  As early as 1896 Zhang himself was a member of a well-known bandit gang.( In one version of Zhang Zuolins beginnings as a warlord, during a hunting trip he spotted a wounded bandit (Honghuzi) on horseback, killed him, took his horse, and became a bandit himself.  By his late 20s he had formed a small personal army, acquiring something of a Hood reputation.(Behr 145) In 1900 the Rebellion broke out, and Zhangs gang joined the imperial army.  In peacetime, Zhang hired his men out as escorts for travelling merchants. In the war of 1904-05, the Army employed Zhang and his men as mercenaries. At the end of the Qing dynasty, Zhang managed to have his men recognized as a regiment of the regular Chinese army, patrolling the borders of Manchuria and suppressing other bandit gangs.(Growth of power in ManchuriaDuring the 1911 Revolution, some military commanders wanted to declare independence for Manchuria, but the pro-Manchu governor used Zhangs regiment to set up a Manchurian Peoples Peacekeeping Council, intimidating would-be rebels and revolutionaries.  For his efforts in preventing civil disturbance and revolution, Zhang was named the Vice Minister of Military Affairs.(Bonavia 63-64)On January 1 1912, Yat-sen became the first President of the of China in Nanjing. Shikai, operating out of Beijing, sent other northern military commanders a series of telegrams, advising them to oppose Suns administration. To gain Zhangs loyaqlty, Yuan sent Zhang a large shipment of military provisions; Zhang sent Yuan an enormous (and costly) ginseng root in return to symbolize their friendship. Zhang then murdered a number of leading figures in his base city of Shenyang (then known as Mukden), and was rewarded with a series of impressive-sounding titles by the nearly-defunct Manchu court. When it became obvious to Zhang that Yuan would usurp control of the central government, Zhang endorsed Yuans rule over that of either Sun or the Manchus. After Zhang put down a rebellion in June 1912, Yuan raised him to the rank of Lieutenant-General. In 1913 Yuan attempted to move Zhang away from Manchuria by having Zhang transferred to Mongolia, but Zhang reminded Yuan of his successful efforts to keep local order, and refused.(Bonavia 64-65)In 1915, when it became clear that Yuan intended to declare himself emperor, Zhang was one of the few officials who supported Yuan. Besides political opportunism, Zhang probably recognizing that Yuans monarchy would likely be short, and that it could always be attacked later. Because Zhang Zuolins main rival for power in Manchuria, Xiluan, when asked about Yuans ambitions, had told Yuan to think about it a bit more, Zhang Xiluan was recalled to Beijing, while Zhang Zuolin was promoted.(Bonavia 66)In March 1916, after many sourthern provinces revolted against Yuan Shikais government, Zhang supported Yuan but expelled a local military governor sent by Qirui to replace him, with some support from local Japanese officers in the Army. Beijing accepted Zhangs authority, and Yuan appointed Zhang superintendant of military affairs in Liaoning (known as Fengtian until 1929). After Yuan died, in June 1916, the new central government named Zhang both military and civil governor of Liaoning, the essential components of a successful warlord.(Bonavia 66-67)Zhang, a monarchist, had always remained cordial with Puyi, the last of China, and had sent him a gift of 1,600 for his wedding as a token of loyalty.  In 1917 he plotted with Zhang Xun, a Qing-loyalist general, to restore the abdicated Puyi to the throne.(Behr 105)  After Zhang Xun rebelled, Zhang Zuolin remained neutral, and actually supported Duan Qirui in suppressing Zhang Xun after it became clear that Duan would win. Zhang was able to absorb soldiers of nearby commanders who had been linked to the rebellion, increasing his own power.  Zhang intervened and took control of Chinas northernmost province, Heilongjiang, after a rebellion there forced the local governor to flee.  Because the governor of Jilin had been linked to the attempt to restore the monarchy, Zhang had allies from Jilin successfully agitate for the governors dismissal in Beijing. By 1918 Zhangs control of Manchuria was complete, except for the small areas held by the Empire.(Bonavia 67-68) Fortress Manchuria thumb|left|In 1920, when he had passed his mid-40s, Zhang was the supreme ruler of Manchuria. The Central Government acknowledged this fact by appointing him to be Governor-General of the Three Eastern Provinces. He started to surround himself in luxury, built a chateau-style home near Shenyang, and had at least five wives (an accepted practice of any powerful or wealthy Chinese at the time). In 1925, his personal fortune was estimated at over 18 million yuan (roughly 2.6 million USD).His power rested on the Army, which was composed of about 100,000 men by 1922 and almost triple that number by the end of the decade. It had obtained large stocks of weapons left over from World War I, and even included naval units, an air force, and an armaments industry. Zhang integrated a large number of local militias in his Army, and thus prevented Manchuria from falling into the chaos which reigned in proper at this time. province was ruled by a military governor, who was said to be a cousin of Zhang; Heilongjiang had its own regional warlord, who never displayed any ambitions outside the province.Although Manchuria officially remained a part of the of China, it became more or less an independent kingdom isolated from China by its geography and protected by the Fengtian Army. The only pass at Shanhaiguan, where the Wall meets the sea, could easily be closed. In a time when the Central Government was hardly able to pay the salaries of its civil servants, no more revenues were forwarded to Beijing. In 1922 Zhang took control of the only rail link, the Railway, north of the Great Wall and also kept these revenues. Only postal and customs revenues were continued to be sent to Beijing, because they had been pledged to the victorious foreign powers after the failed rebellion of 1900, and Zhang feared their intervention. Japanese and Russian influences Manchuria shared a long border with Russia, which had been weakened militarily after the Revolution. The line of the Eastern Railway, which was under Russian control, ran through northern Manchuria, and the land immediately on either side of the tracks was considered to be Russian territory. From 1917 to about 1924 the new Communist governmentin Moscow was having such difficulties establishing itself in Siberia that often it wasnt clear, who was in charge of operating the railway on the Russian side. Still, Zhang avoided a showdown, and after 1924, the Russians managed to re-establish their dominance over the railroad.How precarious the situation could develop at times was demonstrated by an outbreak of pneumonic plague in Hailar, a town at the western end of the Chinese Eastern Railway, in October 1920 . Chinese troops were present in great number and turned railway quarantine into a farce. The soldiers set free some of their comrades who had been imprisoned as contacts, and they escaped to the mining town of Dalainor on the Amur River, where a quarter of the population succumbed. In the other direction all the towns along the Chinese Eastern Railway as far as Vladivostok were infected. In all, about 9,000 died, on the other hand only a few contacts were able to reach south Manchuria.(Nathan, Carl F. (1967). Plague prevention and politics in Manchuria 1910-1931 Cambridge/Mass.: Harvard University Press. p. 66.)The Japanese posed more of a problem. After the Russo-Japanese war of 1904-05 they had gained two important outposts in south Manchuria: The Guandong (Kwantung) Leased Territory consisted of a  peninsula in the southernmost part of Manchuria. It included the ice-free port of Dairen (known as Dalian in Chinese), which became the main link to Japan. Reaching northward from the colony the Manchurian Railway passed through Shenyang (referred to as Mukden by the Japanese) linking up with the Chinese Eastern Railway in Changchun. The land on either side of the railway tracks remained extraterritorial, now being controlled by the Japanese Army. This army maintained from 7,000 to 14,000 men in Manchuria tolerating and being tolerated by the Fengtian Army although Zhang kept up a war of words, playing on anti-Japanese sentiments in the Chinese public. Civil reform At the beginning of the 1920s Zhang transformed Manchuria from an unimportant frontier region to one of the most prosperous parts of China. He had inherited a financially weak provincial government, e.g. in 1917 Fengtian faced ten outstanding loans from foreign-controlled consortia and banks totaling over 12 million yuan. Zhang chose Yongjiang, who had served as head of a regional tax office, for the task of solving Fengtians financial problems. He was named Director of the Bureau of Finance.A number of currencies were circulating in the province, as was the custom in China, and the paper notes issued by the provincial government had experienced a steady depreciation in value. Wang decided to switch to a standard and set the initial value of the new silver yuan equal to the Japanese gold yen, which was accepted throughout Korea and Manchuria. Much to the surprise of the Chinese the new currency even gained in value against the gold yen, although Japanese businessmen claimed that it was not backed up by sufficient silver reserves. Wang then used  the newly gained credibility to introduce another note, the Fengtian dollar, which was not convertible into silver anymore. But it was accepted by the government for the payment of taxes, a sign that the government had faith in its own currency.Next Wang turned to the chaotic tax collecting system. Because of his former job he was well acquainted with the abuses of the system and introduced a number of controls. The provincial government had also invested government funds in various enterprises, many of which were poorly managed. Wang ordered a total review of government sponsored firms. Since 1918 the revenues rose steadily, by 1921 all outstanding loans had been repaid and there was even a budget surplus. Wang was rewarded  by being appointed as Civil Governor of Fengtian province while remaining Director of the Bureau of Finance. Zhang retained the title of Military Governor of Fengtian. Still, more than two thirds of the budget were allocated to the military. War in north China In the summer of 1920 Zhang made a foray into north China on the other side of the Great Wall trying to topple Qirui, the leading warlord of Beijing. He did this by supporting another warlord, Kun, with troops, and they both successfully ousted Duan. As a reward Zhang was granted control over most of inner Mongolia to the west of Manchuria. Zhang had become a figure of national prominence. But he was confronted by Peifu, a divisional commander of the North China clique, which was based in the of Zhili that surrounded Beijing. In spring 1922 Zhang personally took the position of Commander-in-Chief of the Fengtian Army, and on 19 April his forces entered into China proper. Fighting started three days later, and on 4 May they were seriously defeated by the Zhili Army in what came to be known as the Zhili-Fengtian War. 3,000 troops had been killed and 7,000 wounded, so that Zhangs units had to retreat to Shanhaiguan Pass. Zhili forces were in control of Beijing, Zhangs image as a national leader had been destroyed, and he reacted by declaring Manchuria independent from Beijing in May 1922. Manchurias top civil official, Wang, left Shenyang on 22 June for Japanese controlled Dalian allegedly for treatment of an eye infection that troubled him. From there he challenged Zhang by demanding restrictions to military spending and a complete control over civil affairs. Zhang, one of Chinas most feared warlords, gave in, lifted martial law and agreed to a separation of civil and military administration in all of the three provinces. Wang returned on 6 August thereby guaranteeing Manchurias continued stability. Regional development In the following years Wang realized a far reaching development plan. He tried to bring more workers to the booming Manchurian economy. Most workers  had come on a temporary basis, returning to their homes in North China in winter. Now the Manchurian government encouraged them to bring along women and children and settle permanently. They were eligible for reduced fares on all Chinese owned railways in Manchuria, received funds to build a dwelling and were promised total ownership after five years of continuous occupation. Rent for the land was canceled for the first years. Most were sent to the interior of Manchuria, where they reclaimed land for agriculture, or worked in forestry or mines. Between 1924 and 1929 the amount of land under tillage increased from 20 to 35 million acres (80,000 to 140,000 km). Manchurias economy boomed while chaos and uncertainty reigned in the rest of China. An especially ambitious project was to break the Japanese monopoly on cotton textiles by creating a large mill, which, much to Japans sorrow, succeeded. The government also invested in other enterprises, among them quite a number of Sino-Japanese companies. During this time the Fengtian Army successfully kept a lid on Manchurias many bandits. Various railway lines were built, among them the Shenyang-Hailong line, which opened in 1925. In 1924 Wang amalgamated three regional banks into the Official Bank of the Three Eastern Provinces and personally became its General Director. By this move he tried to create a development bank and at the same time to keep accurate records of military spending. The beginning of the end After the disastrous defeat of 1922, Zhang had reorganized his Fengtian Army, started a training program and had bought new equipment like mobile radios and machine guns. In the autumn of 1924, fighting broke out again in Central China and Zhang saw an opportunity to capture North China and Beijing and become head of the Central Government. While most other warlord armies fought along the River, Zhang attacked North China. The Zhili-Fengtian War had begun. In a surprise move a Zhili commander, Yuxiang, toppled Cao Kun and took control of Beijing. He shared power with Zhang and both appointed the same Duan Qirui he had ousted in 1920. By August 1925, the Fengtian Army controlled four large provinces within the Great Wall (Zhili, where Beijing was located, but not Beijing itself, Shandong, Jiangsu, and Anhui). One unit even marched as far south as the city of Shanghai. But the military situation was so unstable, that Chuanfang, a Zhili clique warlord whose sphere of influence extended along the Yangtze, managed to push back the Fengtian Army again. By November, Zhang held only a small corner of North China including a corridor connecting Beijing with Manchuria. Attacks on Beijing continued into the spring of 1926.Manchuria was placed under martial law again, while its economy disintegrated under the burden of the insatiable war machine. Old taxes were increased and new taxes invented. Zhang demanded that more paper money was being printed out of step with silver reserves. A most serious crisis erupted when in November 1925 Songling revolted and ordered his troops to turn back and march on Shenyang. The Japanese brought in reinforcements to protect their interests in Manchuria, but Zhang managed to put down the revolt in December. Even more seriously, Manchurias top civil official, Civil Governor Wang Yongjiang, realized that his work of nine years had been in vain. He left Shenyang in February 1926 and handed in his resignation. This time he didnt react, when Zhang asked him to return. Wang died from kidney failure 1 November 1927. Manchurias economy collapses thumb|250px|The railroad car Zhang was in.In March 1926 a new civil governor was appointed. His only job was to supply the Fengtian Army with large amounts of money. He issued new provincial bonds, forcing business and local communities to purchase them. Early in 1927 he even entered into the opium trade by selling expensive licenses for the sale and use of opium. Bank reserves and railway revenues were plundered, while ever more paper notes were issued. The best indicator of Manchurias economic decline was the value of the Fengtian dollar (yuan), which had started on parity with the Japanese gold yen. In February 1928 a yen cost 40 yuan. In this winter Manchurias economy collapsed. Workers went on strike, hungry immigrants flooded back into Shenyang because they couldnt find any work.In June 1926 Zhang had managed to capture Beijing. A year later he proclaimed himself as Grand Marshal of the Republic of China, and thus led Chinas internationally recognized government. But the Nationalists, led by Kai-shek attacked his forces and in May 1928 the Fengtian Army had to retreat towards Beijing. In addition, Japan applied pressure on Zhang to leave Beijing and return to Manchuria, and underscored this by bringing reinforcements to Tianjin. Zhang left Beijing on 3 June 1928.The next morning his train reached the outskirts of Shenyang. Here, the line passed underneath the Japanese operated South Manchuria Railroad. An officer of the Japanese Guandong (Kwantung) Army, Colonel Kmoto Daisaku, had planted a bomb, which exploded when Zhangs train passed under the viaduct. At the Tokyo War Crimes Tribunal in 1946, Keisuke testified that Zhang was murdered because the Guandong (Kwantung) army was infuriated by his failure to stop Chiangs army, which was backed by Moscow, then Tokyos strategic rival. For two weeks Zhangs death was kept secret, while the scramble for power was decided. That is why, according to an announcement issued by the Fengtian Army, he officially died on 21 June 1928. Zhang was succeeded by the eldest son of his official wife, Xueliang.See also*era*Xueliang*of the Republic of ChinaFootnotes References * Behr, Edward. The Last Emperor.  Bantam.  1987.  ISBN: 0553344749.* Bonavia, David.  Chinas Warlords.  New York: Oxford University Press.  1995.  ISBN 0-19-586179-5* Hata, Ikuhiro. Continental Expansion: 1905-1941. In The Cambridge History of Japan. Vol. 6. Cambridge University Press. 1988.* Suleski, Ronald. (2002). Civil Government in Warlord China: Tradition, Modernization and Manchuria New York: Peter Lang.* War? TIME Magazine September 8 1924.  Retrieved August 24 2011.* Zuo-linZuolinZuolinZuolinko:Zuolin-ZuolinZuolinja:ZuolinZuolinZuolinZuolinzh:
541390
Stanisaw_Mikoajczyk
Stanisaw Mikoajczyk (July 18, 1901December 13, 1966; ), Polish politician, was Minister of the Polish government in exile during War II, and later Prime Minister in postwar Poland, before the USSR took political control of Poland.BiographyMikoajczyks family came from Pozna in western Poland, which in the 19th century was part of the Empire and known as the of Posen. He was born in Westphalia in western Germany, where his parents had gone to look for work in the wealthy  mining regions, as many Poles - known as Ruhr Poles - did in the 19th century. He returned to Pozna as a boy of ten.As a teenager he worked in a beet refinery and was active in Polish patriotic organisations. He was 18 when Poland recovered its independence, and in 1920 he joined the Army and took part in the War. He was discharged after being wounded near Warsaw and returned to inherit his fathers farm near Pozna.In the 1920s Mikoajczyk became active in the Peoples Party Piast (PSL), and after holding a number of offices in the government of Pozna province, he was elected to the Sejm (the Polish Parliament) in 1929. In 1935 he became Vice-Chairman of the executive committee of the PSL, and in 1937 he became party President. He was an active opponent of the authoritarian regime established in Poland after the death of Pisudski in 1935.When Germany invaded Poland in September of 1939, Mikoajczyk was a private in the Polish army,(Stanislaw Mikolajczyk The Pattern of Soviet Domination Sampson Low, Marston & Co 1948 Page 5) and served in the defence of Warsaw. After the fall of Warsaw he escaped to Hungary, where he was interned.(Stanislaw Mikolajczyk The Pattern of Soviet Domination Sampson Low, Marston & Co 1948 Page 6) He soon escaped and made his way to Paris via Yugoslavia and Italy.( By the end of November, Mikoajczyk had reached France where he was immediately asked to join the government in exile as deputy Chairman of the National Council.(Stanislaw Mikolajczyk The Pattern of Soviet Domination Sampson Low, Marston & Co 1948 Page 7) In 1941 he was appointed Minister of the Interior and became Prime Minister Sikorskis Deputy Prime Minister.In April 1943 the Germans had announced that they had discovered the graves of almost 22,000 Polish officers who had been murdered by the Soviets at Katy Wood. The Soviet government said that the Germans had fabricated the discovery. The Allied governments, for diplomatic reasons, formally accepted this, but Mikoajczyks government refused to do so, and Stalin then severed relations with the government in exile. When Sikorski was killed in a plane crash in July 1943, Mikoajczyk was appointed as his successor.(Editor Peter Stachura Writer Chapter 4 Wojciech Rojek The Poles in Britain 1940-2000 ISBN 0 7146 8444 9 Page 33) We do not wish to see only a formal democracy in Poland, he said in his broadcast to Poland on taking office, but a social democracy which will put into practice not only political, religious and personal freedom but also social and freedom, the four freedoms of which Delano Roosevelt spoke so finely. In any case there is and will be no place in Poland for any kind of totalitarian government in any shape or form.But Mikoajczyk faced daunting challenges. It was obvious by this time that the Soviet armed forces, not those of the western Allies, would seize Poland from German occupation, and the Poles feared that Stalin intended both imposing Communism on Poland and annexing Polands eastern territories, which had  population made of Poles, Ukrainians and Belarusians.During 1944 the Allied leaders, particularly Churchill, tried to bring about a resumption talks between Mikoajczyk and Stalin, but these efforts broke down over several issues. One was the Katy massacre. Another was Polands postwar borders. Stalin insisted that the eastern territories should remain in Soviet hands. Mikoajczyk refused to compromise on this issue. Mikoajczyk also insisted that Stalin not set up a Communist government in postwar Poland. As a result, Stalin agreed that there would be a coalition government in the Soviet seized territories of Poland. A Socialist, Osbka-Morawski, became Prime Minister of the new Government of National Unity (Tymczasowy Rzd Jednoci Narodowej - TRJN), and the Communist leader Gomuka became one of two Deputy Prime Ministers. Mikoajczyk resigned as Prime Minister of the government in exile to return to Poland and become the other Deputy Prime Minister and Minister for Agriculture.Many of the Polish exiles opposed this action, believing that this government was a faade for the establishment of Communist rule in Poland. The government in exile maintained its existence, although it no longer had diplomatic recognition as the legal government of Poland. Mikoajczyk immediately set about reviving the PSL, which soon became by far the largest party in Poland. He was helped, ironically, by the radical reform pushed through with the support of the Communists, which created a new class of small farmers who became a firm political base for the PSL. The Communists knew they would never win a free election in Poland, and so they set about preventing one, despite the pledges given by Stalin at the Conference.In June 1946 the 3xTAK referendum was held on a number of issues. The PSL decided to oppose the referendum calling for the abolition of the Senate as a test of strength against the Communists: two-thirds of voters supported Mikoajczyk, but the Communist-controlled Interior Ministry issued faked results showing the opposite result. Between then and the January 1947 general elections, the PSL was subjected to ruthless persecultion, and hundreds of its candidates were prevented from campaigning. The elections produced a parliament with 394 seats for the Communist-controlled Democratic Bloc and 28 for the PSL, a result which everyone knew could only have resulted from massive electoral fraud. Mikoajczyk immediately resigned from the government, and in April, facing arrest, he left the country. Churchill, upon seeing him in London, remarked: I am surprised you made it out alive. In London the Polish government in exile regarded him as a traitor for having co-operated with the Communists. He emigrated to the States, where he died in 1966. In June 2000 his remains were returned for burial in Poland. His papers are in the Institution on War, Revolution and Peace at University.Film The Right to Vote (O Prawo Gosu, 2008, director: Petelski) tells the story of Mikoajczyks (played by Ferency) struggle. See also * betrayal Literature *Stanisaw Mikoajczyk: The Rape of Poland: The Pattern of Soviet Aggression. Sampson Low, Martson & Co.,LTD., London 1948. Whittlesey House, McGraw-Hill Book Company, New York, 1948 http://www.questia.com/PM.qst?ao&d77426438*Andrzej Paczkowski: Stanislaw Mikoajczyk, czyli kleska realisty. Agencja Omnipress, Warszawa 1991, ISBN 83-85028-82-X*Roman Buczek: Stanislaw Mikoajczyk. Century Publ. Co., Toronto 1996*Janusz Gmitruk: Stanislaw Mikoajczyk: trudny powrt. Muzeum Historii Polskiego Ruchu Ludowego, Warszawa 2002, ISBN 83-87838-59-4 Further reading *Nagy: The Struggle Behind the Iron Curtain. Translated by S. K. Swift. Macmillan, New York, 1948.*Karski: Story of a Secret State. Houghton Mifflin Company, Boston 1944.ReferencesMikoajczykMikoajczykMikoajczykMikoajczykMikoajczykMikoajczykMikoajczykMikoajczyk
543427
Clay_Pit_Ponds_State_Park_Preserve
Clay Pit Ponds State Park Preserve is park of the state of York, located near the southwestern shore of Staten Island. It is the only state park located on Staten Island.The park is a  nature preserve, comprising wetlands, ponds, sand barrens, spring-fed streams, and woodlands. It includes pine woods, and rare wildflowers such as cranberry, lizard-tail, possumhaw, and twayblade. The animal species found in the park include black racer snakes, turtles, Fowlers toads, frogs, and peepers. More than 170 bird species have been sighted in the park. Deer have also been spotted as recently as September 2010.The park was created in 1976 after extensive lobbying by the of Pine Oak Woods, a local conservation organization. The purpose of the preserve is to retain the unique ecology, as well as to provide educational and recreational opportunities, such a nature walks, pond ecology programs, and birdwatching. Horseback riding is permitted on 5 mi (8 km) of bridle paths. The park has two designated areas which are set aside for endangered species and which are off-limits to the public. Two hiking trails, the Abrahams Pond Trail, and the Ellis Swamp Trail, are open to the public near the park headquarters.The park was the site of extensive mining of white clay in the 19th century that provided the raw material for bricks and cotta. After the abandonment of the quarrying operations, rainwater, natural springs, and vegetation filled in the pits. The preserve also contains archaeological evidence of settlements of the Lenape, early European settlers, and the Free Blacks of Sandy Ground.In October 2008, an interpretive center opened on Nielsen Avenue with exhibits on the history of the Charleston area and wildlife and plants found within the park.() The groundbreaking for the $1.3 million nature center was held on May 4, 2007. The  facility contains exhibit space, classrooms, and an outdoor pavilion.()See also* of New York state parksReferencesExternal links* Official site* NY League of Conservation Voters site on Clay Pit Ponds State Park Preserve
546009
Itai-itai_disease
, was the documented case of mass poisoning in Prefecture, Japan, starting around 1912. The cadmium poisoning caused softening of the bones and kidney failure. The disease is named for the severe pains (Japanese:  itai) caused in the joints and spine. The term itai-itai disease was coined by locals.(ICETT Itai-itai disease (1998) http://www.icett.or.jp/lpca_jp.nsf/a21a0d8b94740fbd492567ca000d5879/b30e2e489f4b4ff1492567ca0011ff90?OpenDocument) The cadmium was released into rivers by mining companies in the mountains. The mining companies were successfully sued for the damage. Itai-itai disease is known as one of the Big Pollution Diseases of Japan.()CauseItai-itai disease was caused by poisoning due to mining in Toyama Prefecture. The earliest records of mining for gold in the area date back to 710. Regular mining for silver started in 1589, and soon thereafter, mining for lead, copper, and zinc began. Increased demand for raw materials during the War and War I, as well as new mining technologies from Europe, increased the output of the mines, putting the Kamioka Mines in Toyama among the worlds top mines. Production increased even more before War II. Starting in 1910 and continuing through 1945, cadmium was released in significant quantities by mining operations, and the disease first appeared around 1912.( Prior to World War II the mining, controlled by the Mitsui Mining and Smelting Co., Ltd., increased to satisfy the wartime demand. This subsequently increased the pollution of the River and its tributaries. The river was used mainly for irrigation of rice fields, but also for drinking water, washing, fishing, and other uses by downstream populations.(Due to the cadmium poisoning, the fish in the river started to die, and the rice irrigated with river water did not grow well. The cadmium and other heavy metals accumulated at the bottom of the river and in the water of the river. This water was then used to irrigate the rice fields. The rice absorbed heavy metals, especially the cadmium. The cadmium accumulated in the people eating contaminated rice.The population complained to the Mitsui Mining and Smelting about the pollution. The company built a basin to store the mining waste water before leading it into the river. It was too little, too late as many people were already sick. The causes of the poisoning were not well understood and, up to 1946, it was thought to be simply a regional disease or a type of bacterial infection.(Medical tests started in the 1940s and 1950s, searching for the cause of the disease. Initially, it was expected to be lead poisoning due to the lead mining upstream. Only in 1955 did Dr. Hagino and his colleagues suspect cadmium as the cause of the disease.( Toyama prefecture also started an investigation in 1961, determining that the Mitsui Mining and Smeltings Kamioka Mining Station caused the cadmium pollution and that the worst affected areas were 30 km downstream of the mine. In 1968 the Ministry of Health and Welfare issued a statement about the symptoms of itai-itai disease caused by the cadmium poisoning.(Itai-itai disease http://www.kanazawa-med.ac.jp/~pubhealt/cadmium2/itaiitai-e/itai01.html)The reduction of the levels of cadmium in the water supply reduced the number of new disease victims; no new victim has been recorded since 1946. While the victims with the worst symptoms came from Toyama prefecture, the government found victims in five other prefectures.The mines are still in operation and cadmium pollution levels remain high, although improved nutrition and medical care has reduced the occurrence of Itai-itai disease.(SymptomsOne of the main effects of cadmium poisoning is weak and brittle bones.  Spinal and leg pain is common, and a waddling gait often develops due to bone deformities caused by the cadmium. The pain eventually becomes debilitating, with fractures becoming more common as the bone weakens.  Other complications include coughing, anemia, and kidney failure, leading to death.(Hamilton, J. What is Itai-Itai disease http://www.accessscience.com/studycenter.aspx?main9&questionID4978)A marked prevalence in older, postmenopausal women has been observed.  The cause of this phenomenon is not fully understood, and is currently under investigation.  Current research has pointed to general malnourishment, as well as poor calcium metabolism relating to the womens age.(Recent animal studies have shown that cadmium poisoning alone is not enough to elicit all of the symptoms of Itai-itai disease.( These studies are pointing to damage of the mitochondria of kidney cells by cadmium as a key factor of the disease.Legal actionTwenty-nine plaintiffs, consisting of nine victims and 20 family members of victims, sued the Mitsui Mining and Smelting Co. in 1968 in the Toyama Prefectural court. In June 1971, the court found the Mitsui Mining and Smelting Co. guilty. Subsequently, the company appealed to the Nagoya District Court in Kanazawa, but the appeal was rejected in August 1972. The Mitsui Mining and Smelting Co. agreed to pay for the medical care of the victims; finance the monitoring of the water quality performed by the residents; and pay reparations to the victims of the disease.(People who consider themselves victims of itai-itai disease have to contact the Japanese Ministry of Health, Labor and Welfare to have their claims assessed. Many victims were not satisfied with government actions and demanded a change in the official procedures. This caused the government to review the criteria for recognizing a victim legally; the government also reassessed the treatment of the disease.A person is considered to have itai-itai disease if he or she lived in the contaminated areas, has kidney dysfunctions, softening of the bones, but no related heart problems. One hundred eighty-four victims have been legally recognized since 1967, of whom 54 were recognized in the period from 1980 to 2000. An additional 388 people have been identified as potential victims, those that had not been officially examined yet.(  Fifteen victims were still alive .Economic costsThe cadmium pollution had contaminated many agricultural areas. Heavy metal pollution affected many areas in Japan, and as a result the Prevention of Soil Contamination in Agricultural Land Law of 1970 was enacted. It ordered planting to be stopped so that restoration of the soil could be enacted to areas with 1ppm of cadmium or more contamination in the soil. Surveying in Toyama Prefecture began in 1971, and by 1977 1500 hectacres along the Jinz river were designated for soil restoration. These farmers were compensated for lost crops as well as for lost production in past years by the Mitsui Mining and Smelting, Toyama Prefecture, and the national government. , only 400 hectares remained contaminated.(In 1992, the average annual health expense compensation was 743 million. Agricultural damage was compensated with 1.75 billion per year, or a total of annually 2.518 billion. Another 620 million were invested annually to reduce further pollution of the river.(See also*metal poisoningReferencesExternal links*Additional Information on Itai-Itai Disease*Preventative Measures Against Water Pollution*What is Itai-itai disease?  ca:Itai-itaide:Itai-Itai-KrankheitItai-itaija:itai-itaide itai-itai-sr:Itai-Itaisv:Itai-itaith:-zh:
549023
The_Works_(film)
 followed_by    The Works is a shelved 3D computer animated film which was under development by the staff of the Graphics Lab in association with the York Institute of Technology in Westbury, New York. Being worked on sporadically from 1979 to 1986, the films development and production had difficulties which finally prompted the film being abandoned before completion. The Works would have been the first entirely 3D CGI film in history had it been finished in the early 1980s as intended. This goal was later accomplished by Disney Pixars Story released in 1995, nearly a decade after The Works was attempted. The name was inspired by the original meaning of the word robot, from robota  work in many Slavic languages.(Out of this World ) It was originally intended to be approximately 90 minutes long although less than 10 minutes were known to be produced. Short in length and few in number, the completed film sequences were highly impressive considering the state of the technology and what was then the unique look of 3D computer animation. A trailer of the forthcoming film was screened at SIGGRAPH in 1982. The project also resulted in other groundbreaking computer animations such as 3DV, Sunstone, Inside a Quark and some segments of the short movie The Magic Egg from 1984. Plot The story, written by Williams, was never finalized but centered around Ipso Facto, a charming elliptical robot, and the heroine, a young female pilot nicknamed T-Square. The story was set at some time in the distant future when a malfunctioning computer, The Works, triggered a devastating last World War but then, realizing what it had done, set out to repopulate the planet entirely with robots. T-Square, who worked and lived in a nearby asteroid belt, vowed to journey to Earth and fight to make it safe for the return of her fellow space-faring humanity. Many staff-members contributed designs and modeled characters and sets under the coordination of art director Bil Maher who created blueprint-style designs for T-Square and many of the 25 robots called for by the script. Lundin, legendary for his exhaustive and elaborate creations, designed and animated a huge mining ship and the famous gigantic robot Ant which was to be one of the villains in control of the Earth. Pre-production The founder of NYIT (York Institute of Technology), entrepreneur and eccentric millionaire Dr. Alexander Schure, had a long and ardent interest in animation. He was a great admirer of Disney and dreamed of making animated features like those from the golden age of theatrical animation. He had already had created a traditional animation facility at NYIT. After visiting the University of Utah and seeing the potential of the computer technology in the form of the computer drawing program Sketchpad created by Sutherland, he told his people to pore over the Utah research center and get him one of everything they had. He then established the NYIT Computer Graphics Lab, buying state-of-th-art equipment and hiring major researchers from throughout the computer graphics field.At first, one of CGLs main goals was to use computers to produce 2D animation and invent tools to assist traditional animators in their work. Schure reasoned that it should be possible to develop computer technology that would make the animation process cheaper and faster. An early version of the CAPS system later used by Disney animators were among the tools they created there.Once its potential became clear, the main focus of the Lab became 3D computer graphics, and when Lance Williams presented his story, The Works, the idea was to attempt to make it as a 3D computer animated feature. Schure enthusiastically agreed and green-lit the project as he too dreamt of a computer animated movie and had this in mind when he created the facility. This movie project became the center of attention at NYIT CGL. For many of the individuals involved, it became a primary and personal goal to create the first computer generated feature.While creating a one-of-a-kind film in a method that had never been done before was the motivation, the practical reason for the project was to continue to develop patentable tools while demonstrating what computer animation could accomplish for the industry. In theory the projects success would lead to significant improvements in visual effects and the in editing process in film and television. Integrating computer power into visual media held promise in terms of speed, cost, creativity, and quality compared to more conventional techniques. The arrival of The Works would have been the beginning of a new animation genre. Interested representatives from studios and networks regularly toured the lab as did musicians Anderson and Gabriel, puppeteer Henson and animation legends Jones and Culhane.Dr. Schure was well aware of the challenges and potential for success going into the project and consistently provided very extensive resources to aid the research and development of the necessary technologies. Dr. Schure also believed that his staff would work best if they were constantly being supplied with the latest computer hardware. This meant that with each new advance in the field, his staff would have to upgrade their systems, convert existing programs, and rework familiar tools for use on new machines. When these upgrades actually delayed production significantly, Schure kept himself isolated from the complaints of his staff but for his part there were never any budgetary constraints or the pressure of a release date. Production difficulties While progress on The Works did manage to advance the level of computer animation technology significantly, the film itself was in hell for nearly a decade and was eventually abandoned for several reasons. The staff was composed almost entirely of technical experts, such as engineers and programmers, with directors and editors considered unnecessary. When NYIT, with Schure as a director, produced a 2D feature known as Tubby the Tuba, the film did very poorly and shook their confidence in their ability to produce a film that would succeed critically or financially. The lukewarm reception of Disneys heavily computer-themed Tron did little to buoy the groups confidence in their ultimate success.CGL was not working in a field without competition. Lucas also realized the potential gains from computer animation, and in 1979 he created a new department of Lucasfilm which had the same goals as CGL, but ensured that movie industry professionals had a hand in the production. As Lucasfilm began headhunting for the best talent in the industry, many individuals struggling on The Works felt that Lucasfilm was a company more likely to succeed and abandoned NYIT. The University was another competitor, and NYIT lost some of its best people to them during the following years. Losing interest Another major problem was in the computers themselves. They were among the best and most powerful of their kind, but compared to the computers of today but were too slow and underpowered to generate the number of images required for a theatrical film. Attempting to pick up the pace, Dr. Shure recommitted himself to the project and the NYIT Computer Graphics Lab had more than 60 employees at its peak. Some were dedicated to The Works while others made animations for advertisers as a way to soften the financial toll the prolonged project exacted. Now not only did the computer team have to continue do ground-breaking animation and tool development, but as the quality of their output improved, they attracted outside clients wanting to commission title animations, commercials, and scenes for music videos, jobs which further sapped energy from the production. Scientist Ned Greene looked at the situation, analyzed all the elements needed to the film and crunched the numbers with devastating results: with the technology available, even if all the models and animations were calculated, it would take 7 years to output the rendered frames needed to complete the film. The fact was that, in spite of all the resources brought to bear, CGL did not have the human or technical capacity to create film quality sequences on the hardware of the time.Once it had been shown that the film could not be realized The Works was officially abandoned. A less ambitious project, 3DV was attempted. In a bid to circumvent the film-making bottleneck, 3DV was intended to be a TV special with a script that would include footage originally intended for The Works repurposed as programming for an imaginary all-computer generated cable tv service. 3DV incorporated some of its own innovations like lip-synching and compositing a CG character into a live-action scene but, other than a promotional edit which was shown at SIGGRAPH, this too went nowhere. Many of those who had been working at CGL were hired by others and took their ideas, techniques and experience to new places. The vision of Dr. Shure and the effort invested in The Works were at the forefront of technology which continued to evolve into both an artform and an industry.Though the film was never completed in spite of the millions of dollars invested in it, it was clear that The Works was not a waste of time and money. People involved in the project were and are among the top computer graphics researchers and developers in the world and their early creations are now in common use in 3D modeling and animation programs and in editors like Effects, Photoshop, and Flash. When the first computer animated feature was finally released in the form of Story, Catmull, one of the founding fathers of the NYIT (York Institute of Technology) Computer Graphics Lab and other Lab alumni had become members of PIXARs staff. Partial credits * Williams* Paul Heckbert* Dick Lundin* Christie Barton* Bil Maher References  External links * The Works* Pictures from The Works Film Project* Slide Show* Short clip
551523
Natural_resources_of_Primorsky_Krai
Krai is a territory rich in resources:CoalMore than 100 deposits of coal are known in Primorye. The commercial deposits of coal are connected to the Partizansky and Razdolnensky coal basins, the Podgorodnensky deposit, the Uglovsky basin, and the Shkotovsky, Pavlovsky, Bikinsky, Rettikhovsky, Suputinsky deposits. The Partizansky Basin. The city of Partizansk is located in the southern part of the basin. The total area of the basin is 6,000 km (2,306 mi). The basin has been known since the 19th century and has been explored since 1902. Five coal-bearing regions - Staropartizansky, Melnikovsky, Belopadinsky, Molchanovsky, and Sergeyevsky - are within the limits of the basin. The coal is coal. By the output of the volatile substances and the caking ability coals prevail. The reserves of coal in the basin total 193.6 million tonnes. The deposits are maintained by the mines of the Partizanskugol Association. A Coal Mining Factory also operates in this area. The Razdolnensky Basin. The total area of this basin is about 4,500 km (1,730 mi). The basin is located to the north and the west of the city of Ussuriysk. The basin includes the following deposits: Ussuriysky, Lipovetsky, Verkhne-Razdolnensky, Konstantinovsky, Alekseye-Nikolsky. The deposits were prospected as early as 1868. The mining of coal has been conducted since 1909. The coal is hard coal. By the output of the volatile substances and the caking ability coals prevail. The reserves of coal in the basin total 66.7 million tons. The deposits are maintained by the mines and the open-pit coal mines of the Lipovetskoye Mine Administration. The Uglovsky Basin. Located 30 km (19 mi) to the north-east from Vladivostok. The basins band extends about 40 km (25 mi) to the north-east of the Bay and ranges from 6 to 14 km (3-9 mi) in width. Coals in the basin have been known since 1859. The mining of coal has been executed since 1867 in the Tavrichansky deposit, and since 1911 - in the Artyomovsky deposit. The coal is coal, which is used as a power fuel. In the long years of operation the stocks of coal in the basin have been considerably depleted. The reserves of coal in the basin total 233.7 million tons. The mines of the Tavrichansky Mine Administration and the Artyomugol Association operate on the basis of the deposits. The Podgrodnensko-Surazhevsky coal-bearing region is located close to Vladivostok. The stocks of the Podgrodnensky deposit are estimated to be a total of 19.6 million tons. The coal is coal. By the output of the volatile substances and the caking ability the coal is hard (non-bituminous). Maintained by the Podgorodenka mine of the Artyomugol Association. The Paleogene-Neogene deposits of Primorye are the Bikinsky, Pavlovsky, Shkotovsky, Rettikhovsky, Rakovsky, and Khasansky deposits. The deposits are the major sources of fuel for the largest heat and power stations of Primorye - Luchegorskaya and Vladivostokskaya. The coal is coal. The Bikinsky Deposit is the largest coal deposit in Primorye. Its total area is 260 km (100 mi). The reserves total 1,113.9 million tons. The coal-bearing thickness is 1,800 m (5,904 ft). The Luchegorsky Open-Pit Coal Mine maintains the mine and provides fuel to the largest power station in Primorye - the Luchegorsky Hydro Electric Power Station. The Pavlovsky Deposit. The total area is 400 km (248 mi). The reserves total 400 million tons. The coal-bearing thickness is up to 400 m (1,312 ft). The mining is maintained by the Pavlovsky-1 and Pavlovsky-2 Open-Pit Coal Mines. The coal is used as fuel for the Vladivostok Heat and Power Plant-2. The Skotovsky Deposit. The total area is 150 km (93 mi). The reserves total 251.6 million tons. The coal-bearing thickness ranges from 800 to 950 m (2,624 - 3,116 ft). Maintenance is by the open-pit mine of the Artyomugol Association. The coal of the Pavlovsky, Skotovsky, and Bikinsky deposits contains germanium and metals.TinThe major areas of occurrence of the commercial tin stocks are Kavalerovsky, Krasnoarmeysky, and Dalnegorsky Districts. There are more than 30 deposits of tin in Primorye. The extraction of tin ore is maintained by Khrustalnenskaya Tin Extracting Company, Dalpolimetal Stock Company, and Vostok Mining Company. All tin extracting enterprises of Primorye are provided with a 30 years ore supplies.TungstenThere are four major commercial deposits of tungsten in Krasnoarmeysky and Pozharsky Districts. The mining of only two of them is currently maintained: Vostok-2 and Lermontovskoye by the Primorsky Mining Group and Lermontovskoye Mining Company. The enterprises have a 10 years reserve supply. The ores are complex ores, they contain copper, gold, silver, bismuth, and other metals besides tungsten. Lead and zincThere are more than 10 commercial deposits of lead and zinc in the territories of Dalnegorsky, Kavalerovsky, and Krasnoarmeysky Districts. The mining of the deposits of lead and zinc is maintained by Dalpolimetal Stock Company. The enterprise has a 40 years supply of ore.SilverAmong the deposits of precious metals in Primorye silver and gold-silver deposits prevail. The total of 10 deposits of silver are found in the Krai. The large part of silver-polymetal ore deposits is located in District. Here they are maintained by Dalpolimetal Stock Company. Silver is extracted simultaneously with tungsten from tungsten ores deposits in Krasnoarmeysky and Pozharsky Districts. GoldMore than 60 deposits of gold are found in the territory of Primorye. Most of them are placer deposits. The richest in placer deposits is Southern Primorye. The following gold-placer sites are distinguished here: Kommisarovsky (the river), Fadeyevsky (the river), Krinichny (the Rudnevka river), Nakhodkinsky (the river), and Soboliny (the river). Okean Artel and Primorsky Mine are engaged in gold extraction.  Gold is also extracted from complex deposits of tungsten ores.FluorsparThe Voznesenovsky and Pogranichny deposits of rare-metal-fluorspar ore are located in District. The Voznesenovskoye deposit was prospected in 1948. It is maintained by the Yaroslavsky Mining Group Stock Company. The enterprise has over 20 years supply of stocks. The ore is a complex ore. Fluorspar totals 10% of the mineral content of the ore. The ore contains such rare metals as beryllium, lithium, tantalum, and niobium.BoronRussias largest deposit of boron-containing ore (silicates) is located in District. The deposit is operated by Bor Stock Company. The enterprise has 50 years supply of borosilicates stocks.LimestoneThere are more than 100 large deposits of various construction materials.The Spasskaya group includes the Spasskoye and Dlinnogorskoye limestone deposits. The stocks total more than 100 million tons. Maintained by Spassktsement Stock Company. The Suchanskaya group includes the Novitskoye and Chandolazskoye limestone deposits, which are located in Partizansky District. Suitable for the production of Portland (cement) of 400 and 500 types. The stocks total approximately more than 1 billion tons. The Maikhinskaya group includes the Maikhinskoye and Glubinnogorskoye deposits located in District. The estimated stocks of limestone in both deposits total about 60 million tons. Ashler stonesThere are numerous deposits of granites, porphyrites, and marbles which, when polished, acquire a smooth surface of beautiful color. These deposits are located in Lesozavodsky, Khorolsky, Khasansky, Spassky, Chernigovsky, Partizansky, and other districts. The Ambinskoye deposit of marbles is located in District. This marble is highly decorative and is easily polished. The estimated stocks total more than 2 million m (70.6 million ft). The Knorringskoye deposit of stones is located in District. The estimated stocks total about 10 million m (35.3 million ft). They are similar in color to the famous American ashler stones. Brick earthThere are more than 100 deposits of clay which is used in brick production in Primorye. Fusible clay deposits are found almost everywhere in Primorye, except its north-eastern parts. The Uglovskaya, Ussuriyskaya, and Spasskaya group of fusible clay deposits are distinguished in this area. Primoryes largest stocks, a total of more than fifteen million tons, is the Uglovskaya group of deposits located in Uglovoye settlement. The deposits provide raw material to the brick factories in Vladivostok and Artyom. There are more than twenty deposits of refractory and fireclay. The clay is suitable for manufacture of bricks and ceramics. The largest deposits are located in Oktyabrsky and District, and in Artyom. The Lipovetskoye Deposit of refractory clay is located in Oktyabrsky District. The estimated stocks total about 1.5 million tons. Maintained by the Lipovetsky Brick Factory. The Ozernovskoye deposit of fireclay is located in Uglovoye settlement. The estimated stocks total about 2 million tons. Used for manufacture of bricks since 1964.Porcelain stonesPrimoryes best-known Gusevskoye deposit of stone is located in District. The material is used by the Vladivostok and Artyom Porcelain Factories. The estimated stocks total about 3 million tons.Feldspar rhyolitesThe Sergeyevskoye deposit of ceramic rhyolites is located in Partizansky District. It may be used for manufacture of porcelain.
554924
Illinois_Country
300px|right|thumb|French settlements and forts in the Illinois Country in 1763, showing U.S. current state boundaries.The Illinois Country (), also known as Upper Louisiana, was a region in what is now the United States that was explored and settled by the French during the 17th and 18th centuries. The terms referred to the entire Mississippi River watershed, though settlement was concentrated in what are now the U.S. states of Illinois, Missouri, and Indiana. First explored in 1673 by the expedition of Joliet and Marquette, the area was soon claimed by France and became part of Louisiana, together with Louisiana.Whereas the term Upper Louisiana referred to the entire Upper Mississippi area claimed by France, through the 18th century Illinois Country primarily referred to the concentrated settlement area. By the mid-18th century, the major settlements included Cahokia, Kaskaskia, Chartres, Saint Philippe, and Prairie du Rocher, all on the east side of the Mississippi in present-day Illinois; and Ste. Genevieve across the river in Missouri.()() The region was initially governed from Canada, but by the 1720s a local governmental infrastructure was in place, in which the local towns reported to the commandant of Fort de Chartres, who in turn reported to the governor general of Louisiana in New Orleans.() Upper and Lower Louisiana east of the Mississippi River were ceded to the British in 1763, and the west to the Spanish, after the and Indian War. Some French settlers remained in the area, while others crossed the Mississippi, forming new settlements such as St. Louis. Both regions eventually came under the control of the States. French language and culture continued to exist in the area, with the French dialect still being spoken into the 20th century.Because of the deforestation that resulted from the cutting of much wood for fuel during the 19th-century age of steamboats, the Mississippi River became more shallow and broad, with more severe flooding and lateral changes in its channel in the stretch from St. Louis to the confluence with the Ohio River.  As a consequence, many architectural and archeological resources were lost to flooding and destruction of early French colonial villages originally located near the river, such as Kaskaskia, St. Philippe, and Illinois, and old Genevieve, Missouri.()LocationThe region never had clearly defined boundaries. Earlier descriptions tended to be more expansive. The largest scope described it as extending east to the Mountains, west to the Mountains, north up to Peoria and south to the Post, where the River flowed into the River.  By another description, it extended from lakes Michigan and Superior to the Ohio and Missouri rivers.  A third, from after the British acquired the region, described it as bounded by the Mississippi River on the west, the River on the north, the River on the east, and the Ohio River on the south.  The region now known as the Bottom is nearly at the center of all descriptions of the Illinois Country.Exploration and settlementImage:Western New France, 1688.jpg|thumb|250px|Map of Western New France, including the Illinois Country, by Coronelli, 1688Initially, the principal European, non-native inhabitants were French traders and missionaries, both dealing with Native Americans, particularly the group known as the Kaskaskia.  The French were not very successful in encouraging settlement in the isolated area, despite the importation of women to induce permanent settlement.  Some number of French convicts were relocated there and became settlers.  There were also some German and Spanish immigrants to the region, creating one of the earliest American pot cultures.It was originally governed from Canada, but by order of King Louis XV on September 27, 1717, the Illinois Country was annexed to the French province of Louisiana, with the northern border being the River.  In 1721, the seventh civil and military district of Louisiana was named Illinois.  It included more than half of the present state, as well as the land between the River and the line of 43 degrees north latitude, and the country between the Rocky Mountains and the Mississippi River. In 1723, the region around the River was made into a separate district. Around this time, the Illinois Country was sometimes referred to as Upper Louisiana, although this term was also used to describe the land west of the Mississippi River, with Illinois Country referring to land east of the Mississippi and north of the Ohio River. The distinction became clearer after the Treaty of Paris in 1763, when Britain acquired the land east of the Mississippi, and Spain acquired Louisiana and the land west of the Mississippi.  Many French settlers moved west across the river to escape British control.Fort de ChartresOn January 1, 1718, a trade monopoly was granted to John Law and his Company of the West (which was to become the Company of the Indies in 1719). Hoping to make a fortune mining precious metals in the area, the company with a military contingent sent from New Orleans built a fort to protect its interests. Construction began on the first de Chartres (in present-day Illinois) in 1718 and was completed in 1720.The original fort was located on the east bank of the Mississippi River, downriver (south) from Cahokia and upriver of Kaskaskia. The nearby settlement of du Rocher, Illinois, was founded by French-Canadian colonists in 1722, a few miles inland from the fort.The fort was to be the seat of government for the Illinois Country and help to control the aggressive Fox Indians.  The fort was named after Louis, duc de Chartres, son of the regent of France.  Because of frequent flooding, another fort was built further inland in 1725.  By 1731, the Company of the Indies had gone defunct and turned Louisiana and its government back to the king.  The garrison at the fort was removed to Illinois in 1747, about 18 miles to the south.  A new stone fort was planned near the old fort and was described as nearly complete in 1754, although construction continued until 1760.The new stone fort was headquarters for the French Illinois Country for less than 20 years, as it was turned over to the British in 1763 with the Treaty of Paris at the end of the and Indian War.  The British Crown declared almost all the land between the Mountains and the Mississippi River from Florida to Newfoundland a Native American territory called the Indian Reserve following the Proclamation of 1763.  The government ordered settlers to leave or get a special license to remain.  This was to cause many of the French settlers to move to St. Louis, but they also wanted to be ruled by a Catholic government.The British took control of Fort de Chartres on October 10, 1765 and renamed it Cavendish.  The British softened the initial expulsion order and offered the French inhabitants the same rights and privileges enjoyed under French rule. In September 1768, the British established a Court of Justice, the first court of law in the Mississippi Valley (the French law system is called civil law).After severe flooding in 1772, the British saw little value in maintaining the fort and abandoned it. They moved the military garrison to the fort at Kaskaskia and renamed it Gage.Other settlements*Peoria was at first the southermost part of France, then the northernmost part of the French Colony of Louisiana, and finally the westernmost part of the newly formed States.  French interests dominated at Peoria for well over a hundred years, from the time the first French explorers came up the Illinois River in 1673 until the first United States settlers began to move into the area around 1815.  A small French presence persisted for a time on the east bank of the river, but was gone by about 1846. Today, only faint echoes of French Peoria survive in the street plan of downtown Peoria, and in the name of an occasional street, school, or hotel meeting room: Joliet, Marquette, LaSalle.*In 1675, Marquette founded a mission at the Great Village of the tribe, near present Illinois, which was destroyed by Iroquois in 1680.*Vincennes, later known as St. Vinennes and eventually Indiana, was established in 1732.  The British renamed it Sackville after their capture in the and Indian War (also known as the Years War.)  George Rogers Clark renamed it Fort Henry, for the Governor of Virginia, when he took it in the Revolution.  Although part of the original expansive Illinois Country, as part of the Northwest Territory, it became the seat of a separate county.*Cahokia, established in 1699 by French missionaries from Quebec, was one of the earliest permanent settlements in the region.  It became one of the most populous of the northern towns.  In 1787, it was made the seat of St. Clair County in the Territory.  In 1801, Henry Harrison, then governor of Territory, enlarged St. Clair County to administer a vast area extending to the Canadian border. By 1814, the county had been reduced to almost the size of the present Clair County, Illinois.  The county seat was shifted from Cahokia to Belleville.  On April 20, 1769, the great Indian leader Pontiac was murdered in Cahokia by a chief of the Peoria.*Kaskaskia, established in 1703,  was at first a tiny mission station.  It later flourished to become capital of the Territory, 18091818, and the first capital of the state of Illinois, 1818-1820. The French built a fort here in 1721, which was destroyed in 1763 by the British. (The fort was situated above what was then the lower course of the River, but became the new channel of the Mississippi in 1881.)  During the Revolution, General Rogers Clark took possession of the village in 1778.  The residents rang the church bell in celebration, and it became known as the liberty bell.  (It had been sent in 1741 by King XV.)  Flooding and a lateral shift of the river channel in 1881 cut off the old settlement from the mainland of Illinois and destroyed some of the village and its archaeology.  Much of the village cemetery was transferred to the higher ground of Kaskaskia State Park across the river.  Today visitors can reach the remnants of Kaskaskia only by a bridge and road from the Missouri side.  In the Flood of 1993, the Mississippi submerged all but a few rooftops and the steeple of the Catholic Church of the Conception, built in 1843 and moved brick by brick to the new location on Kaskaskia Island about 1893.*In 1720, Francois Renault, the Director of Mining Operations for the Company of the West, arrived with about 200 laborers and mechanics and 500 African slaves from Domingo to work the mines. However, the mines yielded only unprofitable coal and lead, providing insufficient revenues for the Company of the West to survive.  In 1723, Renault, with his workers and slaves, established the village St. Philippe (on the Bottoms down from the present-day unincorporated community of Illinois in County, Illinois.)  It was about 3 miles north of Fort de Chartres.  This is the first record of African slaves in the region.  Some of the French farmers also used slaves for labor, but most families held only a few, if any.  The village quickly produced an agricultural surplus, with its goods sold to lower Louisiana, as well as to settlements less successful than those in the Illinois Country, such as Arkansas Post.*The original Ste. Genevieve was established around 1750 along the western banks of the River.  The village consisted mostly farmers and merchants of French-Canadian descent from the settlements on the east side.  Despite flooding, the town remained in that location until the great flood of 1785 destroyed much property.  The villagers decided to move the entire village to higher ground about two miles north and half a mile back from the river floodplain.  The city has retained the most buildings of Colonial architecture in the US.*The French built Massac in 1757 near the present Illinois.*They established Orleans in 1723 along the River near Missouri.Post-colonial periodDuring the Revolutionary War, General Rogers Clark took possession of the entire Illinois Country for Virginia. In November 1778, the Virginia legislature created the county of Illinois comprising all of the lands lying west of the River to which Virginia had any claim, with Kaskaskia as the county seat. Captain John Todd was named as governor. However, this government was limited to the former French settlements and was rather ineffective.For their assistance to General Clark in the war, French and Indian residents of Illinois Country were given full citizenship. Under the Ordinance and many subsequent treaties and acts of Congress, the French and Indian residents of Vincennes and Kaskaskia were granted specific exemptions, as they had declared themselves citizens of Virginia. The term Illinois Country was sometimes used in legislation to refer to these settlements.Much of the Illinois Country region became an territory of the United States with the establishment of the Territory in 1787.During the 19th century, steamboat travel flourished on the Mississippi River, which was good for the economy of St. Louis and other towns, but it led to deforestation along the river.  Adverse environmental effects resulted, including more severe flooding as the river became broader and more shallow, lateral changes in the channel, instability of banks, and loss of towns due to flooding or channel changes.  Much of archeological importance was lost in the flooding and destruction of French colonial towns such as Kaskaskia, St. Philippe, and Illinois; and Mines and old Genevieve, Missouri.See also* of commandants of the Illinois Country* France* regions of the United States* Country* French, a dialect of the language spoken by 1,000 people in remnants of Old France in Missouri.References* French Peoria in the Illinois Country, 1673-1846 Library of Congress exhibit* Louisiana Digital Libraries Plan for Fort OrleansBibliography*Alvord, Clarence W. and Sutton, Robert M., The Illinois Country, 16731818, ISBN 0-252-01337-9*Belting, Natalia Maree, Kaskaskia under the French Regime by ISBN 0-8093-2536-5*Brackenridge, Henri Marie, Recollections of Persons and Places in the West (Google Books)*Ekberg, Carl J., Colonial Ste. Genevieve: An Adventure on the Mississippi Frontier, Tucson, AZ: Patrice Press, 1996, ISBN 1-880397-14-5*Ekberg, Carl J., Francois Vall and His World: Upper Louisiana Before Lewis and Clark, Columbia, MO: University of Missouri Press, 2002.*Ekberg, Carl J., Stealing Indian Women: Native Slavery in the Illinois Country, Urbana, IL: University of Illinois Press, 2007.*Ekberg, Carl J., Francois Valle and His World: Upper Louisiana before Lewis & Clark, Tucson, AZ: Patrice Press, 2006*Ekberg, Carl J., French Roots in the Illinois Country: The Mississippi Frontier in Colonial Times, Tucson, AZ: Patrice Press, ISBN 0-252-06924-2External links*Foundation for Restoration of Ste. Genevieve, Inc. Guibourd Historic House & Mecker Research Library*Ste. Genevieve County Historical and Genealogical Resources*Sainte Genevieve Chamber of Commerce*Felix Vall State Historic Site Missouri Department of Natural ResourcesLandodes Illinoisdes Illinoisja:Country
556357
Maytag
 homepage  http://www.maytag.comthumb|250px|Former Headquarters of the Maytag Corporation, Newton, Iowathumb|250px|Antique Maytag washing machine.Maytag Corporation is an American home and commercial appliance company, headquartered in Iowa, that is a division of the Corporation.Company historyThe Maytag Washing Machine Company was founded in 1893 by businessman Frederick Maytag. In 1925, the Maytag Washing Machine Company became Maytag, Inc. During the Great Depression of the 1930s, the company was one of the few to actually make a profit in successive years. In 1938, Maytag provoked strikes by the companys workers because of a 10% pay cut.(Page on Maytag strike in 1938) The company was able to beat the strike because of the intervention of four military companies, including a machine gun company, of the 113th Cavalry Regiment, Iowa National Guard.(Steven E. Clay, U.S. Army Order of Battle 19191941, Fort Leavenworth: Combat Studies Institute Press, p. 635.) At his fathers death in 1940, Fred Maytag II, grandson of the founder, took over the presidency. During World War II, the company participated in war production by making special components for military equipment. In 1946, production of washing machines was resumed; in 1949, the first automatic washers were produced in a new, dedicated factory. In 1946, Maytag began marketing a separate line of ranges and refrigerators made by other companies under the Maytag name. During the Korean War, the company again produced parts for military equipment, although washing-machine production continued.During the 1950s, the white goods, or laundry appliance industry grew rapidly. Maytag first entered the commercial laundry field at this time, manufacturing washers and dryers for commercial self-service laundries and commercial operators. In response, other full-line appliance producers began to compete with Maytag in the white-goods consumer market. These included full-line manufacturers such as Whirlpool, General Electric, and Frigidaire, who built not only washing machines and dryers, but also refrigerators, stoves, and other appliances. Since Maytag was much smaller than the full-line producers, the company decided to limit itself to the manufacture of washers and dryers, alongside ovens and refrigerators built by other companies, as a small, premium-brand manufacturer. The company capitalized on its reputation by renaming its corporate address in Newton, Iowa, One Dependability Square.By 1960, Maytag had ceased marketing ovens and refrigerators, but later began once again to expand into kitchen appliances with its own design of portable kitchen dishwasher and a line of disposers. Upon the death of Fred Maytag II, the last family member involved in the companys management, E. G. Higdon was named president of the company, with George M. Umbreit becoming chairman and CEO. By the late 1970s, over 70 percent of U.S. households were equipped with washers and dryers, and with approximately 18,000 employees worldwide, the company was established as a dominant manufacturer of large laundry appliances.  After the companys acquisition of Chef, Inc., in 1986, a move which nearly doubled its size, the company acquired a new corporate name, Maytag Corporation.In 1997, a Maytag engineering team, at Maytag Laundry Appliances Research and Development, developed the Maytag Neptune line of front-load washers.(Ashley, Steven, Energy Efficient Appliances Mechanical Engineering, March 1998)  A matching dryer was introduced to accompany the new washer. The company claimed that the new Neptune model saved energy costs over traditional washer/dryer sets. Production of the Neptune line was later switched to Electronics. In 2001, the company acquired the Corporation and its appliance assembly facilities. That same year, Ralph F. Hake became the last chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of Maytag Corporation, serving in that post until March 2006. Once renowned as the standard for laundry appliances, by 2003 the company faced increasing competition from new appliance brands in the US market, as well as from existing appliance manufacturers who had outsourced production a decade earlier in order to reduce costs.(Copeland, Michael V., Stuck in the Spin Cycle: Maytag, the All-American Appliance Icon, Is Learning A Dangerous Lesson, Business 2.0 Magazine, 1 May 2005)(Pitt, David, Moves to Mexico Fuel Fears at Maytag, Deseret News (Salt Lake City), 6 August 2003)  While Maytag had begun the process of shifting appliance production to lower-cost assembly plants outside the United States, in 2004 the company was still producing 88 percent of its products in older U.S.-based factories.(Copeland, Michael V., Stuck in the Spin Cycle: Maytag, the All-American Appliance Icon, Is Learning A Dangerous Lesson, Business 2.0 Magazine, 1 May 2005)  In an apparent move away from traditional company marketing strategy, company management decided on a plan to stimulate consumer purchases of new Maytag appliances before their old ones had worn out.(Hunger, Prof. J. David, Maytag Corporation 2002: Focus On North America, Strategic Management And Business Policy, 9th ed.(2002), p. 28)Costs incurred in Maytags acquisition and integration of Amana and an increased corporate debt load led to aggressive internal cost-cutting efforts in direct materials, manufacturing, and distribution costs.((Maytags CEO Expects Significant Sales, Growth in 2002, Appliance Design Magazine, 28 February 2002)  Maytag introduced a value-priced appliance line under a separate label, Performa by Maytag.  To increase sales, the company also marketed Maytag-branded Legacy Series washing machines that were otherwise identical to low-end Amana models, and built in the former Herrin, Illinois Amana assembly plant. The rebranded Maytag models, later termed Amanatags by dissatisfied owners, received poor customer reviews after reports surfaced of major mechanical and/or durability problems.(Amanatag Washer With Slipping Clutch)(Amana Washer Service Manual PN800486, Top Load Washer: NAV/SAV series, Maytag Corporation)  The company also consolidated warehouse operations and cut the number of Maytag vendors.  Between 2002 and 2004, Maytag corporate management cut new-product investment by 50%.(An increasing chorus of consumer complaints concerning product reliability and customer service, assisted by the rapid growth of internet consumer forums, began to affect the companys reputation with customers.(CPSC, Maytag Corp. Announce Recall to Repair of Amana Gas Ranges)(Want A Reliable Appliance? Do Your Homework)(North, Gary, What To Learn From Maytag LewRockwell.com (2007))(The High Cost of Low Quality)  The company was also slow to react to customer complaints regarding its flagship Neptune washer and dryer line (labeled the Stinkomatic by dissatisfied customers), resulting in further damage to the companys reputation and a $33.5 million payout to settle several class-action lawsuits arising from the Neptune problems.(Cipollone, Peter, Boiled Frogs and Your Organizations Reputation: Visualizing Emerging Opportunities and Threats to Reputation through Text Mining, Information Management Special Reports, October 2005)(Higgins, Dan, Maytag Puts Couple Through Wringer In Warranty Claim, The Advocate, 4 June 2009)(Continental Quality Engineering, The High Cost of Low Quality; Anderson IA: The Continental Quality Newsletter)(North, Gary, What To Learn From Maytag, LewRockwell.com (2007))   By 2005, Maytags market share had declined to all-time lows, sales were flat, and customer satisfaction surveys ranked Maytag near the bottom of the appliance field.(  The problems with the Neptune line continued; in 2007, 250,000 Neptune washing machines became part of a nationwide safety recall by the Product Safety Commission due to fire danger.(Melanson, Donald, Maytag Repairman Panics As Company Recalls 250,000 Washers, Endgadget, 31 March 2007)On April 1, 2006, the Whirlpool completed its acquisition of Maytag Corporation. In May 2006, Whirlpool announced plans to close the former Maytag headquarters office in Newton, as well as laundry product manufacturing plants in Iowa; Illinois; and Arkansas by 2007.(Vindicator, June 26, 2006) Following the Maytag headquarters closure, all brand administration was transferred to Whirlpools headquarters in Harbor, Michigan. The Maytag name would now be used on Whirlpool-designed appliances. Most Maytag employees were terminated, but some were offered jobs at Whirlpool. The board of directors of Maytag all received five years severance pay. Former Maytag chairman and CEO, Ralph F. Hake, received two years base salary and two years target bonus under his severance agreement.(MYG Proxy Statement)File:OurHoliday 031.JPG|thumb|Museum exhibit in Museum. Washing machine Maytag, was letting out in 1927 (see below sign on it).On January 1, 2009, Maytag (under the ownership of the Corp.) changed the vested lifetime benefits of the Maytag retirees. There is a lawsuit pending in the Southern District Court of Iowa where Whirlpool has asked for permission to change the UAW bargained benefits. The benefits in question were subsequently changed despite any resolution of the lawsuit.Chronology Owned brands * Admiral* Amana* Caloric* Crosley* Dynasty* Gaffers & Sattler* Glenwood* Hardwick* Holiday* Jade* JENN-Air* Litton* Chef* Menu Master* Modern Maid* Norge* SunrayProductsIn major appliances, Maytag was among the top three companies in the North American market, offering a full line of machines, dryers, dishwashers, cooktops, refrigerators, and ranges under the Maytag, Jenn-Air, Amana, and Magic Chef brands.Maytag sold multiple small appliances including a cordless iron under the Maytag brand, a mixer and blender under JENN-Air, the company also sold the popular Skybox and Rookie home-vending products.In floor care, Maytag owned the Hoover brand, the market leader in North America and the floor-care brand with the highest consumer recognition and buying preference.In commercial products, Maytag owned Dixie-Narco, a leader in refrigerated soft drink and specialty vending machines as well as Jade cooking products and Amana commercial cooking products.Maytag had presence in markets around the world, including sales operations in Mexico, the Kingdom, Japan, and Australia. The corporations export sales and marketing, licensing of brands, and international joint ventures was coordinated by Maytag International in Illinois.Maytag InternationalIn 1988, DOMICOR was established as Maytag Corporations international division and in 1992 became Maytag International, Inc. which eventually encompassed all of Maytags worldwide ventures including Maytag Australia, Maytag Japan, Maytag Commercial (Mexico), and Maytag UK.Maytag International, was based in Illinois, handled the sales, licensing and business ventures of corporate appliances and floorcare brands in overseas markets as well as the administrative support for the international sales organization. This network extended to more than 70 countries worldwide.Maytag International was responsible for export sales and licensing of the corporations appliances and floor care brands and joint ventures in overseas markets. This network extends to more than 90 countries worldwide. The main office is located in Chicago with major subsidiary offices in Burlington, Ontario (Canada), Monterrey (Mexico), Sydney (Australia), and London (England) and region sales offices in Beirut (Lebanon) and Yokohama (Japan).Manufacturing plantsAs of 2008, Maytag had 14 manufacturing plants throughout the United States and Mexico. These include:* laundry manufacturing plants in Iowa; Illinois; and Arkansas, in the U.S., and Jurez, Chihuahua* refrigeration manufacturing plants in Iowa and Tamaulipas* cooking manufacturing plant in Tennessee* dishwashing manufacturing plant in Ohio* vending manufacturing plant in South Carolina* subassembly manufacturing plant in TamaulipasOl Lonelythumb|right|200px|Gordon Jump as the Maytag repairmanOl Lonely, or the lonely repairman, is a character in Maytag advertisements, created for Maytag by copywriter Vincent R. Vassolo of the Leo Burnett advertising agency. His character was initially played by Jesse White, who retained the role until 1988.((Early Maytag Repairman TV CommercialMaytags Brand Blunder, BrandCultureTalk.com, 9 January 2009)  In a time in which the laundry appliances of major manufacturers had reached maturity, differing mostly in minor details, the campaign was designed to remind consumers of the perceived added value in Maytag products derived from the brands reputation for dependability.  Maytag advertisements stated Ol Lonelys predicament is testimony to the durability and reliability of Maytag appliances. Now if only he had something to do with his days.  The campaign proved a huge success, allowing Maytag to set a substantial price premium, as well as strongly influencing consumer preference at the higher end of the laundry appliance market.(Maytags Brand Blunder, BrandCultureTalk.com, 9 January 2009)In 1986, the repairman was joined by Newton, a hound named for Maytags headquarters in Newton, Iowa. In 1989, actor Jump first appeared as Ol Lonely in the advertisement Biker. In total, Jump appeared in more than 77 Maytag commercials and print advertisements. He made appearances at events for employees and customers and also was actively involved in several philanthropic and charitable causes.  Ironically, a former Maytag repairman was convicted of fabricating repair and expense claims.()Actor Rawls was hired to play Ol Lonely after Jumps retirement in 2003, although he appeared only in print advertising and personal appearances. Gordon Jump died two months later on September 22, 2003.(Maytag)  In French-speaking Quebec, Ol Lonely was played by Berval.(Paul Berval)  For a period of time Maytag gave Ol Lonely a younger sidekick character known as the Maytag Apprentice, played by actor Devine. However, in 2005 Maytag cancelled his contract. Maytag also elected not to renew Rawls contract, instead holding open auditions. Colts backup quarterback Sorgi was among those who auditioned.()  On April 2, 2007, Maytag announced that Earl Jackson of Virginia had been selected to fill the role of Ol Lonely.(http://www.accessatlanta.com/news/content/shared-gen/ap/TV/Maytag_Repairman.html)By the end of the twentieth century, the Maytag repairman character had become an iconic metaphor for a professional whose services are rarely needed, such as Most people in town now have their own cars, making the local bus driver like the Maytag repairman.  Times were changing however, and events at Maytag and within the industry began to diminish the effectiveness of the long-lived Maytag- repairman campaign.  Consumer demand for innovative, expensive, and increasingly complex electronically-controlled and computerized appliances, coupled with higher labor costs and complaints over Maytag product quality and service, influenced a decline in Maytag sales and profit margins.  By 2004, the Maytag repairman character had become to some consumers a symbol of misplaced trust in aging marketing campaigns.(Maytags Brand Blunder BrandCultureTalk.com, 9 January 2009)(Frankel, Rob, The Maytag Repairman Gets Even Lonelier 28 April 2005)  As one commentator noted, Unfortunately things change, and, after some major quality hiccups, now its the Maytag salesman who is bemoaning his loneliness. Maytags reputation has plunged to the bottom with costly consumer class action lawsuits and numerous quality complaints.(Continental Quality Engineering, The High Cost of Low Quality; Anderson IA: The Continental Quality Newsletter)  As a partial result of Maytags quality problems, the company reported a loss of $9 million in 2004, according to Industry Week.( See also * Toy Racer automobiles References  External links * Maytag* Maytag Corporation website (Archive)ja:
557837
USS_Chicago_(CA-136)
{|Ship notesShip notes|}USS Chicago (CA-136) was a Baltimore class cruiser laid down on 28 July 1943 at Pennsylvania, USA, by the Navy Yard. Launched on 20 August 1944 she was sponsored by Mrs. Edward J. Kelly, wife of the of Chicago, Illinois, and commissioned at the Philadelphia Navy Yard on 10 January 1945, Captain Richard R. Hartung, USN, in command.World War IIChicago spent her first six weeks preparing for sea duty before departing on 26 February for Norfolk. After conducting training exercises, and calibrated her compasses in Bay, the cruiser got underway on 12 March for the of Paria, Trinidad. Arriving on 18 March, the cruiser conducted shakedown training and shore bombardment exercises off Culebra, Puerto Rico, before returning to Norfolk on 11 April. Following inspections and battle problem training, the cruiser sailed to Philadelphia for post-shakedown repair availability on 16 April.In company with , the cruiser departed for the Caribbean on 7 May, en route to the Ocean. Designed to operate offensively with strike and amphibious forces, Chicago spent her transit time conducting various anti-air drills, gunnery exercises, and radar tracking training. After refueling at Juan, Puerto Rico on 11 May, the ships spent three days conducting gunnery practice before departing for Canal Zone, on 15 May. With transit complete the next day, the ships arrived at Pearl Harbor on 31 May.Following another period of gunnery, day battle, anti-aircraft, and shore bombardment exercises off Kahoolawe Island, the cruiser departed for Eniwetok, Islands, on 28 June. In company with , Chicago arrived at the atoll on 5 July and immediately refueled from . Underway that same day, with , added for anti-submarine screen, the ships joined Admiral Radfords Task Group 38.4 north of the Islands on 8 July.Added to the anti-aircraft screen, Chicago guarded the Task Groups carriers as they conducted air strikes against the Tokyo Plains area, Honsh, Japan, on 10 July. After refueling on 12 July, the Task Group returned to the Japanese coast and launched air strikes against airfields, shipping, and railways in the northern Honsh and Hokkaid areas the next day.On 14 July, in company with , , , , and nine destroyers of Rear Admiral Shafroths bombardment unit, Chicago closed northern Honsh to bombard the industrial area. At 1212, the cruiser joined the battleships in firing on the iron works and warehouses. Although heavy smoke obscured the target from the cruisers spotting planes, the combination of pre-plotting the target through photo reconnaissance and radar positioning data allowed Chicagos guns to start fires in numerous buildings, several large warehouses, and among nearby oil tanks. At 1251, the cruisers secondary battery guns began firing on a Japanese destroyer-escort type vessel. The escort was straddled and hit by 5 in shell fire, began smoking, and retired into the harbor. The Task Force retired at 1426, leaving the port under a pall of black smoke.The following day, Chicago operated as a temporary seaplane carrier when  transferred her Seahawk floatplanes to the cruiser. By hanging one plane over the side with the crane the crew was still able to launch a Seahawk from the catapult for spotting services. After replenishment operations on 16 July, the cruiser resumed screening the carriers as they launched air strikes over the Plains, northern Honsh and Hokkaid, and the Kure-Kobe area over the next two weeks.On 29 July, in company with  and several American battleships, Chicago participated in a night shore bombardment mission against the port of Hamamatsu. Using radar, and assisted by spotting planes dropping flares and rockets, the ships fired at bridges, factories and the rail yard for about an hour. Rejoining the Task Group five hours later Chicago once again screened the carriers as they launched air strikes against the Tokyo-Nagoya area.Operations with the carriers, including a diversion to the south to avoid a typhoon, continued until 9 August when Rear Admiral Shafroths bombardment unit returned to Kamaishi. The battleships, joined by Chicago, three more heavy cruisers and a Royal Navy light cruiser detachment, delivered another two-hour bombardment of the town before returning to the carrier task forces.For the next six days, the cruiser screened the carriers as they launched continuous strikes against the Japanese Home Islands, until 15 August and the Japanese armistice. Chicago remained with the carriers until 23 August, when she departed for Japan. Anchoring in Wan on 27 August, and then moving to Bay on 3 September, the cruiser supported the unloading of supplies and equipment for Third Fleet occupation forces.Post-WarAfter transferring 47 men and the Marine Detachment for duty at Naval Base, the cruiser remained in port until 23 October when she got underway for the demilitarization of the Islands. Over the next twelve days, inspection teams helped the Japanese garrison on Shima and Shima demolish gun emplacements, artillery, ammunition and other military equipment on the islands. Three days later, on 7 November, the cruiser got underway for Pedro, California.After arrival on 23 November Chicago received an overhaul at the Pedro Naval Shipyard, before returning to the Far East. Underway on 24 January 1946, the cruiser arrived in Shanghai on 18 February for occupation duty. She remained there until 28 March as flagship of the Patrol, and then sailed to Sasebo, Japan, where she became flagship of Naval Support Force, Japanese Empire Waters. The cruiser visited several other ports in Japan before clearing for the west coast on 14 January 1947. Moved to Sound Naval Shipyard, the heavy cruiser was placed out of commission in reserve on 6 June 1947.Rebuilt as Missile CruiserOn 1 November 1958, Chicago was reclassified CG-11 and towed to Francisco Naval Shipyard to begin a five-year conversion to a guided missile cruiser. Begun on 1 July 1959, the entire superstructure was removed and replaced with new aluminum compartments, modernized electronic systems, and an improved Tactical Data System (NTDS) equipped combat information center. Representative of the new technological focus on guided missiles, Chicago was refitted with Tartar and Talos SAM stowage, loading, launching, and guidance systems. Two triple torpedo tubes, an ASROC launcher, two 5 in/38 cal guns, and two antisubmarine helicopters rounded out the cruisers modifications.Designed to provide long-range air, surface, and sub-surface defense for task forces, Chicago was recommissioned at the San Francisco Naval Shipyard on 2 May 1964, and was assigned to Cruiser-Destroyer Flotilla Nine, Pacific Fleet. Preliminary acceptance trials were conducted throughout the summer until 2 September, when Chicago officially joined the 1st Fleet as an active unit. Following sonar calibration and deperming in Sound the cruiser arrived at her home port of Diego, California to begin weapons systems qualifications. Examination and evaluation of the new missile systems were completed by 2 December, following successful trials at the Pacific Missile Range off southern California.On 4 January 1965, the cruiser shifted to Beach, California to begin a series of shock tests off Clemente Island. Equipment tests, as well as damage control exercises, were completed by mid-January. Chicago then departed the area for San Francisco for alterations, receiving upgraded missile systems and improved electronics. The warship returned to San Diego on 17 April.For the next two months, Chicago continued shakedown training, engineering, navigation, and seamanship drills as well as missile and electronic exercises. In mid-June, the cruiser began Talos fire control developmental testing with the Naval Electronics Laboratory. This, and later tests, examined guidance improvements and experimented with missile replenishment at sea.During fleet exercise Hot Stove in August-September, Chicago practiced anti-air and ASW operations, including firing ASROC and tube-launched torpedoes against submerged enemy submarines. Following an ECM exercise Chicago participated in a competitive missile firing exercise and won a gold Missilery E for her Tartar battery. During the first week of October the warship participated in another anti-air exercise, this time shooting down two high-speed, high-altitude drones with Talos and Tartar missiles.After a cruise to Hawaii from 19 October to 3 November, during which the cruiser practiced tactical data sharing training with  and , the ship finished out the year conducting tests and exercises in the San Diego area. Local operations continued in the spring, including more missile evaluation tests through February 1966. Returning to San Diego on 4 March the ship underwent operational readiness, technical proficiency, boiler, electronics, and nuclear warfare acceptance inspections. In April, the warship participated in Exercise Gray Ghost, where the cruiser operated as tactical flagship for the anti-air warfare commander, Rear Admiral R. Zumwalt, Jr..1st Vietnam DeploymentOn 12 May 1966, Chicago got underway for her first Vietnam deployment.  After stopping at Pearl Harbor and Yokosuka, where a new radar antenna was installed, the ship arrived at Naval Base Subic Bay on 12 June.  Picking up her helicopter detachment the cruiser departed the next day for duty with Task Force 77 on Station in the Gulf.On 15 June, Chicago began evaluating the concept of radar surveillance of all U.S. Navy air operations over designated areas of the Gulf and Vietnam. Known as PIRAZ, for positive identification and radar advisory zone,(An Unclassified Summary Of PIRAZ (1968).) the initial duties of tracking friendly aircraft was expanded to include Air Force planes, controlling barrier combat air patrols, advising support aircraft, and coordinating strike information with the Air Force reporting center at Nang, Vietnam.  After a port visit to Kong, where the ship had to avoid a typhoon on 17 July, the cruiser returned to Yankee Station on 29 July.On her second PIRAZ tour, in early August, Chicago assumed the duties of anti-air warfare commander for short periods of time and demonstrated the ability of a CG to track complex air operations.  After a practice Talos missile shot off Okinawa on 27 August, and a short visit to Taiwan, the ship returned to her station on 7 September.  The cruiser, expanding air duties once again, soon became the primary source for MIG warning information, and assumed surveillance responsibility for the North Vietnamese-Chinese border.  On her fourth PIRAZ tour, from 25 October to 12 November, the cruiser helped improve these procedures, particularly in the area of joint Air Force-Navy cooperation.En route to Sasebo, via Subic Bay, the cruiser stopped at the Missile Range to fire two more practice missiles on 18 November.  Arriving in Japan on 19 November, the ship visited Yokosuka before departing for home on 27 November.  Sailing in rough seas, the ship completed the non-stop voyage on 7 December.  The cruiser remained at San Diego for the remainder of the year.Starting in January 1967, the cruiser settled into the busy routine of training, exercises, and inspections.  Underway for such widely divergent responsibilities as providing guest cruises for the Secretary of the Navy, serving as First Fleet flagship, and air warfare exercises with , the cruiser spent the first five months of the year off California. In both April and May, Chicago conducted experimental Talos missile tests against surface targets to demonstrate missile versatility.Following readiness inspections, the cruiser departed 6 June for an Alaskan cruise with Commander First Fleet.  Arriving in Alaska on 10 June, the ship paid an official visit to that city before returning to San Diego eleven days later.  After another fleet exercise in July, where Chicagos Talos battery scored a direct hit on a drone at a range of 96 miles, the cruiser spent August conducting official visits to Washington, Vancouver, and Esquimalt, Columbia.2nd Vietnam DeploymentAssigned to tender availability on 1 September, the ship received boiler and other repairs and inspections from  before departing for another WestPac deployment on 11 October 1967.  After departing Pearl Harbor on 18 October, the warship assisted in vectoring aircraft to the site of a Navy Crusader crash site, successfully rescuing the pilot. Arriving on station in the Gulf of Tonkin three weeks later, via Yokosuka, Okinawa, and Subic Bay, the ship relieved , beginning PIRAZ duties on 12 November. These responsibilities, improved over the past year, included radar surveillance, coordinating barrier CAP and rescue operations, providing MiG and border warnings, and a wide variety of communication and real-time data sharing services.After a visit to Hong Kong from 16 to 21 December, the cruiser moved to Subic Bay for an import availability period completed on 3 January 1968.  Chicago steamed to Singapore, for a short rest period, before returning to the PIRAZ station on 13 January.  On 28 January, following the seizure of  by North Korea, the cruiser steamed to the Sea of Japan to help coordinate air activities for the carriers of Task Group 70.6.  On 7 February, as the crisis eased, Chicago departed to resume PIRAZ duties in the of Tonkin.Following two more PIRAZ cruises, Chicago departed Subic Bay on 1 May and arrived in San Diego on 15 May, via Guam and Pearl Harbor.  After a brief diversion to the Pacific Missile Range, to conduct experimental aircraft tracking and missile firings, the cruiser entered Beach Naval Shipyard on 1 July for a regular repair period followed by machinery and electronics sea trials and inspections for the remainder of 1968. 3rd Vietnam DeploymentOn 31 January 1969, Chicago concluded her missile systems qualifications tests, including a Talos test firing against a missile drone, before departing for her third cruise to the Western Pacific on 13 February.  The cruiser underwent ten days of upkeep and type training at Subic Bay before assuming duties as PIRAZ ship on 11 March.  Twelve days later, the ship began additional Search and Rescue (SAR) duty in the Gulf.  This involved maintaining two helicopters on patrol station to provide rescue coverage for Naval aircraft reconnaissance missions.On 17 April, Chicago was ordered to proceed to the of Japan, off Korea, for duty with Task Force 71. In response to the shooting down of a Warning Star by North Korean fighters on 14 April, that killed all 31 personnel on board, the Task Force patrolled the Sea of Japan during the crisis that followed. The cruiser provided PIRAZ and screening duties for the carriers, and their constant air patrols, until 27 April when the ship departed for upkeep at Sasebo, Japan.Following repairs, Talos and Tartar missile tests at the Okinawa missile range, and picking up a group of midshipmen at Da Nang on 23 May, Chicago conducted another long PIRAZ/SAR tour from 23 May to 1 July.  After upkeep at Yokosuka, a visit to Hong Kong, and a typhoon evasion, the cruiser returned to the Gulf of Tonkin on 1 August to continue radar surveillance, electronic countermeasures, and missile screen duties. Departing 25 August, the cruiser returned, via Subic Bay, Guam, and Pearl Harbor, to San Diego on 17 September.After a leave and upkeep period, followed by a tender availability that installed chaff dispensers, the cruiser finished out the year conducting routine inspections, local training exercises, and operations at the missile test range. Chicago, still serving as flagship for Commander First Fleet, began the new year quietly, with team training at the Fleet Anti-Submarine Warfare school in San Diego. Several fleet exercises, two missile firing tests, and inspections filled the months until 12 June 1970, when the cruiser underwent a two week repair and alteration period. All four Talos fire control systems were upgraded to include anti-ship targeting and an experimental video target tracker was installed. Communications security, nuclear safety, and operational readiness inspections, as well as final engineering checks, were completed by the end of August.4th Vietnam DeploymentImage:CHICAGOtowsKNOX.png|thumb|right|Chicago passes tow line to Knox after Knox was disabled by a fire enroute from Guam to Hawaii.Despite cutbacks that had substantially lowered her crew component, the cruiser sailed for Vietnam on 9 September 1970.  Arriving on station on 3 October, Chicago conducted PIRAZ and search coordination duties with evasive maneuvering to avoid typhoons Joan and Kate between 14 and 26 October.  After a 27 October refueling accident injured several men, Chicago left the Gulf of Tonkin on 1 November and arrived in Yokosuka on 7 November.  Chicago departed Yokosuka on 17 November and resumed PIRAZ station from 20 November to 19 December.  Chicago spent Christmas 1970 in Hong Kong and celebrated the new year in Subic Bay.  Chicago left Subic Bay on 11 January and resumed PIRAZ station until 18 February. Chicago departed Subic Bay en route to San Diego on 24 February escorted by .  Knox rescued a Chicago sailor who fell overboard on 26 February.  After refueling in Guam on 27 February, Knox suffering a loss of power due to a JP-5 fire in engineering on 3 March.  Chicago took Knox in tow until a fleet tug arrived at the scene from Pearl Harbor on 5 March.()Upon arrival in San Diego on 11 March, the cruiser began a post-deployment leave and upkeep period.  Supply replenishment, inspections, and a midshipmens cruise in June and July, were followed by exercises, inspections, and a dependent-guest cruise into October.5th Vietnam DeploymentAfter a final readiness test and embarking five guests of the Secretary of the Navy, Chicago departed for another deployment on 6 November 1971.  After a weekend stop at Pearl Harbor, where the passengers were debarked, the ship stopped at Guam and Subic Bay before arriving in the Gulf of Tonkin PIRAZ station on 6 December.  Chicago celebrated the new year in Singapore, and briefly crossed the equator on 4 January for a ceremony at 105 30&prime; east.  Chicago then spent a week in Subic Bay before resuming PIRAZ station on 18 January.  Chicago launched four RIM-8H Talos-ARM anti-radar homing missiles against North Vietnamese shore-based radar stations in February and March, but no hits were registered.(Sherwood, John Darrell Nixons Trident: Naval Power in Southeast Asia, 1968-1972 (2009) United States Government Printing Office ISBN 978-0-945274-58-2 pp.31&36) Radar surveillance and air coordination continued, except for a few days in Subic Bay in late February, until a visit to Hong Kong in late March.  The cruiser set course for San Diego before being recalled to PIRAZ station on 3 April 1972 in response to the North Vietnamese Armys invasion of the south.The scale of U.S. air operations increased dramatically as strike and interdiction missions, designed to restrict the movement of men and supplies, were conducted throughout North Vietnam.  The cruiser monitored all aircraft flying over the gulf, directed friendly CAP, and, despite intense electronic jamming, coordinated fighter escorts during the mid-April Stratofortress raids against the North Vietnamese.  By maintaining a complete air picture, Chicago vectored damaged bombers around enemy missile sites, set up tanker rendezvous points for planes low on fuel, and directed helicopters on rescue operations.  The cruiser also directed friendly fighters against North Vietnamese aircraft. In April and May, Chicagos air intercept controllers directed Navy and Air Force aircraft on CAP missions that were credited with 14 MiGs shot down.  Among these was the second MiG downed by Navy aces Cunningham and P. Driscoll.(Sherwood, John Darrell Nixons Trident: Naval Power in Southeast Asia, 1968-1972 (2009) United States Government Printing Office ISBN 978-0-945274-58-2 p.55)Chicagos forward Talos battery downed a MiG at long-range during the mining of Hai Phong harbor on 9 May.  Chicago and USS Long Beach were given the unusual assignment of protecting Intruder and Corsair aircraft mining Phong harbor at low altitude.  To avoid exposing Phantom fighters to Vietnamese ground-based anti-aircraft defenses, these ships patrolling offshore were given a free-fire zone for Talos missiles to engage defending MiG fighters approaching the coast from Yn and Kp airfields near Hanoi.()  Chicago came under fire from North Vietnamese artillery batteries, but was able to maintain missile envelope coverage while moving out of gun range before suffering any damage.  After a month of surveillance and directing air strikes against Hai Phong harbor traffic, Chicago finally departed for San Diego on 21 June 1972.Post-VietnamArriving home on 8 July, the ship underwent a local availability before entering Long Beach Naval Shipyard on 25 August for a Complex Overhaul. During this refit, Chicago received new digital fire control systems, replacing the old analog computers, installed new missile launchers, and expanded her electronics equipment.On 15 May 1973, Chicago began carrying out six months of sea trials, tests, and training evolutions. New equipment and combat coordination procedures were also implemented, extending the cruisers operational readiness date to 14 December. Finally, after refresher training, fleet exercises, and weapons load-out, the cruiser departed for another WestPac deployment on 21 May 1974. After arrival at Subic Bay on 15 June, the ship prepared for an extended cruise with , , and . Designed to counter the Navys presence in Somalia and Aden on the Ocean, the low-key port visits were intended to demonstrate that the Indian Ocean is not a Russian lake.Departing Subic Bay on 25 June, the squadron passed through the of Molocca on 2 July and arrived at Karachi, Pakistan six days later. Underway on 13 July, Chicago and her escorts began a month long at sea period, showing the flag in the Sea and the of Aden, before arriving at Mombassa, Kenya on 9 August. A week later, in an effort to influence Russian negotiations for basing rights in the Islands, the squadron conducted a diplomatic port visit to Louis. Toward this end, Chicago embarked several Mauritian government officials on 21 August for a two-day cruise to Island. Departing on 23 August, the ships returned to Subic Bay, via Singapore, for upkeep on 11 September.Following a visit to Hong Kong in early October, the cruiser spent the next month conducting training and fleet exercises in the Philippines area until getting underway for Guam on 17 November. After a week at Harbor, the ship departed on 29 November for San Diego. Arriving home on 14 December, the ship remained in port for leave, repairs, and upkeep into March 1975. Technical inspections and equipment modifications, interspersed with a visit by a delegation of French officials, lasted until April when the ship conducted interim refresher training in the southern California operating areas.Following a series of missile tests in late May, and fleet exercises with Pacific naval units, the cruiser visited Seattle for the Fourth of July celebrations. After a visit to Vancouver the following week, Chicago returned to San Diego to begin overhaul preparations. From 9 September to 24 October, the cruiser underwent a major restricted availability as repairs were conducted to fuel tanks, boiler casings, and the main propulsion plant. Additional upkeep, tender availability, and type training continued through the new year as the cruiser prepared for another deployment. In February 1976, personnel in the Operations department underwent extensive team training in anti-air, anti-submarine, and electronic warfare in preparation for a fleet exercise in March. That operation, exercise Valiant Heritage, took place from 211 March with forces from Canada, the Kingdom, Zealand, and the United States.Following a month in port, and several service inspections, Chicago left San Diego on 13 April to deploy to the Western Pacific. Sailing with an amphibious group the cruiser conducted multi-ship exercises, both before and after Pearl Harbor, and arrived at Yokosuka on 3 May. Task group exercises with , Multiplex 2-76 from 19-25 May and Multiplex 3-76 in the South China Sea from 4-7 June, and port visits to Subic Bay and Keelung, occupied Chicago through June. After a midshipmen cruise from Yokosuka to the Philippines in early July, the cruiser began an import period lasting until 2 August.On 4 August, the cruiser participated in Multiplex 1-7T, followed by a successful missile firing exercise off Point, Luzon on 7 August. Returning to Subic Bay for two weeks of upkeep, the cruiser sailed for Hong Kong on 22 August. Arriving three days later, after avoiding a third typhoon, the ship spent six days in that liberty port. Leaving Hong Kong on 31 August, Chicago joined rendezvous with  for a war-at-sea exercise lasting until 8 September, before returning to Subic for a lengthy upkeep period. Repainting the exterior, and interior improvements lasted until 27 September, when the cruiser got underway for home. Stopping at Guam on 1 October to refuel, and Pearl Harbor on 9 October for a dependents cruise, the ship finally returned to San Diego on 16 October.The cruiser remained in port, receiving boiler repairs and equipment upgrades, until 23 February when the ship began post-repair sea trials and crew training. Following inspections, and ordnance loadout at Beach on 3 March, Chicago began a regular schedule of training operations out of San Diego. These exercises, including helicopter pad training, simulated missile and torpedo attacks, and other similar drills, continued until 6 September, when the ship got underway for her eighth WestPac tour.Chicago arrived in Subic Bay on 30 September, after multi-ship exercises that included four missile shots while underway, to begin a series of operations with the 7th Fleet. Missile shots and convoy exercises off Mindoro, a barrier exercise off Bay, and visits to Yokosuka, Keelung, and Hong Kong lasted until late November. On 4 December, after a rendezvous with Kitty Hawk, the cruiser began operations in the Sea of Japan. Helicopter and underway replenishments were interrupted two days later, when the formation was circled by two Soviet Tu-16 Badgers, but exercises continued until 8 December. Departing the area, Chicago steamed south to Subic Bay, for sonar exercises with , arriving at Singapore on 23 December. After the holidays, the cruiser moved to Bay, Thailand on 30 December.Departing 4 January 1978, the cruiser visited Subic Bay and Hong Kong before starting a month of exercises in the Philippine Sea. Gunfire exercises, helicopter operations, unreps, and other drills, including a real man overboard rescue on 28 February, lasted until 4 March, when Chicago moored at Manila. After repairs and upkeep, the ship steamed for Guam on 16 March, arriving five days later to refuel, before arriving in Pearl Harbor on 31 March.After returning to San Diego on 7 April, the ship remained in upkeep status until 24 July 1978, when the cruiser moved to Long Beach to start a regular overhaul. Repairs at the Long Beach Naval Shipyard lasted until 18 October, when the cruiser conducted two days of sea trials. Finishing work continued until 25 October, when Chicago departed the shipyard. After two days of operations with  and , the cruiser moved back to San Diego to begin a regular schedule of training exercises. These short cruises, concentrating on gunnery and underway training, lasted through February 1979. A number of propulsion and electronic service inspections were also conducted. On 5 March, during exercises off southern California, the cruiser also earned her eleventh consecutive Missile E.After a month long pre-deployment period, the cruiser departed on 30 May for the cruisers final cruise to the Western Pacific. Chicago escorted the aircraft carrier  and her battle group to Pearl Harbor, conducting exercises with , , and  along the way, before steaming on to Subic Bay on 13 June. Fleet exercises off Okinawa, and a port visit to Pusan, Korea, at the end of July, were followed by refugee surveillance in the China Sea. There, along with other 7th Fleet ships, she helped rescue Vietnamese refugees fleeing the mainland, picking up five herself.thumb|right|Chicago in the Coral Sea, October 1979Escort duties for Kitty Hawk continued through September when, on 6 October, she sailed for Australia. On 15 October, after memorial services for two cruisers lost in the Islands battles during War II,  and the earlier , the cruiser began two weeks of exercises in the Sea. After the exercise, involving seven U.S. ships and twenty Australian and New Zealand vessels, the ship visited Sydney, Australia, for a week long port visit. Returning to San Diego on 17 December, via Subic Bay and Pearl Harbor, the cruiser began preparations for inactivation.A pre-decommissioning inspection classified the cruiser as unfit for further economical naval service, due the high cost of modernization required, and on 1 March 1980, Chicago was decommissioned at San Diego. Towed to the Inactive Ship Facility at Washington, the ship was held in reserve until 8 February 1989. Stripped of equipment by 11 August, the hulk was sold for scrap to Southwest Recycling, Inc., Terminal Island, California on 9 December 1991. The anchor was saved and placed on display at Pier on 11 November 1995. (U.S.S. Chicago Anchor) Image:U.S.S. Chicago Anchor.jpg|thumb|right|U.S.S. Chicago Anchor on display at PierAwards*She was awarded the Unit Commendation for her efforts in developing the PIRAZ concept on her Western Pacific cruises in 1966 and 1967-68.*In 1972, the cruiser was awarded the Unit Commendation for Vietnam Service, the Burke Fleet Trophy, and her seventh consecutive E for excellence in missilery.References(CA-136)Chicago (CA-136)Chicago (CA-136)
560839
Multiple-unit_train_control
Multiple-unit train control, sometimes abbreviated to multiple-unit or MU, is a method of simultaneously controlling all the traction equipment in a train from a single location, whether it is a unit comprising a number of self-powered passenger cars or a set of locomotives.A set of vehicles under multiple unit control is referred to as a consist in the United States(Railway Technical Web Pages:Modern Railway Terminology railway-technical.com).Originsthumb|South Side Elevated Railroad car #1, one of the cars that Frank Sprague converted to MU operation in ChicagoMultiple-unit train control was first used in Multiple Units in the 1890s.Frank J. SpragueThe multiple unit traction control system was pioneered by Frank Sprague and first applied and tested on the Side Elevated Railroad (now part of the L) in 1897. In 1895, derived from his companys invention and production of direct current elevator control systems, Frank Sprague invented a multiple unit controller for  electric train operation. This accelerated the construction of electric traction railways and trolley systems world wide.Each car of the train has its own traction motors: by means of motor control relays in each car energized by train-line wires from the front car all of the traction motors in the train are controlled in unison.The Liverpool Overhead RailwayThe Overhead Railway, which opened in 1893, was also an early user of electric multiple-unit trains.()It is not clear, however, if these used a system of multiple-unit train control before Spragues invention; in their initial two-car formation, the rear motor coach may merely have been towed.Locomotive applicationsSpragues MU system was adopted for use by locomotives and locomotives in the 1920s, however these early control connections were entirely pneumatic. Todays modern MU control utilizes both pneumatic elements for brake control, and electric elements for throttle setting, dynamic braking and fault lights.In the early days of diesel electric MUing there were numerous different systems and while some were compatible with one and other, some were not. For example when first delivered many  F units lacked MU cables on their noses, allowing only for MUing through the rear of the locomotive. That meant that if a train need four locomotives and there were four A units and no B units that a train would require two train crews as the four A units could not be multiple unit controlled, except as two groups of two. Furthermore Baldwin Centipedes were infamous for being unable to MU with any other locomotive even other Baldwin diesels, these locomotives could only be MUed with one other locomotive of the same type. Terms used in North America are A unit and B unit where the B or slave unit does not have a control cab; slug where the B unit has traction motors powered by the mother unit via extra connections; and Cow-calf for switcher units. A Car Remote Control Locomotive has remote control but not traction equipment.Most modern locomotives are now delivered equipped for MU operation, allowing a consist (set) of locomotives to be operated from one cab. However, not all MU connections are standardized between manufacturers, thus limiting the types of locomotives that can be used together.  In North America there is a high level of standardization using the of American Railroads (AAR) system.(US Loco MU Control) In the Kingdom several different incompatible MU systems are in use (and some locomotive classes were never fitted for MU working), but more modern diesel locomotives used on British railways use the standard AAR system.  Modern locomotive MU systems can be easily spotted due to the large MU cables to the right and left of the coupler.  The connections typically consist of several air hoses for controlling the air brake system, and an electrical cable for the control of the traction equipment. The largest hose, located next to the coupler is the main air brake line or train line. Additional hoses link the air compressors on the locomotives and control the brakes on the locomotives independently of the rest of the train. There are sometimes additional hoses that control the application of sand to the rails.With power, long trains e.g. ore trains on mining lines may have locomotives at each end and at intermediate locations in the train to reduce the maximum drawbar load. The locomotives are often radio controlled from the lead locomotive by the Locotrol system. control locomotives e.g. switchers in hump yards may be controlled by a stationary operator.Passenger train applicationsModern multiple unit and multiple unit vehicles often utilise a specialised coupler that provides both mechanical, electrical and pneumatic connections between vehicles. These couplers permit trains to be connected and disconnected automatically without the need for human intervention on the ground.There are a few designs of fully automatic couplers in use worldwide, including the coupler, various knuckle hybrids (such as the Tightlock, used in the UK), the Wedgelock coupling, Dellner couplings (similar to Scharfenberg couplers in appearance), and the BSI coupling.Multiple control technology is also used in trains operating with a standard locomotive at one end only. Control signals are either received from the cab as normal, or from a cab car at the other end that is connected to the locomotive by cables through the intermediate cars.See also* brake (rail)* Car Remote Control Locomotive* locomotive* working* Push-pull (mode of operation for locomotive-hauled trains)* Railway brakesReferencesExternal links*Frank Sprague*The Evolution of the Diesel Locomotive in the United Statesde:Mehrfachtraktionde tren de unidades mltiples(chemin de fer)ko:kk:nl:Treinschakelingja:wielokrotne sv:Multipelkrning
562331
Lou_Blonger
 children  noneLou Blonger (May 13, 1849  April 20, 1924), born Louis Herbert Belonger, was a Wild West saloonkeeper, gambling-house owner, and mine speculator, but is best known as the kingpin of an extensive ring of tricksters that operated for more than 25 years in Colorado. His Bunco Ring was brought to justice in a famous trial in 1923.Blongers gang set up rooms resembling stock exchanges and betting parlors that were used by several teams to run big cons. The goal of the con was to convince tourists to put up large sums of cash in order to secure delivery of stock profits or winning bets. The depiction of the Wire Con seen in the movie Sting is a fairly accurate representation of a typical big con.Blonger had longstanding ties to numerous Denver politicians and law enforcement officials, including the mayor and the chief of police. In 1922, however, District Attorney S. Van Cise bypassed the Denver police and used his own force, funded by donations solicited in secret from local citizens, to arrest 33 con men, including Blonger, and bring the ring to justice. Childhood Lou Blonger was born in Swanton, Vermont, on May 13, 1849, the eighth of 13 children. His father, Simon Peter Belonger, was a stonemason born in Canada of French ancestry. His mother, Judith Kennedy, was raised in an orphanage in Nenagh, Tipperary, Ireland.(Swinbank Family Bible, in possession of Joseph Swinbank. (Mary Swinbank was Lou Blongers sister.)) The Belonger family migrated from Vermont to the lead mining village of Wisconsin, when Lou was five years old. After his mother died in 1859, Lou lived with his older sister and her husband for a few years. Around this time Blonger began using a shortened version of the family name (omitting the first e), as most of his brothers did.Blonger followed brothers Mike and Joe into the Army in 1864. Although he was still three days shy of his 15th birthday, Blonger was mustered in as a fifer at Illinois, and served a few weeks with Company B of the 142nd Illinois Regiment before suffering a leg injury at Station, Tennessee. He spent the remainder of his 100-day enlistment recovering at the Marine Hospital in Chicago.(Blonger pension file.)At the conclusion of the Civil War, Blonger reunited with his brother Sam, ten years his elder, who had spent the war years prospecting in Colorado and driving freight over the mountains in California and Nevada.() Lou was living in Carroll, Illinois, with a friend named William Livingston when Sam returned. While Sam courted and eventually married Livingstons sister Ella, Lou attended high school.() Later Sam sent his brother to study at Bryant & Stratton Business College in Chicago.( In the Western boomtowns In 1870 Sam and Lou Blonger, along with many of the Livingstons, left the Midwest for the western frontier. Following the path of the newly completed Transcontinental Railroad, they briefly ran a hotel and saloon in Oak, Iowa, before moving on to Lake City, Utah, and the nearby mining towns of Stockton and Dry Canyon. In a pattern that repeated itself at many of their stops, Lou owned and operated saloons with assorted entertainments while Sam developed mining claims in the surrounding mountains, served occasionally as a peace officer and, in his spare time, raced horses. Similar stops followed in City, Nevada; Nevada; Reef, Utah; and again in Salt Lake City.(Moving to Colorado in 1879, Lou Blonger took a shot at running a vaudeville theater in Georgetown,() while Sam made an unsuccessful bid to become the first mayor of nearby Leadville.( p. 213.) There the Blongers were joined by two other brothers: Simon, the eldest, who worked as superintendent at the Robert E. Lee Mine, and Marvin, the youngest, also a miner.( Available at ancestry.com.) Soon afterward, Sam and Lou were on the move again, this time to the burgeoning railroad town of New Albuquerque, New Mexico (soon to merge with Albuquerque). Albuquerque days Sam Blonger was appointed marshal of New Albuquerque in February 1882 and quickly deputized his brother.() Newspaper accounts indicate that while the brothers engaged in a few shootouts and jailed their share of vagrants, they also took plenty of time off to pursue other interests: prospecting, racing, and even running a brothel.(See series of newspaper clippings at BlongerBros.com.) For a couple of months the Blongers were toasted as the solution to the towns law enforcement problem (a previous marshal, Milt Yarberry, had murdered two citizens). When Sam and Lou were joined briefly by brother Joe, a prospector in the nearby Cerrillos Hills, a local newspaper wrote: The three brothers are all of them young, nervy and square western men and it would be a good thing for the town if they were all on the police force.()In April 1882, Lou Blonger served as acting town marshal while Sam traveled to Denver to negotiate the sale of a mine.()Lous stint roughly coincided with the escape to Mexico by the Vendetta Posse, composed of Earp, Holliday, and five others. Hoping to make their way to legal sanctuary in Colorado, the men took temporary refuge in New Albuquerque after killing several men to avenge the murder of Wyatts brother Morgan. According to one theory, Lou or Sam (or both) may have been called upon to provide shelter for the posse members during their stay.()Sam Blongers appointment as marshal of New Albuquerque lasted just five months. He was relieved of his duties while on a trip to Kansas City, and soon afterward, Lou and Sam split up for the only extended period of their adult lives.() Lou spent the next few years in the Mexico towns of Silver City, Deming, and Kingston, living at least part of the time with Thurmond, a well-known gambler, and his wife, Carlotta Thompkins (better known as Deno). Blonger also got married, probably in 1884, to Emma Loring.(In 1888, a woman calling herself Kitty Blonger shot and killed a man who tried to break into her room in a Springs, Arizona, brothel. Lou Blonger soon arrived to arrange her defense, and eventually she was acquitted.() Kitty had previously worked in Albuquerque, where she had a soiled reputation.() She may have been one of Blongers madams, but the exact nature of their relationship has not been determined. The Denver underworld Soon after the Kitty Blonger trial, Lou Blonger relocated permanently to Denver, rejoining his brother Sam. The pair operated several saloons and gambling houses in the area of Larimer Street and Seventeenth Street over the next few years, including the magnificent Elite Saloon at 1628 Stout Street, with its mahogany fixtures and frescoed ceiling.() In addition to hosting the typical array of poker and faro tables, the Blongers operation also branched out into the policy racket (also known as the game), an illegal lottery that paid out on a daily basis. The Blongers aggressively targeted tourists, who were lured to the saloon by a network of henchmen called steerers and then cheated out of their money. The sophistication of the swindles developed over time. In the early years they were as simple as marked cards or dice; later, elaborate big cons became the Blonger trademark.Denver had a reputation as a wide-open town in the 1890s. Gambling shops bought protection from the police force and the mayors office and operated openly except when occasional crackdowns were required for show. In addition to making direct payments to authorities, Sam and Lou Blonger also engaged in election fraud for candidates from both parties, from Denver mayor Londoner in 1890() to Congressman W. Bonynge in 1902.() Testimony in the latter case indicated that Blongers network of steerers had already been in place for several years.The Blongers policy shop had plenty of competition, including saloon man Chase and Smith, the famous Western con man. Smith was an uneasy Blonger ally for a while, but the frequent quarrels between steerers from the rival groups suggested a confrontation was brewing. In 1895 Smith went on a drunken rampage through several Larimer Street establishments including the Blongers saloon, where police removed him; one account alleged that Lou Blonger was crouched behind the cigar counter, ready to unload a shotgun.()(Collier, p. 208.) In the wake of the rampage, Smith and his brother Bascomb were charged with the attempted murder of a saloon manager. Realizing he had lost control of the situation, Soapy left for the mining boomtown of Alaska, in 1897, ceding control of Denvers underworld to Lou Blonger.(Collier, p. 209-10.) The Forest Queen In 1892 Sam and Lou Blonger found the gold mine they had been looking for in the mountains above Creek, Colorado, and named it the Forest Queen ().(Forest Queen location certificate, filed 1892-04-18.) Sam and Lou had several partners in the mine at different stages of its development, some of whom were extraordinarily well-placed. Two of them, Neil Dennison and W. Steele, served as attorney in Denver during the 1890s. Dennison was the son of a former governor of Ohio and Steele later became justice of the Supreme Court.(Jackson.) A third partner of note was W. McCulloch, manufacturer of River Whiskey, who supposedly traded 20 barrels of his product for a piece of Lou Blongers stake.()Once developed, the Forest Queen provided its owners with periods of steady income, if not the fortune that came out of the nearby Independence Mine.( Lou and Sam Blonger claimed, bought, traded, and sold several mines in their lives, but both held onto the Forest Queen to the end, leaving their interest to their wives.The Blongers were keen observers in the frequent labor struggles between miners and mine owners. Conditions reached a head in 1894 during the Battle of Bull Hill, when striking miners took up arms in the hills near the Forest Queen. Lou Blonger and several allies from Denver were frequent visitors to the area during the months-long dispute and its aftermath, calling themselves detectives.()Million-Dollar Bunco RingAs his gang branched out into bigger and more complicated big cons that attracted a more well-to-do clientele, Lou Blonger found he no longer needed his saloon and the relatively small take it provided from card and dice games. Eventually he moved into headquarters in the American National Bank building on Seventeenth Street and styled himself as a mining magnate. A crucial moment in the development of the bunco gang was Blongers partnership in 1904 with Adolph W. Duff, who had operated his own gang of confidence men in Colorado Springs before being run out of town by the police.(Van Cise, p. 10.) With Duff handling the details of coordinating gang members and scheduling locations for the scams, Blonger was free to conduct the business of schmoozing public officials and bribing law enforcement, all while cultivating the image of a model citizen. In the summertime he made the rounds of friendly politicians and policemen, paying off favors with boxes of cherries from his orchard in suburban Lakewood.(Van Cise, p. 11.)For the next 18 years Blonger and his gang operated virtually unmolested by local law enforcement. Gang members were specifically instructed not to solicit victims from Colorado, concentrating instead on out-of-state tourists who would find it difficult to help prosecute a criminal case. Only twice during this period did Blonger come close to arrest. The first was in 1910, when he escaped prosecution in connection with the Gang of Bluffs, Iowa.(Van Cise, p. 9.) The second occurred in 1915, when Blonger was implicated in a swindling scheme uncovered by carpenters remodeling his office building.()Sam Blongers participation in his brothers gang waned as bigger and more sophisticated cons were developed, and he died in 1914.() Meanwhile, Lou Blonger expanded the gangs home base from Denver, where it operated only during the warmest months, southward to Miami and Cuba. During the winter Blonger relaxed at Springs, Arkansas, where he reportedly compared notes with his old friend Pinkerton, president of the Detective Agency.(Van Cise, p. 96-97. Van Cise refers to Pinkerton as simply the great detective.) Investigation and Arrest During the 1920 primary election for Denver attorney, Blonger approached Republican Party candidate S. Van Cise and offered assistance in the way of campaign contributions and votes. To Blongers surprise, Van Cise turned down his offer, and after his election, Van Cise called Blonger into his office to warn him that one of his goals would be the eradication of Blongers gang of con men.(Van Cise, p. 13-19.) Recognizing that the police force was in Blongers pocket, Van Cise undertook a private investigation underwritten by donations from 31 wealthy benefactors.(Van Cise, p. 59-66.) Over the course of a year, his detectives gathered information and watched the habits and movements of the gang members. Van Cise monitored Blongers trash, spied on him from a building across the street, and had a Dictaphone installed surreptitiously inside his office (an action that did not require a warrant at the time).  He also allowed a crooked police detective to work inside the district attorneys office, feeding him misleading information to confuse the gang.(Van Cise, p. 111-16, 91-95.)In the summer of 1923, Van Cise made it well known he was going on a long fishing vacation to the Mountains, signaling to the gang members that the heat was off their operation.(Van Cise, p. 164-65.) While the con men plied their trade openly on the streets of Denver, Van Cise and his assistants plotted a huge roundup that required a willing victim to help catch the gang in the act. With incredible good fortune, Frank Norfleet showed up in Denver at precisely this moment. Norfleet was a Texas rancher who had previously been scammed twice by other gangs and was on a nationwide manhunt to bring the men who swindled him to justice. Entering the lobby of the Brown Palace Hotel, Norfleet was hooked by unwitting gang members who saw him as an easy mark, and the plan was set in motion.(Van Cise, p. 182-94.)(Norfleet, p. 260-323.)The posse assembled early on the morning of August 24, 1923: eighteen Colorado Rangers to arrest the gang members and several private citizens to chauffeur them to a holding cell in the basement of the First Universalist Church. Blonger and Duff were among the first to be arrested; eventually 33 gang members were hauled in before news of the raid reached the street, allowing the remainder of the gang to flee.(Van Cise, p. 173-209.)Although newspapers across the country carried the particulars of the unusual sting, the Post at first declined to print Blongers name. Co-publisher Tammen was a close friend of Blongers, but his partner Fred Bonfils ordered the papers editors to end the embargo and support Van Cise and the prosecution of the Bunco Ring.(Van Cise, p. 212-13.) The nickname the papers hung on the gang didnt tell half the story. The con mens total haul was impossible to determine, but in any case was well in excess of a million dollars per year. Trial Blonger had a host of legal talent at his disposal, not to mention a sympathetic judge or two. His personal lawyer, Thomas Ward, Jr., was a former U.S. district attorney who had argued cases before the U.S. Supreme Court. While the rest of the gang was represented by lesser names, they all benefited from the roadblocks laid down by the lead lawyers in the conspiracy case. The defense successfully fought to have Van Cise removed from the prosecution of the case on a technicality, but Van Cise considered this a tactical error, since it allowed him to spend more time devising the prosecutions strategy and less time in court. The case proceeded with two prosecutors, Harrison White, former justice of the Supreme Court, and Harry C. Riddle, a former district court judge.(Van Cise, p. 238-41.) The trial began on February 5, 1923. Day after day the prosecution called a series of victims, bilked out of their life savings, to the stand. The star witness, however, was Len Reamey, one of the gangs bookmakers, fourth in the hierarchy behind Blonger, Duff, and bookmaker Jackie French. Reamey provided the inside story of how the gang defrauded hundreds of victims and divided the spoils among themselves. When the prosecution rested after seven weeks of testimony, the defense attorneys surprised everyone by resting their case without presenting a witness, and further by offering to forgo their closing arguments if the prosecution did the same. Van Cise directed the special prosecutors to call their bluff, and so the case went immediately to the jury without any closing arguments.(Van Cise, p. 321-39.)During the trial rumors were rampant that the jury had been fixed. Blongers men approached at least four of the jurors, but struck out when they attempted to bribe Herman M. Okuly, a mechanic. Okuly played along with the offer, but immediately reported the deal to his boss, who informed Van Cise. After four days of deliberations, with three jurors still favoring acquittal, Okuly played his ace, telling the holdouts the difference between me and you is that I got my five hundred dollars, but turned it over to the Judge, and youve still got yours.(Van Cise, p. 323-26, 342.) The three relented, and the jury returned a verdict of guilty for the 20 defendants who remained on trial.(Van Cise, p. 342-44.) Incarceration and death Blongers health, poor even before his arrest, grew increasingly worse during the long trial. In the days after his conviction, while he was still battling to stay out of prison, Blonger received a final blow when the Post revealed that he had led a double life for 20 years, living with his wife, Nola, on weekends and a mistress, Iola Readon, during the week.() Rocked by the revelation, he reconciled with his wife, transferring his property to her in anticipation of his incarceration.() As one legal appeal after another failed, Blonger made a final plea to Van Cise to remain free, a plea the district attorney forcefully rejected:Blonger was driven in a special car to the State Penitentiary on October 18, 1923,() and died there on April 20, 1924, succumbing to organ failure.() His funeral, held at Denvers Cathedral of the Immaculate Conception, was attended by hundreds of people from all walks of life.() Despite his wishes to be buried at Mount Olivet Cemetery, his wife directed that he be interred at Fairmount Cemetery instead.()FamilyLou Blonger married twice. In 1882 or 1884 in Francisco, he married Emma Loring, about whom nothing is known. Blonger received an uncontested divorce in 1889 on the grounds of desertion and quickly married 30-year-old Cora Nola Lyons (ne Morehouse), who was said in younger days to have been a successful variety actress.(Van Cise, p. 6.) Blonger had no children. Upon Nolas death the remainder of Blongers estate, including his interest in the Forest Queen Mine, passed to her fourth husband, William J. MacAuley.(Notes References *Lou Blongers military pension file, filed 1887-11-05.** Available at the Cripple Creek District Museum.****External links* BlongerBros.com*                   
563864
List_of_halls_and_walks_of_fame
This is a list of halls and walks of fame which identifies organizations or places that honor persons, groups, and/or entities in our societies endeavors. Halls of fame and walks of fame may be national, state, local, or private representation and/or ownership.Halls of fameAviation and space*Aviation Hall of Fame*Hall of Fame* Aviation Hall of Fame* Aviation Hall of Fame*Space Hall of Fame*Aviation Hall of Fame* Aviation Hall of Fame* Aviation Hall of Fame*Aviation Hall of Honor*Hall of Fame and Museum of New Jersey*Aviation Hall of Fame*Space Walk of Fame* Aviation Hall of FameMusic and bands*Bluegrass Music Hall of Fame*Jazz Hall of Fame*Music Hall of Fame* Classical Music Hall of Fame and Museum* Apollo Theatre Hall of Fame (New York City)* Hall of Fame* Music Hall of Fame* Music Hall of Fame* Down Beat Jazz Hall of Fame* Music Hall of Fame* Grammy Hall of Fame (for recordings)* Lifetime Achievement Award (for people)* Parade Hall of Fame* Bluegrass Music Hall of Fame* Musicians Hall of Fame* Band Association Hall of Fame of Distinguished Band Conductors* Songwriters Foundation* Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* and Roll Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Dakota Rock and Roll Hall of Fame* Music Hall of Fame* Group Hall of FameShow business and theater* Theatre Hall of Fame* AVN Hall of Fame (Adult Video News)* Filmmakers Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Hall of FameSportsAll-sports halls of fame*All-sports halls of fameCollege sports:See also: Hall of Champions, State All-Sports Museum, and ACC Hall of Champions*College sports halls of fame in the United StatesAmerican football*Football Hall of Fame*Bay Packers Hall of Fame*Football Hall of FameAssociation football (soccer)*Football (soccer) Hall of Fame*Football Hall of Fame*Streets Hall of Fame* Soccer Hall of Fame (U.S.)*City F.C. Hall of Fame*Football Hall of Fame*Football Museum Hall of FameAustralian rules football*Football Hall of Fame* Australian Football Hall of Fame* Football Hall of Fame* Australian Football Hall of FameBaseball and softball*Baseball Hall of Fame* Baseball Hall of Fame*American Baseball Hall of Fame (U.S.)* Baseball Hall of Fame* Mexican Baseball Hall of Fame* Baseball Hall of Fame and Museum (U.S.)* College Baseball Hall of Fame (U.S.)*Atlanta Braves Museum and Hall of Fame* Red Sox Hall of Fame*Reds Hall of Fame* Reds Hall of Fame and Museum*City Royals Hall of Fame*York Mets Hall of Fame*New York Yankees Monument Park*Baseball Wall of Fame* Louis Cardinals Hall of Fame Museum*Mariners Hall of Fame* Softball Hall of Fame (U.S.)Basketball*Hall of Fame* Collegiate Basketball Hall of Fame* Basketball Hall of Fame* Lakers Hall of Fame* Basketball Hall of FameHorse racing*Racing Hall of Fame* Horseracing Hall of Fame* Horse Racing Hall of Fame* Horse Racing Hall of Fame* Dominion Hall of Fame* Zealand Racing Hall of Fame* Zealand Trotting Hall of Fame* United States National Museum of Racing and Hall of Fame*West Australian Racing Industry Hall Of FameIce hockey*Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* States Hockey Hall of Fame* Hockey Hall of FameMotorsports*Motorsport Hall of Fame* Motor Speedway Hall of Fame Museum* Motorsports Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame of America* Hall of Fame* Dirt Late Model Hall of Fame* Midget Auto Racing Hall of Fame* National Sprint Car Hall of Fame* Motorsports Hall of Fame* Hall of FameProfessional wrestling* Hall of Fame* Wrestling Legends Hall of Heroes* Professional Wrestling Hall of Fame* Louis Wrestling Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Observer Newsletter Hall of Fame* Hall of FameRugby league*League Hall of Fame*Rugby League Hall of Fame (est. 1988)*Widnes Vikings Hall of Fame (est. 1992)*Warriors Hall of Fame (est. 1998)*Rugby League Hall of Fame (est. 2002)Rugby union*Hall of Fame (International Rugby Board) (Rugby union)* Rugby Hall of Fame (Rugby union)Other sports*Cup Hall of Fame* Cricket Hall of Fame* Congress of America Hall of Fame* Curling Hall of Fame* Football Hall of Fame* Lacrosse Hall of Fame* Ski Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Cricket Hall of Fame* Bowling Hall of Fame* Boxing Hall of Fame* Gymnastics Hall of Fame* Jewish Sports Hall of Fame* Swimming Hall of Fame* Tennis Hall of Fame* Museum and National Hall of Fame* Boxing Hall of Fame* Bike Hall of Fame* Distance Running Hall of Fame* Italian American Sports Hall of Fame* Lacrosse League Hall of Fame (Indoor Lacrosse)* Wrestling Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Field Hockey Hall of Fame* States Bicycling Hall of Fame*States Bowling Congress Hall of Fame* Figure Skating Hall of Fame* United States National Ski Hall of Fame and Museum* Hall of Fame*Golf Hall of Fame* Figure Skating Hall of Fame* Golf Hall of Fame* Karate Union Hall of Fame*Tae Kwon Do Federation Hall of FameOther halls of fame*Allen Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* National Business Hall of Fame* Quarter Horse Hall of Fame* Stockmans Hall of Fame* Australian Television Logie Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Social Work Hall of Distinction* Business Hall of Fame* Cartoonist Hall of Fame* Medical Hall of Fame* News Hall of Fame* Science and Engineering Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Electronics Hall of Fame*Culinary Hall of Fame official website* of Information Act Inquiry Hall of Fame*of Fame for Great Americans*Hall of Fame* Space Hall of Fame*Jewish-American Hall of Fame official website* The Gathering Hall of Fame* Intelligence Hall of Fame* Agricultural Center and Hall of Fame* Cowboy Hall of Fame* Inventors Hall of Fame* Mining Hall of Fame* Museum of Dance and Hall of Fame* Radio Hall of Fame* Toy Hall of Fame* Womens Hall of Fame* Jersey Hall of Fame* Dakota Cowboy Hall of Fame* Sports Hall of Fame* Hall of Fame* Fiction Museum and Hall of Fame* Cowboy Hall of Fame* Industry Hall of Fame* Sports Hall of Fame and Museum* temple* Monument Hall of HeroesWalls of fame*Sporting Wall of Fame (Netherlands)*Wall of Fame (U.K.)*Wall of Fame (Sweden)*Rugby Museum Wall of Fame*Wall of FameUnited States*Baseball Wall of Fame*Brewers Walk of Fame*Buffalo Bills Wall of FameWalks of fame*Walk of Honor (Lancaster, California, U.S.)* Walk of Stars* Australian of the Year Walk in Canberra* Walk of Stars in Birmingham, England* Walk of Fame in Toronto* Dog Walk of Fame in London* Gennett Walk of Fame in Richmond, Indiana* Walk of Fame* The Kansas City Sports Walk of Stars in Allis Plaza* Kazan Alley of Tatar Stars in Tatarstan, Russia(The Names of Munira Bulatova and Salavat Fatkhutdinov Light up on the Alley of Stars in Kazan ())* Vegas Walk of Fame* Beach Motorsports Walk of Fame* Walk of Fame in Lansing, Michigan* Brewers Walk of Fame* Walk of Fame in Minneapolis* Munich Olympic Walk Of Stars in Munich* City Walk of Fame in Nashville* Springs Walk of Stars* Ste Marie Walk of Fame in Sault Ste. Marie, Ontario* Louis Walk of Fame* Space Walk of Fame* of Game in San Francisco* Poker Tour Walk of FameAvenue of Stars*of Stars, Hong Kong*of Stars, LondonSee also*Of Fame Records, a record labelReferencesExternal links*American High School Hall of Fame Listingver hall of fame och walk of fame
565912
Laurie_Ferguson
 footnotes Laurie Donald Thomas Ferguson (born 7 July 1952), Australian politician, has been an Labor Party member of the House of Representatives since March 1990, representing Reid until 2010 and Werriwa thereafter, both in South Wales. He was born in Sydney, South Wales, and grew up in the Sydney suburb of Guildford. He was the son of Ferguson, who was Deputy Premier of South Wales 1976-84. He is the brother of Ferguson, also a federal MP, and both attended at Patricks College, Strathfield.  His younger brother Ferguson is the NSW Secretary of the Forestry Mining and Energy Union (Construction and General Division). He is married to Maureen Walsh, a former councillor at Parramatta City Council in the Woodville Ward.()Ferguson was educated at University and was a Research Officer with the Miscellaneous Workers Union before entering politics. He was the member for Granville in the South Wales Legislative Assembly 1984-90.()In the federal Parliament, Ferguson was elected to the Opposition Shadow Ministry in March 1996 and was Shadow Minister for Immigration in 2004-05. His handling of the debate around Georgious private members bill on asylum seekers was severely criticised, and he was shifted to become Shadow Minister for Consumer Affairs; Population Health and Health Regulation in June 2005. Upon the election of the Labor Government in 2007, Ferguson became Parliamentary Secretary for Multicultural Affairs and Settlement Services.Ferguson is a member of the Board of Advisors of the Panel Foundation-Australasia.Ferguson was preselected to contest the south-western Sydney seat of Werriwa at the 2010 federal election after his existing seat of Reid was merged with neighbouring Lowe. Lowe MP John Murphy contested the redistributed Reid.() He was not re-appointed to the executive of the Gillard Ministry after the election.ReferencesExternal links**The Global Panel Foundation
566591
1967_in_aviation
This is a list of aviation-related events from 1967: Events * The Canadian Centennaires aerobatic team is formed and performs all year to celebrate the centennial year.* Boeing opens its biggest factory (largest building by volume), the Everett Factory, in Washington.January* January 1 - The United States conducts a 48-hour standdown of air operations over Vietnam for the Year holiday.(Nichols, CDR John B., and Barret Tillman, On Yankee Station: The Naval Air War Over Vietnam, Annapolis, Maryland: United States Naval Institute, 1987, ISBN 978-0-87021-559-9, p. 155.)* January 2 - In the biggest air battle to date in the War, seven Vietnamese MiG-21s are destroyed by U.S. Air Force F-4C Phantom II fighters of the Tactical Fighter Wing in Bolo.* January 2 - The contracts for the development of the SST transport and its engines are awarded.February* February 12  Pershing begins against Cong and Vietnamese Army units in Bin Dinh and Qung Ngi provinces in South Vietnam; it will last until January 1968.(Chinnery, Philip D., Vietnam: The Helicopter War, Annapolis, Maryland: Naval Institute Press, 1991, ISBN 978-1-55750-875-1, pp. 94.) The U.S. Armys Cavalry Division (Airmobile) takes part alongside other U.S. Army, South Vietnamese Army, and South Korean Army units.* February 13  President B. Johnson orders a six-day halt of American bombing raids over Vietnam during the visit of Soviet Premier Kosygin to London. (* February 21  Aircraft completes the 2,000th F-4 Phantom II.(Angelucci, Enzo, The American Fighter: The Definitive Guide to American Fighter Aircraft From 1917 to the Present, New York: Orion Books, 1987, p. 314.)* February 22  845 troops of the Armys Airborne Brigade take part in Junction City, the only paratrooper assault of the War* February 26  Navy Intruders of Attack Squadron 35 (VA-35) drop mines in the mouth of the Ci and Gianh rivers. The aerial mining of five North Vietnamese waterways will be completed by mid-April.(March* The Walleye television-guided bomb is used in combat for the first time when U.S. Navy aircraft in Vietnam employ it in an attack on enemy barracks at Lon.(* March 10 - American aircraft attack the steel and iron works at Nguyn, North Vietnam, for the first time.(April* April 7-22 - The U.S. Armys Cavalry Division (Airmobile) conducts Lejeune, a helicopter and ground assault against Cong forces in Ngai Province, South Vietnam.(Chinnery, Philip D., Vietnam: The Helicopter War, Annapolis, Maryland: Naval Institute Press, 1991, ISBN 978-1-55750-875-1, pp. 77-78.)* April 10 - Rubber Company acquires a controlling interest in Lear Jet Industries.* April 18 - Aeroflot and Air Lines jointly inaugurate a Moscow-Tokyo service.* April 20 - American aircraft attack powerplants in Haiphong, North Vietnam, for the first time.(* April 27 - U.S. Navy aircraft strike Kep airfield in Cambodia and U.S. Air Force aircraft attack Lc airfield in southern Vietnam.(* April 28 - The Aircraft Company and Aircraft Corporation merge to form the Corporation.(Angelucci, Enzo, The American Fighter: The Definitive Guide to American Fighter Aircraft From 1917 to the Present, New York: Orion Books, 1987, p. 182.)May* U.S. Navy Alpha strikes against North Vietnam become routine.(* May 18 - NASA announces crew members for the 7 space mission (first manned Apollo flight): M. Schirra, Jr., F. Eisele, and Walter Cunningham.* May 20 - American aircraft strike military targets in downtown Hanoi.(* May 23 - President B. Johnsons administration prohibits any American air attacks within a 10-mile (16-km) radius of Hanoi.(Nichols, CDR John B., and Barret Tillman, On Yankee Station: The Naval Air War Over Vietnam, Annapolis, Maryland: United States Naval Institute, 1987, ISBN 978-0-87021-559-9, p. 156.)* May 31 - A U.S. Air Force Stratotanker makes an emergency refuelling of six U.S. Navy jets.June* MiG fighters in Vietnam withdraw to bases in the Republic of China.(* June 3  Perpignan Air Disaster: Air Ferry DC-4 G-APYK on a charter flight from Airport to Perpignan crashes into Mount Canigou, France, killing all 88 passengers and crew.* June 4  Air Disaster: British Midland flight G-ALHG crashes in Hopes Carr, Stockport, killing 72 passengers and crew.* June 5 - Boeing delivers its 1,000th jet airliner, a 707-120B for Airlines* June 5-10  The War is fought between Israel and her Arab neighbours Egypt, Jordan, and Syria. In a pre-emptive strike, the Air Force destroys half of the Air Force on the first night. By the end of the six days, 452 Arab aircraft had been destroyed for a loss of 46 Israeli aircraft.* June 8  In the USS Liberty Incident, Air Force aircraft join Navy boats in attacking the U.S. Navy research ship  in the Sea north of the Peninsula.* June 17  The Wars heaviest air attacks in nine months are American strikes targeting railroads near Hanoi.(* June 23  Airlines Flight 40 crashes due to a non-return valve failure, killing all 34 passengers and crew.July* July 29 - On Station in the of Tonkin off North Vietnam, a flight deck fire aboard the aircraft carrier  kills 134 men, injures 161, destroys 21 aircraft, and knocks the ship out of action until April 1968.August* President B. Johnsons administration restricts all American bombing of targets in cental Hanoi for two months, effective to October.(* August 7 - Argentinas and Iberia jointly inaugurate the worlds longest non-stop air route, between Aires and Madrid.* August 9 &ndash; The worlds first radar-equipped antsubmarine helicopter enters service, a Navy Air Arm Westland Wessex HAS.3 with No. 814 Squadron.(Sturtivant, Ray, British Naval Aviation: The Fleet Air Arm, 1917-1990, Annapolis, Maryland: Naval Institute Press, 1990, ISBN 0-87021-026-2, p. 216.)* August 11 - Thunderchiefs of the Tactical Fighter Wing USAF cut the Paul Doumer Bridge in Hanoi, North Vietnam, using 100 tons (90,720 kg) of bombs.* August 19 - U.S. Marine Corps Captain W. Pless, piloting a UH-1E helicopter near Ngai, South Vietnam, drives Cong forces away from Americans stranded on a beach and then lands under heavy fire to rescue them. He will receive the of Honor for his actions, and his crew will receive the Cross.(Chinnery, Philip D., Vietnam: The Helicopter War, Annapolis, Maryland: Naval Institute Press, 1991, ISBN 978-1-55750-875-1, pp. 84-85.)* August 30 - American aircraft bomb strike North Vietnamese road, railroad, and canal traffic in an attempt to isolate Haiphong.(* August 30 &ndash; The Navy acquires the second aviation ship and first true aircraft carrier in its history when the United States loans the aircraft carrier  to Spain under the Defense Assistance Program; Spain will purchase the ship outright in 1973. Renamed Ddalo (R01), she will serve in the Spanish Navy until 1989.(Gardiner, Robert, Conways All the Worlds Fighting Ships 1947-1982, Part One: The Western Powers, Annapolis, Maryland: Naval Institute Press, 1983, ISBN 0-87021-418-9, p. 111.)September* September 1 - The U.S. Navys first dedicated search-and-rescue squadron, Helicopter Combat Support Squadron 7 (HC-7), is commissioned at Atsugi, Japan; it operates UH-2 Seasprite helicopters. Previously, all Navy search-and-rescue had been performed by helicopter antisubmarine squadrons. HC-7 will make its first rescue on October 3 in Haiphong Harbor, Vietnam.(Chinnery, Philip D., Vietnam: The Helicopter War, Annapolis, Maryland: Naval Institute Press, 1991, ISBN 978-1-55750-875-1, p. 90.)* September 11 - U.S. Navy aircraft strike the port facilities at Ph, North Vietnam, for the first time.(* September 22  American Aviation and the Corporation merge to form the American Rockwell Corporation.(Angelucci, Enzo, The American Fighter: The Definitive Guide to American Fighter Aircraft From 1917 to the Present, New York: Orion Books, 1987, p. 328.)October* October 3 - J. Knight sets a new airspeed record in a American X-15, of Mach 6.72 (4,543 mph, 7,297 km/h). This is the fastest flight that the X-15 will make.* October 8 - American aircraft strike Cat Bi airfield near Haiphong in North Vietnam for the first time.(* October 8 - The first gunship designed as such to see combat, the U.S. Armys AH-1G Cobra, flies its first combat mission when two AH-1Gs operating over South Vietnam escort U.S. Army transport helicopters, then support South Vietnamese troops by destroying four enemy fortifications and sinking 14 sampans.(Chinnery, Philip D., Vietnam: The Helicopter War, Annapolis, Maryland: Naval Institute Press, 1991, ISBN 978-1-55750-875-1, pp. p.86.)* October 23 - American aircraft attack Yn airfield, North Vietnams largest airfield, for the first time.(November* November 4 - Airlines Flight 062, Aviation Caravelle EC-BDD operating a scheduled flight from Airport, Spain, to Heathrow Airport, flies into Sussex, killing all 37 on board.* November 8-9 (overnight) - Shot down by Viet Cong ground fire in an HH-3E helicopter and badly burned during a rescue mission southeast of Sanh, South Vietnam, U.S. Air Force Captain O. Young deliberately draws attention to himself, then evades the enemy on the ground for hours to lead enemy forces away from other Americans on the ground and additional helicopters comig to rescue them. He will receive the of Honor for his actions.(Chinnery, Philip D., Vietnam: The Helicopter War, Annapolis, Maryland: Naval Institute Press, 1991, ISBN 978-1-55750-875-1, pp. 85-86.)* November 16 - American aircraft attack the shipyards at Haiphong, North Vietnam, for the first time.(* November 17 - American aircraft strike Mai airfield near Hanoi for the first time.(December* December 4 &ndash; The A-7A Corsair II strike aircraft enters combat for the first time, operating from the aircraft carrier  over Vietnam.(* December 10 &ndash; Singer Redding and four members of his back-up band, Bar-Kays, are among six people killed in the crash of a 18 into Monona in Madison, Wisconsin.* December 26 &ndash; The Union commissions its first carrier, Moskva.(Fontenoy, Paul E., Aircraft Carriers, ABC-CLIO, 2006, ISBN 1-85109-573-X, p. 312.)* December 31 &ndash; The Air Forces V-bomber force begins to be dismantled, pending the deployment of the missile aboard Navy submarines to act as Britains nuclear deterrent.* December 31 &ndash; The Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) begins initial talks to develop guidelines for a re-usable spaceplane. First flights January* January 4 - Titch G-ATYOFebruary* February 8 - Viggen* February 10 - Do 31March* March 3 - Be-30April* April 7 - SA.340, prototype of the Gazelle* April 8 - Pup* April 9 - 737* April 21 - BetaMay* F28* May 12 - AM-3June* June 10  MiG-23 prototype 23-11/1* June 30  BAC One-Eleven Series 500 prototype G-ASYD(Donald, David, ed., The Complete Encyclopedia of World Aircraft, New York: Barnes & Noble Books, 1997, ISBN 978-0-7607-0592-6, p. 92.)August* August 18 - Page JetstreamOctober* October 5 - Miewa SS-2* October 26 - StikemasterNovember* November 18 - Mirage G Entered service * Mi-8July* July 18  Dynamics F-111 with the Air Forces Tactical Fighter Squadron; first variable-geometry wing aircraft to enter service, the first with radar, and the first able to score direct hits in zero visibility on the first attempt(Angelucci, Enzo, The American Fighter: The Definitive Guide to American Fighter Aircraft From 1917 to the Present, New York: Orion Books, 1987, p. 205.)August* Tu-134 with AeroflotNovember* November 17  BAC One-Eleven Series 500 with European Airways (BEA)(Referencesv letectven aronautiqueja:1967  khng nm 1967
568883
Data_Mining
#REDIRECT mining 
571674
Dragline_excavator
File:TKI Dragline.JPG|thumb|right|250px|Page 725 dragline at Turkish Coal Association - Yenikoy Open Pit Coal Mine, MilasFile:PileDriving.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Dragline excavator with driver attachment.A dragline excavator is a piece of equipment used in engineering and surface mining.In engineering the smaller types are used for road, port construction, and as pile driving rigs. The larger types are used in strip-mining operations to move overburden above  coal, and for tar-sand mining. Draglines are amongst the largest mobile equipment ever built on land, and weigh in the vicinity of 2000 metric tonnes, though specimens weighing up to 13,000 metric tonnes have also been constructed.A dragline bucket system consists of a large bucket which is suspended from a boom (a large truss-like structure) with ropes. The bucket is manoeuvred by means of a number of ropes and chains. The hoist rope, powered by large diesel or motors, supports the bucket and hoist-coupler assembly from the boom. The dragrope is used to draw the bucket assembly horizontally. By skillful manoeuvre of the hoist and the dragropes the bucket is controlled for various operations. A schematic of a large dragline bucket system is shown below.HistoryThe dragline was invented in 1904 by W. Page (as a partner of the firm Page & Schnable Contracting) for use digging the Canal. By 1912, Page realized that building draglines was more lucrative than contracting so he created the Engineering Company to build draglines. Page build its first crude, walking dragline in 1923. These used legs operated by rack and pinion on a separate frame that lifted the crane. The body was then pulled forward by chain on a roller track and then lowered again. Page developed the first diesel engines exclusively for dragline application in 1924. Page also invented the arched dragline bucket, a design still commonly used today by draglines from many other manufacturers, and in the 1960s pioneered an archless bucket design. With its walking mechanism badly behind Monighan, Page updated the mechanism to an eccentric drive in 1935. This much improved mechanism gave a proper elliptical motion and was used until 1988. Page modernized its draglines further with the 700 series in 1954. Pages largest dragline was the Model 757 delivered to the Obed Mine near Hinton, Alberta in 1983. It featured a 75-yard bucket on a 298-foot boom and an operating weight of 4,500 tons. In 1988, Harnischfeger Corporation (Mining Equipment) purchased Page Engineering Company.In 1907, Monighans Machine Works of Chicago became interested in manufacturing draglines when local contractor John W. Page placed an order for hoisting machinery to install a dragline. In 1908, Monighan changed its name to the Monighan Machine Company. In 1913, a Monighan engineer named Oscar Martinson invented the first walking mechanism for a dragline. The device, known as the Martinson Tractor, was installed on a Monighan dragline, creating the first walking dragline. This gave Monighan a significant advantage over other draglines and the company prospered. The cam mechanism was further improved in 1925 by eliminating the drag chains for the shoes and changing to a cam wheel running in an oval track. This gave the shoe a proper elliptical motion. The first dragline using the new mechanism was the 3-W available in 1926. So popular were these machines that the name Monighan became a generic term for dragline. In the early 1930s, Bucyrus-Erie began purchasing shares of Monighan stock with Monighans approval. Bucyrus purchased a controlling interest and the joint company became known as Bucyrus-Monighan until the formal merger in 1946.Bucyrus International supplied about two thirds of the steam shovels used on the Panama Canal. In 1910, they entered the dragline market with the purchase of manufacturing rights for the Heyworth-Newman dragline excavator.  Their Class 14 dragline was introduced in 1911 as the first crawler mounted dragline. In 1912 Bucyrus helped pioneer the use of electricity as a power source for large stripping shovels and draglines used in mining. After the merger with Monighan in 1946, Bucyrus began producing much larger machines using the Monighan walking mechanism such as the 800 ton 650-B which used a 15-yard bucket. Bucyrus largest dragline was Big Muskie built for the Ohio Coal Company in 1969. This machine featured a 220-yard bucket on a 310-foot boom and weighed 14,000 tons. The market for draglines began shrinking rapidly after the boom of the 1960s and 1970s. P&Hs acquisition of Page and then Bucyrus acquisition of Marion has cut the number of worldwide suppliers in half. Today these two companies are the sole remaining manufacturers of large draglines.In 1914, Corporation (established as Mining in 1884 by Pawling and Harnischfeger) introduced the worlds first gasoline engine-powered dragline.  An Italian company, Fiorentini, produced dragline excavators from 1919 licensed by Bucyrus. In 1988 Page was acquired by the Harnischfeger Corp., makers of the P&H line of shovels, draglines, and cranes. Besides Bucyrus, P&H is the only surviving company that still makes large draglines.The Marion Steam Shovel Dredge Company (established in 1880) supplied about one third of the steam shovels used for the Panama Canal. Marion continued making larger power shovels until they built The Captain in 1965 with a 180-yard bucket and a weight of 15,000 tons. In 1939, it built its first walking dragline with a simple single-crank mechanism.  The company changed its name to the Marion Power Shovel Company in 1946. Its largest dragline was the 8950 sold to Amax Coal Company in 1973. It featured a 150-cubic yard bucket on a 310-foot boom and weighed 7,300 tons. Marion was acquired by Bucyrus in 1997.Operationright|300px|thumb|Dragline excavator.In a typical cycle of excavation, the bucket is positioned above the material to be excavated. The bucket is then lowered and the dragrope is then drawn so that the bucket is dragged along the surface of the material. The bucket is then lifted by using the hoist rope. A swing operation is then performed to move the bucket to the place where the material is to be dumped. The dragrope is then released causing the bucket to tilt and empty. This is called a dump operation.The bucket can also be thrown by winding up to the jib and then releasing a clutch on the drag cable. This would then swing the bucket like a pendulum. Once the bucket had passed the vertical, the hoist cable would be released thus throwing the bucket. On smaller draglines, a skilled operator could make the bucket land about one-half the length of the jib further away than if it had just been dropped. On larger draglines, only a few extra metres may be reached.Draglines have different cutting sequences. The first is the side cast method using offset benches; this involves throwing the overburden sideways onto blasted material to make a bench. The second is a key pass.  This pass cuts a key at the toe of the new highwall and also shifts the bench further towards the low-wall.  This may also require a chop pass if the wall is blocky. A chop pass involves the bucket being dropped down onto an angled highwall to scale the surface. The next sequence is the slowest operation, the blocks pass.  However, this pass moves most of the material. It involves using the key to access to bottom of the material to lift it up to spoil or to an elevated bench level. The final cut if required is a pull back, pulling material back further to the low-wall side.Draglines in miningright|thumb|300px|Dragline at the Curragh Coal MineA large dragline system used in the pit mining industry costs approximately US$50-100 million. A typical bucket has a volume ranging from 30 to 60 cubic metres, though extremely large buckets have ranged up to 168 cubic metres.(Keith Haddoc, Extreme Mining Machines - stripping shovels and draglines, pub by MBI, Appendix 4 Tables of capacities page 127 ISBN 0-7603-0918-3) The length of the boom ranges from 45 to 100 metres. In a single cycle it can move up to 450 metric tonnes of material.Most mining draglines are not diesel-powered like most other mining equipment. Their power consumption is so great that they have a direct connection to the high-voltage grid at voltages of between 6.6 to 22 kV. A typical dragline, with a 55 cubic metre bucket, can use up to 6 megawatts during normal digging operations. Because of this, many (possibly apocryphal) stories have been told about the blackout-causing effects of mining draglines. For instance, there is a long-lived story that, back in the 1970s, if all seven draglines at Downs Mine (a very large BHP coal mine in central Queensland, Australia) turned simultaneously, they would black out all of Queensland. However even now, if they have been shutdown they are always restarted one at a time due to the immense power requirements of startup.In all but the smallest of draglines, movement is accomplished by walking using feet or pontoons, as tracks place too much pressure on the ground, and have great difficulty under the immense weight of the dragline. Maximum speed is only at most a few metres per minute(Maid Marians journey becomes a drag The Daily Gleaner (10 October 2008) accessed 01 November 2008) since the feet must be repositioned for each step.( Paradise for Sidewalk Superintendents Popular Mechanics, October 1947, p. 153-157, detailed drawings and photos of dragline operation) If travelling medium distances, (about 30100 km), a special dragline carrier can be brought in to transport the dragline. Above this distance, disassembly is generally required. But mining draglines due to their reach can work a large area from one position and do not need to constantly move along the face like smaller machines.LimitationsThe primary limitations of draglines are their boom height and boom length, which limits where the dragline can dump the waste material.  Another primary limitation is their dig depth, which is limited by the length of rope the dragline can utilize. Inherent with their construction, a dragline is most efficient excavating material below the level of their base. While a dragline can dig above itself, it does so inefficiently and is not suitable to load piled up material (as a rope shovel or wheel loader can).Despite their limitations, and their extremely high capital cost, draglines remain popular with many mines, due to their reliability, and extremely low waste removal cost.ExamplesImage:Dragline Walking Mechanism.JPG|thumb|250px|right|The Walking Mechanism on a preserved Bucyrus-Erie 1150 dragline in the UKThe coal mining dragline known as Muskie, owned by the Central Ohio Coal Company (a division of Electric Power), was the worlds largest mobile earth-moving machine, weighing nearly 13,000 metric tons and standing nearly 22 stories tall.http://little-mountain.com/bigmuskie/ It operated in Muskingum County, in the U.S. state of Ohio from 1969 to 1991, and was powered by 13,800 volts of electricity. It was scrapped in 1999.http://ohiobio.org/muskie.htmThe British firm of & Rapier produced a few large (1400-1800 ton) excavators, the largest in Europe at the time (1960s). Power was from combustion engines driving electric generators. One, named SUNDEW, was used in a quarry from 1957 to 1974. After its working life at the first site in Rutland was finished it walked 13 miles to a new life at Corby; the walk took 9 weeks.Smaller draglines were also commonly used before hydraulic excavators came into common use, the smaller draglines are now rarely used other than on river and gravel pit works. The small machines were of a mechanical drive with clutches. Firms such as Ruston and Bucyrus made models such as the RB10 which were popular for small building works and drainage work. Several of these can still be seen in the English Fens of Cambridgeshire, Lincolnshire and parts of Norfolk. Rustons are a company also associated with drainage pumping engines. Electric drive systems were only used on the larger mining machines, most modern machines use a diesel-hydraulic drive, as machines are seldom in one location long enough to justify the cost of installing a substation and supply cables.Technological AdvancesDraglines, unlike most equipment used in earth-moving, have remained relatively unchanged in design and control systems for almost 100 years. Over the last few years, some advances in dragline systems and methodologies have occurred.AutomationResearchers at CSIRO in Australia have a long-term research project(CSIRO research project) into automating draglines and have moved over 250,000 tonnes of overburden under computer control.Simulation softwareSince draglines are typically large, complicated and very expensive, training new operators can be a tricky process. In the same way that simulators have developed to train pilots, simulator software has been developed to assist new operators in learning how to control the machines.UDDUDD stands for Universal-Dig-Dump. It represents the first fundamental change to draglines for almost a century, since the invention of the miracle hitch. Instead of using two ropes (the hoist rope and the drag rope) to manipulate the bucket, a UDD machine uses three ropes, two hoist and one drag. This allows the dragline operator to have much greater selectivity in when to pick up the bucket, and in how the bucket may be dumped. UDD machines generally have higher productivity than a standard dragline, but often have greater mechanical issues. Within the mining industry, there is still much debate as to whether UDD improvements justify their costs.See also*Muskie - The Biggest dragline built*wheel excavator - alternative mining machine*International  Manufacturer of draglines*Excavator - generic class of machine of which draglines are a sub class*Power Shovel - former manufacturer of Shovel excavators*Mining  Manufacturer of draglines, power shovels and blasthole drills *shovel - type of mining machine (also called a front shovel)*Shovel - earliest type of mining excavatorReferences*K. Pathak, K. Dasgupta, A. Chattopadhyay, Determination of the working zone of a dragline bucket - A graphical approach, Doncaster, The Institution of mining engineers, 1992.*Peter Ridley, Peter Corke, Calculation of Dragline bucket pose under gravity loading, Mechanism and machine theory, Vol. 35, 2000.External links*P&H draglines*Bucyrus draglinesde:Schrfkbelbaggeres:Dragalinafr:Draglinenl:Draglinezgarniakowaru:sv:Slpgrvmaskintr:Draglineuk:
575747
Pontypool
Pontypool () is a town of approximately 36,000 people in the county borough of Torfaen, within the historic boundaries of Monmouthshire in Wales.(Cwm Lickey, Pontypool:: OS grid ST2698 at Geograph)(Cwm Lickey, Pontypool:: OS grid ST2698 at Geograph)Today Pontypool is regenerating itself and may be seen as a dormitory town for its southern neighbours Cwmbrn and Newport. It is one of the goals of the and Blaenavon Railway to extend southwards towards Pontypool from Blaenavon.LocationIt is situated on the Lwyd river in the borough of Torfaen. Although situated on the edge of the Wales coalfields, Pontypool is regarded as an industrial town with former industries including iron and steel production, mining and the growth of the railways. A rather artistic manufacturing industry which also flourished here alongside heavy industry was Japan or lacquer ware.HistoryTudor, the Lord of Abergavenny and uncle of Henry VII, on 10 October 1490, made a grant of land to one John ap David, and in the conveyance fixes one boundary as the highway leading from the church of Trevethin towards the bridge called Pont poell. It would seem therefore that the town gains its name from the bridge placed near the swampy pool which almost certainly would be greater than the forge pond that exists today.The coming of industryPontypool grew principally from the manufacture of iron. Although iron was made from 1425 in Pontymoile, now a suburb of Pontypool, Pontypool grew only when Richard Hanbury bought land locally during the period in 1588 and constructed an ironworks. The Hanburys pioneered the production of iron japan-ware with its decorated, lacquered style.The Hanbury family lived in what was to become Park, and around this the town grew. Much of the towns history comes from this family of industrial pioneers. The Wars were kind to the Hanburys, with increased prosperity due to the demand for munitions and armanents. With this increased wealth, Capel Hanbury Leigh extended Pontypool Park House between 1779 and 1840. Highly elaborate, iron gates can be seen at the entrance to the park. These were made in the 1720s and remodelled in 1835 by Thomas Deakin. They were a gift to Major John Hanbury (16641734) by the of Marlborough.Recent developmentsBetween 1996 and 1998 a new bypass completely diverted traffic away from the town centre. This added to the decline of many years and much of the old town centre was increasingly abandoned by both visitors and businesses. In 2003 plans were drawn up to regenerate the town centre and today the town has experienced a redevelopment of Crane Street, one of the principal shopping streets.Crane Street had been the location of the towns central railway station, on the Newport - Blaenavon branch line but it was closed to passengers in April 1962 and freight in 1967. Contrary to what is often remembered locally, the passenger service to Crane Street had already been closed for more than a year before the publication of the notorious Report. In financial terms the line was doing no worse than any of the other lines in the South Wales valleys but the closure of the railway line was linked to the opening of the new steelworks on the outskirts of Newport. The amount of freight traffic the new plant generated was causing severe rail congestion in the Newport area and in an era when passenger rail transport was in decline a number of local services in Monmouthshire were withdrawn by the British Transport Commission as an operational measure.Pontypool still has a passenger rail link, but as the main Cardiff - Crewe line skirts the town it is well over a mile from the town centre. Road as it was originally known, became a major and important junction, engine shed and marshalling yard, but the decline of the railways after the war, combined with the run-down of the mining industry, hit the area badly and all the local passenger and coal lines have been closed and the tracks removed.  Passenger services to Usk and Monmouth ended in 1955, and the line to Neath and Swansea (which also stopped at a station called Pontypool Clarence Street on the edge of the town centre) closed in 1964 - the latter being the only rail service in the area which actually did fall victim to Beeching.  In 1972 the station was renamed to just Pontypool and again in 1994 to Pontypool and New Inn, to reflect its actually location in the suburb to the south-east of the town, but it is now an unmanned station with few amenities, and only approximately half of the passenger trains on the line stop there, the rest going straight through.The once famous Clarence Hotel was redeveloped in 2004-05 http://www.geograph.org.uk/photo/258748 and converted into flats and offices http://www.geograph.org.uk/photo/357794. In April 2006 a new Wetherspoons pub was opened on Osborne Road and named in honour of John Capel Hanbury, former owner of Pontypool Park House (now Albans R.C. High School).In March 2011 the local council reported the winning of bids to various bodies including the lottery heritage fund for further works of regeneration in the town centre. The Pontypool regeneration fund is worth aprox 13m and will fund restoration works to key buildings, including the market hall, and will allow property owners access to 80% grants for works.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/uk-wales-south-east-wales-12865282)EducationThe town is home to three schools: Monmouth School, (formerly Jones West Monmouth School for Boys) and Comprehensive School (formerly Abersychan Grammar). Community School has been closed. This was formerly Pontypool Grammar School for Girls (also known as The County), although at one time the sole campus was where the Welsh medium school, Gyfun Gwynllyw now stands. In addition there is a school, Albans R.C. High School. There is also a Gwent campus located in the town, formerly known as Pontypool College.Sport and leisureLeisure Centre in Park is a centre with the only swimming venue in Pontypool. It has a 25 metre Swimming Pool for competitive swimming galas and viewing for up to 200 spectators. It also has a separate teaching pool and two hydroslides.Park is also home to Wales oldest and longest artificial Ski slope. Built in 1974 and at 230m long it is used for leisure and by the Welsh Ski Squad for training (http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/uk-wales-12358101) . It is currently closed for part of the year due to local council funding cutbacks.RugbyPontypool Rugby Football Club is one of the towns cornerstones. Founded in the 1870s, the club became a founder member of the Rugby Union in 1881. Under the captaincy of Cobner the intervening years saw Poola become one of the great teams of Welsh rugby. The legendary Pontypool Front Row in the 1970s, of Windsor, Faulkner and Price was immortalised in song by Boyce. Whilst the teams contribution to Wales was seen again in 1983, when Pontypools forward factory produced five of the Welsh pack in the Nations Championship. Other union clubs based in or near the town are United RFC, RFC, RFC and RFC. Pontypools league club are called the Tigers and play in the League Conference Welsh Premier.Notable people:See also People from PontypoolThe British experimental film-maker, writer and poet Jane Arden (ne Norah Patricia Morris) was born in Twmpath Road, Pontypool in 1927. Members of the influential band, Street Preachers James Edwards, Dean Bradfield and Sean Moore were also born there. Poet Haycock and opera singer Gwyneth Jones were also born in the Pontypool area. Actor Hopkins attended Monmouth School as a boarder for a brief time. Politicians Ruddock and Jenkins were born and educated in the area. Other notable people born or brought up in the area include screenwriter Collins, actress Daniel, footballers Ebdon and Villars, model and presenter Giles, author David Llewellyn, Dainton of Dirty Sanchez. The experimental musician Steve Parry of the band Hwyl Nofio was born in Inn.ReferencesExternal links* * Pontypools Only Community website - with History~Pictures~Forums - Covering All Of Pontypool* Old Francis Frith photographs of Pontypool* Pontypool Round Table No. 867* www.geograph.co.uk : photos of Pontypool and surrounding area* Gwent Army Cadet Force- Pontypool detachment  * bg:cy:Pont-y-plde:Pontypooleo:Pontypoolfr:Pontypoolnl:Pontypoolno:Pontypoolpl:Pontypoolsk:Pontypoolfi:Pontypooluk:
578140
Thorne,_South_Yorkshire
Thorne is a town and civil parish in the Borough of Doncaster in Yorkshire, England.  It has a population of 16,592.(Office for National Statistics : Census 2001 : Parish Headcounts : Doncaster Retrieved 2009-08-27)GeographyIt lies east of the River Don, on the and Keadby Canal, and is located at approximately , at an elevation of around 5 metres above level, on the Yorkshire side of the border with Lincolnshire. The civil parish of Thorne also takes in the village of Moorends to the north.The town is served by two stations: Thorne North, and Thorne South; as well as Junction 6 of the M18 and junction 1 of the M180. The A614 runs through the town, crossing the canal.HistoryThe land which is now Thorne was once inhabited by Neolithic, Age and Age people. It became a permanent settlement around AD700, and is mentioned in the Book.The main industries in the town have traditionally been mining and farming, although many residents now commute to Doncaster.Places of interestBand concerts are held in the park during the summer months, which is also the location for the Memorial Park Miniature Railway and the annual Thorne Festival. The area now has its very own Radio station, 95.3. Notable buildings in the town include the eleventh century church and the motte of Peel Hill Castle. Other attractions include the extensive Thorne Moors.LandmarksThere are Dutch-like bridges over canals, such as the Wykewell bridge. There are two large water towers. The parish church is St Nicholas.SportLocal rugby league side Marauders RLFC play in the Yorkshire league during the winter season and the League Conference during the summer.Thorne is also home to the rugby union side Thornensians RUFC who currently play in Yorkshire Division 3.Speedway racing, then known as Dirt Track racing, was staged a track on the southern edge of the town in 1930. Billed as The Wembley of the North the track was a bit basic and followed the edge of the football pitch on the inside of the track. Rather than two sweeping bends, the track shown on contemporary ordnance survey maps, had four corners and four straights.SchoolIn September 2005 a newly built school, Trinity Academy, opened in Thorne. Specialising in Business and Enterprise. The 24 million state of the art Academy has nine classes per year group, and an initial school population of 1250 children, between the ages of 11  18, and is the third Christian Ethos school founded by Sir Peter Vardy. In 2004, only 21 per cent of students from Thorne and Moorends achieved five or more passes at grade C or above. But Trinity has revolutionised education in the area and was named as Englands most improved academy last yearThe new Academy replaced Grammar School, a once notable provider of distinguished education, which boasts many famous alumni, including Garrett; Porter, a prize-winning chemist; Charles Spencer, a renowned pianist; and Sir Graham Hall, former CEO of Electricity.Notable peopleNotable people from Thorne include Clarke and Crapper. Former professional footballer Jenkinson, who represented Wales internationally, is from Thorne. Coultard, former captain of England womens football team during the 1990s is also born and bred in Thorne. Worrall who plays for Leeds Rhinos after switching codes from rugby union, was born in Thorne.Garrett, operatic soprano, attended Grammar School and was reunited with the Thorne of her past in the BBC documentary series Who Do You Think You Are?.ReferencesExternal links* Thorne and Moorends Town Council* TMCR FM Community Radio, 95.3 Covering north-east Doncaster from a base in Thorne.* Friends of Buntings Wood, adopt a tree on this restoration site.* Thorne Memorial Park Miniature Railway Open most Sundays, check the site for details..* Waterstart, a waterways based training and recreational facility based at Thorne* The Bungalow Project, Moorends Drug Awareness and Support Group(South Yorkshire)(South Yorkshire)nl:Thornenn:Thornepl:Thornero:Thorne
582029
The_Nashville_Teens
The Nashville Teens are a British pop band formed in Weybridge, Surrey in Summer 1962.HistoryArthur Sharp began his career in music as the manager of Aerco Records in Surrey. The groups line-up eventually comprised singers Sharp and Ray Phillips, with former Rock Combo members Hawken (piano), Mick Dunford (guitar), Pete Shannon Harris (bass) and Dave Maine (drums). Roger Groome replaced Maine shortly afterwards but was in turn replaced by Jenkins in 1963, in which year a third vocalist, Terry Crowe, joined briefly and Dunford left, to be replaced by John Allen. (Crowe and Dunford later formed The Plebs with Danny McCulloch and were re-united with Hawken in Renaissance in 1970). While playing in Hamburg (as several British bands of the era did) the Teens backed Lee Lewis for his at the Star Club, Hamburg album, widely considered one of the greatest live and roll albums ever.(Peter Checksfield, Jerry Lee Lewis. The Greatest Live Show on Earth, Collector, #188 - April 1995, p. 79.)(Milo Miles, Album review of Live at the Star Club, Hamburg. Stone, #899/900 - July 2002, p.112.)(Q Magazine, #1, 2002, p.59.)(Mojo, 3/01/04, p.52.)(Stephen Thomas Erlewine, Album Review: Live at the Star Club, Hamburg at Allmusic.)(Steven Stoulder, Editorial review of Live at the Star Club, Hamburg at Amazon.com.) Music critic Thomas Erlewine writes, Live at the Star Club is extraordinary, the purest, hardest rock & roll ever committed to record.(They later backed Perkins on his single Big Bad Blues (May 1964), and also played with Berry when he toured Britain.(Many sources state that the group also backed Diddley but Arthur Sharp denies this in the booklet accompanying the CD sampler Rockin Back To Tobacco Road.) At one concert they were spotted by Most who subsequently produced their June 1964 debut single, an interpretation of the D. Loudermilk penned song, Tobacco Road, which reached number 6 in the Singles Chart and number 14 in the U.S.Hot 100 chart. Jim Sullivan and Page played guitars on the studio cut of Tobacco Road. The follow-up, another Loudermilk song, Google Eye, reached number 10 in the UK in October 1964. The Nashville Teens producers also included Loog Oldham and Talmy.A further three top fifty singles, Find My Way Back Home and The Little Bird, followed in February and May 1965 and The Hard Way made a brief appearance the following year but three subsequent records (I Know How It Feels To Be Loved, Forbidden Fruit and Thats My Woman) all failed to chart. Jenkins left in 1966 to join Animals, and was replaced by his predecessor Roger Groome. Reportedly Ray Phillips got an offer to join Cream in 1966. He refused.(Brian Hogg in the booklet accompanying the 1993 CD The Best of the Nashville Teens 1964-1969.)Although musically as competent as any of their contemporaries, the groups lack of distinctive personality contributed to their lack of long-term success, as did Deccas poor promotion. (By 1970, Deccas only remaining rock acts were Rolling Stones and Moody Blues, both of whom handled their own promotion.) In the late Sixties the group returned to its old craft: backing other artists like Carl Perkins, Chuck Berry and Vincent.(Chris May and Tim Phillips, British Beat, Sociopack Publications, London, 1974, p. 61.) In 1971 they released a single, Ella James, a Wood-penned song originally recorded by Move, on the Parlophone label, again without success. Arthur Sharp left in 1972 to join their one-time manager Arden, and Trevor Williams joined. Despite Phillipss efforts the Nashville Teens split in 1973. They reformed in 1980, however, with Phillips as the only original member, joined by Peter Agate (guitar), Len Surtees (bass) and Adrian Metcalfe (drums). The band is still working. Phillips joined The British Invasion All-Stars in the 1990s and made three albums with the group, consisting of members of Yardbirds, Harum, Pretty Things, Sect and other groups. They did a cover of Tobacco Road that still receives airplay on XM Satellite Radio. The current line-up is Phillips, Metcalfe, Pattenden (bass and vocals), Simon Spratley (keyboards and vocals) and Ken Osborn (guitar).A 1993 EMI label compilation, Best of the Nashville Teens, contained a re-recording of their Tobacco Road hit which is the only version available on iTunes.(Allmusic review)Appearances in filmsThe Nashville Teens appeared in three films in 1965;In Gear by Frederic Goode(Pop Gear in The Internet Movie Database) a long series of pop artists play one or two songs; Beatles live before an audience while Animals, Honeycombs, & Gordon and Hermits) mime in a studio. The Nashville Teens mime Tobacco Road and Google Eye. In the States the film was brought out as Go Go Mania.In Be My Guest,(Be My Guest in The Internet Movie Database) a family has inherited a hotel in Brighton. Their son works at a local paper and tries to set up a pop group of which one member is played by Marriott. A talent scout scene is a pretext to present a few artists, among them The Nashville Teens who also back Lee Lewis.Gonks Go Beat by Robert Hartford-Davis(Gonks Go Beat in The Internet Movie Database) is set in the distant future. An alien from the planet Gonk comes to Earth to establish peace between the two remaining nations,one of which prefers and roll and the other ballads and his task involves listening to The Teens, Lulu and The Bond Organisation.In 2010, The Nashville Teens hit Tobacco Road was featured on the 4th season premiere of the hit AMC TV show Men.DiscographySingles* Tobacco Road/I Like It Like That (1964) - # 6 (Singles Chart), # 14 (Hot 100)* Google Eye/T.N.T. (1964) - # 10 (UK) # 117 (US)* Find My Way Back Home/Devil In Law (1965) - # 34 (UK)* The Little Bird/Whatcha Gonna Do (1965)(Marianne Faithfull recorded the same song under the title This Little Bird.) - # 38 (UK) # 123 (US)* I Know How It Feels To Be Loved/Soon Forgotten (1965)* The Hard Way/Upside Down (1966) - # 45 (UK)* Forbidden Fruit/Revived 45 Time (1966)* Thats My Woman/Words (1967)* Im Coming Home/Searching (1967)* The Biggest Night of Her Life/Last Minute (1967)* Along The Watchtower/Sun Dog (1968)* The Lament of the Cherokee Reservation Indian/Looking For You (1969)* Ella James/Tennessee Woman (1971)* You Shouldnt Have Been So Nice/Tell The People (1972, never released)()EP*The Nashville Teens: How Deep Is the Ocean, I Need You Baby (Mona), Parchman Farm, Bread and Butter Man (1964)LP albums*Tobacco Road (released in the US and Canada, 1964):**Tobacco Road, I Need You Baby (Mona), Need You, Bread and Butter Man, Hurting Inside, Hootchie Kootchie Man, Google Eye, Too Much, Parchman Farm, I Like It Like That, How Deep Is the Ocean, La Bamba*Nashville Teens (1972):**The Biggest Night of Her Life, Let It Rock/Rocking on the Railroad, Im a Lonely One, Chantilly Lace, Day and Night, Ex Kay on LX, Widdicombe Fair, Along the Watchtower, Miss Clawdy, Tobacco Road, The Little Bird, Break Up, Sun Dog, Im Coming HomeCD samplers*The Best of the Nashville Teens 1964-1969 (1993):**Tobacco Road, I Need You Baby (Mona), T.N.T., Parchman Farm, Need You, La Bamba, Bread and Butter Man, Google Eye, Hootchie Kootchie Man, How Deep Is the Ocean, Find My Way Back Home, Devil-in-Law, Too Much, Hurtin Inside, I Like It Like That, Searching, Soon Forgotten, The Little Bird, Im Coming Home, The Hard Way, Words, Thats My Woman, The Lament of the Cherokee Reservation Indian, Looking For You*Tobacco Road (produced in Germany, 2000):**Tobacco Road; I Need You Baby (Mona), Need You, Bread and Butter Man, Hurtin Inside, Hootchie Kootchie Man, Google Eye, Too Much, Parchman Farm,(Erroneously called Parchment Farm on the cover.) I Like It Like That, How Deep Is the Ocean, La Bamba, T.N.T., Devil-in-Law, Find My Way Back Home, Whatcha Gonna Do, I Know How It Feels to Be Loved, Upside Down, Forbidden Fruit, Revived 45 Time, Thats My Woman, Im Coming Home, The Biggest Night of Her Life, Last Minute, Along the Watchtower, Sun Dog, Poor Boy,(Song from the film Gonks Go Beat.) Ella James, Tennessee Woman*Rockin Back To Tobacco Road (2007):(The first twelve tracks are Nashville Teens recordings from the years 1966-1968, meant for radio broadcasts. The other tracks are recordings from the years 1969-1971 with Ray Phillips and Arthur Sharp as singers, backed by various studio musicians.)**Let It Rock/Rocking on the Railroad, Im a Lonely One, Chantilly Lace, Break Up, Tobacco Road, Widdicombe Fair, Miss Clawdy, Ex Kay on LX, The Biggest Night of Her Life, Last Minute, Along the Watchtower, Sun Dog, Hitch Hike, The Little Bird, Widdicombe Fair (alternate version), The Lament of the Cherokee Reservation Indian, Train Keeps a-Rollin, Tennessee Woman, Fishhead, New York Mining Disaster, Half Breed, Day and NightMembers;Current members*Ray Phillips - Lead Vocals, Bass (1962-1973; 1980-present)*Adrian Metcalfe - Drums (1980-present)*Pattenden - Bass, Lead Vocals (?-present)*Simon Spratley - Keyboards (?-present)*Ken Osborn - Lead Guitars (?-present);Former members*Arthur Sharp - Guitars, Lead Vocals (1962-1972)*Hawken - Keyboards (1962-1968)*Pete Shannon Harris - Bass, Guitars (1962-1966)*Mick Dunford - Lead Guitars (1962-1963)*Dave Maine - Drums (1962)*Roger Groome - Drums (1962-1963; 1966-1973)*Jenkins - Drums (1963-1966)*Terry Crowe - Lead Vocals (1963)*John Allen - Lead Guitars (1963-1969)*Neil Korner - Bass (1966-1969)*Len Tuckey - Lead Guitars (1969-1973)*Roger Dean - Bass (1969-1973)*Trevor Williams - Lead Vocals, Bas)s (1972-1973)*Peter Agate - Lead Guitars (1980-?*Len Surtees - Bass (1980-?)See also*of 1960s one-hit wonders in the United States*of artists under the Decca Records label*of performers on Top of the Pops*Invasion*RecordsReferencesExternal links*Nashville Teens web site*Nashville Teens biography on AMGNashville TeensNashville TeensNashville TeensNashville TeensNashville Teens
584593
Lake_Burley_Griffin
Yarramundi ReachLake Burley Griffin is an artificial lake in the centre of Canberra, the capital of Australia. It was completed in 1963 after the Riverwhich ran between the city centre and Trianglewas dammed. It is named after Burley Griffin, the American architect who won the competition to design the city of Canberra.()Griffin designed the lake with many geometric motifs, so that the axes of his design lined up with natural geographical landmarks in the area. However, government authorities changed his original plans and no substantial work was completed before he left Australia in 1920. His scheme remained unfulfilled as the Depression and War II intervened, and it was not until the 1950s that planning resumed. After much political dispute over several proposed variations, excavation work began in 1960 with the energetic backing of Prime Minister Menzies. After the completion of the bridges and dams, the dams were locked in September 1963. However, a drought meant that the target water level was not reached until April 1964. It was formally inaugurated on 17 October 1964.The lake is located in the approximate geographic centre of the city, and is the centrepiece of the capital in accordance with Griffins original designs. Numerous important institutions, such as the National Gallery, National Museum, National Library, National University and the High Court were built on its shores, and Parliament House is a short distance away. Its surrounds, consisting mainly of parklands, are popular with recreational users, particularly in the warmer months. Though swimming in the lake is uncommon, it is used for a wide variety of other activities, such as rowing, fishing, and sailing.The lake is an ornamental body with a length of ; at its widest, it measures . It has an average depth of  and a maximum depth of about  near the Dam. Its flow is regulated by the  tall Scrivener Dam, designed to handle floods that occur once in 5,000 years. In times of drought, water levels can be maintained through the release of water from Dam, located on an upstream tributary of the Molonglo River.Design historyFile:Walterburleygriffin.jpg|thumb|Walter Burley Griffin, the architect who designed Canberra, and after whom the lake is named, and his wife and assistant Mahony Griffin. |altWalter Burley Griffin stands next to his wife (left to right) in a grass paddock. His wife is looking to the left of the photo. He is wearing a suit and trousers, she a dress.Charles Robert Scrivener (18551923) recommended the site for Canberra in 1909, which was to be a planned capital city for the country. One of the reasons for the locations selection was its ability to store water for ornamental purposes at reasonable cost;(Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 3.) Scriveners work had demonstrated that the topography could be used to create a lake through flooding.(In 1911, a competition for the design of Canberra was launched, and Scriveners detailed survey of the area was supplied to the competing architects.( The River flowed through the site, which was a flood plain(Sparke, pp. 47.) and Scriveners survey showed in grey an area clearly representing an artificial lakesimilar to the lake later createdand four possible locations for a dam to create it.()() Most of the proposals took the hint and included artificial bodies of water.( Walter Burley Griffins design The American architect Burley Griffin won the contest and was invited to Australia to oversee the construction of the nations new capital after the judges decision was ratified by OMalley, the Minister for Home Affairs.((Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 4.) Griffins proposal, which had an abundance of geometric patterns, incorporated concentric hexagonal and octagonal streets emanating from several radii.(Wigmore, p. 67.)His lake design was at the heart of the city and consisted of a Central Basin in the shape of circular segment, a West and East Basin, which were both approximately circular, and a West and East Lake, which were much larger and irregularly shaped, at either side of the system.(Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, pp. 67.) The East Lake was supposed to be  higher than the remaining components.(Andrews, p. 89.) Griffins proposal was the grandest scheme submitted, yet it had an appealing simplicity and clarity.(The lakes were deliberately designed so that their orientation was related to various topographical landmarks in Canberra.(( The lakes stretched from east to west and divided the city in two; a land axis perpendicular to the central basin stretched from Capital Hillthe future location of the new Parliament House on a mound on the southern sidenorth northeast across the central basin to the northern banks along Anzac Parade to the War Memorial (although a casino was originally planned in its place).( This was designed so that looking from Capital Hill, the War Memorial stood directly at the foot of Ainslie. At the southwestern end of the land axis was Peak.(Wigmore, p. 64.)The straight edge of the circular segment that formed the central basin was designated the water axis, and it extended northwest towards Black Mountain,( the highest point in Canberra. A line parallel to the water axis, on the northern side of the city, was designated the municipal axis.(Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 17.) The municipal axis became the location of Constitution Avenue, which linked City Hill in Civic Centre and Market Centre. Commonwealth Avenue and Kings Avenue were to run from the southern side from Capital Hill to City Hill and Market Centre on the north respectively, and they formed the western and eastern edges of the central basin. The area enclosed by the three avenues was known as the Triangle, and was to form the centrepiece of Griffins work.(Later, Scrivener, as part of a government design committee, was responsible for modifying Griffins winning design.(()(  ) He recommended changing the shape of the lake from Griffins very geometric shapes to a much more organic one using a single dam, unlike Griffins series of weirs.(( Griffin lobbied for the retention of the pure geometry, saying that they were one of the reasons detre of the ornamental waters, but he was overruled.(Andrews, pp. 8889.) The new design included elements from several of the best design submissions and was widely criticised as being ugly. The new plan for the lake retained Griffins three formal basins: east, central, and west, though in a more relaxed form.((Wigmore, pp. 5257.)Griffin entered into correspondence with the government over the plan and its alternatives, and he was invited to Canberra to discuss the matter.(Wigmore, pp. 6163.) Griffin arrived in August 1913 and was appointed Federal Capital Director of Design and Construction for three years.((Wigmore, p. 63.)The plans were varied again in the following years, but the design of Lake Burley Griffin remained based largely on the original committees plan.( It was later gazetted and legally protected by the federal parliament in 1926,(Sparke, p. 2.) based on a 1918 plan.( However, Griffin had a strained working relationship with the Australian authorities and a lack of federal government funding meant that by the time he left in 1920, little significant work had been done on the city.((Wigmore, pp. 6979.) A 1920s proposal to reduce West Lake into a ribbon of water was made on the basis of flood safety. However, the Owen and Peake report of 1929 ruled that the original design was hydrologically sound.(Political disputes and modificationsWith the onset of the Depression, followed by War II, development of the new capital was slow,(Sparke, p. 6.) and in the decade after the end of the war, Canberra was criticised for resembling a village,(Sparke, pp. 13.)( and its disorganised collection of buildings was deemed ugly.(Sparke, pp. 79.) Canberra was often derisively described as several suburbs in search of a city.(Minty, p. 804.)During this time, the Molonglo River flowed through the flood basin, with only a small fraction of the water envisaged in Griffins plan.(Sparke, p. 14.) The centre of his capital city consisted of mostly farmland, with small settlementsmostly wooden, temporary and ad hocon either side.(Sparke, pp. 67.) There was little evidence that Canberra was planned,( and the lake and Parliamentary Triangle at the heart of Griffins plan was but a paddock.( Royal Canberra Golf Course, and Acton Racecourse and a sports ground were located on the pastoral land that was to become the West Lake, and people had to disperse the livestock before playing sport.( A rubbish dump stood on the northern banks of the location of central basin,(Sparke, p. 5.) and no earth had been moved since Griffins departure three decades earlier.(Sparke, p. 131.)In 1950, the East Lakethe largest componentwas eliminated upon the advice of the National Capital Planning and Development Committee (NCPDC).(Wigmore, p. 151.) Today, what would have been the East Lake corresponds to the suburb of Fyshwick. The rationale given was that around  of farmland would be submerged and that the Molonglo would have insufficient water to keep the lake filled.(In 1953, the NCPDC excised the West Lake from its plans and replaced it with a winding stream,(Wigmore, p. 152.) which was  wide and covered around a fifth of the original area.( As the NCPDC had only advisory powers, this change was attributed to the influence of senior officials in the Department of the Interior who felt that Griffins plan was too grandiose.(Sparke, p. 11.) Advocates of watered-down scheme thought it was more economical and saved  of land for development.( However, according to engineering reports that were ignored, the smaller plan would actually cost more money and require a more complicated structure of dams that would in any case be less able to prevent flooding.(Sparke, pp. 1314.)(Andrews, p. 90.)Initially, there was little opposition during the consultation period before the alterations were made.(Sparke, p. 13.) However, opposition to the reduction of the water area grew.( The process that resulted in the alteration was criticised for being non-transparent and sneaky.(Sparke, pp. 1315.) Some organisations complained that they were not given an opportunity to express their opinion before the change was gazetted,(Sparke, p. 16.) and many politicians and the chief town planner were not informed.(Sparke, pp. 1617.) Critics bitterly insinuated that politically influential members of the Canberra Golf Club, whose course was situated on the location of the proposed West Lake, were responsible for the change in policy.(Sparke, pp. 1516.)The Parliamentary Public Works Committee advised the Parliament to restore the West Lake.( After an inquiry in late 1954, it concluded that:The Prime Minister, Menzies,(Sparke, p. 30.) regarded the state of the national capital as an embarrassment. Over time his attitude changed from one of contempt to that of championing its development. He fired two ministers charged with the development of the city, feeling that their performance lacked intensity.(Sparke, pp. 3132.)In 1958, the newly created Capital Development Commission (NCDC), which had been created and given more power by Menzies following a 1955 Senate inquiry,( restored the West Lake to its plans,(Wigmore, p. 153.) and it was formally gazetted in October 1959.(Sparke, p. 17.) The NCDC also blocked a plan by the Department of Works to build a bridge across the lake along the land axis between Parliament House and the War Memorial contrary to Griffins plans.(Sparke, pp. 1921.)A powerful Senate Select Committee oversaw the NCDC and renowned British architect Sir Holford was brought in to fine-tune Griffins original plans.(Sparke, pp. 5657.) He changed the central basins geometry so that it was no longer a segment of circle; he converted the southern straight edge into a polygonal shape with three edges and inserted a gulf on the northern shore.(Sparke, pp. 6061.) The result was closer to Scriveners modified design some decades earlier.(Sparke, p. 132.)thumb|left|300px|Map of Lake Burley Griffin|altA map of the ACT with an inset into the centre of Canberra and the lake, with the various portions of the lake and islands labelled. Final layout The lake contains  of water with a surface area of . It is  long,  wide at its widest point, has a shoreline of (Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 1.)( and a water level of  above sea level.(The lake is relatively shallow; the maximum depth is  near the Scrivener Dam, and the average depth is . The shallowest part of the complex in the East Basin, which has an average depth of . The minimum depth of the water at the walls is around  and rock is placed at the toe of the wall to inhibit aquatic plant growth.(Andrews, p. 88.)(Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 8.)Lake Burley Griffin contains six islands, three unnamed small islands and three larger named islands.(Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 9.) Of the larger islands, Island is located in Central Basin while Springbank and Spinnaker Island are located in the West Lake.( Aspen Island is connected to dry land by a footbridge,() and is the site of the National Carillon.(Sparke, p. 174.)ConstructionIn 1958, engineers conducted studies into the hydrology and structural requirements needed for the building of the dam.(Sparke, p. 131.) Further studies were done to model water quality, siltation, climate effects and change in land quality.(Andrews, p. 91.) Modelling based on the data collection suggested that the water level could be kept within a metre of the intended level of  above sea level in the case of a flood.(Sparke, p. 136.)(Andrews, p. 92.)In February 1959, formal authority for beginning construction was granted.(Sparke, p. 132.) However, while Menzies was on holidays, some officials from the Department of Treasury convinced ministers to withhold money needed for the lake, so the start of the construction was delayed.( Once it started, progress was fast.( At its peak, the number of people physically working on the construction in the lakes was between 400 and 500.( John Overall, the Commissioner of the NCDC, promised Menzies that the work would be finished within four years, and he succeeded, despite the Prime Ministers scepticism. Equipment was quickly requisitioned.(Sparke, p. 135.)After the lengthy political wrangling over the design had passed, the criticism of the scheme died down. Menzies strongly denounced the moaning by opponents of the lake.( Most critics decried the project as a waste of money that should have been spent on essential services across Australia.( Less strident concerns centred on the potentially negative effects of the lake, such as mosquitoes, ecological degeneration,( siltation and the possibility that the lake would create fog.( The latter of these concerns has proven to be unfounded.(Lakes, islands and foreshorethumb|right|Southern end of Kings Avenue Bridge under construction with Australian War Memorial at far left c. 1961|altKings Avenue Bridge under construction. The bridge is incomplete and only the pylons and platform on the southern side are in place. The site is surrounded by dust and the lakebed is dried out.The excavation of Lake Burley Griffin began in 1960 with the clearing of vegetation from the floodplain of the Molonglo River. The trees on the golf course and along the river were pulled up, along with the various sports grounds and houses.(Sparke, pp. 136138.)During major earthworks, at least  of topsoil was excavated.(Sparke, p. 138.) It was collected for use at several public parks and gardens,( including the future Commonwealth Park on the northern shore. It was also used to create the six artificial islands including Springbank Island. The island was named after the former Springbank Farm that was situated there.( Land excavated to create a sailing course at Yarralumla was used for the thematically named Spinnaker Island to its north, while excavated stone was moved beside the Kings Avenue Bridge at the eastern edge of the central basin from Aspen Island.(((Andrews, p. 94.)Care was taken to excavate the entire lake floor to a depth of at least  to provide sufficient clearance for boat keels. Another reason given for this was that mosquitoes would not breed nor would weeds grow at such a depth.( A soil conservation program was launched in the catchment and bed load traps were installed to minimise loss of earth.( The traps have been used as a source of sand and gravel for building sites.( Drainage blankets were used to prevent the loss of groundwater beneath the lake.(During the following phase of work, four types of lake margin were constructed.( On the southern side of the Central Basin, low reinforced concrete retaining walls were used,(( while on the eastern side, grouted rock wall can be seen near Commonwealth Park, as well as much of the East Basin.(( Sand and gravel beaches were built to cater for lakeside recreational pursuits. These are mostly prevalent on the western half of the lake complex.(( Rocky outcrops, steeply sloping stable shores with water vegetation such as bullrushes were also used. This treatment is evident in the West Lake in Yarralumla.(( William Holford and Partners were responsible for the foreshore landscaping, and over 55,000 trees were planted in accordance with a detailed scheme.((Minty, p. 809.) Eucalypts were preferred so as to maintain the natural colour of the city landscape.(BridgesLake Burley Griffin is crossed by Commonwealth Avenue Bridge (),( Kings Avenue Bridge( (() and a roadway over Dam. The two bridges were constructed before the lake was filled, and replaced wooden structures.( Site testing for both the Commonwealth Avenue and Kings Avenue bridges took place during late 1959 to early 1960.( The construction of the Kings Avenue Bridge began in 1960, followed by Commonwealth Avenue Bridge the year after.( Fortunately for the builders, Canberra was in a drought and the ground remained dry during construction.( Both bridges use post-tensioned concrete,( reinforced with rustproof steel cables.(Andrews, p. 34.)Both bridges are made of concrete and steel and are dual-carriageway;(Sparke, pp. 138139.)(Wigmore, p. 189.) Commonwealth Avenue has three lanes in each direction while Kings Avenue has two.((Andrews, pp. 3031.) Instead of traditional lamp post lighting, Kings Avenue Bridge was illuminated by a series of fluorescent tubes on the handrails, a concept known as integral lighting.(Andrews, p. 141.) The design was deemed a success, so it was introduced to the Commonwealth Avenue Bridge also. Both structures won awards from the Illumination Engineering Society.(Andrews, pp. 141142.)Kings Avenue Bridge opened on 10 March 1962. Prime Minister Menzies unlocked a ceremonial chain before the motorcade and pageant crossed the lake in front of a large crowd.( Commonwealth Avenue Bridge opened in 1963 without an official ceremony. Menzies called it the finest building in the national capital.(DamThe dam that holds back the waters of Lake Burley Griffin was named Dam after Charles Robert Scrivener.(Sparke, p. 132.) The dam was designed and built by Rheinstahl Union Bruckenbau in Germany,(( and utilised state-of-the-art post-tensioning techniques to cope with any problems or movements in the riverbed.( This was required because of the quartz porphery amd geological faulting upon which the dam sits.( About  of concrete was used in its construction. The dam is  high and  long with a maximum wall thickness of . The dam is designed to handle a once in 5,000 year flood event.() Construction began in September 1960 and the dam was locked in September 1963.(The dam has five bay spillway controlled by  wide,( hydraulically operated fish-belly flap gates.( The fish-belly gates allow for a precise control of water level, reducing the dead area on the banks between high and low water levels. The five gates have only been opened simultaneously once in the dams history, during heavy flooding in 1976.( The gates hold two thirds of the lakes volume.( They were designed to allow easy flow of debris out of the lake.(The dam has the capacity to allow a flow of  but can withstand up to  before catastrophic damage results;(Minty, p. 806.)(Andrews, p. 93.) A flow of  can be dealt with without any substantial change in the water level.( The highest recorded flow in the Molonglo was  during an earlier flood.(Lady Denman Drive, a roadway atop the dam wall, provides a third road crossing for the lake. It consists of a roadway and a bicycle path,( and allows residents in western Canberra to cross the lake.( This was possible because the dam gates are closed by pushing up from below, unlike most previous designs that wherein the gates were lifted from above.(Sparke, p. 140.)Lake fillingA prolonged drought coincided with and eased work on the lakes construction. The valves on the Scrivener Dam were closed on 20 September 1963 by Minister for the Interior, Freeth; Menzies was absent due to ill health.( Several months on, with no rain in sight, mosquito-infested pools of water were the only visible sign of the lake filling.( With the eventual breaking of the drought, the lake reached the planned level on 29 April 1964.(Sparke, p. 141.) On 17 October 1964, Menzies (by now Sir Robert) commemorated the filling of the lake and the completion of stage one with an opening ceremony amid the backdrop of sailing craft.(() The ceremony was accompanied by fireworks display, and Griffins lake had finally come to fruition after five decades, at the cost of AUD5,039,050.(( Freeth suggested that Menzies had been in a material sense the father of the lake and that the lake should be named after him.(Sparke, pp. 97, 132.) Menzies insisted that the lake should be named after Griffin.(In times of severe drought, Lake Burley Griffins water level can fall unacceptably low. When this happens, a release of water from Googong Dam located upstream can be scheduled to top up and restore the lake water level.(Sparke, pp. 220221.) The Googong Dam is located on the River which is a tributary of the Molonglo River.( The dam whose construction was finished in 1979 is one of three damsthe Cotter and Corin Dams are the othersthat meet the water supply needs of the Canberra and Queanbeyan region.(ACT Infrastructure Five-yearly report to the Council of Australian Governments (COAG), p. 4041.)  The Googong Dams water carrying capacity is .(ACT Infrastructure Five-yearly report to the Council of Australian Governments (COAG), p. 42.) Later history and developmentGriffins design made the lake a focal point of the city. In the four decades since the initial construction of the lake, various buildings of national importance were added. According to the policy plan of the government, The lake is not only one of the centrepieces of Canberras plan in its own right, but forms the immediate foreground of the National Parliamentary Area.(The creation of the lake also gave a water frontage to many prominent institutions that were previously landlocked. The Royal Canberra Hospital was located on the Peninsula between the West Lake and the West Basin on the north shore until its demolition.(Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 18.) Government House, the historic Cottagewhich was built over 50 years before construction of Canberra beganand the newly built National University, on the southern and northern shores of the West Lake, both gained a waterfront.(In 1970, two tourist attractions were added to the middle of Central Basin. The James Cook Memorial was built by the government to commemorate the Bicentenary of (then Lieutenant) Cooks first sighting of the east coast of Australia. It includes a water jet fountain located in the central basin (based on the deau(http://www.nationalcapital.gov.au/downloads/education_and_understanding/factsheets/15CaptainCookMemorial.pdf) in Geneva) and a skeleton globe sculpture at Regatta Point showing the paths of Cooks expeditions. On 25 April 1970, Queen Elizabeth II officially inaugurated the memorial.(Sparke, pp. 173174.) As part of the same ceremony, Queen Elizabeth also opened the National Carillon on Aspen Island, a set of 53 bronze bells donated by the British Government to commemorate the citys 50th anniversary.(The completion of the central basin placed a waterway between Parliament House and the War Memorial and a landscaped boulevard was built along the land axis.(Sparke, pp. 113116.) Later, various buildings of national importance were built along the land axis in the late-1960s through to the early 1980s. The National Library was opened on the western side of the axis in April 1968.(Sparke, pp. 170171.) Building of the High Court and National Gallery occurred in the late-1970s and the buildings were opened in May 1980 and October 1982 respectively.(Sparke, pp. 307310.) The latter two buildings lie on the eastern side of the axis and are connected by an aerial bridge.((Sparke, p. 311.) In 1988, the new Parliament House was built on Capital Hill, thereby completing the most important structure in the Parliamentary Triangle.(The current home of the National Museum was built on the former site of the Royal Canberra Hospital in 2001.(( This occurred after the public were encouraged to watch the controlled demolition of the hospital in 1997, but a girl was killed by flying debris, leading to criticism of the ACT Government.()At the start of the 21st century, the layout of the lake was significantly altered for the first time since its construction, through the Kingston Foreshores Redevelopment on southern shore of the East Basin, which was planned in 1997.( A bidding process was enacted,()  multi-million dollar luxury apartment complexes were built in the suburb of Kingston,() driving property values to record-breaking levels.() After a dispute over the environmental impact of the development, building works commenced on the previously industrial lakeside area of the suburb.()() In 2007, work started to reclaim land from the lakebed to form a harbour, which is expected to turn the area into an entertainment hub.(The Powerhouse, which used to provide the citys power supply, was converted into the Glassworks in 2007, 50 years after the electricity generators stopped.() A  high tower of glass and light named Touching Lightly, will be built at Kingston after being approved by the government in April 2009. An environmentally friendly structure, it is expected to be completed in mid-2009.()In 2007, the government unveiled a proposal to redevelop the area surrounding the historic Albert Hall into a tourist and dining precinct. This included the building of an eight-storey building and the rezoning of some waterfront land currently designated as cultural to commercial.() It was met with widespread hostility from heritage activists and the general community, which submitted more than 3,300 signatories in a petition against the scheme.()() One of the criticisms was that the project was tilted too heavily towards business, and neglected the arts and community events.() The proposal was scrapped in 2009.()()()It has been proposed that a footbridge, to be named Bridge, be built between the Museum of Australia and Lennox Gardens on the south shore, in recognition of the contributions that immigrants have made to Australia.() The proposal has mostly received negative feedback.() An inquiry recommended that the bridge be redesigned or moved to accommodate the needs of other lake users.()Lakeside recreationThe surrounds of Lake Burley Griffin are very popular recreational areas. Public parks exist along most of the shore line, with free electric barbecue facilities, fenced-in swimming areas, picnic tables and toilets.( These parklands form a large part of the area around the lake, and occupy  in total.( Some of the parks reserved for public recreation include Commonwealth, Weston, Kings and Grevillea Parks, Lennox Gardens and Commonwealth Place.( Commonwealth and Kings Park on the northern shore of the Central Basin are among the two most popular. The former is an urban horticultural park and is the location of the Canberra Festival.( Commonwealth Park is the location of Floriade, an annual flower festival that is held for around a month in spring and attracts upwards of 300,000 visitors,() a number comparable to the city population. The largest flower festival in Australia,() the event is a major tourist attraction for the city, and legal action was threatened after another festival in Australia wanted to use the same name.() An expansion is being planned to coincide with the centenary of the national capital.() The Weston Park to the west is known for its woodland and conifers, while Black Mountain Peninsula is known as a picnicking site with eucalypts.( Grevillea and Bowen Parks on the East Basin tend to be little used.(Owing to the proliferation of beaches, boat ramps and jetties, the West Lake is the area most used by swimmers and vessels.( A bike path also surrounds the lake, and riding, walking or jogging around the lake are a popular activity on the weekends.(((Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 25.) Fireworks are often held over the lake on Years Eve, and a large show called Skyfire has been held at the lake since 1988.()( )Water sportsthumb|upright|left|Maricat on West Basin, Lake Burley Griffin with Black Mountain Tower in the background.|altCatamaran with two adults and a child aboard. It has a rainbow-coloured horizontal striped sail. The water is calm and empty and Telstra Tower is in the background.File:Black Swans Canberra.jpg|thumb|right|swans gather on East Basin, Lake Burley Griffin|altLarge number of black swans and much smaller black ducks close to the lake shore.Lake Burley Griffin, apart from being ornamental, is used for many recreational activities. Canoeing, sailing, paddleboating and windsurfing are popular.( A rowing course is set up at the western end of the lake.( The National Championships were held in the lake in 1964,( but high winds have deterred organisers. On one occasion, winds swept a boat into a bridge pylon.(Sparke, pp. 138144.) While not particularly popular, opportunities for swimming have been limited recently because of increasingly frequent lake closures due to concerns about water quality;() another deterrent against swimming is the generally cold water temperature.(Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 13.)(Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 27.)  During summer, the lake is used for the swim leg of numerous triathlon and aquathlon events including the Sri Chinmoy Triathlon Festival.()Generally, powerboat use on the lake is not permitted. Permits are available for the use of powered boats on the lake for use in rescue, training, commercial purposes or special interest (such as historic steam powered boats).() Molonglo Reach, an area of the Molonglo River just before it enters the east basin is set aside for water skiing, although it is currently suspended due to a cynobacteria outbreak. Powerboats may be used in this limited area.( )SafetyFile:National Carillon.jpg|thumb|upright|The Carillon on Aspen Island|altA tall modern concrete structure of three slabs, with the bells ensconced in the middle at the top, surrounded by landscaped grass and hedge.The lake is patrolled by the Federal Police police.( The water police give assistance to lake users, helping to right boats and towing crippled craft to shore.(At most swimming locations around Lake Burley Griffin there are fenced-in swimming areas for safety. In the more popular areas, there are also safety lockers with life belts and emergency phones for requesting help. Between 1962 and 1991, seven people died from drowning.( )For safety and water quality reasons, the lake has different zones for different activities.() The eastern extremity is zoned for primary contact water activities such as swimming and water skiing.( The East and Central Basins, closer to populated areas, are zoned for secondary contact water sports such as sailing or rowing.( West Lake and Tarcoola Reach, which covers the area between Commonwealth Avenue and Kurrajong Point, is the primary recreational area of the lake, and both primary and secondary contact water sports are permitted.( Yarramundi Reach near Scrivener Dam has a marked rowing course, and is zoned as secondary, although primary contact activities are also allowed.( Environmental issues Water qualityBurley Griffin, East Basin 2.JPG|thumb|Notice of closure due to blue-green algae on 5 June 2009|altA metal sign erected on the sandy shores of the lake advises of the ban on water activity due to pollutionToxic blue-green algae blooms are a reasonably common occurrence in the lake.( Warnings about coming into contact with the water are released when an bloom is detected. Attempts are being made to limit the amount of phosphates entering the lake in the hope of improving its water quality.() Blue-green algae (more correctly cyanobacteria) produce toxins, which can be harmful for humans and any other animals that come in contact with the contaminated water. There have been several cases of dogs being affected after playing in and drinking the lake water.()The water also appears murky due to a high level of turbidity;( however, this is not usually a health risk.( However, the turbidity, which is caused by wind, prevents photosynthetic stabilisation.(Minty, p. 810.) Siltation is not considered a major problem and is only a factor in the East Basin, but dredging is not required. The problem has eased with the construction of the Googong Dam, and the spectre of heavy metal pollution has receded,( partly due to the closure of some lead mines upstream.(Minty, p. 808.) However, leaching and groundwater leakage still causes some pollution.( Rubbish, oil and sediment traps have been set up at the incoming openings to the lake to minimise pollution.(Aquatic life and fishingFishing is quite popular in the lake. The most common species caught is the illegally introduced carp.(Lake Burley Griffin, Canberra : Policy Plan, p. 28.) Annual monitoring is carried out to determine fish populations. However, a number of less common species also inhabit the lake, including native cod, carp gudgeon and perch, as well as introduced goldfish, Gambusia, trout and trout.()Image:Lake burley griffin04.jpg|thumb|The view along Central Basin towards the Carillon and Defence Headquarters |altA small pontoon juts out onto the lake under the shade of a tree. Clouds are present in the sky.The lake has been stocked annually with a variety of introduced and native species and over half a million fish have been released since 1981.(Draft for public comment: Fish stocking plan for the Australian Capital Territory 20092014, pp. 56.) There have been many changes to the fish populations in the lake as well as stocking practices since it was first filled.(Regular stocking since the start of the 1980s have re-established reasonable populations of golden perch and Murray cod;( native fish that were indigenous to the Molonglo River before the lake was built, but had been lost to mining pollution of the Molonglo River in the first half of the 20th century.(Draft for public comment: Fish stocking plan for the Australian Capital Territory 20092014, p. 4.) The main reason for stocking is to boost fish stocks along the Molonglo, which have been depleted by overfishing, introduced species and habitat destruction. One of the motives for raising the level of Murray cod and golden perch is to balance the ecosystem by having them act as native predators of other fish.(Silver perch and brown trout were released in 198183 and 198789 respectively, but have not been stocked since.( Rainbow trout have been released sporadically, approximately once a decade, but have not been released since 200204,( due to unacceptably low survival rates. According to a government report, the reason for the low survival rate is unknown, but the dominance of carp in the competition for food is one prominent theory.( Golden perch and Murray cod have accounted for around four fifths of the released fish in the last three decades and have been the only fish stocked in the last five years.( The government plans to stock only these two species for the five years leading up to 2014.(Draft for public comment: Fish stocking plan for the Australian Capital Territory 20092014, p. 14.)NotesReferences*** *** * External links**Lake Burley Griffin Heritage Assessment with Lake Burley Griffin and Adjacent Lands Draft Heritage Management PlanBurley GriffinBurley GriffinBurley Griffin ()ja:Burley-GriffinBurley Griffinru:- ()zh:
